Authors
Rose 'Bams' Cooper
Number of Reviews
116

Title
Review for Hollywood Shuffle (1987)
HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE (1987)
Rated R; running time 81 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0093200
Written by: Robert Townsend, Keenen Ivory Wayans, Dom Irrera
Directed by: Robert Townsend
Cast: Robert Townsend, Anne-Marie Johnson, Craigus R. Johnson,
Helen Martin, Brad Sanders, Keenen Ivory Wayans, Ludie Washington,
Eugene R. Glazer, Lisa Mende, Dom Irrera, Sena Ayn Black,
Grand L. Bush, Roy Fegan, David McKnight, Nancy Cheryll Davis,
Damon Wayans, Richard Cummings Jr.
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshshuffle.html
Want to know what drives me to do my job as an entertainment critic?
[Trust me: it ain't the money].  Well, you've come to the right place.
If WILD WILD WEST was the impetus for me to co-found 3BlackChicks Review
with my partner The Diva, then for me, HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE is the
inspiration that keeps me going on.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE, a self-financed, semi-autobiographical film by writer
and director Robert Townsend, tells the story of Bobby Taylor
(Townsend), an inspiring actor struggling to make it in show business
while maintaining his dignity and self-respect.  This is hard to do, as
he's surrounded by crab-in-a-barrel coworkers (Keenen Ivory Wayans,
Ludie Washington) to the left of him, and exploitative idiot TV
executives (Eugene R. Glazer, Lisa Mende, Dom Irrera), to the right.
Bobby is stuck in the middle with a strong support system, including
girlfriend Lydia (Anne-Marie Johnson), younger brother Stevie (Craigus
R. Johnson), their grandmother (the late Helen Martin) - and a healthy
imagination.  One in which he sees himself not as a jive talkin'
knucklehead or a thug, as the rest of Hollywood sees him - but as a film
noir detective, or Shakespearean thesp, or action hero.  You know: just
like any old actor.
The Upshot:
I have a lot of love in my heart for this film, on so many levels.  I
admire Robert Townsend for having the fortitude to do the film in the
first place, mostly on his own dime, enlisting a huge group of fellow
actors, comedians, and other struggling artists, to help him make HS a
reality (listing them all here would take way too much space; I
encourage you to check out the IMDB listing for complete cast credits).
I remember watching interviews in which he talked about financing HS on
maxed-out credit cards - back in the days when that kind of thing was
fairly rare - and thought it was the coolest thing in the world to
believe in something so strongly that you would put yourself in
potential debt to keep it going.  That lesson wasn't been lost on me, to
this day.
But mostly, I love HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE because, even after 14 years, and a
bit of progress on the Black Folk In Hollywood front, I find it still
relevant; and more importantly, still *funny*.  As with another old
favorite of mine, BLAZING SADDLES, there are certain lines that never
fail to Take Me Back as soon as I hear them:
  -"He killeded my brutha! I *loveded* my brutha!"
  -"I'm making Winky Dinky Dog hoecakes...'cause hoes gotta eat, too!"
  -"We need you to be a little more 'Black'.  You know: stick your
    ass out, buck your eyes...you know how they do."
But Townsend and his writers don't rely on one-liners to carry the day,
no sirree; intermixed with the "serious" moral theme that drives the
story, Townsend sprinkled daydream sketches throughout HOLLYWOOD
SHUFFLE, skits in which castmembers played various multiple parts.  I
compare these rough skits to SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE when it was still
funny, or MONTY PYTHON'S FLYING CIRCUS...N' The Hood.
Townsend, who polished up some of the sketches from this film and used
them in his series of skit comedy specials on HBO [who could forget "The
Bold, The Black, and The Beautiful"?  Not me!], successfully
collaborated with Keenen Ivory Wayans on those specials as well as in
this movie.  I want to point out two sketches in particular: "Noir
Detective", which leads to the funniest bit I've ever seen this
particular Wayans brother do, in the person of Jerry Curl Johnson; and
obviously, "Speed & Tyrone: Sneakin' In The Movies".  Once you see the
latter skit, you'll have a taste of 3BC Flava.
HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE isn't the kind of movie everyone will Get; if it seems
dated, I think that's because some people are convinced that We *Have*
Overcome, and should Get On With It.  I'm not quite there yet.  From the
looks of things, We've just traded jive talkin' superfly pimps and hoes,
for trash talkin' gangstas and babymamas.  Yeah, progress.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
The Black Factor is abundantly clear throughout HS; let's go for the
White Factor instead.
I won't waste my time here browbeating well-meaning Whites into
submission.  I won't pile more guilt onto those fatcat con men who are
part of the Power Structure Oppressing Black Hollywood, or wonder why so
many of those Blaxploitation TV shows had Jewish writers.  And while I"m
not doing stuff, I won't I take to task those House Kneegrows who
continue to stick out their ass and buck their eyes for a non-feeling,
non-thinking Electronic Massa.  No, my sole purpose here is to wonder
exactly how lost some White Folk will be, hearing strange concepts like
"jheri curl", "light-skinned Blacks don't make good crooks" (and its
natural extension, the "paperbag test"), "crabs-in-a-barrel", and such.
On the real, it brings to mind a heartfelt email one of my readers sent,
asking me if I thought Spike Lee was at all concerned with whether White
viewers will understand the message in his movies.  Hell, Robert
Townsend isn't seen as an Angry Black Man to those who might make such
references - and I wonder if White viewers will understand *Townsend's*
message any better.
I'd make it easier by providing a "Bammer's Blactionary" here, but I've
long since retired that twist, sorry.  I think ya betta ask somebody.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I've been grumbling for awhile now that I couldn't find HOLLYWOOD
SHUFFLE on DVD at Netflix; but I just did a cursory search and it's
there (I screened a VHS version).  Now that I know that it can be
purchased, Amazon here I come!
HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE (rating: greenlight):
My new goal is to catch up to Robert Townsend, and shake his hand.
After all, he's partially responsible for "3BlackChicks Review"; and one
of these days, I plan on telling him so.

Title
Review for Final Fantasy: The Spirits Within (2001)
FINAL FANTASY: THE SPIRITS WITHIN (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 100 minutes
Genre: Animated (CGI)
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.finalfantasy.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0173840
Written by: Al Reinert, Jeff Vintar, Hironobu Sakaguchi
Directed by: Hironobu Sakaguchi
Cast: voices of Ming-na, Alec Baldwin, James Woods, Donald Sutherland,
Ving Rhames, Steve Buscemi, Peri Gilpin
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbabyboy.html
Many of the tech and entertainment web pages I read regularly have been
gushing about the leaps and bounds that computer generated imaging has
taken as of late; these ezines breathlessly muse on advances made in
computing, even going so far as to suggest that One Of These Days,
actors just might be replaced by CGI-created "stars".
As purty as it is, if FINAL FANTASY: THE SPIRITS WITHIN is the yardstick
by which that ubiquitous They are measuring comp-tech success, Hollywood
has nothing to fear.  Yet.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
Earth, in 2065, is pretty toasted, in the aftermath of a Big Fight
between Earthlings and some ALIEN-like aliens.  The ALIEN-like aliens,
called "Phantoms", kick much Earth booty, and don't bother with taking
names.
But the Real, True Hope For The World is the fearless Dr. Aki Ross
(Ming-na); Aki and her mentor, Dr. Sid (Donald Sutherland) struggle to
find and unite the eight Spirits that [mumblemumblemumbojumbo] so they
can stop the ALIEN-like aliens from further thrashing Gaia Earth while
helping the Phantoms [mumblemumblemumbojumbo] so they can chill here,
too.
Of course, things aren't that simple.  On the one hand, Aki has to deal
with Capt. Gray Edwards (Alec Baldwin), who is not only a skeptic, but
is also her old flame.  What's worse, Gray and his Deep Eyes military
crew Sgt. Ryan Whittaker (Ving Rhames), almost-but-not-quite comic
relief pilot Neil Fleming (Steve Buscemi), and kickbutt chick Jane
Proudfoot (Peri Gilpin) report to mean ol' General Hein (James Woods),
who is after the Phantoms with a vengeance - getting rid of Aki in the
process, being a bonus.
The Upshot:
FINAL FANTASY: THE SPIRITS WITHIN is *very* purty, let there be no doubt
of that.  The sheer depth of its beauty, of animation that Walt Disney
would sell off Mickey and Minnie to see, was marvelous to witness.  And
it is purty in a way that no other CGI movies have been yet.  Even my
favorite CGI-animated flick to date, Pixar's TOY STORY 2, didn't come as
close to rendering its world as realistically as did "Final Fantasy",
both as a movie and as its video game predecessor - thanks in great part
to the mastermind behind both versions of "Final Fantasy", game designer
and film director Hironobu Sakaguchi.
And this is where we begin to Receive Wisdom.  Even moreso than with the
dreadful mess that was the live-action movie version of the TOMB RAIDER
video game series of the same name, FINAL FANTASY: THE SPIRITS WITHIN
reminded me just why video games belong in the nebulous realm in which
they exist: they are simply *not real*.  And unlike the
dead-from-the-neck-up morons who are ruining American public schools
with their incredulous Zero Tolerance policies [talk about your
contradiction in terms!  I know...Another Time, Another Place], most
gamers *know* they're not real; and in fact, thrive on that knowledge.
I digress, but the point above - the shared knowledge by gamers that
video games are not at all real - doesn't seem to translate over well
into the cinema, unless it's as High Camp or Parody (the live-action
TEENAGE MUTANT NINJA TURTLES movie series comes to mind).  FINAL
FANTASY: THE SPIRITS WITHIN works *better* than the TOMB RAIDER movie, I
think, because except for a few moments when the viewers' eyes plays
tricks on us, the audience never forgets that we are seeing animated -
that is, un-real - characters on the "Fantasy" screen [versus wholly
un-animated robotrons in "Tomb"].  For example, as good as the animation
was, the lack of realism was never more evident than in scenes calling
for the characters to Emote, especially with sadness; watching the
animated Aki and Gray stiffly commiserate with each other, with the
disembodied voices of Ming-na and Alec Baldwin providing emotion that
the animation just couldn't match, was like watching a Bad Karate Flick
where the dubbing is three steps off-beat.
But the kicker for me was, as with "Tomb", that the Spiritual Mumbo
Jumbo that "Fantasy" went on about - here, that Earth was Mother Gaia,
and Bad Things were disturbing her Wa - might work fine as a video game
cutscene; but as movie canon, it just made me want to cover my ears so
as to stop the pain of its wretchedness.
All that said, you'll notice I didn't red- or yellowlight this project.
Partially, that's because I finally *did* cover my ears, metaphorically
speaking.  Once James Woods' characterization of the Evol General Hein
kicked in, in all of Woods' typical Chewing-The-Scenery glory, I decided
to not worry much about the silliness of "Fantasy", and to just groove
on its Pretty Pictures, as well as the acting talent behind it, realized
in varying degrees.  Between Woods' always humorous appetite for
scenery, Baldwin's growing adeptness at providing vocals for animated
movies, and the ability of Peri Gilpin (from NBC's FRASIER) to make her
presence known despite not being given a whole lot to do, I could almost
forgive Ming-na's monotone, Steve Buscemi's lack of character quirkiness
[surely, Sakaguchi must've known that Buscemi *oozes* quirk!], and the
muting of Ving Rhames' standard powerhouse performing skills.
But damnifi didn't think that Doctor Sid was the spitting image (and,
sound) of William Hurt; right down to the receding forehead.  Uh, sorry
guy.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Relax, "angrywhiteguy" [yeah, I get email from 'em all. Lucky me.];
Black Folk were represented fairly well in "Fantasy".  It's really the
Asian Factor that I'm addressing here.
And actually, it isn't me addressing this one; rather, this comes
paraphrased straight from the mouth of actress Ming-na, the voice Dr.
Aki Ross.  Much has been made of the careful reproduction of Aki's
strands of hair, of making sure the other character's physical flaws
were reproduced, even of how the character Aki might become a Star of
"her" own right, in films beyond "Fantasy".  But as she was being
interviewed by a female reporter of Asian heritage (whose name I am
blanking on right now, sorry) on CBS' THE EARLY SHOW, Ming-na said of
the way Aki was drawn - looking very little like the actress herself:
"The sista, wasn't a sista".
Bammer's Bottom Line:
FINAL FANTASY: THE SPIRITS WITHIN receives a greenlight from me because,
in the final analysis, I think it's definitely worth seeing.  "Seeing",
in fact, is the key term here.  Soak in its beauty; and if you can swing
it, bring along a headset and your favorite music.  Say, about 90
minutes worth.
FINAL FANTASY: THE SPIRITS WITHIN (rating: greenlight):
     But c'mon now; Gaia?  What is this, "Captain Planet"?!

Title
Review for Just Visiting (2001)
JUST VISITING (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 88 minutes
Genre: Comedy
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.just-visiting.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0189192
Written by: Christian Clavier, Jean-Marie Poire, John Hughes
Directed by: Jean-Marie Poire
Cast: Jean Reno, Christian Clavier, Christina Applegate,
Malcolm McDowell, Tara Reid, Matthew Ross, Bridgette Wilson
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsjustvisit.html
As JUST VISITING opens up, the rich baritone voice of Kelsey Grammer
briefly narrates the background story.  Apropos, as a line from
Grammer's FRASIER TV show, spoken by Niles' pet bird [in "To Kill A
Talking Bird", for my fellow Frasierholics], came to mind while I was
watching this movie:
      "Cute, but stupid!"
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
In 12th-century Merry Olde England, the Earl of Warrick was a playa-hata
of the highest order.  The target of the Earl's hatred was Count
Thibault of Malfete (Jean Reno), a French nobleman who was engaged to
Lady Rosalind (Christina Applegate).  Through witchcraft and trickery,
the Earl manages to separate Thibault from his Maiden Faire; and when
the Count enlists the aid of an Old English Wizard (Malcolm McDowell) to
try to right the wrong which was done, Thibault and his trusty servant
Andre (Christian Clavier) get sent "through the corridors of time".
Only, the Wizard discovers something went terribly wrong.
Fast forward to a modern-day Chicago museum, where Thibault and Andre
experience some serious culture shock when they come face to face with
not only modern technology, but also the face of Thibault's betrothed.
But what's this?  The museum curator is not Lady Rosalind, but instead,
Julia Malfete (also Christina Applegate).  Name ring a bell?  Add in
Julia's scheming, two-timing boyfriend Hunter (Matthew Ross), Amber
(Bridgette Wilson) the slimy two-timee, and Angelique (Tara Reid), a
"servant" herself who sees Andre as a soulmate - and...wait for it...
The Upshot:
Of all the fish-out-of-water movies that I've seen in my lifetime - and
I've seen a lot of scrawny minnows - none have come close to the fun of
the best of them, MOSCOW ON THE HUDSON.  To this day, my husband and I
still quote it ["Kah-ffee! Kah-ffee! Kah-ffee!"]; and I got a kick out
of recognizing the Russian waiter in HEARTBREAKERS as having been the
clown Anatoly in "Moscow" (Elya Baskin, for the record).  I seriously
doubt that we'll be having such fond reminiscences regarding JUST
VISITING.
"Visiting" wasn't a _bad_ movie, not necessarily; or at least, not
completely.  It was good for a few quick grins, maybe even a healthy
laugh or two.  I'm as amazed as anyone that Christina Applegate could
even share a movie set with the likes of actor Jean Reno, without him
wiping the floor with her; after all, with MARRIED WITH CHILDREN and
JESSE on your resume, you don't exactly get called to read Shakespeare,
y'know?  And the time-out-of-place hook had its cute moments (lampooning
the stereotype of how the French don't bathe, the Wizard's outfit,
Andre's Issues with cars, and the like).  But after the hook wore off
(and it wore off pretty quickly), JUST VISITING labored on without much
of interest to Say - no doubt under heavy John "Breakfast Club" Hughes
influence.  It finally crawled to its silly end [and could they have
picked a more turgidly foul song for the closing credits? peeyew!], at
which point I found myself making notation of the bad editing during the
ObChaseScene.  Ok, show of hands: who *didn't* see that coming?
Here's the thing that irked me the most, and it's the same thing that
bothers me when it happens to Frasier on FRASIER: you have Andre, played
by actor (and, notably, co-writer) Christian Clavier - who would by no
stretch of the imagination be considered your typical Hollywood babe
magnet - and you have Cute Young Thing Angelique (Tara Reid, who, along
with Clavier, were the best things about "Visiting")...and nobody seems
to think twice about that matchup?  I know that Love Conquers All and
all, but have the ubiquitous They *ever* had such mixed matchups the
other way around, with a rather frumpy looking chick hooking up with a
Studmuffin?  _Without_ it being played as parody or pathos?  I'm no
feminazi, but render unto me a break!
I like a good, mindless popcorn flick as much as the next guy, as
witnessed by my high rating for HEARTBREAKERS; unfortunately, the
not-so-good JUST VISITING runs out of steam way before you get to the
icky pseudo-butter at the bottom of the bag.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
[minor spoiler warning]
Here's Proof that I've become desensitized to Bug-Eyed Black Movie
Characters, and have Moved On: I didn't even notice the slight
resemblance the Black security guard seemed to have to Amos.  Or was it
Andy?
Ok, seriously, though I obviously noticed Sgt. Bugeyes, I also noticed
similar reactions in the White kids and adults in the museum.  And
wouldn't *you* bug out if you saw someone melt before your eyes?  Hmmm...
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Some things just lose it in the translation.  I haven't seen the
original flick that JUST VISITING was based on, but I'll betcha francs
to croissants that it was better in the original French.
JUST VISITING (rating: yellowlight):
JUST VISITING is good for a few scattered chuckles, but it's no French
tickler.

Title
Review for Eye of the Beholder (1999)
Eye Of The Beholder (2000) 
Rated R; running time 107 minutes
Genre: Thriller
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0120662 
Official site: http://www.eyeofthebeholder-movie.com/  
Written by: Stephan Elliott
Directed by: Stephan Elliott
Starring: Ewan McGregor, Ashley Judd, Patrick Bergin, k.d. lang, 
Jason Priestley, Genevieve Bujold, Cara Reynolds
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsplayit.html
Move over, Supernova: I've already found my choice for second-worst 
flick of 2000. 
The Story (WARNING: **there's nothing to spoil here**)
Let's see...Eye (Ewan McGregor) is this super secret agent on His 
Majesty's Service (we know this, see, because we see him at the 
beginning of the movie taking pictures of his target with a rifle.  That 
wasn't a typo. A rifle.) who lives a hermetic life behind his computer 
screen, speaking to no one but his not-really-there daughter Lucy (Cara 
Reynolds) and his agency contact Hilary (k.d. lang).  Eye is losing 
touch with reality because his wife and daughter disappeared; he deals 
with it, see, by talking to his not-really-there daughter.  Hookay.
But wait, there's more!  Eye sees a Mysterious Stranger who he later 
learns is a criminal named Joanna Eris (Ashley Judd), and because his 
not-really-there daughter Lucy whispered "Rosebud"...uh, "don't leave 
her, daddy" to him, Eye stalks Joanna, making up in his mind that Joanna 
(who looks way older than him) is actually his daughter.  Hey, it gets 
worse: when Eye watches her kill some unknown guy for some unknown 
reason, he comes to the Brilliant Conclusion that, hey, she's the one 
for me!
The Upshot:
Not-really-there daughter Lucy might as well have whispered "Rosebud" to 
Eye.  It would've made about as much sense as anything else in this 
wanna-be-Deep-but-just-plain-dumb, mess.
I pay "Eye" a compliment when I say "at least it was stylish".  But I'll 
let you in on a little secret: style without substance makes for a 
lonnnng 107 minutes.  I know that Earth Men Are Easy, but let me get 
this straight: boy stalks girl...boy sees girl kill other boy...weird 
boy falls for murderous girl?  Hookay.
It felt like I walked in on the second part of a two-part movie: the 
part I obviously didn't see was the one that explained what the heck 
this movie was about.   Whatever Stephan Elliot was smokin' when he came 
up with this one, I sure as hell don't want any of it. 
Almost every single character's story made it seem like the whole damn 
cast and crew were on hallucinogens.  Joanna kills a guy she was about 
to screw for...what?  Hellifi know.  Joanna meets wastoid Gary (Jason 
Priestly), who proceeds to kick her butt for...what?  Hellifi know.  Dr. 
Brault (Genevieve Bujold), caretaker of a girl's detention center, was 
introducted for...what?  Helli...well actually, I know this one: we 
needed something, after all, that would Explain Joanna.  Of course, by 
the time Brault was introduced, it was too late; "Eye" had already 
crossed the stoopidity threshold, and there was no going back.
It's weird; the only part of this movie that actually seemed 
believable--when Joanna fell for rich but blind Alex Leonard (Patrick 
Bergin)--made the movie feel really unbalanced.  You see, believability 
and stoopidity are like oil and water; they just don't mix. 
Anyone would want to see this movie for...what?
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]
We are represented here by way of a couple of big Black female beggars, 
and a dirty cop.  Not that that really mattered; the story itself, as 
well as all the characters in this flick (save Alex Leonard) were as 
unreal as not-really-there daughter Lucy. 
Bammer's Bottom Line 
I *knew* there was a reason it took me so long to see this movie.
"Eye Of The Beholder" (rating: redlight)
Man, if only I believed in an eye for an Eye...

Title
Review for Big Kahuna, The (1999)
THE BIG KAHUNA (2000) 
Rated R; running time 91 minutes 
Genre: Dramady 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0189584 
Official site: http://www.lionsgatefilms.com/thebigkahuna/index.htm  
Written by: Roger Rueff 
Directed by: John Swanbeck 
Cast: Kevin Spacey, Danny DeVito, Peter Facinelli
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamskahuna.html
I walked into THE BIG KAHUNA not quite knowing what to expect--and came 
out realizing I had just watched 91 minutes filled with three guys 
jawjackin' about Life, The Universe, And Everything.
Bless its character-driven little heart.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The three primaries in THE BIG KAHUNA are industrial lubricant salesmen 
who've reached different stages of their lives: Bob Walker (Peter 
Facinelli) is still young and wet-behind-the-ears; as clean-cut as they 
come, Bob is an unabashed Christian who takes his faith and how it 
defines him, seriously--maybe a bit *too* seriously--to the point where 
it seems more a crutch than an aide.  Larry Mann (Kevin Spacey), a 
fast-talking, cynical, take-no-prisoners sort, immediately challenges 
everything that Bob holds dear.  And Phil Cooper (Danny DeVito) is weary 
of it all; having gone through a nasty divorce, and feeling useless, 
Phil is used to Larry's caustic nature, and has seen plenty of Bob-types 
before--but he has reached the point in his life where nothing surprises 
him anymore, and he wouldn't care even if it did. 
While the men are waiting for an important client--a big kahuna--to 
visit them in a run-down hospitality suite in a run-down hotel deep in 
the heart of Wichita, the three discover things about themselves and 
each other that they never realized existed before.
The Upshot:
You must know, straight off, three things about "Kahuna": first, it 
takes place almost entirely in the smallish suite that becomes the bane 
of Larry's existence in the time that he's there; second, what little 
plot there is revolves around the three men's search for Richard Fuller, 
the kahuna in question; and third, the movie is based on a play 
(HOSPITALITY SUITE) - and looks every bit like one.  If you cannot get 
with that, then it's best to exit, stage right.  As for me, in the 
waning days of one of the worst five months of movie releases in recent 
history, and on the cusp of summer's Big! Movie! Events!, a film like 
THE BIG KAHUNA - all talk, little plot, much character development - is 
just what the doctor ordered.    
Obvious comparisons to GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS will be made, especially 
because Spacey was in both.  And while "Glengarry" was in many ways a 
superior film, "Kahuna" has its charms as well; not the least of which 
is the fact that because of its smaller cast, we get to "know" these 
characters a wee bit more, especially the Phil character.  Rumor has it 
that Kevin Spacey, one of the producers of THE BIG KAHUNA, talked Danny 
DeVito into co-starring in the movie under somewhat shady pretenses.  
After seeing DeVito's performance, I can say that the ends very much 
justified the means; shady pretenses or not, DeVito most def steals this 
particular show.
It's been a long time since I've seen DeVito so convincing in a role; 
known primarily as a comic actor (in flicks like ROMANCING THE STONE, 
WAR OF THE ROSES, and his TAXI TV series), not since his turn in L.A. 
CONFIDENTIAL has he impressed me as much as he did in "Kahuna".  Hard as 
it is for me to believe, DeVito outdid even Kevin Spacey, easily one of 
my favorite modern-day actors.  But don't be fooled; as Larry, Spacey 
was no slouch.  It is to his credit that Spacey didn't play Larry like 
part two of his "Glengarry" character, or rest on the laurels of his 
Oscar win in last year's AMERICAN BEAUTY.  A lesser actor might have 
done just that.  Between Larry's  snarkasm  and Phil's 
I-don't-give-a-damn (but, really, I'd *like* to) attitude, "Kahuna" did 
a fine job of showing, in an exaggerated sense, the desperate measures 
taken by men who feel themselves defined as what they do rather than who 
they are--even if those measures are taken only in words.
Of the three men, the least interesting to me was Bob; Peter Facinelli 
was workable in the role, and definitely looked the All-American Boy 
part, but I like my characters with some fat on their cheeks and some 
world-weariness in their bones, thankyewverramuch.  Which is, of course, 
The Point behind Bob's fascination with Phil; impressed by Phil's 
integrity of character (and, conversely, turned off by Larry's seeming 
lack of same), Bob sets out to create character lines in his own face as 
a reflection of what he sees in Phil.  And of course, it ain't that 
easy.  Hmmm...perhaps Bob was somewhat more interesting to me than I 
gave him credit for being.
To be sure, THE BIG KAHUNA had its faults.  Seemingly running without 
focus for much of the first half, the viewer was left to wonder whether 
they were ever going to get to The Point before the end credits rolled.  
And during the first half of the first half, the emphasis seemed to be 
put on one-liners and cute schticks, especially from Larry/Spacey.  But 
once Spacey's and especially DeVito's burners kicked in, "Kahuna" took 
off running, and brought audience members willing to make the effort to 
work with it, along for the ride.  Humorous and intense--especially in 
the final bits--"Kahuna" is a refreshing, though challenging, change of 
pace from the typical summer Hollywood movie.
[Though I do have to wonder whether the guy in my audience that damn 
near busted a gut throughout, was a shill.  Uh, doode, it wasn't that 
funny.  Well, except for that "spoken word" song in the end credits, 
"Everybody's Free [To Wear Sunscreen]".  Now *that* was worth a laugh or 
two].
I have to chuckle at the timeliness of this movie for me; in a few days, 
I'll be headed off to a computer-buyers convention, and very likely will 
be "wined and dined" by Phil, and Larry--and Bob--types, hoping to lube 
me up, so to speak, for my business.  So does that make me a big kahuna?  
Lord, I hope not.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
No, this "talkie" is not for everyone; but it worked for me. I loved THE 
BIG KAHUNA, for all the same reasons I loved its cousin-in-type, 
GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS.  The real surprise for me was, I liked Danny DeVito 
in it even more than Kevin Spacey.  
THE BIG KAHUNA (rating: greenlight): 
Easily one of the better of the "I could watch [insert kickbutt actor's 
name here] read the telephone book" group of films.

Title
Review for Replacements, The (2000)
THE REPLACEMENTS (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 114 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0191397
Official site: http://www.the-replacements.com/
Written by:Vince McKewin
Directed by: Howard Deutch
Cast: Keanu Reeves, Gene Hackman, Brooke Langton, Orlando Jones,
Jon Favreau, Rhys Ifans, Faizon Love, Michael "Bear" Taliferro,
Ace Yonamine, Troy Winbush, David Denman, Michael Jace, Jack Warden,
Brett Cullen, John Madden, Pat Summerall, Mark Ellis
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsreplacements.html
[WARNING: SEMI-PROFANE RANT AHEAD]
I can't say that I remember the 1987 National Football League strike at
all; not being a sports fan, I don't care about these silly games that
men (and in some cases, women) play in general, and I certainly don't
give a rats ass about the Lifestyles Of The Sick And Shameless pus...uh,
babies who - come on now, admit it - get paid WAY too much as it is to
chase a ball up and down a field on Sunday afternoons, 16 weeks out of a
GOTdam year.  I may normally empathize with union workers, but no one
can tell me with a straight face that the spoiled brat primadonnas of
the NFL, NBA, and whatnot, were really striking with Their Oppressed
Underpaid [snicker] Brothers in mind.  Not when they could get an extra
mil to pay for their coke habit, nosirreebob.
So when I first saw trailers for THE REPLACEMENTS, I was hopeful that
its story of The Other Side - the "scabs" who played for the Love Of The
Game (yarite) while the pus...uh, babies, were on strike - would tear a
new one into those blowhards who offend their fans by whining about how
hard it is to be a millionaire when their owners are billionaires [oh
boo friggin hoo].  But I should've known better.  After all, movie stars
are millionaires, too.
[END RANT]
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
It's 1987, and the "Washington Sentinels" [peeve: sports movies without
the balls - or money - to give their teams real team names] no longer
wish to be Football Heroes; like the rest of the NFL, spoiled wimp
Quarterback Eddie Martel (Brett Cullen) and his teammates go on strike
because their millions are not enough to cover the necessities of life,
like insurance on a Mercedes and the like.  Team owner Edward O'Neil
(Jack Warden) calls on former coach Jimmy McGinty (Gene Hackman) to
recruit and lead a replacement team of players to a possible playoff
spot, if they can win their last 3 of 4 games; McGinty, who O'Neil
earlier fired under Suspicious Circumstances, agrees to this only if he
can have complete control over the short-lived team of ragtag unknowns,
coulda-beens, and never-weres.
The replacement team McGinty puts together includes QB Shane "Footsteps"
Falco (Keanu Reeves), currently a plankton-remover best known for his
disastrous Sugar Bowl game; Wide Receiver Clifford Franklin (Orlando
Jones), fleet-of-foot and non-catching comic relief; defensive Lineman
Daniel Bateman (Jon Favreau), an ex-Navy SEAL and current SWAT cop who
loves smashing things - and people; Kicker Nigel "The Leg" Gruff (Rhys
Ifans), Loveable Welsh Drunk and footballer on both sides of the Pond;
offensive Linemen Jamal Jackson (Faizon Love) and Andre Jackson (Michael
"Bear" Taliferro), brothers and bodyguards for rap stars; offensive
Lineman Jumbo Fumiko (Ace Yonamine), so huge he has to be a Sumo
wrestler, of course; Running Back Walter Cochran (Troy Winbush), with a
bible in one hand and a drink in the other; Tight End Brian Murphy
(David Denman), who could've been an NFL Great, except he's deaf; and
defensive Safety (I think) Ray Smith/Earl Wilkinson (Michael Jace) as
the Obligatory ex-player/current convict [yes, that's right; he's a
convict let out on a five-week furlough so he can play Strike Football.
It's all I can do to only be *semi*-profane.] whose double names were
never explained.  Add an ObLoveStory between Shane and head cheerleader
Annabelle Farrell (Brooke Langton), and you've got yourself a football
flick!  blech.
The Upshot:
Ok, let's bring the penalty flags out for unnecessary stupidity: THE
REPLACEMENTS is unoriginal, transparent, hackneyed, cliched, poorly
written and directed, and very funny in spots.
What's that?  Yes, I have to admit that it had its funny moments, most
of which were occupied by Jon Favreau as Daniel "SWAT" Bateman.  Try as
I might, I couldn't help but to laugh at the big lug as he proceeded to
rip up every scene he was in, with an all-out assault on every character
that came into his field of vision.  There's something weird about
laughing at an abusive cop cum footballer, I know; but dammit, Bateman
was funny - as was John Madden, either parodying himself or just playing
Madden straight.  Either way, it worked (and on the other hand, Pat
Summerall as himself is just as bad here as anywhere).  The other good
funny bits came from uncredited players: the hilarious (at first)
cheerleading squad (both the tryouts and the finalists), especially the
ditzy blonde who couldn't spell; and Mark Ellis as coach of the San
Diego team.  I damn near busted a gut when he asked the referee to make
the lap-dancing cheerleaders "stop shaking their asses" so his team
could concentrate on the game.
But the fun was interrupted by long stretches of dumb.  Gene Hackman,
bless his talented heart, truly gave it a shot, but the writer saddled
him with nothing but cliches, which even the most talented actor can't
easily get past (though he does have a great scene with SWAT; "get me
the ball"?  You betcha).  Orlando Jones made me want to spit! everytime
I saw his bug-eyes on the screen; his Big Scene (where he preens to
Gloria Gaynor's "I Will Survive") was cute for the first few minutes,
but lasted way too long [the writer and director repeated this pattern
throughout the movie], and his character's sudden bout of Bob Doleism
(calling himself "Clifford Franklin" over and over again) seemed a
desperate attempt to make sense out of a generally senseless character.
As The Warm Place To Put It, Brooke "Sandra Bullock, Jr." Langton didn't
seem to add much warmth, though the fault is again mostly attributable
to Vince McKewin's poisoned pen.  The leaps of (il)logic that Annabelle
makes with regard to Shane (the Put It part of the equation) were
laughable - in the "this is stoopid" sense of the term.   And of course,
Keanu "whoa" Reeves brings his own special brand of Dumb to most every
movie he occupies.  This isn't always A Bad Thing - it did wonders for
him in THE MATRIX - but here, he looked like he was sleepwalking through
the flick, waiting for "Matrix 2" to start filming.
The heaviest penalties should be assessed to writer McKewin and director
Howard Deutch; if it were up to me, neither of these hacks would be let
anywhere near a motion picture set ever again, especially not Deutch.
I've noted in the past that I don't notice directors in pictures very
often [which I see as A Good Thing; after all, I don't go to a flick to
see what the *director* is doing, I want to be dazzled by the story].
But in this movie, one couldn't help but notice the thrill Deutch got
from Being The Director, what with all those ridiculous and unnecessary
closeups, quick cuts, lingering on certain characters inexplicably while
the "action" is going on elsewhere, and most aggravating of all, the
combination closeup/Jumbotron shots in the stadium scenes.  Deutch is
apparently from the "if Less is More, then think of how much more More
would be!" (tm Frasier) school of directing.  blech.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Let's look at that starting lineup again, shall we?
On defense, we have:
  -An intense SWAT guy who pounds people for a living, but it's all good
   because he's on The Right Side Of The Law (White guy);
  -A fun-loving Welshman who boozes and gambles a wee bit too much,
   but daggonit, he's Weeierry (White guy);
  -A Sumo wrestler who's main "fault" is that he's big, but he
   balances that out by being fun, Hip, and otherwise non-stereotypically
   Asian (Japanese guy);
  -A player who is deaf.  Not That There's Anything Wrong With That.
   (White guy).
And the offending line?
  -A swishy, cowardly, bug-eyed clown (Black guy);
  -A [and I'm sure I'll be roasted for this one] Jesus Freak (Black guy);
  -Two brothers (no doubt ME, MYSELF, & IRENE rejects) that are as
   thuggish as you can get without wearing Prison Blues (Black guys);
  -Someone who actually wears Prison Blues (Black guy).
Bammer's Bottom Line:
There's absolutely nothing new in THE REPLACEMENTS that would make its
lameness worth sitting through, other than a few hilarious Moments - and
in my book, a few Moments do not a movie make.  My sports-flick
recommendations?  Quality-wise, you'd be better off renting MYSTERY,
ALASKA or THE NATURAL (just to name two).  Or if you like more humor in
your sports, check out the original MAJOR LEAGUE; plot-wise, it was
about as transparent as THE REPLACEMENTS (which, when I think about it,
really ripped "ML" off big time), but at least MAJOR LEAGUE didn't take
itself too seriously.  Until parts two and three, that is.
THE REPLACEMENTS (rating: yellowlight):
I wonder when the real movie'll show up...

Title
Review for Patriot, The (2000)
THE PATRIOT (2000)
Rated R; running time 165 minutes
Genre: Action
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0187393
Official site: http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/thepatriot/
Written by: Robert Rodat
Directed by: Roland Emmerich
Cast: Mel Gibson, Heath Ledger, Joely Richardson, Jason Isaacs,
Chris Cooper, Tcheky Karyo, Trevor Morgan, Lisa Brenner, Bryan Chafin,
Skye McCole Bartusiak, Tom Wilkinson, Rene Auberjonois, Logan Lerman,
Adam Baldwin, Beatrice Bush, Mika Boorem, Mary Jo Deschanel,
Shan Omar Huey, Gil Johnson, Jay Arlen Jones, Jamieson Price, Hank
Stone, Kristian Truelsen, Mark Twogood, Joey D. Vieira, Grahame Wood,
Peter Woodward
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamspatriot.html
I've been to plenty of long movies before.  THE GREEN MILE clocked in at
3 hours plus (though it didn't seem that long to me).  And on the other
end of that spectrum, STUART LITTLE (chronologically short at just 94
minutes) seemed *much* longer.  I've been to plenty of long movies
before.  THE PATRIOT wasn't just long.  It was *torture*; sheer
manipulative torture.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
1776.  A time of upheaval and revolution in these (not quite) United
States Of America.
Widower Benjamin Martin (Mel Gibson) is a man who has known war, and no
longer wants any parts of it; he just wants to farm, make bad rocking
chairs, and be left alone to raise his seven young children.  His eldest
son, Gabriel (Heath Ledger), doesn't understand Ben's pacifistic mood,
and wants to join the Colonials to fight against the Evil British Empire
and old tax baron King George.   After the Evil British Colonel William
Tavington (Jason Isaacs) wreaks havoc on Ben's family and land, Ben
leaves his youngest children with their aunt Charlotte (Joely
Richardson), so he and Gabriel can join forces with Regular Army Colonel
Harry Burwell (Chris Cooper) and French Army officer Jean Villeneuve
(Tcheky Karyo) to create a militia to go up against Tavington and
slightly-less Evil General Cornwallis (Tom Wilkinson).
[And lots more stuff that takes up two hours and forty-five minutes of
movie time.]
The Upshot:
I sat myself down and thought long and hard about what made me the
maddest about THE PATRIOT, to the point where its greenlight for its
epic sweep and beautifully-filmed tale, turned into a yellowlight for
its manipulative nature.  Here's what I told a dear friend about it,
with regard to the other "based on a true[r than *this* one, dadgummit]
story" out this week, THE PERFECT STORM:
    What I liked most about [THE PERFECT STORM] (and conversely,
    hated most about THE PATRIOT), is the way the actors seemed to
    capture the real, messily imperfect folks they played; from
    everything I've read about the production [of "Perfect"], the
    actors and director and such were extremely cognizant of the
    background story, and wanted very much to do those people honor
    (rather than playing the "Look at me, I'm an artiste and a
    battle-recreator!" game that Gibson and the folks attached to
    "Patriot" seemed to).  It shows.
"Manipulative" is the word I keep coming back to when I think about THE
PATRIOT.  It's not enough, it seems, that this movie is being released
around the fourth of July; Independence Day roun' dese hea' parts.  No;
"we must forcefully remind The Uhmerkin Public", the filmmakers seemed
to say, "that Gibson...uh, blue-eyed Benjamin Martin, was a True
American Hero, by having him Wave The Flag Meaningfully at every
opportunity!  And hey, while you're at it, have a few of his friends and
family members die Slow Heroic Deaths with the camera trained on their
faces for a godawful long time, whydoncha?  And ooh yeah, that image of
Mel baby Running Boldly Into Battle with just that battered flag,
*that'll* hit 'em where it hurts, eh?"
Bah.  Just tell me the story, dammit; let *me* decide when and where to
cheer for them, eh?  I don't need no friggin' equivalent to a laugh
track, spattered into so many manipulative scenes.  Bad moviemakers.
Bad, Bad moviemakers.
In all fairness, though, THE PATRIOT latches on to its single-mindedness
and never lets go; at least it's not wishy-washy in its dogged
determination to make the viewer Love Benjamin and his family for being
Epic Heroes.  Even when it speaks of Ben's Unspeakable Past, you learn
early on that Ben was just doing what he had to do For God And Country.
Can't blame a fella for that, even when it leaves him bloody, can ya?
Not the way these moviemakers were selling the story, you can't.
(And don't get me wrong: not having had to ever do much heavy fighting
outside of the time Judy hit me in the stomach with a two-by-four when I
was 13, I'm *not* saying that War Ain't Really Hell; I'm sure it is that
and much more.  What I *am* saying, however, is that the audience
doesn't need to be battered upside the head with the Wifflebat to get
that point.  I understood it after the first hour of my battering; I
didn't need to have it go on for the whole almost-three hours, sheesh!)
I know I'll be in the minority of the reviewing population--I heard
Raving Reviews about "Patriot" blaring on the radio just before I went
to see it (which, in and of itself, gave me a Bad Feeling)--but this
telling of THE PATRIOT didn't move me at all.  Actually, it did: it
moved me from being sympathetic to the cause of a young--and, let's be
honest: White--nation getting its legs under itself, to being cynical
and critical about that *other* part of itself that THE PATRIOT tried to
whitewash over: the folks that were somehow forgotten in "We The People".
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
We The People.  Hold These Truths To Be Self-Evident.  All Men Are
Created Equal.  That is, "we, the White, male landowners, see it that
way--about us".  All others need not apply.
It was this undeniable truth about the establishment of "a more perfect
union"--that its people were only "created equal" if and only if they
were White, male landowners--that grated me most about THE PATRIOT and
its whitewashing-over of its colorful tale.  If the folks behind this
movie had not addressed it (slavery: the big It) at all, then, fine.  I
wouldn't have had an issue with their looking-over of that big It.  But
they addressed It.  Badly.  Shame on 'em, I say.
A little truth goes a long way; but "Patriot" couldn't seem to face up
to the realities of its own time, *this* late into the moviemaking game
(well past the time when the filmmakers could've claimed ignorance about
such things).  And that--much more than the fact that I never caught the
name of the Black slave character, only knowing him from his
introduction as "my nigra"--is what finally brought "Patriot"'s house of
cards tumbling down for me.  In all its flag-waving, it seemed to forget
that even back then, these States weren't as United as the Founding
Fathers claimed they were.
History, it seems, *does* tend to repeat itself.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Call me cynical, call me anti-American, whatever; but I hate feeling
manipulated, and that's exactly how I felt watching THE PATRIOT.  I went
into this movie with an open mind, hoping to learn something more about
what made the early revolutionaries in these, yes, great United States,
tick.  I came out of it with a contempt for what I had just been put
through.  And that's *never* A Good Thing.
THE PATRIOT (rating: yellowlight):
If only they had stopped waving the flag long enough to see the hearts
and souls that went into weaving that symbol of independence...

Title
Review for Blazing Saddles (1974)
BLAZING SADDLES (1974)
Rated PG; running time 93 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0071230
Written by: Andrew Bergman, Mel Brooks, Richard Pryor, Alan Uger,
    Norman Steinberg
Directed by: Mel Brooks
Cast: Cleavon Little, Gene Wilder, Harvey Korman, Madeline Kahn,
    Slim Pickens, Mel Brooks, Alex Karras, David Huddleston,
    Liam Dunn, John Hillerman, George Furth, Claude Ennis Starrett Jr.,
    Richard Collier, Charles McGregor, Dom DeLuise, Burton Gilliam,
    Count Basie
DVD standard features: Widescreen and "Pan And Scan"; scene access.
    Languages & Subtitles: English, French, Spanish
DVD special features: theatrical trailer; cast notes; production notes;
    55-minute interview with Mel Brooks
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsblazsaddles.html
According to the American Film Institute, SOME LIKE IT HOT is The
Funniest Movie Of All Time (or something like that).  And I can diggit,
really I can; I've TiVoEd it to see for myself, when I get a spare
couple of hours.  I defer to the wisdom of my reviewing elders; I'm just
a snot-nosed ponk when it comes to Film Knowledge.  But for me, I can't
think of anything that's made me laugh longer, harder, and more
memorably, than BLAZING SADDLES.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The old western town of Rock Ridge stands in the way of progress, by way
of the railroad that Attorney General Hedley "Not Hedy, Hedley!" Lamarr
(Harvey Korman) is trying to build, on the backs of Chinese, Black, and
Irish laborers.  Lamarr wants the townfolk to leave Rock Ridge, since
land there will be worth much moolah was the railroad goes through town;
but the townfolk - all of whom are surnamed "Johnson" - aren't ready to
go.  With the help of dimwitted Governor Lepetomane (Mel Brooks), Lamarr
comes up with a plot to make the town so mad they'd be read'ta go...
...enter Sheriff Bart (Cleavon Little).  *Black* Bart.
The Upshot:
I like the tag on back of the DVD box: "Mel Brooks' Comic Saga Of
Cowboys And Imbeciles".  That pretty much covers it.
Having just watched this DVD again (I've lost track of the count at this
point), I'm amazed at how many BLAZING SADDLES lines have made their way
into my everyday life.  The husband wants me to do something that I
don't really mind doing much, but I want to josh with him?: "work work
work work work"!  Asked to do something incredibly stupid at the office,
against my better judgement?: "Mongo only pawn...in game of life"!
Silly "merit" games being played at work?: "Badges? We don' need no
steenkin' badges!"  And many a bruthaman has gone for the double whammy:
"'Scuse me while I whip this out" - and my all-time favorite - "Where
the White wimmen at?"
I don't do those lines justice, I know.  BLAZING SADDLES is as much
about the delivery of great lines by its actors, as it is the writing
and directing itself.  I can't say there's a bad act in the lot, though
it's the supporting cast that really worked this film into a froth [the
Johnson Chorus - David Huddleston (Olson Johnson), Liam Dunn (Rev.
Johnson), John Hillerman (Howard Johnson), George Furth (Van Johnson),
Claude Ennis Starrett Jr. (Gabby Johnson), Richard Collier (Dr. Sam
Johnson) - just brought to mind Greek comedy.  Am I warped, or what?].
Stars Cleavon Little and Gene Wilder (Jim, the Waco Kid) were matched
well, in a way that even Richard Pryor (one of the writers here) didn't
quite capture in later pairings with Wilder; and Little riding into
town, Gucci'd out with Count Basie providing the theme music, is but one
classic moment the underrated actor provided in this film.  But though
they were both great, it was Harvey Korman (in the role of a lifetime),
Alex Karras as Mongo (that horse!), Slim PIckens as Taggart ("You use
your tongue pretter'n a $20 whore"?  I wish I could use that one more
often!), and the late, great Madeline Kahn as bon vivuse Lili Von
Shtupp, who had me rolling on the floor, laughing.
I have page after page of highlighted, underlined, asterisked notes
about the double entendres and sight gags that flew across the screen;
some so quickly, or subtly, that I'm sure I missed them.  I could go on
for hours about BLAZING SADDLES - I won't - but I'd do Kahn's amazing,
Oscar-nominated performance an injustice if I didn't mention how much
her showstopping "I'm Tired" number almost made me bust a gut the first
time I saw it.  "They're always coming and going/and going and
coming/and always too soon"...man, I loved that woman.
Mel Brooks' madness petered out near the end (though the very last scene
redeemed his slip for me.  Whomever came up with that one, thank you!).
And amongst Brooks aficionados, BLAZING SADDLES doesn't seem to hold the
weight that his classic YOUNG FRANKENSTEIN does.  I can dig that, too.
As for me, deliver a Candygram For Mongo, and you'll get me, every time.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I really shouldn't like this film.  Forget about the slapstick humor;
what with my general movie temperament, my stridency against racial
slurs and misogyny, and my Black Factor bent, this is the type of film
my militant side tells me I really shouldn't like.  If BLAZING SADDLES
had been made in today's climate, I probably wouldn't have liked it
nearly as much.  But to see it in such a light - to only notice the fart
jokes; to only hear the "nigger"s, the "chink"s, the "faggot"s, and the
"rape"s - is to miss The Point entirely.
And what is that Point?  For me, then and now, Mel Brooks' point is that
racists and their ilk are the stupid ones, ripe to be ridiculed and
ignored for the idiots they are.  In BLAZING SADDLES, we don't laugh
_with_ these fools, we laugh *at* them.  For me, that was truly The
Point.
Well, that and "fart jokes are funny as hell".  In the hands of a
master, that is.
DVD Thingies:
After jam-packing so many memorable moments into his 93 minute film, I'm
surprised there was anything left for Mel Brooks to offer - but he (or
at least his representatives) did, in the form of the goodies they've
made available on this DVD.  Along with standards like widescreen (yay!)
and scene access, extras like trilingual languages/subtitles, and the
original theatrical trailer, are provided.  On top of all that, the
55-minute interview with Brooks is a treat unto itself.  Be warned,
though: if you haven't seen BLAZING SADDLES yet, check out the interview
after you watch the movie.  You'll thank me.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I don't think BLAZING SADDLES could be made today; certainly, it can't
be shown on TV without being totally neutered, the guts of it wrenched
out on the censor room floor [and then, what's the point?].  And, given
the caliber of available artists and our general inability to laugh at
ourselves anymore, maybe that's A Good Thing after all.  These days,
that Point would be sitting on the curb, wondering how it got so lost.
BLAZING SADDLES (rating: greenlight):
They don't make 'em like they used to - so thank heavens for DVD.

Title
Review for Whipped (1999)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamswhipped.html
It's been a long while since I've actively looked forward to seeing
_all_ of the new releases scheduled to come out here in Podunkville; for
vastly different reasons, I eagerly anticipated seeing HIGHLANDER:
ENDGAME, SAVING GRACE, and this movie, WHIPPED - a triple-play rarity
for me.  Now that I've seen two out of three ("Endgame" is next-up for
me this afternoon), the question is, was my eager anticipation rewarded?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Brad (Brian Van Holt), Zeke (Zorie Barber), and Jonathan (Jonathan
Abrahams), are three Wild And Crazy guys who get together for weekly
Sunday brunches, along with their married (and thus, no longer Wild nor
Crazy), completely whipped friend, Eric (Judah Domke), to compare notes
on their female conquests over the past week.  All's well in their
individual worlds - Studly Stockbroker Brad, Horndog Beatnik Zeke, and
Sensitive Onanistic Jonathan imagine themselves quite the ladies men,
and have the raunchy stories to prove it - until they each find a woman
who Completes them; someone who is more than their match.  Who knew Mia
(Amanda Peet) would be the perfect fit for each of them?
The Upshot:
Those who know my taste in movies, will probably be surprised to find
out I liked WHIPPED.  And will probably be even more surprised to find
out *why*.  See, I ain't as bougie as summa y'all might think.
Occasionally, I like to slum, too [/end sarcasm].
Contrary to some folks' perceptions, I can enjoy a raucous film every
now and then.  I can groove on comedies in which the humor is derived
from base situations (the basest of which, some might say, is Gettin'
Some) - as long as the premise, or the characters, don't insult my
intelligence.  And for me, WHIPPED fit that bill nicely.
There's nothing very Deep about it; no real Lessons to be learned, no
Truth that would forever alter the viewer (unless said viewer was one of
those types who like to think he or she is God's Gift.  And even then,
I'm sure said viewer wouldn't see themselves in the on-screen
characters).  And the Moral at the end - that the way (some) men troll
for chicks is muy lame - is likewise nothing new.  But what I enjoyed
most about WHIPPED was how it avoided the patronizingly typical way most
flicks of this nature try to depict the boy likes girl likes other boy
likes same girl likes other boy likes same girl and all of the boys are
friends-setup: [SMALL SPOILER] early on, we are shown that not only do
all the participants in this menage a quad *know* about each others'
involvement, they _accept_ it (some less willingly than others) [END
SMALL SPOILER]. And with that first "twist", I leaned back in my chair
and relaxed, knowing that no matter what else happened, I wasn't about
to see the same ol' same ol' vapid flick as has been repeated ad nauseum
so often in the past.
The "feel" of the film was quite appealing to me.  Multiple elements -
from the nicely-done opening credits, to the "weekly" titles (I admit,
I'm a sucker for inside-joke titles), and even the overdone-on-TV
breaking of the fourth wall (where the characters talk directly to the
camera as if they were being interviewed) - took this movie to a
different place for me than its subject matter would suggest it
belonged.  And indeed, the feel of the movie helped it overcome some
glaring flaws that might have otherwise been deal-breakers for me,
including the incredibly immature way the male characters (especially
Brad) spoke, as if the actors (or writer) thought they were in a high
school flick, and the fact that at least two of the characters (Zeke and
Jonathan) were anything but the God's Gift To Women that they thought
themselves to be.  In fact, I'd be shocked to find that New York women
were *really* that hard up; those two guys were by no means All That
(nor were they A Bag Of Chips).  Not that Brad was any catch, but hey, I
wouldn't kick him out of bed.  Um...the point being, my Disbelief had a
hard time saying Suspended when it came to taking this motley trio at
face value as being Playas.
That, and the potty mouths that these guys all had aside, WHIPPED moved
along at a good pace, though I was disappointed that Amanda Peet didn't
have a much bigger speaking part than she wound up having.  I looked
forward to seeing this flick specifically because of her; I enjoyed her
immensely in THE WHOLE NINE YARDS and looked forward to seeing her in
WHIPPED - and would've walked away completely disappointed if it hadn't
been for her ending scenes.  Even with that, her Mia was more a concept,
than a fully-developed character.
The trio of bachelors, and the Obligatory Married Guy Friend against
which the trio measured themselves, were the true stars of this show.
Strangely enough, the ObMarriedGuy was the most easily accepted of the
four Types (you know: the Studly Wallstreet Type, the Horny Beatnik
Type, the Sensitive Self-loving Type, and the Cockblocked Emasculated
Husband Type); unfortunately, I could believe there are many Erics in
this world, much easier than I could see a Brad, a Jonathan, or
especially a Zeke.  My sympathies for the characters fell right in line
with whom Mia might've picked: I thought Brad was way too full of
himself, Zeke was just too tiny (in more ways than one) to even
consider, Eric needed to be put out of his - and no doubt, his wife's -
misery, and Jonathan was as pathetic as he was harmless.  In this,
actors Van Holt, Barber, Domke, and Abrahams (respectively), performed
their jobs quite well.
And the biggest kick of all, for me?  Seeing Callie "gag" Thorne [who,
along with Jon "spit" Seda and Micheal "retch" Michele, put the last
nail into the coffin that once was TBDSOT, NBC's HOMICIDE: LIFE ON THE
STREET] play the kind of inconsequential sleazy slut for which her
acting abilities were obviously hoed...oops, I mean, honed.  Talk about
your perfect casting...
Having been married for nearly twenty years, I'm glad to say that I
don't recognize *any* of these types from those in my everyday life,
though I knew my fair share back in my college days.  That's the great
thing about The Movies, though: in them, even a city with residents as
jaded as those occupying New York, can have people so willing to believe
what they'd normally know to be unbelievable, if they'd only look closer
at what was being offered to them.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Often, when I watch a "White" movie [one of these days, we'll have to
Discuss what constitutes a "White", or a "Black", movie.  But that's
another topic for another time], I wonder to myself, "Self, could you
imagine this as a 'Black' movie?"  And in the case of WHIPPED, the
answer was easily, "yes".
If the creative folks behind it had chosen to Go There, WHIPPED could've
easily been Booty Call or The Player's Club or [insert typically
misogynistic hit-dat-bootay flick here].  To the extent it was not,
WHIPPED earned my admiration; though much of the posturing was there,
WHIPPED had the foresight [or so I'd like to think.  It might actually
be that they stumbled upon this quite accidently] to avoid the cliches
inherent in the situations it depicts, and tackle the questions it asked
in a somewhat more mature fashion (even though, as I noted above, most
of the male characters sounded like refugees from high school).
Now, before anyone [yes, I mean you, "babylove"] gets their panties all
in a wad, note that I am NOT saying White "Booty Call" flicks are better
than Black "Booty Call" flicks by default.  What I *am* saying is, in
this specific case, the makers of WHIPPED overcame its predecessor's
faults by making the _way_ they told the story, much more interesting
and much less pathetically, and stereotypically, obvious (though to some
degree, just as titillating) in the end.  Ka peech?
So, what does this say about *Black* flicks within this genre?  Maybe
nothing.  Or maybe, folks like me could tolerate the "Booty Calls"
flicks more if they had some substance behind their empty-calories
style.  I don't see nuttin' wrong/with a little bumpngrind.  But surely
We can do better than Yet Another longform BET video, right?  Uh, right?
Bammer's Bottom Line:
While it's nowhere near gut-bustin' funny, WHIPPED does provide an
entertaining, and refreshingly different, look at The Oldest War in the
book: the war of the sexes.  Take note, fellas: those wack lines y'all
use are _transparent_.
WHIPPED (rating: greenlight):
The bar is raised, Young Black Hollywood; the gauntlet is thrown.  Can
y'all take "Booty Call" to the next level?  Or is that all you got?

Title
Review for Any Given Sunday (1999)
Any Given Sunday (1999) 
Rated R; running time 165 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0146838 
Official site: http://www.anygivensunday.net/  
Written by: John Logan (based on the novel by Rob Huizenga)
Directed by: Oliver Stone
Starring: Al Pacino, Jamie Foxx, Cameron Diaz, Dennis Quaid, 
James Woods, LL Cool J, Matthew Modine, Ann-Margret, Aaron Eckhart, 
John McGinley, Jim Brown, Bill Bellamy, Lawrence Taylor, Lauren Holly,
Lela Rochon, Clifton Davis, Charlton Heston
[Author's note: Just as I noted in my review/analysis of  "The Best 
Man", I offer the following disclaimer: the text below is something more 
than a "standard" review.  Purposefully, I wanted to do more than just 
say "I liked this movie" or "I didn't like this movie", as "Any Given 
Sunday" struck me on a different level than "just another movie".  To 
that end, the following is much more detailed, story-wise, than those 
who have not yet seen the movie, may want to read; it is more a film 
analysis, I suppose, than a straight review.  The reader is referred to 
read small snippets of both my and The Diva's opinion on this flick on  
"Movie Bytes", as well as reading her separate  "Any Given Sunday" 
review (and even if you don't mind my spoilage, read it anyway, on its 
own merits).
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamssunday.html
Professional Football: a game--a game, I say!--where grown men get paid 
obscene amounts of loot and booty to chase a weirdly-shaped ball up and 
down a field.  Which is to say, I can't stand pro football (or, for that 
matter, most other pro sports).
So why am I reviewing the football flick "Any Given Sunday", hmmm?  
Hmmm...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
"On any given Sunday, any team can win or lose".  Such is the type of 
platitude spouted by Tony D'Amato (Al Pacino), the tired, worn-out coach 
of the Miami Sharks pro football team.  A so-so team that's seen its 
glory days behind it and is fading fast, the Sharks chances of making it 
to the playoffs are threatened by the injury of aging veteran 
quarterback Jack "Cap" Rooney (Dennis Quaid)--who, along with Luther 
"Shark" Lavay (former real-life football player Lawrence Taylor) was 
already considered to be expendable by owner Christina Pagniacci 
(Cameron Diaz in a tour-de-force role), a no-nonsense hard-hitter who 
inherited the team from her late father, who was also Tony's old 
compatriot.  But Pagniacci is not the least of D'Amato's worries: he 
also has to contend with idiot sports reporter Jack Rose (John 
McGinley); hungry assistant coach Nick Crozier (Aaron Eckhart); slimy 
team doctor Harvey Mandrake (James Woods); showboat running back Julian 
Washington (LL Cool J); and third-string young gun quarterback Willie 
Beamon (the outstanding Jamie Foxx), a wild player (on and off the 
field) who has a strange projectile ritual.
The Upshot (WARNING: **more-than-usual spoilers contained below**):
This flick opens with a quote by legendary football coach Vince 
Lombardi, who compares football players to warriors--and this theme is 
advanced throughout the movie by D'Amato and others.  "Not an auspicious 
start to this flick," thought I; "these overpaid boys (and girls, as in 
the case of owner Pagniacci) owe an apology to the real warriors of the 
world for being so full of themselves to make such ridiculous 
comparisons."  But that's another rant for another time...
Fortunately, I was distracted from that rant by the opening images of 
the Sharks and their opponents; director Oliver Stone (who, casting 
himself as a football announcer, might have found a new calling) and his 
cinematographer grabs the viewer right off the bat with the MTV-like 
cuts from the field to the stands to overhead shots of the stadium and 
back; similar photography is shot throughout a great deal of the movie.  
In the hands of a lesser (younger?) cast and director, this camerawork 
might've shown the emptiness under the window dressing; but here, it 
emphasizes the storyline--to the deficit of the traditionally-shot, 
slower parts of the story.  Those bits dragged the flick down more than 
they would have in "normal" situations, and made the time more 
noticeable.
But again fortunately, the "drag" times were few and far between.  The 
story was a standard one, pitting Old School (D'Amato, Cap, and 
Julian--yes, Julian; a flashy showboater, to be sure, but still 
respectful of the old ways) versus New Jack (Pagniacci, Nick, and 
Beamon) in a "duh, we knew that" parable (Owners are greedy fat cats who 
only care about the bottom line: "Mo' Money"; older Players are grizzled 
rich men who Do It For The Gipper; younger Players are spoiled rich boys 
who Do It For The Benjamins--and the adoring fans, who keep giving them 
The Benjamins; team doctors just wanna Pump You Up).  But the story is 
told in a fresh, non-straightforward way that keeps the audience's 
attention for the most part; and though most of the characters lines are 
drawn early on, with the exception of Matthew Modine's Dr. Oliver 
Powers--a "goody two-shoes" doctor who fronts Dr. Mandrake about his 
ethics--few, if any of the characters have a surplus of redeeming 
qualities (and even Powers' "goodness" is called to question late in the 
movie).
Indeed, the best part of the telling of "Sunday" lies in the "Badness" 
of the characters: D'Amato is a frightened has-been with narrow vision; 
Pagniacci Has No Heart; Washington can't hold on to the ball in his 
anxiousness to get to the next page in the record books; Shark has more 
brawn than brains when it comes to his health; Beamon gets the big head 
and disses his teammates and his girlfriend, Vanessa Struthers (Lela 
Rochon, a long way from her Siren of "Waiting To Exhale"--but, though a 
bit more chunky, still pretty); Mayor Tyrone Smalls (Clifton Davis), a 
Black man, is shown as questionably dirty as any White politician might 
be (more on the importance of that in "The Black Factor"); assistant 
coach Montezuma Monroe (Jim Brown, in another standout role) doesn't 
pamper his players one iota, calling their manhood into question at the 
drop of a hat; in a small, but noticeable bit, Cap's wife Cindy (Lauren 
Holly) shocks us with her bitchitude; and so on.  Not many totally 
redeeming qualities in this bunch.  And up to the point where Pagniacci 
and Beamon See The Light, I grooved on their Badness.
Unfortunately, Logan almost blew the lead the story had in the first 
three quarters, in a "delay of game" snoozer of a last quarter.  Having 
told more here than I'd intended to, I won't fumble the ending except to 
say that, considering what happened in the steam room scene, I came to 
expect the ending that played itself out.  And, I find I need to qualify 
the above sentiment: though the last quarter of the flick was 
disappointing, D'Amato's action in the last scene was excellent, showing 
glimpses of the heat that Al Pacino once had oozing through his acting 
pores but now seems to have lost as he's grown older (I preface this 
with the admittance that, not having seen "The Insider" yet, I don't 
know whether Pacino's tiredness throughout in this movie was indicative 
of his acting chops as of late, or just being intentionally 
in-character).
Though the photography and direction were great, the members of this 
large cast were just as important to this flick.  As noted above, Foxx, 
Diaz, and Brown were superb; Pacino and Quaid, though solid, played as 
"old" as they looked, Quaid almost to the point of being there to just 
pass Go, collect $200 (plus a percentage of the receipts).  If I hadn't 
seen the execrable "True Crime", I might've given Woods some play here; 
but since he's playing the same one-note character here that he did in 
that movie, his just-short-of "over the top" acting gets no love from 
this reviewer; Bill Bellamy (as wide receiver Jimmy Sanderson) made me 
smile with his pep talk to himself, though he was far overshadowed by 
Foxx and LL Cool J (who, himself, I saw as being excess luggage here).  
But on a sour note, as the constantly-soused Margaret Pagniacci 
(Christina's wacky mother), Ann-Margaret was just irritating; I was too 
oft reminded of whazhername's character on "Overboard" (a wholly 
forgettable Goldie Hawn/Kurt Russell flick that I can't be arsed to look 
up on the IMDB; trust me, it ain't worth the effort).  And is it just 
me, or did the appearance of a movie clip actor Charlton Heston was 
featured in, blow any currency his Commissioner character, could've had? 
If you're like me, the players (on and off the field) in "Any Given 
Sunday" won't elicit any sympathy--and neither will their counterparts 
in real life: oh, he didn't make a kabillion dollar bonus for kicking 
the most punts in a season? boofrigginhoo; what, she was made to jump 
off a short pier after her lame team didn't clear .500? good; serves her 
right.  But the story here was told well enough to let me leave my 
cynicism about the Games grown folk play, on the sidelines for three 
hours (and by the way, it is a coincidence that this movie lasted damn 
near as long as a real pro game would?  Hmmm...)
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I can't speak highly enough of Jamie Foxx in his role in this flick; 
though I knew he was funny and talented from his "In Living Color" days 
[nota bene, Hollywood: Jim Carrey wasn't the only one in that cast.  But 
they don' hear me doe...], and I've thus far managed to miss him in that 
show of his on the WB (aka, The Ghetto Network), the depth of his acting 
here really made me sit up and take notice.  Funny in the right spots 
("My Name Is Willie" had me rollin') but serious in others, he smoked 
Pacino in their breakfast scene together, and had some good stuff to say 
about the role of Black athletes--something that's been a long time in 
coming to be voiced on-screen.  But is anyone listening? 
Another BF moment that stood out in a movie full of them, had to do with 
the characterization of the Mayor by Clifton Davis.  It is the stigma of 
the dearth of Black roles in movies, that when a Black person is shown, 
it's generally in either a comedic role, or as the Bad Guy.  That the 
Mayor could be played as a (questionably) Bad Guy here, was a bold move 
on the movie makers parts, I think; though there might be an outcry of 
"stereotyping!" by some Blacks, the sad reality is that there are some 
slimy Black politicians out there, just like their slimy White 
counterparts.  Forget spending all this energy on getting rid of the 
movie bad guys, dump the ones in real life, eh? 
And I'm surprised that I've made it this far without mentioning that 
remarkable young man in the locker room, who didn't say much but whose 
mere presence said a mouthful.  I'll try to be good, but I don't know 
how much longer I'll be able to keep it up. 
Bammer's Bottom Line:
It appears that long movies are becoming the norm these days: in the 
past few weeks, I've watched 10 hours between only four movies ("The 
Green Mile": 3 hrs. 15 min.; "Bicentennial Man": 2 hrs. 25 min.; "Stuart 
Little": 1 hr. 34 min.; and "Any Given Sunday": 2 hrs. 45 min.), with 
mixed results (my time in "Green" felt like a picnic compared to the 
torturous "Stuart").  Which goes to show that shorter is not necessarily 
better--but longer daggone bet' have a good reason for being so long.
For the most part, "Any Given Sunday" used its time well.  It could've 
stood a more careful snip or two in the editing box (and a little less 
ham-handedness during Beaman's and Christina's Obligatory Awakenings), 
but the excellent cinematography, tight cast, good soundtrack with more 
than just the usual Urban Contemporary song stylings offered (and yet, I 
must take issue with one of the "songs" featured during the game with 
the Rhinos, a rap number that prominently featured the phrase "my 
nigga".  When, My People? When?  sigh), and the great ending scene, made 
the time watching grown folk play their Games, time well-spent.  And did 
I mention bru-man in the locker room?  woo lawd.
"Any Given Sunday": (rating: greenlight)  
We have most def entered the MTV Generation of moviemaking (though 
including Oliver Stone in that description is a tenuous connection at 
best), where quick cuts and "special effects" rule the day in the movie 
theater.  What "Any Given Sunday" has that most MTV-esque flicks lack, 
though, is a mostly compelling story line (throughout the first 3/4, 
anyway), good acting (specifically from Jamie Foxx, Cameron Diaz, and 
surprisingly, Jim Brown) and an uncredited three-legged fella who has to 
be seen to be believed.

Title
Review for Remember the Titans (2000)
REMEMBER THE TITANS (2000)
Rated PG; running time 113 minutes
Genre:Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0210945
Official site: ">http://disney.go.com/disneypictures/rememberthetitans/>
Written by: Gregory Allen Howard
Directed by: Boaz Yakin
Cast: Denzel Washington, Will Patton, Wood Harris, Ryan Hurst,
Donald Adeosun Faison, Ethan Suplee, Hayden Panettiere,
Catherine Bosworth, Jerry Brandt, Craig Kirkwood, Rice Brett, Neal Ghant,
Ryan Gosling, Stuart Greer, Earl Poitier, David Jefferson, Burgess
Jenkins, Lucinda Jenney, Kip Pardue, Krystin Leigh Jones,
Nicole Ari Parker, Brett Rice, Ethan Suplee, John Michael Weatherly,
Scott Miles, Gregory Alan Williams
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsremember.html
It has been said that one shouldn't judge a book by its cover.  Just as
surely, one also shouldn't judge a movie by its trailer - not always,
anyway.  If I had left it up to the trailer for REMEMBER THE TITANS - or
more precisely, on the sheer number of times I'd seen the same daggone
trailer before the movie was released - I might have decided not to go
see this film.
And would have missed the best movie I've seen all year.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Virginia, 1971, was not very far from Boston, race relations-wise.
Desegregation and forced busing made many Whites upset, and displaced
long-time winning White high school football Coach Yoast (Will Patton)
from his job, when what originally started out as an assistant coach
position under Yoast for Black football Coach Boone (Denzel Washington),
turned out just the opposite: Boone was to take over as head coach for
the newly-integrated Titans football team.
That team, being a microcosm of the society around it, would need to do
more than just be physically combined to be truly integrated; Yoast was
somewhat hesitant at first to be assistant coach under a person with
less experience than him, but the surrounding neighborhood, parents,
students, and others, made it clear in no uncertain terms that Boone,
and "his people", were unwanted there.  Boone, however, had other plans:
plans which included making the young Black and White athletes truly
come together as a unit, by putting them through bootcamp-type training,
enforced interracial socialization, and lots of hard work.  And maybe,
just maybe, the Titans - the student players as well as the ill-at-ease
coaching staff - could pull a victory or two out of their collective
hats, in spite of themselves.
The Upshot:
About the only thing Keanu Reeves' THE REPLACEMENTS had in common was
REMEMBER THE TITANS was that they were both football flicks; the
similarities end there, for "Titans" was everything "Replacements" was
not.  But I didn't come here to rip on The Whoa Dude; I came in praise
of Denzel Washington, a bunch of young actors (the names of whom,
unfortunately, I do not know; my apologies), and most surprisingly, two
young girls who acted their cute little butts off.
That Denzel would Give Good Show is almost a no-brainer; with the
exception of a few miscues early on (CARBON COPY, anyone?), Washington's
career has been filled with solid, and sometimes awe-inspiring,
performances.  His Coach Boone is no exception; funny at times (the
"offsides" bit near the end had me crackin' up) and almost always
intense, I would be very surprised if Washington didn't receive an Oscar
nod for this performance.
The actors making up the Titans team were also very good, though alas
too numerous to name (and get right) in this small space.  Standouts
were Ryan Hurst as team captain Gary "Jerry" Bertier, one of the first
White players to See The Light; Wood Harris as "Big Ju", one of the
first Black players to also be thus enlightened; Donald Adeosun Faison
as Petey, the "football's zero fun" character from the trailer (and even
though I'd seen that specific scene so many times, it was still funny in
its context), and Ethan Suplee as Louie Lastik, the big loveable lug -
both actors playing Funny without going overboard and playing The Clown.
Along with the soft-spoken Will Patton as the go-along-to-get-along
Coach Yoast, these actors came together in a way that made the cheering
audience I was in, really believe they became a cohesive team.
But the shocker for me came with the interplay of Hayden Panettiere as
Sheryl Yoast (Coach Yoast's daughter) and Krystin Leigh Jones as
Nikki Boone (Coach Boone's daughter).  Typically, the Cute factor in
young actors would be turned up to epic proportions in these types of
Conquering Heroes flicks, but not so here; indeed, they sparkled in
their scenes together, and were funny and heart-warming without being
overly smarmy (and Panettiere should get special recognition for
matching Washington in intensity.  She was out there!).  Young actors
like these may not be everyone's cup o' tea within sports movies, but I
very much enjoyed them.
REMEMBER THE TITANS makes no apologies for its Feel Good bent.  The
music was obviously picked for its Inspirational value, and the mending
of racial fences might've come across as too trite in a lesser movie;
certainly, it takes more than a good round of The Dozens to Bring People
Together As Brothers, though I can believe that the more sports-minded
neighbors might not let a little thing like their racist tendencies, get
in the way of Some Football! from their winning coach-neighbor.  Yes,
this was a Feel Good setup from jump.  But hey, ain't nuttin' wrong with
Feelin' Good.  Go see it, and get some Feel Good of your own.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
It's easy to pick the overt, cross-burning, white-sheet-wearing, racists
out of a crowd, point at them, and assure the viewing audience that Yes,
Those People Are Racists.  Much harder, I think, to see the
not-so-obvious, and deal with it.  Much harder, I think, to see that
racism doesn't just wear a White face, and isn't always a one-way
street.  Much harder, I think, to admit that racism will ALWAYS be there
until the mindset that creates an US versus a THEM, begins to be erased
by creating a WE.  REMEMBER THE TITANS looked at the WE for a time, in a
way that's not often shown in mainstream flicks; here's hoping that
other movies will pick up where it left off.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
For a PG-rated Disney flick, REMEMBER THE TITANS did a decent job of
addressing The Race Issue; it did lay it on too thick at times, and not
thick *enough* at others.  I've seen better attempts, but I've also seen
much worse; and at least it pinned the tail right on The Major Cause of
racial hatred: ignorance.  Think on that.  And while you're thinking, go
see this movie.  It'll make you Feel Good.
REMEMBER THE TITANS (rating: greenlight):
A field goal, a touchdown, and the extra point; REMEMBER THE TITANS is
the best movie I've seen all year.  And yes, I cried; hey, if Bryant
Gumble can cry over this flick, I can too.

Title
Review for Anna and the King (1999)
Anna And The King (1999) 
Rated PG-13; running time 140 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0166485 
Official site: http://www.annaandtheking.com/  
  [I highly encourage my readers to visit this extremely well-done 
   webpage. It's stunning.]
Written by: Peter Krikes and Steve Meerson; based on the diaries 
of Anna Leonowens
Directed by: Andy Tennant
Starring: Jodie Foster, Chow Yun-Fat, Bai Ling, Tom Felton, 
Keith Chin, Syed Alwi (Kralahome), Kay Siu Lim, Randall Duk Kim, 
Melissa Campbell, Deanna Yusoff, Shanthini Venugopal
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsanna.html
The first of my "1999 catchup" movies, I avoided "Anna and the King" 
when it first came out, because of my general distaste for most remakes, 
especially music and movie remakes.  While this distaste is not 
universal--I loved George Benson's turn on "Unchained Melody", for 
instance; similarly, I grooved on the Pierce Brosnan/Renee Russo version 
of "The Thomas Crowne Affair"--I can say without overmuch reservation 
that remakes twist my gizzards.  And for me, the ghost of Yul Brenner's 
King Mongkut loomed heavy on the horizon of this version; so much so 
that it took me until yesterday, to go see it.
Of course, the irony in all of the above is that Yul's "The King and I" 
was, itself, a remake.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Set in Siam of the 1860's, "Anna and the King" tells the epic - and this 
time, non-musical - tale, based on the diary of widowed English 
schoolmistress Anna Leonowens (Jodie Foster), on how she and her son 
Louis (Tom) came to live in Siam (now Thailand).  Their primary purpose 
there is to "Westernize" Prince Chulalongkorn (Keith Chin), the eldest 
son of King Mongkut (Chow Yun-Fat), "Lord of Life" in the eyes of head 
wife Lady Chang (Deanna Yusoff) and his 22 other wives and 42 
concubines; his daughter Princess Fa-Ying (Melissa Campbell) and 66 
other children; his brother, Chowfa (Kay Siu Lim); assistant Kralahome 
(Syed Alwi); and army General Alak (Randall Duk Kim).  But all is not 
well in Siam: his newest wife, Tuptim (Bai Ling) is still in love with 
the man she left out of duty to her King; and Burmese forces, backed 
with the power of the British Empire Anna so proudly boasts of, conspire 
against him--possibly backed by a traitor within the King's trusted 
circle.
The Upshot:
One of the traits that I have and generally consider a positive one - 
loyalty - is, alas, my undoing with regard to enjoying new things.  In a 
nutshell, it takes a lot for me to let go of an old passion, to be able 
appreciate a new one.  "Anna and the King" illustrates this precisely; 
try as I might, I kept comparing it, and its stars, Foster and Yun-Fat, 
to the "original" with Brenner as the King and Deborah Kerr as Anna 
(though I had far less problems with that role; Jodie Foster quickly 
made me say "Deborah who?").  Not that the "original", story-wise, was 
all that great; it had all of the Issues that come with musicals [who, 
really, breaks out in song to express an idea or problem?], but like 
many true Classics, such Issues are overlooked in favor of our nostalgia 
for Better Days.
Not so with the whippersnappers who come along as pretenders to the 
throne--to wit, "Anna".  That it has the audacity to not Break Out In 
Song, makes the scrutiny all the more great.  That "Anna", for the most 
part, is able to stand up to that scrutiny, is a tribute to the actors 
involved, if not the story itself (a story which resonates, "Black 
Factor"-wise, for me as a descendant of people taken into slavery.  But 
more on that below).  Foster, as I implied, was much easier a pill to 
swallow in the role of Anna than was her counterpart, Yun-Fat; a problem 
very much exacerbated by nostalgia.
My memories of "The King and I" are very much colored by nostalgia; I 
remember key scenes and songs (mostly because the school choir I was in, 
sang them), and the general storyline, but I haven't seen it on TV in 
quite some time.  Were it not for "Anna", I would have missed the 
heartbreaking story of Tuptim and her love for Balat (Shanthini 
Venugopal), and how that came to cause Issues for The King and Anna; I 
have no memory of whether this was an important part of the musical 
version, and in fact, though I remember the name "Tuptim", I thought it 
was the name of one of The King's sons. 
Were it not for "Anna", I would have missed the sweet Princess Fa-Ying, 
the "little monkey" who, in this version, held a stronger hold on The 
King's heart than did his eldest son; that bond, not the traditional 
"that's my boy!" father's pride, was more at the forefront here, and it 
bespoke a Kinder, Gentler King than Yul Brenner's, which of course has 
something to do with the times we live in (for modern times do have an 
effect on historical dramas), but I believe it has even more to do with 
the kind of actor Yun-Fat is.  I saw this as a deficit at first--I kept 
fighting the urgency to shrug him off with a flippant "yeah, but he's no 
Yul Brenner"--but Yun-Fat did the wise thing by not *trying* to be Yul 
Brenner.
And were it not for "Anna", I would have remembered Siam as it was seen 
by Hollywood of the 1950's: a country full of Happy Little Orientals 
with few worries in their Primitive heads, with  spoils afoot, begging 
for the taking--much like the Black slaves were seen in the book that 
the Prince was reading, "Uncle Tom's Cabin".  And less distant yet, the 
many African countrymen and women whose countries were being 
colonialized by the "Great Empires" in the 19th and 20th centuries.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
If there's anything that raises my hackles, it's the patronizing notion 
that colonialization did anything for the nations who came under the 
rule of the "Great Empires" besides strip colonized countries of their 
natural resources, and force missionary ideals of "civilization" onto 
people whose "primitive" lives might well have been a whole lot better 
off in the end had they not been "blessed" with civilization, thank yew 
verrah much.  How sad it was, then, that many times, it was the leaders 
of these "primitive" countries who sought out the Empire's patronage.
And Anna wasn't immune; Foster may or may not have meant to play it that 
way, but Anna's acceptance of White Privilege was not lost in all her 
posturing (sincere or not) about wanting Siam, The King, and Siam 
servants, to have the right to their freedom and destiny.  Perhaps the 
posturing would've come across less fake, had Anna's Indian servants not 
have been fetching her tea and crumpets at the time.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Some things are better left alone--Celine Dion will go to a Special Hell 
for having the nerve to dare try and remake anything previously sang by 
diva Patti Labelle--some things just cannot be improved upon.  But if 
you're gonna muster up the nads to remake a classic firmly embedded in 
the collective eyes of quite a few fans (I say again, Yul Brenner will 
ever be my vision of The King), you could do a damn sight worse than 
Jodie Foster and Chow Yun-Fat.
"Anna And The King": (rating: greenlight)  
Still, couldn't Jodie have *tried* to hum "I could have danced all 
night"?

Title
Review for Siunin Wong Fei-hung tsi titmalau (1993)
IRON MONKEY (1993)
  aka "Siunin Wong Fei-hung tsi titmalau"
Rated PG-13; running time 89 minutes
Genre: Action/Martial Arts
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.iron-monkey.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0108148
Written by: Tsui Hark, Cheung Tan, Pik-Yin Tang, Tai-Muk Lau
Directed by: Yuen Woo-Ping
Cast: Donnie Yen, Sze-Man Tsang, Rongguang Yu, Jean Wang,
Shun-Yee Yuen, Yee Kwan Yan, James Wong, Hou Hsiao, Sai-kun Yam,
Fai Li
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsironmonkey.html
When I heard about the background of this movie, I thought of an African
fable I learned as a child, that of Anasi The Spider, told to me in many
variations.  I don't remember the details of it very well, but the
memory came to me as an analogy to the legend of Wong Fei-Hung.  When I
found out that the Fei-Hung I enjoyed so much in LEGEND OF DRUNKEN
MASTER was the grown-up version of the one in IRON MONKEY, I found
myself anticipating it, just as I had, years ago, anticipated hearing a
new version of the Anasi tale.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Legend has it that in 1800s China, warlords ruled the land, causing the
countryside peasants to flee and seek protecting as refugees in China's
big cities.  Unfortunately, greedy merchants and corrupt politicians
made the refugee's life a difficult one.  The good news was that in
Chekiang province, there were kind people like Dr. Yang (Rongguang Yu)
and Miss Orchid (Jean Wang) to help care for the mistreated peasants.
And that a man known as Iron Monkey was there to rob from the rich and
give back to the poor.
This, of course, doesn't sit well with the town's leading official,
Governor Cheng (James Wong), who wants to keep all his "hard-earned"
money to himself.  The Governor charges Chief Fox (Shun-Yee Yuen) with
hunting down the Robin Hood of China; but it soon becomes apparent that
Fox and the traitorous Shaolin monks in his employ, can't handle the job.
Paranoid about the Iron Monkey, the Governor orders anyone who even
*looks* like they have any monkey in them [Driving While Monkey?] to be
arrested.  Wong Kei-Ying (Donnie Yen), an innocent monk travelling
through town with his son Wong Fei-Hung (Sze-Man Tsang), is profiled and
arrested along with other innocent villagers.  The Governor, seeing
Kei-Ying's mighty kung-fu, uses Kei-Ying to track down Iron Monkey - by
holding his son Fei-Hung hostage.
The Upshot:
My wait was not in vain.  Though IRON MONKEY is new to the U.S., it
actually predates LEGEND OF DRUNKEN MASTER (itself a late U.S. release)
by one year: IRON MONKEY was released in Hong Kong in 1993, as SIUNIN
WONG FEI-HUNG TSI TITMALAU ("Iron Monkey: The Young Wong Fei-Hung").
Both films share a wonderful sense of wit, a grand display of martial
arts skill and artistry, and a warmth not found even in one of my
favorite films of all time, CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON (which shares
another datapoint in common with IM: director Yuen Woo-Ping
choreographed the CT/HD fight scenes - and it shows).
In fact, I have a hard time separating these three films in my Best Of
Genre sights.  Where CT/HD was more grandiose, IM, in its relative
simplicity, was easier to believe; its lack of out-and-out fantastical
mysticism made it more immediate, more human.   And though LODM was much
more out-and-out funny at times, IM's use of humor blended more
naturally with its storytelling.  IM may not have had a lead with the
overpowering presence of a Chow Yun-Fat, or the hilarious timing of a
Jackie Chan, but the team of Donnie Yen, Sze-Man Tsang, Rongguang Yu,
and Jean Wang, are no slouches either.
Yen and Tsang match beautifully, with Yen displaying a calm charisma
that did remind me of Li Mu Bai in CT/HD, but with less of that
character's standoffishness; and Fei-Hung's monkey-like mimicking of
father Kei-Ying made Tsang a joy to watch.  The other duo, Yu and Wang,
were also good, together and separately.  I was floored by one of their
first shared scenes - a "simple" act of picking up scattered paper - and
found myself wishing that the romance in CT/HD had been drawn nearly as
well as the story of Dr. Yang and Miss Orchid.  And needless to say,
this foursome can kick some serious booty.
I have mixed feelings about the supporting characters.  It was good to
see many of the characters I had seen in LODM - the witch (Fai Li), the
disfigured warrior (Hou Hsiao), and unless I'm mistaken, Hin Hung the
monk (Sai-kun Yam) - but it would've been nice to have had some idea
where those characters came from, rather than just seeing them show up
to kick some serious booty [not that there's anything wrong with that.]
Similarly, James Wong didn't add any real nuance to his ObIdiot
Governor; except for the necessity of twists in Chief Fox's story, the
Governor character could've been dropped altogether, with Chief Fox
being The Bad Guy in his place.  But I have no such Issues with Chief
Fox himself; Shun-Yee Yuen gave this character layers that I found
pleasantly interesting to watch.  And Hiu Hing, Shaolin Traitor (Yee
Kwan Yan) will always be My Boy if for no other reason than introducing
me to Flying Sleeve!
In a way, I wish I had seen them in chronological order: IRON MONKEY
first, then LEGEND OF DRUNKEN MASTER, and CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON
last.  I wasn't as wowed after seeing IM as I was after CT/HD, partially
because of advances in "wire-fu" technology since 1993, I think.  I just
hope that that advancement doesn't affect IM's box office success; it is
a film that should be seen on its own terms, not just as a predecessor
to a more technically-advanced chop-socky flick.  Meaning THE MATRIX, of
course.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Check out IRON MONKEY: a less polished, less mystical - but somehow
warmer and more pure rendering - of CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON-type
storytelling, with the humor (and shared storyline) of LEGEND OF DRUNKEN
MASTER.  Like those movies, IRON MONKEY (and its sequel, IRON MONKEY 2)
will most def become part of my DVD collection, once Amazon brings this
movie back to its virtual shelves.
IRON MONKEY (rating: greenlight):
I think I'll be spending a lot more time looking for legendary fables at
the library - and the video store - if they're told half as well as the
one in IRON MONKEY.

Title
Review for Brothers, The (2001/I)
THE BROTHERS (2001)
Rated R; running time 106 minutes
Genre: Romantic Comedy/Drama
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.sony.com/thebrothers/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0250274
Written by: Gary Hardwick
Directed by: Gary Hardwick
Cast: Morris Chestnut, D.L. Hughley, Bill Bellamy, Shemar Moore,
Gabrielle Union, Jenifer Lewis, Tamala Jones, Susan Dalian,
Tatyana Ali, Julie Benz, Clifton Powell, Vanessa Bell Calloway,
Marla Gibbs, Angela Brooks
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsthebrothers.html
On 3BC's "Viewer Voices" webboard, Chris Utley mentions that in numerous
other reviews of THE BROTHERS, some [begin code word] mainstream [end
code word] critics are complaining that it's "just another flick in the
same vein as THE BEST MAN and THE WOOD and the films in this genre of
young Black professionals seeking romance, etc."
Yeah; lord knows we need to get back to the days when the only Black man
in a movie, played the ObThug.  What's that now: FIVE "Professional
Black Man/Woman Seeks Fulfillment And The American Dream - Just Like
Their White Counterparts" movies to UMPTEEN "Hoodrat/Thug/Drug
Dealer/SkantchHoe/Pimp/Ig'nant Shuffling Sambo..." flicks?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
THE BROTHERS literally starts with a bang, as Dr. Jackson Smith (Morris
Chestnut) recounts the nightmares he has of a mysterious woman in bridal
attire coming after him with a gun, to his therapist (Vanessa Bell
Calloway).
And speaking of brides, Terry Wright (Shemar Moore), one of Jack's
running buddies (a group of four professional Black men who call
themselves "The Brothers") announces that he's about to jump the broom
with his girlfriend of two months, BeBe Fales (Susan Dalian).  The
Brothers are underwhelmed by this news, especially lawyer Brian Palmer
(Bill Bellamy), who's never met a Black woman without Issues [listen
closely, and you can almost hear the Black Sista 3-Snaps-Up from Angela
Brooks as the spurned Judge], and thus looks to a White woman (Julie
Benz) to fulfill his needs.  And speaking of not having one's needs
fulfilled, fellow Brother Derrick West (D.L. Hughley) is also not quite
enthusiastic over Terry's news; Derrick speaks from experience, as his
wife Sheila (Tamala Jones) refuses to, as the youngsters say, "give
Derrick brain", or to entertain thoughts of letting D's mother (Marla
Gibbs) live with them.
Jack also has Intimacy Issues, stemming from the way his father (Clifton
Powell) abandoned his feisty mother (the wonderful Jenifer Lewis),
leaving them and his wacky sister Cherie (Tatyana Ali) to fend for
themselves.  But Jack's world is about to be turned upside down, as he
meets and falls for freelance photographer Denice Johnson (Gabrielle
Union); Denice *seems* normal enough at first glance, but like most of
the women in The Brothers' lives, she has a skeleton in her closet, too.
The Upshot:
Even with my eyes rolling at my fellow critics, it pains me to say that
THE BROTHERS just didn't Do It for me; not because of some misguided
notion that the Black Movie Role scale has been balanced now that it's
finally hitting the positive end more often - sorry Mr. Charlie, we're a
*lonnnnnng* way away from things being Even, Steven - but because it
paled in comparison to the much better THE BEST MAN, and indeed, was too
derivative of that movie.  One could easily switch the actors in both
movies, and except for the more balanced strength of TBM's cast (sorry
Shemar Moore and Bill Bellamy; you're no Morris Chestnut/Taye Diggs and
Terrence Dashon Howard), come away with nearly the same concept, though
not nearly the same strong movie.
Not to say that there weren't some good-to-great performances in THE
BROTHERS.  Morris Chestnut, as always, put in solid work as Jackson
(even though his character's main conflict made absolutely no sense to
me), and had wonderful chemistry with Gabrielle Union as Denice.  D.L.
Hughley had me absolutely rolling as the sexually frustrated Derrick
West, and put me in mind of, strangely enough, Burgess Meredith in
GRUMPY OLD MEN (made more evident by the outtakes shown at the end).
And Jenifer Lewis once again ran away with a movie, in a role (the
mother) that was probably supposed to suppress her power, but you might
as well ask the sun not to shine as to try to tuck Lewis' abilities to
Bring It, away.
But Bill Bellamy ought to go back to stand-up comedy, or MTV-hosting,
because - as his scenes with his movie mother proved - the man can't
act; more's the pity, because his character's playa-hating and "jungle
fever" *could* have had much more pivotal impact, given a better actor.
Ditto Shemar Moore, who stood there looking as pretty as he wanna be,
but added little to the movie itself.  In his case, though, I fault the
writing and directing more than the actor.  Where Bellamy was given *too
much* to do with too little talent to support it, Moore simply wasn't
given the tools he needed to make Terry much more than a bad plot
device.
And the women in THE BROTHERS?  Besides the powerhouse that is Ms.
Lewis, and Union's good showing, the women came off here pretty badly.
Not that I was surprised by that; after all, the Black Males In
Female-Driven Black Movies scale is also unbalanced with an
overabundance of McMillanesque No Good Black Men.  "Touche", I guess.
My biggest gripe?  It's not so much that women, as a gender, get blasted
in "Brothers" - hey, some of my sisters *deserve* the thrashing - but
that putting a penis on a skreech, doesn't improve the skreech.
Apparently, Terry McMillan doesn't have the corner on Black
gender-bashing.  Writer/director Gary Hardwick had the beginnings of a
good idea, but let it get away from him, failing to support his idea
with a solid storyline, believable backstory, or straightforward
character development.  What started out as a near-copycat of THE BEST
MAN ended up as WAITING TO EXHALE in drag, with an implied Oedipal
conflict thrown in for "good" measure.
The Interview:
I had the honor of interviewing Morris Chestnut before the special
limited showing of THE BROTHERS in which he came to Lansing (yes, I was
shocked, too) to introduce the movie to our audience.  As I expected, he
was quite charming, rivetingly handsome (though slimmer than I expected,
especially after seeing him in THE BEST MAN last year), and serious
about his craft.  We spoke about his breakout role in BOYZ IN THE HOOD
and how he's grown as an actor since then; he told me that he looks for
roles with depth and meaning, and that his long-term plans are to get
involved behind-the-scenes as a producer and director, and to continue
to elevate his art.  He seemed proud of THE BROTHERS; and though I don't
share his enthusiasm with the overall product, Chestnut's solid
contribution to it, as with his past performances, warrant his pride.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I struggled with this one - I truly did - but in the end, I had to mark
it down a notch from the conditional green that I *wanted* to give THE
BROTHERS, because its miscues, lack of direction, and derivative nature,
overshadowed the solid performances by Morris Chestnut, Gabrielle Union,
Jenifer Lewis, and the hilarious D.L. Hughley.  I *will* have to see it
again, though - the ghettofabulous crowd made me miss too much the first
time.
THE BROTHERS (rating: flashing yellowlight):
But still, I'd take a thousand "Brothers" over one more Black Gangsta
flick, *any*day.

Title
Review for Osmosis Jones (2001)
OSMOSIS JONES (2001)
Rated PG; running time 95 minutes
Genre: Live action and animated
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.osmosisjones.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0181739
Written by: Marc Hyman
Directed by: Piet Kroon, Tom Sito (animation);
              Peter and Bobby Farrelly (live action)
Cast: Chris Rock, David Hyde Pierce, Laurence Fishburne, Brandy,
       William Shatner, Ron Howard, Joel Silver (voice)
       Bill Murray, Elena Franklin, Molly Shannon, Chris Elliott
       (live-action)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsosmosis.html
The hardest part about 3BC having been more or less down for two weeks,
is coming back to review new movies that I really didn't want to watch.
AMERICAN PIE 2?  Ewww.  THE OTHERS?  Not my speed.  SPY KIDS, The
Director's Cut?  Fat chance.  And as queasy as I am, the thought of
watching the grossout humor of OSMOSIS JONES just wasn't twisting my
throttle.  But a Chick's gotta review *something*, I reckon; and there
is the matter of one Laurence Fishburne, with a little David Hyde
Pierce, being part of the action.  In the end, Fishburne and Pierce they
almost cancelled out the Farrelly Brothers' influence.  Well, almost.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
Frank Pepperidge is, in a word, filthy - inside and out.  A
misunderstood widower, only his daughter Shane (Elena Franklin) seems to
be trying to help Frank find a clue again; Shane constantly fights a
losing battle to get Frank to eat healthy, exercise, and generally live
right, but not even a stint in the Army can help Fr...oops, wrong movie.
Uh...Frank's equally nasty bud Bob (Chris Elliott) is as codependent as
they come; and after Frank...loosed himself on Shane's teacher Mrs. Boyd
(Molly Shannon), Frank's gettin' no love from that side of the aisle,
either.
But Frank has a whole crew waiting in the wings to help him.  Actually,
they're waiting inside Frank's body: fighting off colds, allergies,
Twinkies, and the occasional monkey-handled egg, are a team of
hard-working antibodies and white-blood cells, the most strident of
which is Officer Osmosis Jones (voice of Chris Rock).  Due to a bad
history old Ozzie has with his Police Chief (Joel Silver), Oz is
initially banished to patrolling the boring mouth sector of The City Of
Frank; but when Cold Tablet Drixoral (David Hyde Pierce) is dispatched
to fight off what the Chief, Mayor Phlegmming (William Shatner), and
Brand...I mean, the Mayor's assistant, Leah (Brandy) think is merely a
cold virus, Ozzie is assigned to help Drix relieve Frank's symptoms.
What begins as a routine cleanup of the sewer that is Frank, though,
soon turns into Something Else, when Ozzie discovers that a SuperVirus
named Thrax (Laurence Fishburne) is out to terminate Frank.
[Man, does that look weird typed-out.]
The Upshot:
I can describe OSMOSIS JONES in three words: "punny", "nasty", and "PG".
That last bit - that is, the film's PG rating - holds the key to its
lack of success, I think; and, keeping my disdain for the Farrellys'
previous effort, ME, MYSELF & IRENE in mind, my acknowledgement of that
rating's shortcomings is also the source of some discomfort for me.
You see, I opine that with that rein-in-the-madcap PG rating acting as
an albatross hanging around its neck, OSMOSIS JONES didn't, *couldn't*,
go far enough in making itself funnier to adult viewers.  In our
abbreviated audience (the empty seats, no doubt, were due to the throngs
who rushed to see Pie Deux), you could hear a pin drop as pun after pun
fell on deaf ears: the adults who thought the humor was merely "cute",
and the kidlets who'd forgotten everything they knew about the "science"
of OSMOSIS JONES well before summer break began.
That's too bad, too; I really wanted OJ [sorry] to succeed.  Certainly,
the cast should have been up for it; with its collection of comics,
humorists, and damn fine actors, one would think OJ's success was
written in the stars.  To be sure, Fishburne tore it up as Thrax, the
baddest mutha of a germ this side of ebola - though I couldn't help but
think about the inherent problems with trying to make a seemingly
AIDS-like virus, *funny*; that Sir Laurence succeeded, and playfully so,
is a testament to just how great an actor he is, even with this type of
material.  Pierce, an equally great comic actor in his own right (if
you've never seen this modern-day Buster Keaton as "Niles" from
FRASIERR, you don't know what you've been missing), made a wonderful
Drix, though I was reminded of his similar voice acting in A BUG'S LIFE;
the comparison is favorable, but still, too similar.
Bill Murray reinvented his CADDYSHACK character, though besides the icky
subject matter itself, Murray's character was the other primary reason I
hesitated on going to see OSMOSIS JONES in the first place; I had hoped
Murray would've gotten past all of that by now.  Watching Murray Go
There Again was distressing, much the same as if, for instance, Steve
Martin suddenly picked up his Wild And Crazy Guy schtick again...ewww.
Still, a slovenly Frank was necessary for OJ to work - and my
reservations aside, I can think of no better actor to have played this
slob than Murray.  As for the balance of the cast, I had to be reminded
that William "KHAAAAN!" Shatner voiced The Mayor Of Frank, so my Issues
weren't really with him, nor was it with Ron "Opie" Howard's brief punny
bit as Tom Colonic, the Mayor's chief rival, or singer Brandy as The
Mayor's headstrong assistant, Leah.  Even Chris Rock, who normally gets
on my nerves in too large a dose, was quite tame as OSMOSIS JONES.
Aye, there's the rub.  Rock was tame; *too* tame, methinks.  He tried
hard, but even with the likes of Fishburne and Pierce helping to class
up the joint, he couldn't seem to elevate OSMOSIS JONES beyond the its
punny nature, saddled with the limitations of its diluted grossout
humor.  Look for a few chuckles here and there, a couple of good lines
(Fishburne has the best one late in the movie), and a cute riff on
Fishburne's THE MATRIX - but don't expect too much here.  Like I said,
too bad.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Surely, there must be a compromise between the all-out illness of an
R-rated "Irene" and the cute but PG-weakened punnyness of an OSMOSIS
JONES, some middle ground where adults can get their laugh groove on
without having our intelligence insulted, isn't there?  I'm still
looking for that middle ground - though you'll notice I'm not holding my
breath.
OSMOSIS JONES (rating: flashing yellowlight):
     Diagnosis: too much Farrelly, not enough funny.

Title
Review for What Planet Are You From? (2000)
What Planet Are You From? (2000) 
Rated R; running time 100 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0181151 
Official site: http://www.sony.com/whatplanet/  
Written by: Michael Leeson (based on a story by Garry Shandling)
Directed by: Michael Leeson
Starring: Garry Shandling, Annette Benning, John Goodman, Greg Kinnear, 
Ben Kingsley, Linda Fiorentino, Anne Cusack, Camryn Manheim, Nora Dunn, 
Caroline Aaron, Richard Jenkins, Samantha Smith, Janeane Garofalo
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsplanet.html
When I realized last week that my travelling to New Orleans for Mardi 
Gras would mean that I'd miss the opening weekend for What Planet Are 
You From (hereby known as WPAYF), I breathed a sign of relief.  Unlike 
the hoards who thought Garry Shandling's HBO and FOX TV shows were 
funny, I avoided them like nobody's business; I couldn't get past his 
looking too much like a giant weasel.  And the premise behind WPAYF just 
screamed to me, "Girl, don't go see this goofy sh...tuff".  Still, I had 
a few extra hours on my hands Sunday; and besides, I reasoned with 
myself, if you ignore Shandling, it's got a very talented supporting 
cast in Annette Benning, John Goodman, Ben Kingsley, and Linda 
Fiorentino.  What could go wrong?
Then I remembered "Random Mess" and "Stupornova" - and crossed my 
fingers...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
WPAYF takes the "Men Are From Mars" concept to another level: Harold 
Anderson (Gary Shandling) is a brother from another planet - a planet of 
men with no penis [shudder].  It should come as no surprise, then, that 
these dickless men wish to conquer another planet - and which planet 
would that be?  Three guesses; and the first two are wrong.
After putting his planet's men through semi-intensive training on the 
ways of Earth women, hoping that they'd be Easy, fearless leader Graydon 
(Ben Kingsley) picks Harold as their man.  His mission: grab his 
attachable penis, get an Earth Girl knocked up, and something or another 
mumble mumble about the new superbaby...oh yeah, it will become Supreme! 
Ruler! Of! Earth!
A few things get in the way first, though; mainly, his lame lines fail 
to impress many women - including a Flight Attendant (Samantha Smith) he 
met on the way to Earth - that is, until he meets Susan Hart (Annette 
Benning), who he figures just might be The One.  Finding a job at a bank 
while he's waiting for the child thingy to resolve itself, he also has 
to deal with his slimy sycophant co-work Perry Gordon (Greg Kinnear), 
their boss Don Fisk (Richard Jenkins), and FAA inspector Roland Jones 
(John Goodman), who is committed to proving to his bosses that Harold is 
from somewhere way the hell out there.
The Upshot:
As did "The Whole Nine Yards", WPAYF started out slow(ly) and picked up 
steam as it went along, with some very funny scenes along the way.  What 
really worked about it for me is the sense of fun the characters and 
actors seemed to have with each other, from Susan kickin' it with her 
girlfriends Liz (Anne Cusack), Alison (Camryn Manheim), and Madeline 
(Nora Dunn) to the comic interplay between Shanning and the surprisingly 
funny Benning - and especially Goodman, one of the funniest Big Men in 
Hollywood - the laughs were easily drawn out of me, even I as sat there 
determined not to laugh at this movie.  That lasted for about 15 minutes 
- right up to the point where Mr. Happy starting humming.  After that, I 
was done for.
The feel of this comedy is very "Raising Arizona"-ish; stretching the 
see-through lines men often troll on women - and the 
hook-line-and-sinker way women often respond to them - to a comic 
extreme, you quickly see, through Harold's eyes, just how silly the 
Battle Between The Sexes really is.  But even after the Obligatory 
Alien-Develops-Human-Feelings bit, the "yes, dear" relationship, in all 
its familiarity, seems somehow comforting; at least it did for this old 
married chick.
I do, however, take slight issue with what I see as two casting flaws, 
one of character choices, the other, miscast actors.  The character most 
out-of-place here was Helen Gordon, played to her smoky best by Linda 
Fiorentino; though Ms. F. did no real wrong in her role, her character 
seemed to be an unnecessary distraction, an appendage to "prove" how Bad 
Perry was (not that he needed the help).  Still, she delivered one of 
the best lines of the movie (and since it was featured in its 
commercials, I'm not giving away anything here): when Harold tells her 
that the humming sound she heard was coming from his penis, she says, "I 
guess it doesn't know the words".  Rollin', I tell ya; absolutely 
rollin'.
The second, more problematic, casting flaw involves Janeane Garofalo; as 
was done in Dogma, she was included here in a glorified cameo as a 
nervous airline passenger used as a target for more of Harold's Intro To 
Earth bit.  WPAYF's Powers That Be would've done far better to cast her 
as Roland's wife Nadine, and her part minor played instead by Caroline 
Aaron (the actor who actually played Nadine Jones).  Nothing against 
Aaron, but I had no idea why she was trippin' so tight over Roland just 
doin' his thang; but you can bet your bippy that if Garafolo had gotten 
her hooks into Nadine, comedic sparks would've flown between her and 
Goodman.
There's nothing - nothing, I say! - at all Deep about WPAYF; it 
certainly won't be up for anyone's "Best Of" lists at the end of the 
year, to say the least.  But in a year (so far) where damn near every 
movie seems to be striving for inclusion on "Worst Of", you could do 
much worse than to spend 100 minutes of your time with a few good 
bellylaughs and a chuckle or three.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Yeah, I know: I'm as shocked as you probably are to see me give WPAYF a 
greenlight (especially since I only gave its soulmate, last year's 
Galaxy Quest, a conditional yellow).  Hey, every Chick can be wrong 
once, eh?
"What Planet Are You From?" (rating: greenlight): 
Even if Garry Shandling does look like a giant weasel.

Title
Review for Hurricane, The (1999)
The Hurricane (1999) 
Rated R; running time 146 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0174856 
Official site: http://www.universalpictures.com/hurricane/  
Written by: Written by Armyan Bernstein (based on the book by 
 Rubin 'Hurricane' Carter)
Directed by: Norman Jewison
Starring:Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon Shannon, Dan Hedaya, 
Deborah Unger, Liev Schreiber, John Hannah, Debbi Morgan, David Paymer, 
Harris Yulin, Clancy Brown, Rod Steiger, Garland Whitt
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshurricane.html
If you've either never heard the true story of Rubin "The Hurricane" 
Carter and how he was imprisoned for more than 20 years for crimes he 
didn't commit, or you can't infer whether he was released or not from 
the tone of the trailers that have been shown, you might not want to 
read this review, since I'll be pulling no punches in telling what 
happened at the end.  After all, I respect my readers' intelligence.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
A strong contender for the middleweight boxing title during the 60s, 
Rubin "The Hurricane" Carter's (Denzel Washington) hopes were dashed 
when he and John Artis (Garland Whitt) were sentenced to three life 
terms and imprisoned for 20 years for murders he didn't commit.  This is 
his story...
...and it is also the story of an unlikely group of folks from Canada 
(one, by way of Brooklyn): Lesra Martin (Vicellous Reon Shannon), a 
young Black teen from Brooklyn, being homeschooled in Toronto by three 
White Canadians, Lisa Peters (Deborah Unger), Sam Chaiton (Liev 
Schreiber), and Terry Swinton (John Hannah).  By a strange twist of 
fate, Lesra finds a book written by Rubin about his unjust imprisonment, 
and he is so moved by it and his feverent belief in Rubin's innocence, 
that he convinces the Canadians to help him set Rubin free.  But not 
without a fight; they come up against pure evil, in the form of Det. 
Vincent Della Pesca (Dan Hedaya), a dirty, racist cop who's been after 
Carter for years, and does all he can to see that Rubin remains locked 
up.
The Upshot (WARNING: **more spoilers contained below**)
Let me get this out of the way: Denzel Washington, Vicellous Reon 
Shannon, and Dan Hedaya were outstanding in this film.  Washington, 
we've seen go "all-out" before, so his strong performance didn't 
surprise me at all.  Hedaya is one of those character actors that you 
know you've seen a million time, but can't put your finger on where, 
exactly; he's played Funny ("Cheers") as well as straight drama 
("Nixon"), but never before has he sent chills down my spine as he did 
here.  But Shannon really impressed me in the strangest of ways: every 
time he spoke, I said to myself, "his voice and his body don't match".  
For some reason, I kept expecting to hear a "softer" voice, but sure 
enough, his heavy Brooklyn accent came through each time.  But beyond 
that, Shannon's portrayal of Lesra's passionate belief in Rubin, and in 
his place in Rubin's life, astonished me--and will hopefully move him 
beyond the Obligatory Thug Roles that the IMDB lists him as having 
played so frequently in the past (if there's any justice in Hollywood.  
Notice that I'm not holding my breath).
The story itself, though moving, felt somewhat hollow.  Though of course 
Rubin couldn't know what became of John Artis while they were both in 
prison, I felt short-changed by the offhand mention of him throughout 
the film, and especially at the end.  I also got somewhat dizzy during 
the flashback/flashforward sequences; though the boxing scenes were 
beautifully shot in black and white, they felt cut-n-pasted on, and I 
could never fully understand their true significance to the story being 
told.  And one has to wonder how, after Rubin's lawyers Myron Beldoc 
(David Paymer) and Harris Yulin (Leon Friedman) spent ten years on a 
case that was heard by two juries, the Canadians could come along 
and...well, see for yourself.  Something else bothered me, involving 
Rubin's wife, Mae Thelma (Debbie Morgan) and the scene from the trailers 
which show Rubin telling her to "bury him".  Unfortunately, saying 
exactly what bothered me, would call for more spoilage than I'm prepared 
to do, so I'll have to wait to discuss this with the curious reader 
after they've has seen the movie.  Still, in spite of its padding (a 
half-hour could've easily been excised from this movie, with little 
detriment), "The Hurricane" spins a good tale; fractured, in places, but 
still told reasonably well.
Besides the performances of the three leads mentioned above, most of the 
other cast seemed pretty mute.  Liev Schreiber was almost invisible in a 
role that one would think would provide ample opportunity for him to 
shine in--especially since his character's (Sam Chaiton) book is given a 
writing credit in the film.  Unger and Hannah were almost as marginal; 
until their stint at private eye-ism, they could just as well have been 
shown as Lesra's babysitters, to no real detriment to the story.  And 
what a wasted opportunity the movie's Powers That Be made in not using 
Clancy Brown to his fullest potential; he's played prison guards enough 
before that casting him as Jimmy Williams, the Guard With A Heart (But 
Not Much To Do), made little sense to me.  But still, not as little 
sense as the casting of Rod Steiger as Judge H. Lee Sorokin.  Maybe I'm 
the only one who saw "Crazy In Alabama", and therefore, saw Steiger's 
Judge there.  Played as an absolute loon in that film, Steiger worked; 
here, he was just more flotsam.  But maybe I'm too picky.
The use of period music throughout the film was excellent, even Bob 
"damn, I can't sing!" Dylan's song, "Hurricane", written during the time 
when Dylan was one of a few celebrities (along with Ellen Burstyn and 
Muhammad Ali) who were trying to get Rubin set free early on in his 
sentence.  Their involvement (or lack thereof) over time was a key point 
made by Beldoc, when Lesra and the Canadians came to confront him in 
what Beldoc surely saw as Guilty White Liberalism at its worst.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Actually, since the BF is pretty clear in this flick, consider this 
space The "White Factor".  And let's go one step further: since Della 
Pesca's (and those like him) rabid racism need no explanation, let's 
examine the "Guilty White Liberal Factor", shall we?
Guilty White Liberals make an easy target; they seem to come in like a 
whirlwind, upset the status quo, do what they see as The Right Thing for 
those poor heathens who they deem worthy of their patronage, and leave 
after their Guilt is assuaged, right?  Well, maybe.  And maybe the three 
Guilty White Liberals from Canada took pity on both Rubin and Lesra, and 
by helping them, they purged themselves of their Guilt long enough to 
look back at their lives and feel they've Done Good--much to the 
consternation of those other poor heathens left behind in their wake who 
weren't so lucky as to gain the favor of those Guilty White Liberals.  
Maybe that's the way some see it. 
To those "some", ask yourself this: is Rubin still in that prison?
And as for the fellow (self-identified as being White) who, after he 
read Diva's "The Hurricane" review, took it upon himself to scold 3BC, 
saying we should be ashamed for not slamming "The Hurricane" for 
deifying those Guilty White Liberals?  Pardon my French, but he can 
baise mon bel noir ane.
Bammer's Bottom Line 
Overall, a powerful story that feels padded in spots (especially those 
involving the Danger! the Canadians were in, and how they so "easily" 
did what others couldn't do over the period of 15 or so years.  Yeah, 
right.), featuring bravura performances by Washington, Shannon, and 
Hedaya that should not be missed, but will likely be ignored come Oscar 
night.

Title
Review for Beyond the Mat (1999)
Beyond The Mat (1999) 
Rated R; running time 102 minutes
Genre: Documentary 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0218043 
Official site: http://www.beyondthemat.net/  
Written by: Barry W. Blaustein
Directed by: Barry W. Blaustein
Starring: Terry Funk, Mick "Mankind" Foley, Jake "The Snake" Roberts, 
Vince McMahon, Vicki Funk, Stacey Funk, Brandee Funk, Collette Foley, 
Dewey Foley, Noelle Foley, Brandy Smith, "Chyna", Paul Heyman, 
Roland Alexander, Tony Jones, Mike Modest, Darren "Puke" Drozdov, 
Duane "The Rock" Johnson
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbeyond.html
I have a confession to make: I'm a closet Pro Rasslin' fan ["Rasslin'", 
by the way, is a different creature than "wrestling".  The latter is 
what high school, college, and Olympic grapplers, do; the former is what 
crazy men and women dressed in tights of various fit and style and in 
cahoots with one another, do for little to no pay, or for crazy amounts 
of money, depending on many factors, some of which will be addressed 
below.  But yet again, I digress].
Ahem. I repeat: I'm a closet Pro Rasslin' fan--or at least, I used to 
be.  I watched it a lot as a kid back in the days of "The Sheik" and 
"BoBo Brazil", and like most of America, lost interest in it, until the 
heyday of the likes of "Hulk Hogan", Randy "Macho Man" Savage, and my 
personal favorite, "The Ultimate Warrior".  But though I've glanced at a 
few current World Wrestling Federation (WWF) and World Championship 
Wrestling (WCW) shows from time to time with my son, I've lost interest 
in the spectacle that is Pro Rasslin', because in its current 
incarnation, it's way too raunchy, soap opera-ish (and bad soap opera, 
at that), blatantly stereotypical and misogynic (all part of the soap, 
I'm sure they'd say), and when you get down to it, unabashedly aimed at 
the lowest common denominator.
Most people know, and even accept, that these "fights" are pre-ordained 
in their outcome--boxing promoter Don King would be a natural in this 
business--but the big question remains: is it fake?  And if is not, who 
are these fools and why would they subject their bodies to the pain?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The documentary Beyond The Mat takes a look at the Sports Entertainment 
industry of Professional Wrestling from the viewpoint of three of its 
major players: Terry Funk, a 53-year-old wrestler nearing the end of his 
career; Mick Foley, a gentle father and husband, but an all-out lunatic 
within the ring; and Jake "The Snake" Roberts, formerly a "golden boy" 
with the WWF, but now a crack addict whose glory days have come and 
gone.  It also addresses the differences between the minor, independent 
leagues and the "big three" of Pro Rasslin': the WWF, WCW, and Extreme 
Championship Wrestling (ECW), itself a controversial entity because of 
its high violence content.
The Upshot:
There was one overwhelming emotion that hit me as I was watching this 
documentary: sadness.  Above all else, I felt incredibly sad for each of 
the characters--make that, each of the three main people--being 
discussed, and even more, for their families.  Of the three, Mick Foley 
(aka "Mankind", "Dude Love", and "Cactus Jack") seemed the most centered 
and stable outside of the ring, and clearly he loved his family as much 
as they loved him.  But the kinds of horrific punishment he puts himself 
through for love of his (pseudo) sport was sickening to watch for me as 
an outsider; I shudder to think what his young children dream of every 
night, after they saw it up close and personal.  Terry Funk's mindset 
was just beyond my comprehension; why he would continue to, basically, 
slowly kill himself, is something I do not understand.  I do give him 
props, though, for being able to swallow such punishment at his age--and 
compared to Muhammed Ali in his degenerative state, Funk is not so bad 
off.  But then again, say the name "Ali", and you get instant 
recognition.  Say "Funk", and most people think of a righteous bass 
groove... 
But by far, my heart went out most to Jake "The Snake" Roberts.  Foley 
is one of the new(er) kids on the block; Funk is from the *original* Old 
School--but The Snake was from back in my rasslin'-fan day.  Jake's 
trademark move, the DDT, was something to watch.  His sneer would 
quickly turn into a smile that you knew hid teeth that would just as 
quickly bite you.  And though those huge pythons he carried to the ring 
never seemed to a real threat, you went along with the charade when he 
tossed them on his opponent, because, after all, Jake wasn't The Snake 
without them.  But like many of the older WWF (and then later, WCW) 
characters, Jake took a back seat to the new, younger guys--and then one 
day, he was gone.  And by then, I'd gotten older, and my interest in 
Rasslin' faded, so I hadn't thought much about Roberts, until this 
documentary.  That he had gotten older and fatter was no real surprise; 
it happens to the best of us.  But to hear that he was a crack 
addict...man, that threw me for a loop.  I'm glad that filmmaker Barry 
Blaustein got Roberts to open up to him, but unfortunately, the viewer 
never really gets as much of Roberts as we do of Blaustein talking about 
Roberts' problems.  
Along with the three featured athletes (and clearly, these folks are 
athletes; though their moves are choreographed, they are real...and real 
scary to watch when the mask is pulled off and you see it for what it 
is) and their families, Blaustein interviews some veterans in the 
profession as well as some up-and-comers.  Among these are: WWF owner 
Vince McMahon, whose family has been in the business for a very long 
time, and is very, very rich; Darren Drozdov, a former NFL player (as 
are many Pro Rasslers) who has the distinct "talent" of being able to 
vomit on command; female Rassler "Chyna", built like a man but made like 
a woman; Paul Heyman of the ECW, a league that has little respect for 
the WWF or WCW, but with all of their violence, seems to respect the 
individuals within its own organization; Tony Jones and Mike Modest, 
part-time Rasslers trying to get into the WWF with the help of their 
promoter, Roland Alexander; and current WWF heartthrob Duane "The Rock" 
Johnson, shown here competing against Foley as a Bad Guy (though last 
time I watched, The Rock is now a Good Character).
As interesting a documentary as it is, I wonder why Beyond The Mat was 
released in theaters instead of on TV; there have already been quite a 
few "Pro Wrestling Expose" types of documentaries on the small screen, 
so why this one here, now?  And I have to wonder about something else, 
too.  Stay with me here: writer/director Blaustein makes no bones about 
his love for the pseudo-sport, and it's clear that the athletes involved 
are pretty comfortable, even chummy, with Blaustein.  The  official 
"Beyond" website proclaims that this documentary is something that WWF 
President Vince McMahon "Doesn't want you to see!"--but isn't that 
something you would expect someone involved with the likes of McMahon, 
to say?  Hmmm...and didn't this documentary beat the WCW's theatrical 
"comedy" debut, Ready To Rumble, to the theaters?  Hmmm...and weren't 
there an awful lot of WWF "superstars" in this documentary, and no WCW 
stars to speak of?  Say it with me now:  HMMMMM...
There were many issues that weren't addressed in this documentary that I 
wish had been: namely, the blatant misogyny, stereotype characters, the 
history of the pseudo-sport (highlighting the way it's changed over the 
years), the way the fans are manipulated, the oodles of money gleaned 
from said fans (McMahon's WWF was reported to be worth almost a billion 
dollars, true, but a closer examination could've been done), the raising 
of the violence bar (namely, with the ECW) and what its logical 
progression will be, and especially the athletes' reactions to the death 
of WWF star Owen Hart last year.  Perhaps that's another documentary for 
another time--by another filmmaker not so in love with the world of Pro 
Rasslin'.
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
And speaking of "stereotype characters"...
For as long as Pro Rasslin' has existed, at least in the United States, 
there have been stereotype characters involved, but as time has gone on, 
things have become more and more blatant.  For every one average joe 
"The Rock" characters out there, there are a dozen shameful characters 
like "Razor Ramon" (a greasy latino caricature, formerly from the WWF), 
and "The Godfather" (a "pimp daddy", also from the WWF, who struts down 
the aisle with skanky hoochies in tight dresses; he calls them his 
"Ho-Train"--rarely, if ever, doing any actual Rasslin').  While I can 
ignore, for the most part, everything else about the three-ring circus 
known as Pro Rasslin', these types of characters are intolerable.
There is one upside to the "Godfather" character and his "Ho-Train", 
though: there haven't been any Black women on it.  So far.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
I've flip-flopped on my final rating on this, but in the end decided on 
a greenlight, primarily for all the millions (ObRock: and millions) of 
Pro Rasslin' fans who think it is something to be emulated.  They 
*really* need to go see this one.  And that's my final answer, Regis; 
now take your rooty-poot candy ass outta here, ya jabronie, 'fore I send 
you to the Smackdown Hotel!   Uh...
"Beyond The Mat" (rating: greenlight): 
I still wonder whatever happened to The Ultimate Warrior.

Title
Review for Freedom Song (2000) (TV)
Freedom Song (2000) 
Running time 150 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0213668 
Official site: http://tnt.turner.com/tntoriginals/freedomsong/
Written by: Phil Alden Robinson and Stanley Weiser
Directed by: Phil Alden Robinson
Music by: Sweet Honey In The Rock and James Horner
Starring: Danny Glover, Vondie Curtis Hall, Vicellous Reon Shannon, 
Loretta Devine, Glynn Turman, Stan Shaw, Michael Jai White, 
John Beasley, Jason Weaver, Rae Ven Larrymore Kelly, 
Marcello Thedford, David Strathairn
Turner Network Television World Premiere Sunday February 27, 
 7pm Eastern
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsfreedom.html
There will be some who flip past TNT next Sunday at 7pm Eastern, 
dismissing the movie "Freedom Song" as Yet Another Attempt by a 
White-owned media outlet to "cash in" on Black History Month before our 
29 days are up.  There will be others who will quickly change the 
channel because they're sick and tired of seeing "free at last" movies 
["Are you people still on that issue?  Haven't we gotten past that yet?  
Haven't you all Overcome by now?"].
My response to the latter would be to mention a little something called 
"Schindler's List". And to the former, I say, put the remote down and 
have a seat.  You just might learn a little something; and even if you 
don't learn something new, at least you'll remember something you may 
have forgotten.
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
This is the question asked of Owen Walker (Vicellous Reon Shannon), a 
Black teen growing up in Mississippi during the 1960s--a time when Jim 
Crow segregation laws were not only legal, they were looked on by many 
Whites as being "the way God wanted it".  
Owen's involvement in the civil rights movement begins when, as a young 
child in 1949, he wanders into the waiting room of a bus terminal--a 
waiting room marked "Whites Only".  For this "crime", a racist White man 
sitting in the waiting room forces Owen's father Will (Danny Glover) to 
spank Owen, against Will's wishes.  This is a turning point in Owen's 
life--as he said, the events prior to that during that summer day was 
his "last happy memory" as a child.
It's also a turning point in Will's life.  Having come home from 
servicing in the military, Will was no longer content to accept the 
status quo, and tried to organize the Black vote.  When they got wind of 
it, the Whites in his town conspired to put his gas station out of 
business.  Knowing full well that he'd have to "go along to get 
along"--to insure the survival of his family--Will soon ended his 
efforts to fight for change in the community.
But not Owen; already not respecting Will for having, in his eyes, caved 
in to racism instead of fighting against it, Owen becomes "hungry for 
courage", and joins a burgeoning struggle for civil rights in his small 
town of Quinlan.  Inspired by his Uncle Jonah (the magnificent John 
Beasley) and by the "Freedom Riders" he sees on TV, Owen dreams of the 
day that he can go back to that waiting room and get a small measure of 
revenge--even at the cost of his relationship with his father and mother 
Evelyn (Loretta Devine).
Others soon enter the movement, in different capacities.  Local barber 
T-Bone Lanier (Glynn Turman), and fellow students Isaac Hawkins (Jason 
Weaver) and Dora Charles (Rae Ven Larrymore Kelly), are joined by 
members of the Student Non-Violent Coordinating Committee (SNCC), a 
group of older students who "join the crusade to desegregate Quinlin".  
Among the SNCC members helping the young students' efforts are Archie 
Mullen (Stan Shaw), Coleman Vaughnes (Michael Jai White), and Marcello 
Thedford (Tyrone Franklin).  Peter Crowley (David Strathairn), a member 
of the U.S. Attorney General's Office (needless to say, a White man), 
also tries to help the growing movement.  And in the quietest 
tour-de-force that I've ever had the pleasure to witness, Vondie Curtis 
Hall plays Daniel Wall, a French teacher from Chicago that becomes the 
focal point for the drive to register Black voters--a task that becomes 
increasingly harder to do as local White opposition builds against him 
and the group.
The Upshot:
I'll be the first to admit that hearing "We Shall Overcome"--in the 
voices of my soft, sated contemporaries--makes me angry.  Partially, 
because it's sung with such little feeling and with so much ironic 
emptiness, by people who mouth the words without knowing the true 
meaning--but also because some forty years after the civil rights 
movement started in earnest, it should be "We HAVE Overcome".  Yes, to 
some extent, We have; but it's the extent that We haven't--mostly, 
because We failed to remember the lessons our mothers and fathers taught 
us--that makes me the most angry.  But that's another rant for another 
time; the tale told in "Freedom Song" predates the jadedness I sometimes 
feel about the lip service that's being done about the movement today.  
This movie is so rich, and its story so historically important, that I 
find it difficult to narrow it down to a simple review.  A few things do 
stand out in my mind, and are reinforced in the background info that was 
included with my tape.  
The first thing was that this story, unlike others we've read about in 
history books and in class (after "our story" finally began to be taught 
in school, that is) is that it was told from the standpoint of "ordinary 
people doing extraordinary things"; in this, I got a much more personal 
connection with what was happening.  Before there was Martin and 
Rosa--two who were and still are larger than life for many in the 
Black community--there were the unsung heroes who put their lives and 
their livelihood on the line, for what they thought was right; for what 
they thought was just.  This sense of paying homage to those "little 
people" comes across powerfully in "Freedom".  It's as if King and Parks 
were "royalty", admired but somewhat untouchable, more a concept than a 
reality; but soft-spoken people like Daniel Wall, struggling against all 
odds to do what he thought was right, were "jus' folks" like you and me.
Another aspect that "hit me where I lived" was the portrayal of just 
what it meant to show non-violence in the violently charged atmosphere 
of racist rage.  Two scenes in particular display this in full force: 
one involved the refreshingly good Michael Jai White; in a scene where 
his Coleman character speaks to Owen about the difference between being 
non-violent and practicing non-violence "as a political strategy, 
because it works," White showed off his physical and acting muscles.  An 
earlier scene was even deeper: to prepare the teens for the ugly hatred 
and violence that they would surely face at a sit-in, the SNCC workers 
subjected the kids to a taste of the kinds of heinous speech and actions 
the racist Whites would pour on them.  It is with no small sense of 
irony that I watched that scene; having heard much of the same kinds of 
filth spewing--for vastly different reasons--from modern-day Black 
characters such as the ones in 1999's "Thicker Than Water", I truly 
wanted to cry from the bitterness that welled up in me.
There are, admittedly, some problems with this production.  The whole of 
the civil rights movement, as portrayed in "Freedom", seems to be 
simplistically narrowed down to Blacks not being allowed to register to 
vote or to sit in "Whites Only" cafeterias and bus stations [this, of 
course, doesn't include the beatings and killings of Blacks in the 
effort to vote or sit; contrary to the silly definition of some American 
laws, I don't consider murder a "violation of civil rights".  Murder is 
murder, plain and simple].  By concentrating primarily on those two 
issues on an individual level--with emphasis especially on Owen's 
stubborn blindness about wanting to sit in the waiting room of his first 
experience with racism--the story almost trivializes the fullness of the 
struggle for civil rights, ending up making an unwitting "White Man's 
Ice Is Colder" statement (which is ironic in and of itself, considering 
a humorous scene at the end of the movie).  Had this been based on a 
specific true incident, this wouldn't have been as problematic; but 
since this is a fictionalized account, this weakness is more pronounced.
It also doesn't help that there's a sense of repetition, especially in 
Owen's scenes; with the caveat firmly in place that I'm reviewing the 
unfinished press version, this movie could definitely stand some tighter 
editing.   As for Owen's role, while I like the power that Shannon 
brings to it, his constant screen-time and Owen's one-note 
characterization, detracts from other key players--notably Glover and 
Devine, both of whom I was anxious to see more of, and sad that their 
own stories of struggle were not given as much "play".  Without those 
seasoned actors providing more of Will and Evelyn's grayshades view of 
the reality of Living While Black in states like Mississippi in the 
1960s, the viewer was left with an overabundance of the non-subtle black 
and white broadstrokes painted by the majority of the characters.
Still, even with these and other minor problems, "Freedom Song" remains 
a powerful movie about a period that some people want to forget--and 
other people never can.
Behind the scenes:
There's so much involved with this story, so much "behind the scenes" 
info that I'd love to share with my readers, but time and space do not 
permit (and I've probably said too much already).  Allow me, though, to 
share three of those background pieces with you...
I was thrilled when the folks at TNT told me that acappella group Sweet 
Honey In The Rock were doing the soundtrack for "Freedom"; I've long 
been a silent fan of theirs, ever since I saw them perform here in 
Lansing "Culture City, it ain't" Michigan.   I was doubly thrilled to 
read the press release from the Sony Classical group that said the 
soundtrack for "Freedom Song" which features "Sweet Honey" and composer 
James Horner, would be available in stores starting February 15; it's 
also featured on Sony Classical's web site.  You know I have one on 
order...
I was also pleased to find out that Turner Learning, Inc is providing a 
"Freedom Song Educator Guide", along with copies of the movie itself, to 
schools nationwide to help prompt classroom discussion of the struggle 
for civil rights.  In these days where high school students are being 
babysat with movies like 101 Dalmations (I'm not exaggerating; it sets 
my teeth on edge when my son tells me things like this), I commend TNT 
Learning for providing educational products like these for our youths' 
growth.  If your school doesn't have one of these guides, or wants more 
info on Turner Learning offerings, educators may call 1-800-344-6219 or 
visit the Turner Learning web site.
Finally, along with the other enriching information TNT provided in the 
press kit for this movie (for which I very much thank them; the Q&A 
sessions with various cast, crew members, and consultants, were very 
edifying), there was a bit of history that is the basis for many of the 
events in this movie:  February 1, 2000, marked the 40th anniversary of 
the F.W. Woolworth lunch counter sit-in.  On that date in 1960, Ezell 
Blair, Jr.  (now Jibreel Khazan), Franklin McCain, Joseph McNeil, and 
David Richmond--"the Greensboro Four"--sat down at the F.W. Woolworth 
"whites-only" lunch counter in downtown Greensboro, N.C.; this act 
sparked a movement that would not be denied.  I find it mindboggling 
that this event isn't given the national recognition it deserves; as 
much as I love MLK and what he stood for, I would think that even he 
would say that this far-reaching event, and many like it, are truly 
worthy of annual celebration. 
A Personal Reflection:
Some Americans mark their passage into adulthood with the ability to 
drive a car.  Some, when they finally could go to the bar, legally.  For 
me, I knew I was an adult when I signed up to vote.  It meant something, 
something very real to me, when I knew I could pull a lever, 
and--regardless to what the jaded observers of Our Life And Times tried 
to tell me--I could make a difference in the way my block, or city, or 
county, state, or country, was run.  For many years, I believed that, 
and made sure I voted every chance I got.  Something happened somewhere 
down the line, and I found myself voting only for the "big" stuff--and 
at times, not even remembering to do that.  The movie "Freedom Song" was 
written for folks like me, who need a swift kick in the butt to make us 
remember.
As difficult as it is to deal with the crooked politicians, with their 
lies and their fake smiles, with the knowledge that they only really 
care about The People when it comes time for elections (and even then, 
only The People with The Money)--even knowing all of that, I remain 
firmly convinced that we, all of us, owe it to those whose thirst for 
freedom in THIS country led them to the ultimate sacrifice, to get up 
off our lazy, spoiled-by-relative-success asses, and *vote*.  And MAKE
our elected politicians work for all of us, for once.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
"Those who forget history, are doomed to repeat it".  The thoughts and 
deeds behind the film "Freedom Song" admonishes us to not forget it, 
even when that means holding your nose, getting your butt up, and 
registering to vote.  And more: doing something about the conditions 
that lead many of us--"us" being people of all colors--to feel that we 
no longer vote for anyone, we only vote against something more "evil" 
than the other choice.  But vote, we should.  The memories of our 
forbears, many of whom were beaten and killed for the right to vote, 
demands it.
"Freedom Song" (rating: greenlight): 
The song of Freedom is beautiful, but it exacts a great price.  It is a 
shame that some of us have forgotten just how great a price has been 
paid throughout the years, for that beautiful song.
Catch the premier of the TNT original film "Freedom Song" on February 
27, 7pm Eastern and Pacific, with additional air dates on March 2, 4, 5, 
8, and 11.

Title
Review for Where the Money Is (2000)
WHERE THE MONEY IS (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 88 minutes 
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0149367 
Official site: http://www.wherethemoneyismovie.com/  
Written by: E. Max Frye
Directed by: Marek Kanievska
Starring: Paul Newman, Linda Fiorentino, Dermot Mulroney, Frankie Faison
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsthemoney.html
Y'all remember that nasty Y2K thingy that everybody thought was just one 
big hoax?  Well, I have a running theory: the Y2K bug didn't infect 
computers--it wormed its way into Hollywood's cameras this year...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Carol Ann McKay (Linda Fiorentino) sees her glory days behind her; her 
brightest moment having been Prom Queen to husband Wayne (Dermot 
Mulroney) as King, she now marks time as a nurse in a nursing home in 
her small town while Wayne works the night shift.
Enter Henry Manning (Paul Newman), a famous bank robber in his 
youth--before he was caught in a bank vault--Henry is transferred from 
prison to Carol's nursing home after he has a debilitating stroke.  Or 
so he wants everyone to believe.  But Carol believes otherwise. 
Intrigued by Henry and by his exciting former life, she sets out to get 
a piece of the action by trying to draw him out of his haze; and she 
goes through extraordinary lengths to do so--much to Wayne's dismay.
The Upshot:
It was surreal, going from the pleasure of almost instantly liking 
KEEPING THE FAITH, the movie I watched just before this one, to hating 
WHERE THE MONEY IS in about the same swiftness of time.  
I noticed three things about "Money", right off the bat: first, it is 
only 88 minutes long, making it shorter than most run-of-the-mill Made 
For TV Movies these days.  When I sat down to watch it, I realized why: 
"Money" is terribly edited.  The hack job done on it put me in mind of a 
rabid butcher using a dull-edged spoon to cut up his cow because his 
boss didn't think he was quite ready to use sharp utensils.  And even 
with that, I can't convey the absolute mess "Money"'s editor made of 
this movie; the cuts come so fast and furious at the beginning, I wasn't 
sure whether I was watching the movie, or outtakes of it.  The third, 
and most insulting, thing I noticed about "Money", was that the 
storyline made absolutely no sense.  I did not believe a single thing 
they were trying to "sell", not for a moment--partially because my 
husband works in Corrections and I know (at least in our state) that It 
Just Doesn't Work That Way--but mostly because I did not feel the actors 
believed it either.  
I was embarrassed for the lot of them, most especially for Paul Newman.  
I have to give him props for making something of an effort, but the 
burden weighed him down, and he looked every bit his age.  Hard to 
believe this was the same man who brought the weary yet bright-eyed Cool 
Hand Luke to the Silver Screen.  As Wayne, Dermot Mulroney played Yet 
Another Doofus led around by his smaller head.  Every time I started to 
see a light come on behind Mulroney's eyes, signaling that an actual 
character existed in there somewhere, the focus would shift back to 
Carol or Henry; and by the time the camera came back to him, the light 
would be out again.  And someone should remind the makeup artist that 
worked on Linda Fiorentino, that when a person cries, their tears 
usually run down in a straight line; they're not generally smeared 
across the face as if someone applied Fake Tearz to try to convince the 
viewer that the actress was actually crying.  
If only that were the least of Ms. F's sins.  Setting aside the 
thoroughly disgusting notion of a nurse  attempting to seduce a 
helpless, wheelchair-bound stroke victim, could there have been a worst 
choice of characterizations in her pouty, fuzzleheaded little girl who 
still somehow managed to have her way with two seemingly brain-equipped 
men?  The whole concept of Carol's character was an insult to this 
viewer; I never took her seriously, and for the life of me, couldn't 
figure out why Wayne or Henry would, either.  Thelma and Louise, she 
ain't.
Even when I dislike a flick, I generally try to give it the benefit of 
the doubt, looking for at least one redeeming factor in them, some small 
thing that I can at least grudgingly say I liked.  
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
>From what I can tell as a movie critic, the stock and trade of a good 
character actor comes when the casting director, confronted with filling 
a role calling for a specific characterization, has a Eureka Moment and 
thinks immediately of that person.  
This in mind, character actor Frankie Faison will not likely wont for a 
job, as long as mainstream casting directors keep him in mind ("we need 
a Frankie Faison type!") when they have a Smiling Older Black Security 
Guard/Cop/Hall Monitor/Teacher With Little To Do, role to fill.  Think 
back on his past few performances: has he played anything else lately?
On the other hand, at least he's one Black actor who has a "sure", 
relatively unembarrassing, part available to him if he wants it.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
A dud from start to finish.  It's a long way from BUTCH CASSIDY AND THE 
SUNDANCE KID and THE STING to this horribly edited dreck.  My heart goes 
out to Mr. Newman; no legend should have to "end" his career on such a 
sour note.  Hurry up and film another movie soon, Butch, so we won't 
have this to remember ya by!
WHERE THE MONEY IS (rating: redlight): 
I can imagine the folks behind this one are asking just that: "where the 
money is?".  They'd best take it and run.  Quickly.

Title
Review for Love & Basketball (2000)
LOVE AND BASKETBALL (2000) 
[review/analysis]
Rated PG-13; running time 118 minutes 
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0199725 
Official site: http://www.loveandbasketball.com/  
Written by: Gina Prince 
Directed by: Gina Prince 
Starring: Sanaa Lathan, Omar Epps, Alfre Woodard, Dennis Haysbert, 
Debbi Morgan, Harry J. Lennix, Gabrielle Union, 
Kyla Pratt (Young Monica), Glenndon Chatman (Young Quincy), 
Monica Calhoun (Lena Wright), Tyra Banks (Karen)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamslovebball.html
In watching movies like SOUL FOOD and THE WOOD, I saw Myself--as in, the 
larger Black community in which I came up--as I rarely have on the 
Silver Screen these days: everyday folk with dreams, aspirations, trials 
and tribulations, existing within a rich culture having little or 
nothing to do with the stereotypes of Black life put forth by far too 
many ignorant White--and Black--filmmakers too eager to compromise Our 
reality for a paycheck.
But in LOVE AND BASKETBALL, and in its protagonist, Monica Wright, I saw 
shades of myself--as in, me--that were startlingly refreshing, and in a 
sense, cleansing, to see.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
LOVE AND BASKETBALL is a tale of two friends who share the same hoop 
dreams: Monica Wright (Sanaa Lathan), a "plain girl" who wants to become 
the first woman in the NBA, and sets aside everything in her personal 
life to achieve that goal; and Quincy McCall (Omar Epps), a popular star 
on his high school and college teams, whose climb to the top is less 
blocked than Monica's is.  Or is it?  
Monica's banker father Nathan (Harry J. Lennix) supports her efforts, 
but her mother Camille (Alfre Woodard) doesn't understand Monica's 
"tomboy" ways.  Q finds himself situated between his bougie mother Mona 
(Debbi Morgan) and father Zeke (Dennis Haysbert); a pro player himself, 
Zeke tries to keep Q focused on becoming an educated man, while trying 
to hide a few skeletons in his own closet.  As a struggling point guard 
Freshman, Monica quickly bumps heads with her Coach, as well as Sidra 
(Gabrielle Union), an upperclassman who is also a point guard.  And as 
Quincy and Monica's friendship turns into something deeper, they also 
have to face the fact that pro basketball may not be quite what either 
of them expected--or even obtainable.
The Upshot:
To say "I loved this movie" would be an understatement.  I felt more 
strongly about last year's THE BEST MAN, but "Love" resonated with me in 
a way that even "Best Man" couldn't touch.  
The fellas were tight in their acting.  Omar Epps' capable turn as Q was 
to be expected; Epps has long been a solid actor, and his performance 
here was no exception.  A bit more surprising was Dennis Haysbert's 
outstanding performance; he and Epps played well off each other, and his 
Zeke character provided a welcome spark to this film (as well as an 
important message to the aspiring pro ballers in the audience).  
Haysbert has definitely come a long way from his MAJOR LEAGUE days.  The 
exception to the "strong males" rule was Harry J. Lennix; Nathan was 
pretty much mute, though Monica clearly identified more with him than 
she did her mother Camille.  It is unfortunate that his character wasn't 
given much to do.
But the women were, for me, what made this movie. Sanaa Lathan was 
nothing less than excellent as Monica; her passion for the game, and her 
passion for Q, were drawn out beautifully.  Equally believable as a 
young woman experiencing her "first time", and a more mature, sensual 
woman playing "strip basketball", Lathan's all-too-brief love scenes 
with Epps brought Black Sexuality back to the mainstream movie audience 
as it hasn't been shown since JASON'S LYRIC way back in 1994.  Alfre 
Woodard tears it up as a mother grossly underestimated by her daughter, 
especially near the end; Woodard is simply powerful, even in "small" 
roles.  Debbi Morgan, whose movies as of late (especially EVE'S BAYOU) 
have made audiences all but forget her time on daytime soaps, was 
somewhat overwrought as the Done Wrong Wife; it's too bad that some of 
the time spent on her character wasn't devoted to Nathan and his role in 
Monica's life instead.
And the Chick at the helm, writer/director Gina Prince, was strongest of 
all.  Her performance here is reminiscent of John Singleton's strong 
entry into feature filmmaking (BOYZ IN THE HOOD), but only in the sense 
that they put out such good works in their rookie year.  That, and the 
fact that both are Black directors, is where the comparison ends; life 
in Singleton's "Hood" was vastly different than Prince's vision of Hoop 
Life.
And speaking of her vision, it was realized in innovative ways.  Prince 
takes advantage of the basketball theme by breaking the movie into 
"quarters" ("First Quarter: 1981"; "Second Quarter: 1988"; and so on).  
She also used background music well (starting with Al Green's "Love And 
Happiness"); it's generally historically accurate, but more importantly, 
the music plays a real role in the movie, almost as if it were a 
character.  This contrasts greatly with most modern hip hop-flavored 
flicks, where the music only provides a means to selling the soundtrack 
(and it's usually "music inspired by the movie").  Prince's use of 
"first person" shots during one of Monica's games, provided a unique 
perspective on that character's situation.  And as writer, Prince put 
mostly believable words in her character's mouths; the actors made those 
words come to life, and the collaboration between writer/director and 
cast, was wonderful to witness.
My one big issue was the turning point in Q and Monica's relationship.  
I had a very hard time believing that the thing which changed their 
relationship (trying to avoid spoilers here) would've really done so; 
since they both were in very similar situations, there's no way one of 
the characters should've been so pigheaded as to huff and puff 
about...that thing.  While not a big enough issue for me to downgrade 
the movie's rating, it's a flaw that could've been easily addressed by 
Prince giving the characters a different conflict to stress over.
Well, actually, there's another big issue I have with this movie.  Turns 
out that it had a little something to do with The "Black Factor"--and in 
how a fellow reviewer, saw it.
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Making a long review even longer, and even though it's probably not good 
manners to do so, I feel driven to include and respond to this snippet 
of a pretty good review of LOVE AND BASKETBALL by Morgan Fouch, quoted 
in TNT's "Roughcut" newsletter:
   "A more interesting movie would have focused on her and the 
    injustice that women athletes face in male-dominated sports 
    where they are unable to compete professionally or be taken
    seriously by sports fans, writers and financiers. But to 
    appease a non-discriminating black audience and to sell 
    tickets, the love story, sports sequences and a hip soundtrack 
    were thrown up front, drowning a potentially good film." 
           -- Morgan Fouch about LOVE AND BASKETBALL
My first reaction was to get snippy about this snippet, even though I 
hadn't yet watched the film, nor read the entire review, at that point.  
My second reaction, after reading the review and realizing that she's 
not only a Black woman, but also someone whose work I've read and 
respected in the past, was a bit more subdued, though I still took issue 
with the bit about "a non-discriminating black audience".
My third reaction?  Past the curiousness of her reaction to the love 
story and sports sequences (it *is* called "Love And Basketball", after 
all), she's Wrong. "Wrong" I say (in my highly- opinionated way of 
thinking) because as I saw it, there was attention given to Monica's 
plight, and on how Q's "red carpet" was vacuumed by the Monicas of the 
world.  Perhaps not enough direct focus, but the best filmmakers show, 
not tell; and for me, the contrast between the crowds and TV cameras at 
Q's games, and the small audience at Monica's, underscored the Female 
Factor quite well.
But still, We have been lackadaisical in supporting quality Black 
movies--like this one, I opine--while crowding theaters the country over 
to see unadulterated "Booty" crap.  While *some* of Us are certainly not 
part of that "non-discriminating black audience", too many of Us are.
Which leads me to my final reaction: she's also Right.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
It's lovely when a film starring and made by Black folk can be held up 
as an example of good moviemaking, without the "...for a Black film" 
addendum.  That it could also tell a love story without resorting to 
"Booty Call"-ism, is icing on a tasty chocolate cake.

Title
Review for Price of Glory (2000)
PRICE OF GLORY (2000) 
Rated PG13; running time 117 minutes
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0188160 
Official site: http://www.priceofglory.com/  
Written by: Phil Berger
Directed by: Carlos Avila
Starring: Jimmy Smits, Jon Seda, Clifton Collins, Jr., Maria del Mar, 
Sal Lopez (Hector Salmon), Louis Mandylor, Danielle Camastra, 
Ernesto Hernandez, Paul Rodriguez, Ron Perlman
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsprice.html
I went in to see PRICE OF GLORY with a slight sense of dread: after 
being upset for so long about the havoc Jon Seda's character Falsone 
wreaked on TV's HOMICIDE: LIFE ON THE STREET (RIP), I was sure that his 
character here would just overwhelm everyone else, leaving me with a bad 
Seda taste in my mouth once again.   Boy, was I wrong--in more ways than 
one. 
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Arizona-based Arturo Ortega (Jimmy Smits) coulda been a contenda--until 
his opponent opened up a can of whupass on him in a 1977 boxing match.  
13 years later, Arturo starts to live out his dream of boxing glory 
through his young sons Sonny and Jimmy, both of whom he trains in a 
Mariposa, Arizona gym.  Sonny is the more skilled of the two 
brothers--something that Arturo never lets Jimmy forget--but when Sonny 
and Jimmy do relatively badly at a Silver Gloves tournament, their 
youngest brother Johnny surprises the whole Ortega crew by announcing 
that he's ready to give up street football to become a boxer, saying 
"them two stunk!"
10 years later...17-year-old Johnny (Ernesto Hernandez) intensely 
prepares for his Golden Gloves tournament, and catches the eye of boxing 
scout Pepe (Paul Rodriguez) and promoter Nick Everson (Ron Perlman); 
Everson approaches Arturo with the offer to "relieve" him of his 
managing duties for Sonny (Jon Seda) and Jimmy (Clifton Collins, Jr.), 
"throwing in" Johnny for good measure.  But Arturo has his eyes on the 
prize--the glory days he sees ahead.  The question is, is it glory for 
them--or for him?
The Upshot:
There's a point in this movie where it went from being enjoyable in its 
look at family dynamics from a Latino point of view that is usually not 
seen in mainstream Hollywood, to being a candidate for TV 
Movie-Of-The-Week.  I can't quite pinpoint where PRICE OF GLORY lost its 
slight edge, but it's there.  Maybe I blinked, and it was gone.  Or 
maybe I was just so thrilled to see so many Mexican-Americans portrayed 
on the Silver Screen without the stereotypically scripted behavior we've 
come to expect, that I didn't notice the lack of depth all along.  And 
that, not my assumption of what Seda would be like, is what left me 
wanting more from this movie than it was prepared to deliver.
Early on, though, there were winning performances; Seda, in particular, 
surprised me with his relatively muted turn as Sonny (if you've ever 
watched him chewing the scenery in "Homicide", you'll know why I was 
surprised).  His acting here was aided, no doubt, by the fact that he 
once was a Golden Gloves boxer himself; he definitely looked comfortable 
on the body bag.  Equally good in the early stages was Clifton Collins 
as the put-upon Jimmy, and Maria del Mar as Arturo's wife Rita; I 
cheered when seeing the interaction between Arturo and his wife, as they 
looked genuinely attracted to each other, and dedicated (in different 
ways) to their sons.  And in his feature film debut, Ernesto Hernandez's 
Johnny Ortega didn't quite give an Oscar-worthy performance, but he had 
his Intense Scowl look down-pat.
On the other side of the ring, Ron Perlman was never convincing as a 
boxing promoter; about the only thing he could've promoted was a bout of 
sleep.  I never did figure out what purpose Danielle Camastra's 
character Mariella served; a throwaway role if I ever saw one, her 
introduction to Arturo as Sonny's girlfriend served its purpose  
sufficiently enough, without the need to have her stand around looking 
Sad in the background, taking up frames of film.  And maybe it was Just 
Me, but Louis Mandylor just did not look like he belonged in a boxing 
ring, though his turn as the rather mean-spirited Davey Lane did seem to 
serve as a needed bit of conflict and tension that was missing from most 
of the movie.  After all, what's a title bout without someone talking 
trash?
Above all, Jimmy Smits gives a winning performance as patriarch Arturo 
Ortega.  At times funny (his Thanksgiving prayer and insistence on 
getting a rad green Cadillac convertible, made me laugh out loud), and 
at other times pensive and sad, Smits showed a side of his acting 
abilities that wasn't allowed to come to the fore nearly enough during 
his NYPD-BLUE days.  
So why did PRICE OF GLORY fall so flat?  Beats me; maybe it developed 
wobbly knees from going a round or two too long, and collapsed under the 
weight of Delivering A Message.  The editor could have easily excised a 
half-hour or so with no ill-effects, giving it a tighter focus and less 
repetition on the theme.  Certainly, they could've lost the irritating 
Paul Rodriguez in a pile of film in the trash dump; he used up his 15 
Minutes a lifetime ago.
In the end, there just didn't seem enough there to rally around; by the 
time the Obligatory Title Match came around, enough of the outcome had 
been telegraphed beforehand to make the results all but assured, and 
frankly, by that point, The Point had already been made.  And though the 
movie seemed authentic on the boxing front, from both the writer's 
standpoint as well as the cinematographer's great shots of the 
pugilistic action--one in particular, with young Arturo hitting the 
canvas, tore right through me, it seemed just that real--the spirit 
seemed to drain out of the movie as it rolled on.  What had started out 
as a fun flick, with great Latin sounds and interesting characters, 
wound up as worthy of being a TV Afternoon Special.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
I wanted to give this one a higher rating, but story-wise, it's more 
suited to a cable TV movie than a feature film release.  Still, Smits 
shows he's got the nalgas to carry a motion picture on his own - if 
Hollywood opens the door for him.  Hmmm...I wonder if I should hold my 
breath...
PRICE OF GLORY (rating: yellowlight): 
More a glancing blow than a knockout, it still gets props for what it 
*didn't* show: stereotypical Latinos, Hollywood-style.  That's worth at 
least an extra point or two on my scorecard.

Title
Review for Sweet November (2001)
SWEET NOVEMBER (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 116 minutes
Genre: Romantic Drama
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.sweetnovember.net/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0230838
Written by: Kurt Voelker (based on the screenplay by Herman Raucher)
Directed by: Pat O'Connor
Cast: Keanu Reeves, Charlize Theron, Jason Isaacs, Greg Germann,
Liam Aiken, Lauren Graham, Frank Langella, Michael Rosenbaum (Brandon),
Jason Kravits (Manny), L. Peter Callender (DMV tester)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsnovember.html
Imagine LOVE STORY meets ABC's DHARMA & GREG, and you'll know all you
need to know about SWEET NOVEMBER.  Literally.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Nelson Moss (Keanu Reeves) is a high-strung, highly successful
advertising executive with no time for a life outside of his job, much
to the dismay of his constantly ignored girlfriend Angelica (Lauren
Graham).  But Nelson's life quickly changes when, after he causes Sara
Deever (Charlize Theron) to flunk her DMV exam, she storms into his life
in a big way.  Like a whirlwind gone mad, Sara goes on a mission to
"save" the stodgy Nelson from himself, by proposing that, for the whole
month of November, he stays with her and in exchange, she'll "help him".
How, and why, is for Nelson to discover in what Sara promises to be a
magical thirty days.
The Upshot (2nd WARNING: **EVEN MORE spoilers contained below**):
KeanuNuts, y'all might as well get your brickbats out now, 'cuz I tell
ya, he stunk up the joint.  Whoever decided to call it "Sweet" wasn't
quite descriptive enough.  "Sickly sweet"...now that's more like it.
I don't know what was worse: the *absolutely, positively mindboggling*
[in case the KeanuDroids didn't hear me the first time] miscasting of
Keanu "whoa" Reeves, or the complete repulsion I felt in noting Greg
Germann's irritating presence in not one, but *two* lame remake flicks
this weekend ("November" and the equally dreadful DOWN TO EARTH).  That,
and the syrupy sweetness of the general storyline.  Holy Chris on a pogo
stick, I think I developed a severe case of sugar diabetes just watching
this thing.
Two things saved "November" from my
"this-must-die-an-excruciatingly-horrible-death" redlight rating: the
first is my inexplicable liking for things Charlize Theron; must be her
eyes (what can I say; they mesmerize me) and the button cuteness her
character showed up to the **BEGIN BIG SPOILER** first Obligatory
Illness Scene - each moment after which, was sheer torture for me to
witness, in anticipation of LOVE STORY, BRIAN'S SONG, and STUPORNOVA,
all rolled up into one smarmy little ball. **END BIG SPOILER**
The other little slice of heaven hiding in "November's" Deep Dish Of
Hell, was Frank Langella as Edgar Price (who, keeping with the DHARMA &
GREG/ABC theme, is "November's" version of Miles Drentell from ONCE &
AGAIN and thirtysomething - if Miles Drentell had an Evil Twin Brother).
For the few moments he was on screen, Langella portrayed a totally
heartless businessman with an originality worthy of adoration; had his
role been expanded, "November" would've been a *much* different movie
experience for me.  My jury's out whether that would've wound up A Good
Thing, though; I have the feeling that more Edgar Price would've
amounted to that much more artificial sweetener being poured on to
counterbalance his Pure Evol.  And _that_ would most def be A Bad Thing.
Sorry, that's it as far as worthwhile characters/storylines go.  I've
seen the "Hip Gay/TV Friend" done better before, so Jason Isaacs' turn
as Transvestite Chas, didn't really Take Me There; and Liam Aiken as
Abner, the boy searching for a Father Figure, was kinda creepy.  That
leaves us with the aforementioned irritant Greg Germann as Nelson's
sycophant business partner Vince, and my friend and yours, the K Man
himself.  So as not to taunt the KeanuWorshippers overmuch, I won't go
into vast detail of the many times I wanted to rip his lungs out and
serve them to Hannibal Lecter, just so his GOTdam agent wouldn't dare
stain the silver screen again by allowing him to be so terribly miscast
in a role that, if it were any more past his reach as an actor, he'd
have to hire someone with an extension cord and a ten foot pole, just to
come within a football field's length of touching.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Not that he needs my approval or anything - I'm fairly sure Mr. Reeves
isn't sitting at home pissing in his beer because some third-rate hack
in Podunkville Called Him Names - but I actually do like Keanu *in roles
in which he plays to the level of his abilities*.  I very much dug him
in THE MATRIX, for example; and he was one of the better things about
the disappointing (and still unreviewed by me) THE GIFT.  But I say now,
and will repeat again: whatever the casting person who thought Reeves
was right for this role, was smoking when they cast him, I don't want
any parts of.
SWEET NOVEMBER (rating: yellowlight):
"Dancing In September"..."Sweet November"...dag, is it Spring yet?!?

Title
Review for Space Cowboys (2000)
SPACE COWBOYS (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 123 minutes
Genre: dramedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0186566
Official site: http://www.spacecowboys.net/
Written by:Ken Kaufman, Howard Klausner
Directed by: Clint Eastwood
Cast: Clint Eastwood, Tommy Lee Jones, Donald Sutherland, James Garner,
James Cromwell, Marcia Gay Harden, Loren Dean, Courtney B. Vance,
Barbara Babcock, William Devane, Aleksandr Kuznetsov (Russian Engineer)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamscowboys.html
There will be inevitable comparisons of SPACE COWBOYS to THE RIGHT STUFF
(though I liken it more to ARMAGEDDON meets MISSION TO MARS meets
COCOON).  I could most def groove on veterans Clint Eastwood, Tommy Lee
Jones, James Garner, and Donald Sutherland bucking the "current" Youth
Fad in Hollywood; but I was less encouraged by Eastwood's uneven
handling of the humorous aspects in some of the movies he's directed or
starred in (cf TRUE CRIME.  ewww.)  Let's see which side of Eastwood
comes to the fore...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
A full forty years after being upstaged by a monkey for the right to
show they had The Right Stuff in outer space, retired Air Force pilots
Frank Corvin (Clint Eastwood), Hawk Hawkins (Tommy Lee Jones), engineer
Jerry O'Nell (Donald Sutherland) and navigator Tank Sullivan (James
Garner) are reunited in "Operation Dateless" when a Russian satellite,
"Ikon", malfunctions.  Much to the dismay of "Dateless'" former Air
Force commander, Bob Gerson (James Cromwell), Frank is found to be the
designer of a system much like the one found in the satellite.  And
since the technology he designed is too ancient for the current NASA
scientists like Sarah Holland (Marcia Gay Harden) to figure out, the
ball is in Frank's court, and he plays it: he'll gladly fix the
satellite - as long as he and his "Dateless" crewmates are allowed to go
on that long-awaited space mission along with reluctant current
astronauts Ethan Glance (Loren Dean) and Roger Hines (Courtney B.
Vance).
And the big question, voiced by both Frank and NASA Flight Commander
Eugene Davis (William Devane): just how did that "similar technology"
get into a Cold War-era Russian satellite?
The Upshot:
It seems like my fears were misplaced: it wasn't the humorous aspects of
the movie that were the problem at all.  In fact, the humor in SPACE
COWBOYS was what saved the day for me - and the better comparison there
was to the best parts of GRUMPY OLD MEN.
I'm an Old Skool kinda Chick, and in Hollywood, there's not much Older
than the likes of Eastwood, Jones, Sutherland, and Garner.  Each were
charming in their own way, none more than Tommy Lee [whose name alone
makes me want to make him an Honorary Brother].  Tommy Lee Jones puts
the Grump in "Grumpy Old Man", and manages to do so without coming off
either smarmy or as irritating as one would think his perpetual Good Ol'
Boy acting would play.  Jones is one of the most talented, natural
actors in the business, and it's almost always a pleasure to watch him
work.  RULES OF ENGAGEMENT, notwithstanding.
SPACE COWBOYS was Jones' and Clint Eastwood's puppy to play with.
Jones' Grump was matched by Eastwood's patented Grimace; I almost saw
Clint crack a smile...once...but I'd not have it any other way.  Where
Jones is at ease with his suthern drrrrawl, Eastwood Emotes through the
grit of his teeth; and though age has softened that grit somewhat, Dirty
Harry At 70 is still a force to reckon with.
Of the two remaining leads, Donald Sutherland fared much better than
James Garner.  I saw shades of Sutherland's younger self - no, not that
hack son of his; I mean his character in THE DIRTY DOZEN - in the
laid-back Jerry O'Nell.  Less a lecher than Walter Matthau's GRUMPY OLD
MEN character, Jerry's playful horniness was never laid on so thick as
to make that character unappealing.  Less successful was Garner; it
didn't help that his character was mistakenly hobbled to start with [I'd
like to throttle whomever decided that making him an uninspired preacher
was A Good Idea], and neither Tank the character nor Garner the actor,
were given much more to work with throughout the flick.  Garner looked
tired; certainly, he was a long way from THE ROCKFORD FILES and MURPHY'S
ROMANCE, two of the better projects I've seen him in.
And speaking of romance - what, you didn't know that Old Folks Need
Love, Too? - there was Love in the most unexpected of places.  The brief
flirtation scenes with Frank & Mrs. Corbin (I never caught Babcock's
character's name, but I smiled when I remembered her in the spicy role
of Sgt. Phil Esterhaus' paramour Grace in HILL STREET BLUES. Unlike many
of her contemporaries, she's aged very well) were only a teaser for the
more unexpected, yet somehow Obligatory, romance between Hawk and Sarah.
I didn't have a problem with that, per se - if anything, Harden brought
out even more of Jones' natural charm - but I'd like the name of Marcia
Gay Harden's hairdresser.  She (I assume) needs her butt whupped for
letting Marcia Gay go out in public looking like that.
I loved "Cowboys'" sense of itself, of how John Glenn and THE RIGHT
STUFF had to be acknowledged, and especially how it never really pushed
the age bit too far [well, almost never].  What I *didn't* like was the
illogic of Cromwell's character Bob Gerson and how he related to the
Russian Engineer [without giving too much away here, howthell was Gerson
kept on after...well, I guess that'd give too much away, so let me stop
there.  Watch it; you'll see what I'm getting at].  More to the point,
though, it was the second, serious half that almost broke "Cowboys'"
spell for me.  And, since I couldn't hear half of what was being said,
almost put me to sleep.
The comedic first half of SPACE COWBOYS certainly worked better for me
than the more serious second half; once the Cowboys blasted into space,
my initial estimation of the movie blasted out with them, and in fact, I
had originally given this movie a lower rating than what it ended up
with (see below).  Fortunately, I saw the movie a second time; and with
a better view of the screen and a better sound system in the theater, I
was able to understand the space stuff a bit more than the first time.
It still didn't compare to the first half, but certainly didn't drag the
movie down as much as I first thought.  Though I wish I'd left the
theater more excited about what I had just seen, I most def felt
Entertained...and ain't that what it's all about?
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I had to chuckle at the way Diva's "Brotha Rule" played out here.
Courtney B. Vance may be married to Angela "Born To Be Storm, I said!"
Bassett, but apparently her cachet hasn't done him much good, as far as
the usefulness of his Hollywood roles goes.  Can't fault a brotha for at
least showing up on the set, though - even if his fairly non-existent
part amounted to not much more than a playful shove to the back of the
shuttle by Tommy Lee.
[Oh...and please, Mr. Vance, bring back your mustache.  Your fans will
thank you for it.]
Bammer's Bottom Line:
This one was a tuffy.  I almost gave it a greenlight, for its sense of
humor (Tommy Lee Jones and Donald Sutherland kept me laughing), but the
serious outer space stuff left me rather cold, and I spent way too much
time straining to hear what was being said.  If you're in the mood to,
check it out if for no other reason than to see three-and-a-half good
old boys give it ye olde college try.
A rarity: upon second viewing, I've changed my mind.  Greenlight, it is.
Hey, it's a Chick's Prerogative...
SPACE COWBOYS (rating: greenlight):
Now if I could only get that infernal Bon Jovi song outta my head...

Title
Review for American Beauty (1999)
American Beauty (1999) 
Rated R; running time 119 minutes
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0169547 
Official site: http://www.amazon.com/exec/  
Written by: Alan Ball 
Directed by: Sam Mendez
Starring:  Kevin Spacey, Annette Bening, Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, 
Mena Suvari, Peter Gallagher, Chris Cooper, Allison Janney, 
Scott Bakula, Sam Robards
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsamer.html
It's a good thing that I didn't see "American Beauty" when it was 
released back in October; I would've had a hard time choosing between it 
and "The Green Mile" for 1999's "Best Of".  As it is, I'm having a 
dickens of a time making my personal Oscar pick between them.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Residents of Plastic Suburbia, U.S.A. populate "American Beauty"...
Lester Burnham (Kevin Spacey), a fortysomething burnout whose highlight 
of the day is the time he spends with himself each morning in the 
shower, feels as trapped by his now-loveless marriage to his wife 
Carolyn (Annette Bening)--a mediocre real estate agent who can't quite 
see past the plastic liners on her furniture, her house, and her 
life--as she feels trapped by him.  Lester seeks a new life through 
rebuilding his body through exercise, as suggested by gay lovers Jim 
(Scott Bakula) and Jim (Sam Robards)--arguably the most "normal" 
residents of their little villa.  Carolyn, meanwhile, seeks mentorship, 
and a wee bit more, from real estate king Buddy King (Peter Gallagher).  
Equally trapped in their misery is their daughter Jane (Thora Birch); 
and as if normal teen angst wasn't enough for her, she also has to deal 
with her father's men-o-pause attraction her very blonde (and she knows 
it) cheerleader friend Angela Hayes (Mena Suvari).  
...the Fitts are Watchers Of Life: dope-dealing loner Ricky (Wes 
Bentley) watches Jane and her family while he tapes them via camcorder; 
bulldog Colonel Fitts (Chris Cooper) watches son Ricky turn into a 
zombie under the Colonel's cold, austere regiment; and all-but-braindead 
mother Barbara (Allison Janney) watches life go by in a haze of her own 
non-existence.
True poster families for Dysfunctions R Us.
The Upshot:
While I may have not seen "The Insider" until its Oscars re-release 
because, well, I didn't want to, my reasoning for missing "American 
Beauty" the first time around is much less harsh: I simply forgot to, 
until it was too late.  This is to my deficit--because "Beauty" lives up 
to its hype. 
There's little doubt that these are people you wouldn't normally want to 
associate with everyday--but in fact, probably do.  "Look closer", 
indeed: is flabby, unmotivated Lester really unlike sloppy 
Joe-down-the-street?  Doesn't Carolyn remind you of that obnoxious Avon 
Lady that keeps ringing your doorbell just as you're sitting down to 
dinner?  And face it: if Jane hasn't started bringing guns to Public 
School 101, she probably will soon.  Yes, America: these are the people 
in your neighborhood/in your neighborhood/in your neigh-bor-hood...
And look closer yet: beyond its portrait of dysfunctional suburbia in 
all its ugliness, "Beauty" has humor, glimmers of hope, wonderful 
cinematography, and above all, kickass performances throughout.  
As Lester, Kevin Spacey is, in a word, magnificent.  An actor's actor, 
Spacey lights up the screen in nearly every scene he's in.  Equally 
convincing both as a burnout and as a rejuvenated weightlifter, the only 
time I questioned his character was near the end, when he took a giant 
leap backwards, character development-wise (and since to say more would 
mean spoiling the movie unnecessarily, I'll just leave it at that for 
now).  But even with that seeming character mis-step, Spacey the actor 
was solid through and through.  Though I've wavered between "Beauty" and 
"Green" ever since seeing this film, my choice for Best Actor is 
crystal-clear.   As they used to say back in the day, "no comp".
Good on a different (and, somewhat lesser) scale is the rest of the 
cast.  Annette Bening gives a Oscar-worthy performance as Carolyn 
(though I still think that Hilary Swank should win for what I've seen of 
her "Boys Don't Cry" performance), proving yet again her range as an 
actress.  And though most reviewers trumpet Thora Birch as angry, angsty 
daughter Jane, my favorites among the supporting cast are Chris Cooper 
as the Colonel, and especially Wes Bentley as Ricky.  I've made it a 
point to look for both Cooper and Bentley in upcoming movies; I'm sure 
we haven't heard the last of either of them.  
For me, the sign that a director has done his or her job well is that I 
notice something behind the acting, but not quite know what that 
something is.  This was borne out in "Beauty", with Sam Mendez's 
"unseen" touches adding icing to a well-baked cake.  One scene in 
particular that I noticed his work came when Jane and Lester were seen 
talking through a kitchen window; though I listened and saw what was 
going on, I also noticed the row of bottles filled with colored liquid 
(which reminded me of a Photoshop class I'd just taken), and that 
further made me notice the use of light and shadows throughout the 
scene.  I had to snap out of it so I wouldn't miss the forest for the 
proverbial trees.
Where some would see those bottles as an unnecessary distraction, I saw 
the Beauty; it was a good touch on what might have otherwise been Just 
Another scene.
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
In her "American Beauty" review, my esteemed colleague The Diva implied 
that this movie may be more relevant to White audience members than to 
Blacks, because the types of dysfunctions portrayed are more typically 
seen in White suburb dwellers.  While I agree to a point, I'd say that, 
considering the phenomenon of "Buppies" and (for lack of a better term) 
the "Whitening" of the more affluent amongst us, the Melting Pot effect 
may see a few more of Us looking very much like Lester and Carolyn--and 
the Colonel.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I'd like to think think that my Brilliant Exposition is the 
be-all/end-all of my reader's existence, but that would be folly.  And 
in fact, the "American Beauty" site I happen to like most was not even 
done by an American (though she is most def a Beauty): I invite you to 
look closer at my good friend Katy Lindeman's tribute to "Beauty" (at 
http://www.americanbeauty.freeserve.co.uk/).  It's a real beaut.
"American Beauty" (rating: greenlight):
If this movie does for Dysfunctional Suburbia what "Fatal Attraction" 
did for...uh, Dysfunctional Suburbia...hmmm...

Title
Review for Cider House Rules, The (1999)
The Cider House Rules (1999) 
Rated PG-13; running time 129 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0124315 
Official site: http://www.miramax.com/  
Written by: John Irving
Directed by: Lasse Hallstrom
Starring: Tobey Maguire, Michael Caine, Charlize Theron, Delroy Lindo, 
Paul Rudd, Jane Alexander, Kathy Baker, Erykah Badu, Kieran Culkin, 
Kate Nelligan, Heavy D, K. Todd Freeman, Paz de la Huerta, Sean Andrew, 
Spencer Diamond, Skye McCole Bartusiak, Erik Sullivan
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamscider.html
After having sat through over three hours of fast-moving action 
involving characters who wouldn't "let me in" to their world in 
"Magnolia", it was a refreshing change of pace to sit back and relax 
with "The Cider House Rules".  Felt like...family.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Dr. Wilbur Larch (Michael Caine) is an unusual man in an unusual place 
during an unusual time: along with Nurse Angela (Kathy Baker) and Nurse 
Edna (Jane Alexander), Larch oversees a home for unwanted children--born 
and yet-to-be born--in St. Cloud, Maine during World War II.  The 
abortions he performs are illegal, but in his eyes, they are necessary, 
considering the alternative (terribly unsafe backalley hatchet jobs).  
This, though, is little comfort to young Homer Wells (Tobey Maguire); 
along with housemates Buster (Kieran Culkin), Mary Agnes (Pas de la 
Huerta), Copperfield (Sean Andrew), Hazel (Skye McCole Bartusiak), Fuzzy 
(Erik Sullivan) and the adorable Curly (Spencer Diamond), Homer grows up 
as an orphan under the care of Larch and the nurses, and becomes almost 
as skilled as the good doctor himself.  The difference, though, is that 
Homer objects to Larch's actions, and has no intentions on being an 
abortionist.
Homer's life takes a drastic change when Wally Worthington (Paul Rudd), 
an Air Force pilot, brings his girlfriend Candy Kendall (Charlize 
Theron) to St. Cloud for an abortion.  When they leave, Homer goes with 
them, and experiences life as an apple picker in the cider mill of 
Wally's family, including his mother Olive (Kate Nelligan).  There, he 
meets a band of migrant workers led by Mr. Rose (Delroy Lindo), his 
daughter Rose Rose (Erykah Badu, in her acting debut), Peaches (Heavy 
D), and Muddy (K. Todd Freeman).  But Homer's former life isn't quite 
behind him; not yet...
The Upshot:
I went into "The Cider House Rules" fully prepared to be either 
disappointed, or put to sleep, by Yet Another art flick.  I need to get 
rid of my jadedness; it would've done this film a disservice had I let 
it win out.  "Cider" was like a breath of fresh air following the "work" 
I had to do to roll with "Magnolia" (lest ye think I'm doggin' that 
flick, check out my "Magnolia" review first.  I'm just sayin'.)   It was 
nice to just let this film wash over me; quite nice to let the movie be.
The flow of the movie served it well.  Told almost as a bedtime story, I 
could easily hear the nurses reading it to the kids as a lullaby; not 
for sleepy-time, but instead to soothe them from the reality that not 
many people were (and sadly, are still not) interested in adopting them 
once they were no longer babies.  Of course, not every aspect of the 
film was a peaceful as all this; the harsh reality of choosing to end a 
life, was a heavy burden to bear by mother and doctor alike.  That the 
movie didn't get bogged down with the heaviness, is indicative of the 
quality of this film.
One would think that a flick that dealt with such a big Issue as 
abortion, from both sides of the fence, would come off as overly 
strident.  One would be wrong.  Though the Issue was "resolved" in the 
end as heavily balanced on one side over the other (you'll have to see 
it to know which), there was no heavy-handed pro-choice or pro-life 
Message involved; the real Message addressed the humanity of the 
characters involved.
And o, the humanity.  The characters felt as natural as those you might 
meet in a small town in 1940's Maine whose only residents are orphans 
and the caretakers that look after them; the actors, likewise, fit the 
clothes of their roles quite well.  Other than the horrible go at an 
American accent, I could easily believe Caine's Dr. Larch, and the 
compassion he had for orphans and pregnant mothers alike; the way he and 
the nurses made the orphans feel special without patronizing them, 
warmed my jaded heart.  Maguire as the eagerly naive Homer, could teach 
Mr. DiCaprio and pals a thing or three about the importance of not being 
so full of your celebrity that you forget how to act; he was charming 
and engaging, and I look forward to seeing him in more movies.  Ditto 
Charlize Theron; my estimation of her acting skills shot way up after 
this flick.  In fact, I can't remember a missed-note from any of the 
actors or characters--including the children.  Heck, especially the 
children; after the sour taste that "Stuart Little" left in my mouth for 
Cutesy Orphan Kids, I was pleasantly surprised by the easygoing 
performances of the young actors (and I fell in love with Spencer 
Diamond; I'd adopt him in a heartbeat!)
The movie took a weird turn when Homer left the orphanage for the cider 
mill; it wasn't exactly difficult to follow, but the motivations (so to 
speak) for the actions of the characters involved, weren't as clear 
during this part of the movie as they were in the orphanage.  That said, 
Delroy Lindo once again knocked my socks off; I find it hard to believe 
that, considering what his Mr. Rose character went through, I could feel 
as...attached...to his character after the movie ended, as I did going 
in.  Though Erykah Badu's movie debut drew my attention [too much, in 
spots; was she wearing contacts?], Lindo's powerful performance kept it.   
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I sometimes have to remind myself that, especially in period pieces like 
this, expressions of "strength" (so to speak) by Black folk, are of 
necessity more muted than they should be able to be in modern day 
movies; that is, just as one wouldn't expect John Coffey to Go Off On 
any of the officers in "The Green Mile", for example, one should also 
not expect Rose Rose to take more serious issue at Candy's charitable 
efforts to give her hand-me-downs.
That said, I cannot help but note this in that regard: White Privilege 
once again reared its ugly head when Migrant Worker Homer was eagerly, 
and repeatedly, invited to sup with both the Kendall and Worthington 
families--but Rose, who at least Candy knew for a much longer time, 
received no such invitation, and none seemed to be forthcoming any time 
soon.  Excuse it away if you will, but I doubt that such excuses would 
go far in Rose's eyes.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
A sweet story with characters that felt Real (especially after having 
just seen "Magnolia", which felt Otherworldly in comparison), one could 
almost forgive Michael Caine for his awful American accent--which gave 
way to his otherwise brilliantly understated performance.  An additional 
tip o' the hat to Delroy Lindo for pulling off the seemingly impossible 
(no spoilers here; you'll have to see it to understand what I mean).
"The Cider House Rules": (rating: greenlight)  
After a year filled with Big!Event! movies (c.f. "Star Wars" The 
Revision), and ultra-long telethon flicks (c.f. "Magnolia"), "Cider" 
gets my props for being a "simple" story with heart.  Y'all go.

Title
Review for I'm the One That I Want (2000)
I'M THE ONE THAT I WANT (2000)
Not Rated; running time 96 minutes
Genre: Comedy (concert)
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0251739
Official site: http://www.margaretcho.com/movie_news/movie_news.htm
Written by: Margaret Cho
Directed by: Lionel Coleman
Performer: Margaret Cho
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsmctheone.html
...and speaking of not judging a book by its cover...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Margaret Cho, a standup comedian, had the "honor" of headlining the
first Asian-American sitcom - ABC's ALL-AMERICAN GIRL - on American TV.
But that "honor" soon turned ugly, when Network Suits tried to make Cho
into something she was uncomfortable being, and quickly cancelled her
show.  In I'M THE ONE THAT I WANT, Cho humorously discusses that
tumultuous time in her life, and touches on the affinity she has with
the gay community in her hometown of San Francisco and beyond.
The Upshot:
I'll be honest [am I ever not in my reviews?  But I digress]: I'M THE
ONE THAT I WANT started off slow, and almost lost my interest.  I think
my Issues with hearing Black comics use the term "nigga" so freely,
transferred over to Cho's liberal use of "faggot", as a term of
endearment.  My cross to bear?  Perhaps.  Certainly, Cho seems to have
the general support of the gay community, so more power to her, I guess.
But still, except for a few chuckles here or there during the opening
part of her show - her "B*tch, it's not that hot" chiding to fashion
designer Karl Lagerfeld for constantly fanning himself, had me rollin' -
I just couldn't Get With her humor at first.
But when Cho started in on the issues surrounding all the things she had
to deal with regarding her TV series, her comedy transformed from being
Just (sorta lame) Jokes, to being something much deeper, something which
I could easily identify with on multiple levels - and I was hooked.
Cho used humor as a method of catharsis in recounting how numbnut TV
network producers and such admonished her to be "more Asian" - and I
could relate, having heard the same thing from some "well-wishers"
who've suggested I be "more Black" in my writing.  So too did I Feel Cho
when she spoke of having been dissed by fellow Korean-Americans for
being "*too* Asian" - after all, critics of my downhome writing style were
one of the reasons why I created "the Bammer Blactionary".  And I gave a
silent Amen when Cho chronicled, with ironic humor, the painful times
she went through in trying to gain acceptance by an increasingly
unaccepting audience, especially as applied to her "weight problem".
After all, what non-svelte American woman - of any race - hasn't had it
up to here with being told that their shape makes them unattractive in
some demographic's eyes?  As Cho blended humor with the obvious anger
that came with being pushed and pulled in multiple directions to become
something she was not, the Black Factor, the Female Factor - the Regular
Person In An Irregular World Factor - made me want to scream "preach,
sista!" throughout.  In many ways, Cho's struggle had been my struggle;
for until one learns to Show Them The Hand, who doesn't want to be
accepted?
Cho put me in mind of John Leguizamo, whose one-man shows on HBO have
shown a talent hidden behind stereotypical thug parts he's had in flicks
like REGARDING HENRY (not to mention the total waste of time that was
SUPER MARIO BROS, ewww) - and more to the point, Cho, like Leguizamo,
laid herself bare for the audience, all the while keeping us laughing,
and thinking.  Cho doesn't quite have Leguizamo's range (hmmm...maybe I
should do a review or two of some of his works), but the message behind
her madness, came through as loudly as did his.
Laughter being the best medicine, she seems to have healed herself from
the destructive behavior stemming from her experiences after struggling
with her weight and still having her show be cancelled.  Don't be
fooled: she's no sweet lotus blossom.  If you spend an hour or two
watching I'M THE ONE THAT I WANT, any preconceived notions you might
have of what Asian Chicks Are Like, will quickly evaporate.  And in my
book, that's most def A Good Thing.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
If you're looking for The Asian Original Kings Of Comedy, you're looking
in the wrong place: this Margaret Cho piece has more akin with John
Leguizamo's heart-wrenching monologues, than with the Kangs' jokes.  But
listen to Cho tell you why she's gonna keep Rockin' The Mike, and about
the pathos that comes with being a Minority expected to Fit In in dese
hea' United States, and you'll know why I hung in there after her
somewhat slow beginning.  Like the drag queens who "raised" Cho might
say, You Go Girl...
I'M THE ONE THAT I WANT (rating: greenlight):
  "Is there a KKKmart?"...ha!

Title
Review for Double Take (2001)
DOUBLE TAKE (2001)
PG-13; running time 88 minutes
Genre: Action Comedy
Seen at: Lowes Star Southfield (Detroit, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.doubletake.movies.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0238948
Written by: George Gallo (based on the story by Graham Greene)
Directed by: George Gallo
Cast: Orlando Jones, Eddie Griffin, Gary Grubbs, Garcelle Beauvais,
Andrea Navedo, Edward Herrmann, Daniel Roebuck, Sterling Macer Jr.,
Benny Nieves, Vivica A. Fox
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsdoubletake.html
I'm not mad that DOUBLE TAKE ("DT") was, for the most part, a pedestrian
comedy with a fairly generic, and plot hole-filled, storyline.  I'm not
mad that most of DT's relatively funny scenes were shown in its trailer
(and of those, that they all came at the beginning of the movie).  I'm
not even mad that, if DT is successful enough at the box office, Orlando
Jones will likely get more Eddie Griffin-type roles offered to him than
Orlando Jones-type roles (confused?  I'll explain in a minute).
What I am mad about is that America has become so desensitized to the
cuss word "nigga" - yeah, you heard; I called it a cuss word - that even
in its liberal usage, DOUBLE TAKE can still get a PG-13 rating.  MPAA
President Jack Valenti, you oughta be ashamed of your two-faced self.
But not as ashamed as those of Us who keep using that ugly term as if it
were an honorific, should be.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Nothing fancy here: Daryl Chase (Orlando Jones) is a successful wall
street banker who stumbled across some Funny Money which is somehow tied
to the Mexican corporation he, his assistant Shari (Vivica A. Fox), and
his boss C.A. (Edward Herrmann) are trying to do business with.  Pretty
soon, Daryl discovers that he's being set up to take a fall, all the
while being pursued by Martinez (Benny Nieves), Norville (Daniel
Roebuck) and Gradney (Sterling Macer Jr).  When the frame job turns into
a charge of murder, he "borrows" the identity of the one person who
might be able to help him - a street hustler named Freddy Tiffany (Eddie
Griffin) - and on the advice of FBI agent T.J. McCready (Gary Grubbs),
heads to Mexico.  But, as Daryl soon finds out, appearances can be
deceiving...
The Upshot:
It's clear from the start that the story in DOUBLE TAKE is secondary to
its main purpose, which is, primarily, to showcase the talents of its
stars: standup comedian Eddie Griffin and comic actor Orlando Jones.  In
this sense, it worked, at least partially; especially as pertains to
Jones.
I've seen Orlando Jones in a few previous roles: as one of the funnier
players in the otherwise dull THE REPLACEMENTS; as The Black Guy [uh,
sorry about that] in BEDAZZLED; and, yes, as the Comic Relief in some
7Up pop commercials.  But in DT, Jones impressed me much more than in
anything else I've ever seen him in - to the point where DT gets a
flashing yellowlight rating solely on the strength of his participation.
Jones' Daryl Chase was that rarity of Black comic skit characters: he
was as believable playing Mr. Wall Street (importantly, without the
unneeded Sellout Uncle Tom overtones) as he was the Schlitz Malt
Liquor-seeking hoodie rat.   The refreshing thing about his character,
in Wall Street-mode, is that Jones portrayed him as a smart, ambitious,
but realistic - and still Old School - achiever.  In other words, Chase
was Everyday Black Folk.  As I said, my estimation of the movie was
raised a notch because of Jones.
Even given my lowered expectations of this type of movie [everybody who
expected Shakespeare In The Round, raise your hands.  Thought so... ]
there's still a limit on the amount of wiggle room I'll give a flick,
"low-brow" or not.  Eddie Griffin quickly reached that limit.  Unlike
Jones, Griffin never made me believe he was anything but the
nigga-spouting street clown he portrayed from the start.  Maybe I
shouldn't be too hard on the brotha - after all, he is more a standup
comedian than a bona fide actor - but hey, I calls it as I sees it.  And
as I sees it in DT, Griffin's welcome was worn out before the end of the
first act.  He lacked the charm of a Jamie Foxx or the depth of an Eddie
Murphy [or is that vice-versa?]; and without much substance to work
with, the flash he had, quickly dulled.
As expected, the supporting cast members were primarily in place to
provide Jones and Griffin characters to bounce their schtick off of,
though Garcelle Beauvais as Chase's sultry lingerie model girlfriend
Chloe, and especially Andrea Navedo as the multi-faceted Maque Sanchez,
provided a bit more than the standard Warm Place To Put It parts that
one might predict of the female leads in an action comedy (strangely
enough, Vivica A. Fox, the one cast member who might've added more to
the DT stew, makes an early exit.  Bad move, guys).  Of the remaining
cast, even a veteran character actor like Edward Herrmann seemed like so
much jetsom and flotsam floating in a lifeless sea - though "Delores" -
Freddy's lap dog - provided an unexpected chuckle or two of her own.
If it seems like I hated this movie, I really didn't; DT never went very
far with me, but it did have its moments, and truthfully, Griffin did
improve over time (once Freddy stopped playing Street, and stopped
spouting "nigga", he was tolerable).  DOUBLE TAKE just wasn't my cup o'
tea; Your Method May, of course, Vary.
I just hope Hollywood casting agents start sending Orlando Jones scripts
that allow him to showcase his acting and comedic skills without always
and only requiring him to Act (their warped idea of) Black.  The Orlando
Jones I saw in DT wasn't the one-dimensional caricature that was his
okay-we-get-it-dammit! costar.  Here's hoping Jones allows his potential
to be challenged even further, regardless of the shortsightedness of
those who would typecast him.  Fingers crossed.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I tried hard to keep my - can I make it plain? - my "boy, I hope White
Folk ain't diggin' this clown" kneejerk sensitivity in check; I truly
did.  And I genuinely liked Orlando Jones here; with a minimum of
over-the-top posturing, his Daryl Chase won me over, easily convincing
me that Jones' talent runs deep.  But there's only so much "nigga"ing I
can take.  And, along with it, only so much of the clowning Eddie
Griffin.
DOUBLE TAKE (rating: flashing yellowlight):
One take was quite enough, thankyewverramuch.

Title
Review for American in Paris, An (1951)
AN AMERICAN IN PARIS (1951)
Not Rated; running time 114 minutes
Genre: Musical
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0043278
Written by: Alan Jay Lerner
Directed by: Vincente Minnelli
Music by: George Gershwin, Ira Gershwin
Choreography by: Gene Kelly
Cast: Gene Kelly, Leslie Caron, Oscar Levant, Georges Guetary,
Nina Foch
DVD standard features (region 1): "Pan And Scan" (non-widescreen);
theatrical trailer; scene access.  Languages & Subtitles: English, French
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsamerparis.html
As my boy Len in MEMENTO might say, memory's a tricky thing.  Take AN
AMERICAN IN PARIS, for instance.  I distinctly remember thinking, as a
young girl brimming with newly-discovered hormones, that There Could
Never Be Anything Finer, Period, than the image of Gene Kelly struttin'
on screen in a skin-tight leotard.  I distinctly remember this, because
at the sight of Monsieur Kelly doing that strut, I was sure of two
things: one, that one day I'd be Mrs. Gene Kelly, and he'd take me out
of Detroit and into his graceful arms (I'd figure out what to do with
Leslie Caron later, my passion-enflamed heart reckoned); and two, that I
had just witnessed what was undoubtedly The Greatest Musical Ever.
Period.
So why, some 25 or so years later, do I feel somewhat let down by the
movie I just watched?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Ex-GI Jerry Mulligan (Gene Kelly) did what any red-blooded American boy
would do after World War II came to a close: he stayed in Paris, to
pursue a career in painting.  His "career", to the point of the opening
of the film [Kelly's first scene, hinting at the graceful athleticism of
a dancer's everyday movement, never ceases to pull me in], consisted of,
mostly, Starving.  He shared such a fate with his best bud, Adam Cook
(Oscar Levant, who I've come to adore almost as much as I love Kelly), a
gifted curmudgeon of a concert pianist who just might be the world's
oldest child prodigy.  Adam, a self-effacing chainsmoker, is also best
buds with the somewhat more successful French music hall star Henri
Baurel (Georges Guetary), an older man who took in young Lise Bouvier
(Leslie Caron) during The Resistance, and in a Woody Hall-ian move, fell
in love with Lise and asked her to marry him.
One problem: once carefree bachelor Jerry laid eyes on Lise, he was
hooked.  Actually, two problems: Jerry's new arts patron, the worldly -
and jealous - Milo (as in, "Venus de") Roberts, wants Jerry for herself.
And on tomorrow's installment of All My Bold And Beautiful Children...
The Upshot:
It's difficult to pin down, but whether it was the relative poor quality
of the DVD itself, or the cringeworthy moments in this movie (see "The
Numbers" below for a couple examples), I honestly have to say that my
childhood Greatest Ever assessment was a bit off.  To be sure, AN
AMERICAN IN PARIS has its moments of absolute brilliance, and I'd easily
put it up against most of the dreck passing for movies these days; but
there was an...emptiness of plot here that just failed to reach the
sustained high notes of a SINGIN' IN THE RAIN or a WEST SIDE STORY, for
instance.  Maybe it was just the idealistic memory I had of that tight
jumper Kelly wore out, but I certainly remembered "Paris" being a little
brighter, a little more dazzling, in my youth.
On the other hand, there's still a lil' sum'n sum'n about AN AMERICAN IN
PARIS that raises it above your standard Boy Meets Girl Let's Dance
musical plot; something a bit hard-edged that makes "Paris" more kin to
the more socially-relevant "West Side" than Kelly's fluffier "Rain".
That "something", I posit, is Oscar Levant.  Yes, "Paris" has plenty of
hokey numbers, like many of its predecessors.  Yes, "Paris" has a
musical-standard Dame In Waiting in the person of the smoky and
underused Nina Foch, and a Charming Ingenue (well, to an extent) in the
magnificent Leslie Caron.  Yes, "Paris" has great Gershwin standards,
and in Minnelli, a director who knew how to make a musical just the way
movie audiences used to want them to be made.  And oh yes, "Paris" has
Kelly showing off all his charms in that skin-tight leotard...ahem.  But
what "Paris" also has that few of the more lighthearted musicals haven't
got, was Oscar the grouch, all-too-briefly snarking his way through AN
AMERICAN IN PARIS like he owned the joint.
And the cool thing about my owning AN AMERICAN IN PARIS on DVD, is that
through the magic of being able to watch selected scenes, I can pretend
that Levant did indeed at least hold a lease on the joint.
  "Oom-pa-pa By Straus"
   Cringe moment #1; Georges Guetary started off rubbing me the
   wrong way [shouldn't it be illegal for a French guy to attempt
   German?] and never recovers.  Next!
  "I Got Rhythm"
   Ahhh...much better.  I've always loved this number; Gene Kelly
   seemed to work so well with those kids, as if he were a dancing
   version of ER's Dr. Ross.  It's funny, though, that he used
   American to teach French kids, English.  Hooked On Ebonics, Jerry?
  "Tra-La-La"
   Cringe moment #2.  I like an almost-shirtless Kelly like the next
   hot-blooded Chick; but lord, that man really couldn't sing, as he
   proved with that misbegotten high note at the end.  Minnelli
   must've directed him to pretend that someone yanked his testicles
   at that moment.
  "Our Love Is Here To Stay"
   The most sensuous, romantic song and dance pairing I can ever
   recall seeing on film.  Some swoon over Astaire And Rogers; but
   Kelly and Caron, in this beautiful scene, are what Does It for me.
  "Stairway To Paradise"
   I love this number, if only because it always makes me to do my
   impression of Henri Tha Playa President.  I'll try to remember
   to do it for Oprah, next time I see her.
  "3rd Movement: Concerto In F"
   Adam's manifesto, and a brief glimpse into the genius of serious
   pianist Oscar Levant.  A few years ago, I remember seeing a PBS
   documentary on Levant which went into detail about what a
   tormented soul he was.  I don't think I've ever been sadder
   about the life of a celebrity than I was after watching that
   documentary.  But even in my sadness, I came away with a deeper
   appreciation for his work in "Paris".
  "S'wonderful"
   Giving my boy Guetary a break for a minute, I liked this
   threesome piece with him, Kelly, and Levant.  By this point, it
   seemed as if Kelly was repeating some taps, but Levant's
   humorous expressions help make this number a winner.
   "An American In Paris"
   If I ever lost my memory ala "Memento's" Leonard, I'd make sure
   to have "you absolutely love the 'An American In Paris' ballet
   number" tattooed across my body.  It'd most def be worth it.
   This 17-minute ballet (which includes Kelly in the skin-tight
   leotard I keep drooling over) is what ultimately caused me to go
   ga-ga over all things Gene Kelly.  Hey, sue me for having a rich
   fantasy life.
Some of the background "noise" may have been a wee bit disheartening to
see, but the heart of a Gene Kelly musical - the singing and dancing -
still stand the test of time in AN AMERICAN IN PARIS.
DVD Thingies:
The lack of gee whiz techie stuff, only added to my slight malaise about
the film in general.  Sure, oldies captured digitally are treasured more
for their innards than for what some technical genius can add to layers
of DVD; and sure, the film still stands on its own merits.  But it's
discomforting to see a wee pretend-Gene Kelly flinching around the
screen like he was on crack, in the bottom corner of the menu.  The
background music's worse, and the butt-ugly menu titles (which were
supposed to imply a painter's pallet), were worse than that.  It was
nothing short of depressing, I swear.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Though my memory of some details about AN AMERICAN IN PARIS may have
been romanticized a bit more than the reality of watching it as an adult
proved out, even at thirtysomething, I still fantasize about the cutie
in the skin-tight leotard.  oh, swoon. Oh yeah; Caron's not so bad,
either.  And as much as I dug Donald O'Connor in that other Greatest
Ever Kelly Musical, Oscar the grouch has him beat by a country mile.

Title
Review for West Side Story (1961)
WEST SIDE STORY (1961)
Not Rated; running time 151 minutes
Genre: Musical
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0055614
Written by: Ernest Lehman (based on the play by Arthur Laurents
      and "Romeo and Juliet" by Shakespeare)
Directed by: Robert Wise, Jerome Robbins
Music by: Leonard Bernstein, Stephen Sondheim
Choreography by: Jerome Robbins
Cast: Natalie Wood, Richard Beymer, Russ Tamblyn, Rita Moreno,
George Chakiris, Tucker Smith, Tony Mordente, David Winters,
Eliot Feld, Susan Oakes, Simon Oakland, Jose De Vega,
Tony Mordente, Ned Glass
DVD standard features (region 1): widescreen; theatrical trailer;
dual layer; Dolby Digital 5.1 soundtrack; 8-page booklet; scene
access.  Languages & Subtitles: English, French
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamswestside.html
It's no secret that I love musicals.  But that love has been tempered by
the fact that musicals, by their very nature, were basically idealized
flights of fancy; worlds in which Beautiful People would break out in
song and dance at the drop of a hat.  Not that there was anything wrong
with that, necessarily; in fact, I think my love for musicals developed
because I needed to escape to the fantasy life they portrayed.
That is, until I watched WEST SIDE STORY, and saw, for the first time, a
musical that addressed the realities of life in the ghetto.  Uh, to the
extent that dancing and singing 'bangers can be said to be real.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The place: New York.  The time: the 1950s.  Whites hung out on one side
of the 'hood, Puerto Ricans, on the other; and never the twain should
meet.  But someone forgot to tell that to Tony (Richard Beymer) and
Maria (Natalie Wood).
Tony, a good White boy, and Maria, a good Puerto Rican girl, defy
tradition by falling in love, much to the chagrin of their families,
their friends - and their respective homies in the rival White Jets and
Puerto Rican Sharks gangs.  The Jets, led by Riff (Russ Tamblyn), and
the Sharks, led by Maria's brother Bernardo (George Chakiris), try to
talk "sense" to Tony and Maria, to no avail.  All hell breaks loose when
Bernardo's girlfriend Anita (Rita Moreno, as good as it gets) tries to
deliver a message from Maria to Tony via the hard-headed and
hard-hearted Sharks; and dire consequences follow.
The Upshot:
Forget that the late Natalie Wood was no more Puerto Rican than I am,
that she wouldn't know a Puerto Rican accent if it bit her on the butt,
and that Wood, Rita Moreno, and Richard Beymer actually had singing
doubles (Marni Nixon, Betty Wand, and Jimmy Bryant, respectively).
Forget that of all the males cast for WSS, Richard Beymer seemed the
most out-of-place [who might've been better as Tony, at the time?
Dunno...maybe John Derek, the cutie from THE TEN COMMANDMENTS?]; if
anyone had the potential to drag WEST SIDE STORY down a notch or two,
Beymer would've certainly been its weakest link.  And forget that one
doesn't usually perceive singing and dancing gangbangers as a menace
[not in these days of drive-by shooting, anyway.  I prefer the cop
rock-types myself...but I digress].
Forget about all that, because it simply does not matter.  The strength
of the movie WEST SIDE STORY lies in its earnestness and in the way it
conveyed the immediacy of its tale without compromising on its obvious
roots as a stage play.  In spite of their shortcomings, I believed in
Wood's Maria, and in Beymer's Tony.  And because of the powerful
performances of the supporting cast (chief among them the firey Moreno,
George Chakiris and Russ Tamblin as fated gangleaders, Simon Oakland as
the soul-dead Lieutenant Schrank, and my favorite Chick of 'em all,
Susan Oakes as the ruffneck Anybodys), WEST SIDE STORY will always be
much more than Just Another Musical for me.
Not to discount the musical portion of the program; not in the least.
Even without its Message, WSS could still stand on its musical merits
alone.  Composers Leonard Bernstein and Stephen Sondheim whipped up a
masterful score; choreographer Jerome Robbins created memorable dance
sequences (who could ever forget "America"? or "Cool"? or...); and
though Ernest Lehman's script seems a bit dated by today's standards,
director Robert Wise beautifully put it all together in a film that
truly deserves to be hailed by a term that's so often abused these days:
a classic.
And did I mention it had singing and dancing 'bangers?
  "Overture" and "Jet Ballet"
   WEST SIDE STORY kicks off with five minutes of little on-screen
   to entertain the viewer except an unidentifiable (at first)
   illustration that changes colors; so just close your eyes and
   enjoy the swelling score until the illustration segues to an
   overhead view of Manhattan and leads to..."Jet Ballet", which
   begins with WSS's trademark signaling whistle, and what appears
   at first to be a bunch of Misunderstood Yooth havin' fun - at
   first.  I can't think of better way to get the feel for the rest
   of the movie, than these first few minutes.
  "Jet Song" and "Something's Coming"
   It's clear: Tony's trying to climb out of the barrel - and the
   Jets are the crabs.
  "The Dance At The Gym" and "Promenade/Mambo"
   Everytime I watch the Jiggaboo/Wannabe dance scene in Spike Lee's
   SCHOOL DAZE, I see Lee's influence in WSS's "Mambo" (though WSS
   of course has SD beat by a country mile).  And besides the
   amazing dancing, the Gym scene is notable for a grin-invoking
   bit with John Astin as Glad Hand.
  "Maria"
   I prefer the "Tony and Maria are hit with a bolt of lightning"
   instrumental/dancing version of "Maria" to the version that Tony
   sings.
  "America"
   By far my favorite number in a movie full of great song/dance
   numbers.  An interesting contrast of old country/new country
   viewpoints, there is so much depth included here, both
   stylistically (Rita Moreno and George Chakiris burned the roof off)
   and in substance (the lyric "Life is alright in America/If you're
   all White in America!"...man oh man).
  "Officer Krupke"
   The Problem With Juvenile Delinquents, in a nutshell.  All they'd
   need to add for 90s/00s sensibilities are references to video games
   and violent movies.
  "One Hand, One Heart"
   If I had been thinking, I would've looked for a recording of this
   song when I got married.
  "The Rumble/Tonight"
   Great intermix of sweetness (Tony & Maria), sexiness (Anita) and
   tragedy (the gangs).
  "Somewhere"
   Forget Streisand; this song has never been done better than in WSS.
   Here, it conveys a poignant mix of despair and desire.
Don't tell anybody, but the time the (very cleverly done) closing
credits roll around, I'm always a soggy mess.
DVD Thingies:
Nothing outstanding here, as far as DVD-specific features go.  I am
happy, though, for the updated soundtrack (for which I turned the knob
up to 11) and for the 8-page booklet; these alone make purchasing this
DVD a steal at any cost.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I could note, I reckon, that WEST SIDE STORY tore up the Academy Awards
in 1961, with 10 total Oscars including Best Picture, Best Supporting
actor (George Chakiris), and Best Supporting actress (Rita Moreno).  But
it hardly matters.  Y'all already know that WSS was tha bomb, right?  If
ya don't know, now ya know.
WEST SIDE STORY: (rating: greenlight):
They just don't make classics like this anymore.  More's the pity.

Title
Review for Singin' in the Rain (1952)
SINGIN' IN THE RAIN (1952)
Rated G; running time 103 minutes
Genre: Musical
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0045152
Written by:Betty Comden, Adolph Green
Directed by: Stanley Donen, Gene Kelly
Music by: Nacio Herb Brown, Lennie Hayton
Choreography by: Gene Kelly
Cast: Gene Kelly, Donald O'Connor, Debbie Reynolds, Jean Hagen,
Millard Mitchell, Cyd Charisse, Rita Moreno
DVD standard features (region 1): "Pan And Scan" (non-widescreen);
theatrical trailer; scene access.  Languages & Subtitles: English,
French, Spanish
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamssinginrain.html
On the back cover of the DVD box for SINGIN' IN THE RAIN, movie critic
Roger Ebert is quoted as calling the movie "The greatest Hollywood
musical ever made!".
I can diggit, Rog, but from my seat, it comes in a close second.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The 1920s were a time of Flappers, and "The Charleston" - and silent
movies.  And Don Lockwood (Gene Kelly) and his leading lady, Lina Lamont
(Jean Hagen), were huge silent movie stars.  Don, at first a struggling
musician along with his buddy Cosmo Brown (Donald O'Connor), enjoyed the
benefits of stardom - even when his adoring fans got to be a bit too
much for him, and when Lina foolishly believed the media hype that she
and Don had a lil' sum'n sum'n goin' on.  Luckily for him, he met and
fell for Kathy Selden (Debbie Reynolds), a feisty chorus girl with big
dreams of the New York stage.
The 20s were also a time of tremendous upheaval: for the movies, it was
a time when "Talkies" came along to change the world.  Producer R.F.
Simpson (Millard Mitchell) initially played off the importance of the
newfangled technology, thinking it was just a passing fad.  Soon,
though, the brass at Monumental Pictures realized that they'd best jump
on the bandwagon, and remake their latest flick, "The Dueling Cavalier",
into a musical Talkie of their own.
Only one problem: contrary to her beliefs, Lina can't sing, can't dance,
and when she talks, her voice could curdle milk.
The Upshot:
Yes, I *know* Everyone Loves Singin'.  Yes, I *know* it sits high on the
American Film Institute's ranking of Rilly Good Flicks.  And yes, I most
def have lots of respect and admiration for the makers of SINGIN' IN THE
RAIN; my Torrid Love for Gene Kelly (first developed in the vivid
imagination of my youth, while watching Kelly musicals before Sunday
School) is a torch I carry to this day.  But I still call this one
second-best, for two nitpicky, but irritating, reasons: the relative
weakness of Debbie Reynolds as Kelly's paramour - as my girl Lina
might've said, "I kaaaan't staaan' 'er!" - and the lack of much to do
for Kelly's sidekick, Donald O'Connor.
Believe me when I say that those two flaws hardly marred the excellent
work that is "Rain".  My minor dislike for Reynolds, and her Kathy
Selden character, is more a personal Issue than a real show-stopping
disdain.  Except for Kathy's original spunk when first confronted with
movie star Don Lockwood, there just didn't seem to be much there worthy
of Don's pursuit; frankly, I wouldn't have given her a second thought.
Of course, my Strong Chick perspective comes some almost 50 years after
this movie was released, so take my attitude with a grain of salt.
However, my problem with Cosmo Brown, stands.  I liked his spotlight in
the "Make 'Em Laugh" number, but even then, that character reminded me
too much of a milder version of Jim Carrey.  In fairness, though, that
may be because I've had too much exposure to Carrey's antics; well
before Carrey showed on the scene, I used to think that Cosmo was Danny
Kaye's little brother.  And I love me some Danny Kaye.  Hmmm...is there
an antidote for overexposure to Ham?
I have nothing but praise for the rest, though.  Gene Kelly, of course,
can Do No Wrong by me [well, he didn't have the best singing voice, but
oh, that body.  Uh.]; here, as usual, he danced divinely, and though his
acting wouldn't be mistaken as Shakepearean, he had a charm that more
than made up for any thespian shortcomings he might've had.  Jean Hagen
was ghettofabulous as the skreetchy, but fun, Lina Lamont - a true diva
if ever I saw one.  In checking Hagen's IMDB listing, I see there are a
few movies of hers that I need to check out.  She didn't seem to get the
wide attention she deserved, after "Rain"; that's just not right.  Also
excellent in supporting roles were Millard Mitchell as the marvelously
henpecked R. F. Simpson ("I was confused!") and Cyd "Legs" Charisse as
the femme fatale dancer who spoke volumes without saying a word.  And in
only her fourth feature film, living legend (and deserving of a Latina
Factor all her own) Rita Moreno's bit part as Lina's bud Zelda is a
small taste of what was to come for her (can you tell I'm excited about
having just bought WEST SIDE STORY on DVD?)
What was that that "Andy Hardy" would always say?  "Hey kids, let's put
on a show!"
The Numbers:
The heart of any musical, especially one made during the 40s and 50s, is
its musical numbers [duh!].  And SINGIN' IN THE RAIN is chock full 'o
good ones:
  "Make 'Em Laugh"
   Donald O'Connor's showcase; funny, and his run-up-the-wall
   bit, made my jaw drop the first time I saw it.
  "You Were Meant For Me"
   Ok, so it's your standard mushy Boy Meets Girl number which
   sweetly clues the audience in that yes, Don is falling for
   Kathy [though *why*, I'll never know].  And oh, that voice.
   But oh, that bod!  Uh.
  "Moses Supposes"
   As far as partners go, I liked Kelly and Frank Sinatra in
   ANCHOR'S AWEIGH better, but this number has its own charms;
   and, thanks to the DVD, I finally caught that quick
   "eeneymeenymineyMoses" riff Kelly does under the curtain, ha!
   And call me Easy, but every time they do that "A" at the end,
   I cheer.  Hey, it's a Thing.
  "Good Morning To You"
   Nothing very special about this number, which has one of the
   weakest segues in the whole movie ["it's not March 23rd, it's
   the 24th; good morning!" ugh]. But I reckon I liked it well
   enough: I kept "rewinding" the DVD back to that track - which
   actually segues very well into...
  "Singin' In The Rain"
   Anything I say about this magnificent, classic number, will be
   woefully insufficient.  Suffice it to say that that's one lucky
   umbrella.  And the struttin' fella ain't half bad.
  "Broadway Melody"
   Clocked in at 14 minutes, this number is the great capper "Rain"
   deserves.  A story-within-the-story, I can't decide what I
   liked most about this number: Kelly of course, the very leggy
   Cyd Charisse, or the coin-flipping mobsters [man, did I think
   they were Coolness Personified when I was 8!].  Ah, who'm I
   kiddin'; I liked it all.  As my Brit friends would say,
   bloody brilliant!
Betty Comden and Adolph Green's screenplay may have been the backbone of
"Rain", but Nacio Herb Brown and Lennie Hayton's music, and Gene Kelly's
fantastic choreography, were its heart and soul.
DVD Thingies:
As with the A CHRISTMAS STORY DVD, the "Rain" disc (understandably)
offered little by way of DVD goodies.  The lack of widescreen option was
disappointing, of course; and the differentiation between "closed
captioning" and "subtitles", without any indication of what the
differences were, was needlessly confusing.  But as I said about A
CHRISTMAS STORY, I'd watch this movie against a brick wall if I had to,
it's *that* good.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I've watched SINGIN' IN THE RAIN in bits n' pieces on TV over the years,
but seeing it on DVD was the first time I've ever watched it all the way
through.  I'm glad, because I couldn't appreciate the depth of the story
when I first watched it as a kid, the way I do now.  "Depth?  In a
*musical*?", you ask?  Yep, depth.  Beneath the fluffy love story and
the Any Excuse To Sing And Dance of your standard movie musical, lies
lessons on (mis)perceptions and adaptability to change.  Weird, how I
hadn't noticed that before.
Or, maybe it's not even all that Deep.  Maybe it *is* just Any Excuse To
Sing And Dance.  Hey, in a world increasingly hostile, cynical, and full
of pain, maybe we *need* to Sing And Dance every once in awhile.  I can
diggit.
SINGIN' IN THE RAIN (rating: greenlight):
What I wouldn't give to have been that umbrella.

Title
Review for Here on Earth (2000)
Here On Earth (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 90 minutes
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0195778 
Official site: http://www.hereonearthmovie.com/main.html  
Written by: Michael Seitzman
Directed by: Mark Piznarski
Starring: Chris Klein, Leelee Sobieski, Josh Hartnett, 
Bruce Greenwood, Annette O'Toole, Annie Corley, Stuart Wilson, 
Elaine Hendrix, Michael Rooker
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshere.html
After my scathing review of the sappy Brokedown Palace, I attracted the 
attention of a 14-year-old AOL troll who, among other things, took 
umbrage with my dismissal of that piece of celluloid as MTV-esque in its 
lack of depth or sensible storyline.
Man, she'll be chompin' at the bit after this one...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
A lookalike movie ("Doc Hollywood" without the humor, "An Officer And A 
Gentlemen" without the smarts) with lookalike actors (Leelee Sobieski 
looks like a young Helen Hunt, Chris Klein looks a bit like Keanu 
Reeves, and in the right light, Josh Hartnett looks like Tommy Lee 
Jones, pre-wrinkles), this flick soaks in the deep-fry vat of stupidity.  
"Here On Earth" (or "HOE", as I like to call it) simplistically recounts 
a mindnumbingly dumb "love triangle" between Kelley Morse (Klein), a 
spoiled little rich boy doing court-ordered community service rebuilding 
a diner he and "farmboy" Jasper Arnold (Harnett) trashed during a 
testosterone-driven drag race through Jasper's small town, and hometown 
girl Samantha "Sam" Cavanaugh (Sobieski), the object of Jasper's 
affection and Kelley's mapmaking tutorial.
Throw in a completely unnecessary (and just as completely unsuccessful) 
ploy to Pull At The Heartstrings with a subplot you could smell from a 
country mile away, and you'll understand Bammer's 5 Second Review of 
"Here On Earth": "Yuck".
The Upshot:
You Know Your Movie Sucked When...the only thing interesting about it 
was the geography fetish the writer seemed to have.  Bad enough that 
Richie Rich and Miss Thang had sex to a bad recital of various states; 
worse yet was Seitzman's inability to keep track of whether his story 
was set in Massachusetts, New York, or Toledo, Ohio.  More proof that 
public schools are failing our Youth; get thee back to Remedial 
Geography, sir! 
This one went south (one of the few geographical directions that Kelley 
didn't head) rather quickly, when Seitzman and Piznarski chose to make 
the Kelley character a total jackass from start to finish, without 
giving him even the hint of a redeeming characteristic (even his 
Obligatory Half-Nekkid scenes felt too slimy to be sexy) or reason to 
root for him.  Sam's attraction to Kelley made absolutely no sense in 
that, or any other, context; to say that it seemed to come from way far 
out of left field, would be a gross understatement.  And because she, in 
turn, stepped all over poor loyal Jasper in her eagerness to play Name 
That State with Kelley, she sank right into the quagmire with Richie 
Rich; instead of coming across as Innocence, Awakened, she more closely 
resembled Ho', Golddigging.  Of the three lead characters, only Jasper 
had my sympathies--and he came off looking like a damfool, for letting 
his long-time girlfriend use him like a doormat (even after they'd 
broken up, no less).
There's little use in talking about the other characters--all there to 
support the losing cause of propping up the lamebrained main- and 
sub-plots; or how the cinematographer tried to capture the essence of 
Small Town U.S.A.--so nicely done that all it did was remind me of how 
bad the humans looked within it. If the storyline, as foundation, is 
shaky, the rest of the "house" is doomed to crumble; and "HOE" was 
standing on some seriously shaky ground.  
The last time I felt this mad after having watched a movie was in 
January of this year.  The target of my anger?  You remember a lil' 
something called "Supernova", no?
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
And now that I've offended the sensibilities of the MTV Generation, 
let's see if this application of the BF Brush winds up alienating me 
from My People...
As I sat in the theater watching "HOE", I kept pinching myself to make 
sure I hadn't nodded off and missed the part that explained why Sweet 
Smalltown-girl Sam would go for a [I'm running out of non-curse words to 
call him] stuck-up cretin like Kelley.  Clearly, Sam suffered from the 
same sicknesses that far too many Black women in America suffer from: 
the "No Good Black Men Left" fever and the "...So I'll Take This No-Good 
One" flu.  I could easily see the three main characters being Black, 
without skipping a beat: my mind's eye saw Charlie, faithful sturdy 
9-to-5'er with a mortgage and a receding hairline, supporting LaShaun, a 
simple city girl who hangs tough with him--until Slick Maurice rolls up 
to the curb with his Lexus and his Rolex; then it's Goodbye Charlie...
Hey, dog me out for that stretch of the imagination if you will, but at 
least my version *entertained* me for a minute or two.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
Is it Just Me, or have most of the movies so far this year been bloody 
awful?  Maybe it's another ill effect of La Nina.  Here's to hoping the 
Bad Weather surrounding these writers, directors, and actors, will clear 
up soon.
"Here On Earth" (rating: greenlight): 
Somewhere along the way, it lost its compass.  But not even a 
state-of-the-art Global Positioning System could've helped "HOE" find 
its way home.

Title
Review for On the Town (1949)
ON THE TOWN (1949)
Not Rated; running time 98 minutes
Genre: Musical
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0041716
Written by: Adolph Green, Betty Comden (based on the Broadway play)
Directed by: Stanley Donen, Gene Kelly
Music by: Leonard Bernstein, Roger Edens
Choreography by: Gene Kelly
Cast: Gene Kelly, Frank Sinatra, Betty Garrett, Ann Miller,
Jules Munshin, Vera-Ellen, Alice Pearce, Bern Hoffman
DVD standard features: "Pan And Scan" (non-widescreen); scene access;
Languages & Subtitles: English, French
DVD special features: theatrical trailer; cast & crew notes
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsonthetown.html
I have to admit, I've been fooled all these years.  Here I've been, in
all my naivete, believing that all the gobs and dames in these 40's
musicals wanted, was a chance to get a few chaste smooches in before
they fell in love with the gob/dame of their dreams.
Then a hot hoochiemama by the name of Betty Garrett changed all that for
me.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Small town Navy boys Gabey (Gene Kelly), Chip (Frank Sinatra), and Ozzie
(Jules Munshin) have a 24-hour pass in New York, and are out to see the
sights.  Sights like Ivy Smith (Vera-Ellen), Hilde Esterhazy (Betty
Garrett), and Claire Huddesen (Ann Miller) will do just fine,
thankyewverramuch.
Okay, okay...when the boys see a poster for Miss Turnstiles, aka Ivy
Smith, Gabey is enchanted and sets out to meet the famous (or so he
thinks) Miss Turnstiles to ask her out on a date that night.  "In a city
of four million women", he actually *does* find Ivy, then loses her,
then finds her again, then...well, you get the picture.  Chip and Ozzie
have their hands full, too: Ozzie pursues Claire, an anthropologist
who'd like to study *his* bones...and Chip finds himself being pursued
by Mae West's little sister, Hildy.
The Upshot:
On the surface, ON THE TOWN doesn't seem all that deep - just another
Boy Gets Shore Leave Boy Looks For A Hookup Boy Meets Girl Boy Falls For
Girl The End kinda flick - but there's more to "OTT" than meets the eye.
Besides its Oscar-winning musical score, "OTT" broke new ground as the
first musical to be filmed partially on location; and the difference
shows.  The opening scenes establish a great, realistic look at New York
from a tourist's eyes (and from a historical point of view, makes one
marvel at how much the NYC skyline has changed over the years).  I also
liked the use of the "clock" to countdown the hours left for the Navy
boys, a technique used better, and more sparingly, here than in some
modern-day films.
But for me, the kicker in this movie was Betty Garrett as the lusty
Brunhilde Esterhazy.  To be sure, Gene Kelly and Frank Sinatra continued
their charming ANCHORS AWEIGH ways, and for the first time since AN
AMERICAN IN PARIS, I haven't wanted to pop Kelly's Girl upside the head;
I found Vera-Ellen quite pleasing here, and I loved her voice.  The
Comic Relief - Jules Munshin as fifth-wheel Ozzie, Ann Miller as his
girl Claire, and especially Alice Pearce as the Hilde's lonelyhearts
roommate Lucy Shmeeler - were also good in their supporting roles.  But
Garrett added some sho'nuff serious spice to this tale, to the point
where I was wondering if they'd have a scene with Hilde and Chip
crawling out of a Navy locker a la STRIPES.  woolaud.
I suppose I could overanalyze many of the plot points of this and other
typical 40's musicals, from a 00's point of view.  I could discuss the
Peter Pan syndrome many of Kelly's characters seem to exhibit, dish on
how Sinatra's skinny-boy-Guys often got smacked around by Dolls,
cogitate on the whys and wherefores of all the various and sundry
floosies that inundated these musicals, yada yada blah blah blah.  But
where's the fun in that?  Besides, in a time where we are oversaturated
with talk show hosts, therapists, and thespians creating a societal
hodgepodge of dysfunctions for us to wallow in
I said, in a time where we are oversaturated with talk show hosts,
therapists, and thespians creating a societal hodgepodge of dysfunctions
for us to wallow in, I don't at all mind looking back at a time when an
announcer breathlessly exclaiming that this movie was "twice as gay as
ANCHORS AWEIGH!", wouldn't be cause for a riot.
  "Prelude"
   This number's not actually listed, and the person that's featured
   isn't credited - but Bern Hoffman as the sleepy dock worker singin'
   the early mornin' blues, was a great way to segue to...
  "New York, New York"
   It's most def a helluva town.  The sailors sing the praises of
   New York, their eyes filled with it.  A great number, made moreso
   by the location shots; it wouldn't have been the same on a set.
  "Miss Turnstiles"
   Though I liked the similar I'm Every Woman dance in "Paris" better,
   I did like the acrobatic male dancers in this number; good
   choreography by Kelly once again.
  "Come Up To My Place"
   Excellent number, both in phrasing and in setting words into action.
   As I alluded to above, I was left with no doubt in my mind what Hilde
   planned for Chip up in her place.  My boy gonna get wo' out...
  "On The Town"
   I can't praise this number enough; featuring the entire sextet, I
   finally had to have someone take the DVD remote away from me so I'd
   stop "rewinding" the disc back to the beginning of this track.
  "A Day In New York"
   This Kelly-standard tell-the-story-in-ballet number doesn't have the
   polish of his better, later works, but I liked the beautiful, swelling
   music, and co-director Kelly's use of light and shadow.
I am so glad I grew up with an appreciation for musicals; Gene Kelly
definitely expressed himself best when he danced, and I'm glad I got a
chance to witness it, even if only after the fact.
DVD Thingies:
Having already seen the ON THE TOWN theatrical trailer during ANCHORS
AWEIGH, I was less impressed by its inclusion in this DVD, especially
because "OTT" lacked a couple other extras that "Anchors" had.  But I
was impressed by the mood-inducing dock sounds in the "OTT" menu.  What
can I say; I'm easily amused.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
If nothing else, ON THE TOWN finally convinced me that Sex existed in
the movies long before they had a rating for it (and an MPAA against
it).  Back then, they were just more subtle about it than the current
batch of cinema artistes.  I can diggit.
ON THE TOWN: (rating: greenlight):
The team of Kelly and Sinatra are two for two with ANCHORS AWEIGH and ON
THE TOWN; next up-at-bat: TAKE ME OUT TO THE BALLGAME.

Title
Review for Play It to the Bone (1999)
Play It To The Bone (1999)  
Rated R; running time 124 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0196857 
Official site: http://movies.go.com/playit/index.html  
Written by:  Ron Shelton
Directed by:  Ron Shelton
Starring: Woody Harrelson, Antonio Banderas, Lolita Davidovich,
Lucy Liu, Tom Sizemore, Robert Wagner, Richard Masur
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsplayit.html
In the six months since Diva and I created 3BC, I've grown much more 
tolerant about movies; setting aside outright ig'nant crap like 
"Supernova", I've learned to roll with the cinematic punches, suspend my 
disbelief, and give a movie the benefit of the doubt--even those I give 
the redlight.  But I have a line that cannot be crossed: Bammer's First 
Commandment Of Flicks is, "Thou shalt not be filled to the brink with 
pointlessness"...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Vince Bourdreau (Woody Harrelson) and Caesar Dominguez (Antonio 
Banderas) are best pals and professional boxers With A Past; on their 
last legs, they're given one last chance at redemption.  But their last 
chance comes at a price: they have to fight each other.  Called as a 
last-minute undercard match, on the day of the fight, by sleazy 
promoters Hank Goody (Robert Wagner), Joe Domino (Tom Sizemore), and 
Artie (Richard Masur), they head for Las Vegas by Bad Ass car [I'm not 
exaggerating; it should've been billed as such in the closing credits].  
Taking them on this inexplicable road trip from L.A. to Vegas is the Bad 
Ass car's owner with whom they've both had "past experience", Grace 
Pasic (Lolita Davidovich); and joining them after a pit stop is Lia 
(Lucy Liu), a "free spirit" who never met a drug, or a penis, she didn't 
like.
The Upshot (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
"Play It To The Bone" is billed as a Comedy, but it had me asking "why?" 
and "how?" so many times, it shoulda been classified a Mystery...
The biggest "why?" by far was the completely unrealistic road trip 
itself.  Work with me here: Vince and Ceasar have the fight of their 
professional lives thrust upon them; given the opportunity by the boxing 
promoters to take a flight from to Vegas, they instead go pick up Grace 
(more Weird than the Bad Ass the film tries to make her out to be) so 
she could drive them there?  WHY?  Folks, the BS Meter worked overtime 
on this one.  As writer and director, Ron Shelton could've solved this 
whole problem by making the fight be scheduled for at least "tomorrow", 
but noooooo.  This point alone damn near ruined the entire movie for me; 
just as the totally unbelievable explanation for keeping Nicholas Cage's 
character in "Face/Off" alive made me walk out of that flick in disgust, 
I felt the urge to do the same here.  But tolerance won out, and I 
instead just grumbled under my breath.  Of course, it didn't help that, 
at what Grace called the "halfway point to Vegas", she went on to say 
they were still five hours out.  Even given a trip down the "scenic 
route", the whole trip between L.A. and L.V. wouldn't take that long.
Another "why?" I mostly know the answer to already: why pad the movie 
with pointless cameos from the likes of Kevin Costner, Steve Lawrence, 
and of all people, Rod Stewart?  The HBO boxing commentators (Larry 
Merchant, Jim Lampley, and George Foreman), I could understand; but what 
with all those pointless cameos by animate and inanimate objects alike, 
two words came swiftly to mind: "product placement".  And while I'm 
asking questions, here's a "how?" for you to ponder when you see this 
flick: given that the road trip took 5+ hours, add to that the amount of 
time it'd take to do all the stuff involved in a professional fight 
(getting the boxers weighed in, physically examined, properly warmed-up, 
etc), and the approximate amount of time a normal fight would last.  
Factoring all that in, ask yourself how the sun could be in the position 
it was at the end of the movie.  Get my drift?
Some would say that my dwelling on such things only set me up to not 
like this flick; thinking too long and hard about a comedy, they say, 
often leads to disaster.  To those "some", I say this: I hate having my 
intelligence insulted; and once that happens, even at my most tolerant, 
the movie in question can never be taken at face value by me.  The proof 
is in the pudding: the vast majority of this review deals with the 
breaking of my number one Flick Commandment.  Shelton earned my disdain 
for taking such outlandish shortcuts just to get to the sole salvation 
of the movie: the big fight; and though the big fight made sitting 
through everything else almost worth it, I don't think I could trust a 
movie bearing the credit "Written and Directed By Ron Shelton", ever 
again.
All that said...the big fight was a doozy.  I was almost able to forgive 
the entire movie, because of what happened during the fight.  I'm no 
sports fan--and certainly after this, I'm even less likely to watch real 
boxing than ever before--but I gotta admit that Shelton et al did a 
bang-up job in those scenes (no pun intended).  I'll say this much: if 
you dig Antonio Banderas or Woody Harrelson for their looks, you won't 
want to see what happens to them in the process of their fight.  Though 
I was more impressed with Denzel Washington's physicality during his 
turn in the ring in "The Hurricane" (given much shorter time on-screen, 
granted), Harrelson and Banderas were no slouches in the squared circle.  
In a word, that fight was intense.
But we're not quite done yet with the Mystery: why Lia?   
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
A few weeks back, a 3BC reader asked me why I don't have a "Female 
Factor" as well as a "Black Factor"; my "Chickness" being as important, 
so the thought goes, as my "Blackness".  I've been looking for an "in" 
for a FF ever since.  Looks like I've found one.
I don't watch TV's "Ally McBeal", but I've seen enough snippets of it to 
know that co-star Lucy Liu is supposed to be the resident Bad Ass Chick 
there; having played a similar role in Mel Gibson's "Payback", Liu is 
likely seen by casting directors as the innocent-looking young thing 
with a heart of stone, a challenge to men and women alike.  I have 
absolutely no doubt that that's why she was cast in this movie.  And I 
have absolutely no doubt that it was about the dumbest move of all, 
second only to the illogical road trip itself.  As Lia, her entire part 
in this flick could've been excised from the film and scattered to the 
wind, with nary a skipped beat.  Of course, it would've put the sole 
onus of being Femme Fatale, square in Davidovich's lap--and with the 
bizarre way her part was written, that might have been one blow too many.
Bammer's Bottom Line 
"Play it to the Bone" rates a conditional yellow, for its sheer 
pointlessness; everything up to, and after, the big fight, had me 
rolling my eyes--but man, that fight was brutal.  I haven't been so 
repulsed, yet so fascinated, by anything in a long time.  If you can 
stomach it (and the "comedy" that precedes it), it's probably the movie 
for you.

Title
Review for Lucky Numbers (2000)
LUCKY NUMBERS (2000)
Rated R; running time 108 minutes
Genre: Comedy
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0219952
Official site: http://www.luckynumbersmovie.com/
Written by: Adam Resnick
Directed by: Nora Ephron
Cast: John Travolta, Lisa Kudrow, Tim Roth, Michael Rapaport,
Michael Moore, Ed O'Neill, Michael Weston, Bill Pullman,
Darryl Mitchell
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamslucky.html
Somebody do me a favor: find Nora Ephron and take her Director's Guild
card away.  And don't forget her Screenwriter's union card; she might
just sneak past an unsuspecting audience again.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Russ Richards (John Travolta), a doofus weatherman at WTPA in Harrisburg
Pennsylvania, is in trouble.  Sure, he has a Jaguar that he parks at his
reserved spot at Denny's "restaurant", and sure, he has a snowmobile
dealership; but when Harrisburg goes through - what, days? - of the
warmest winter on the books and his dealership slowly goes under, Russ
finds himself in need of a quick influx of income.  WTPA station manager
Dick Simmons (Ed O'Neill) won't front Russ the money, so Russ goes to
his friend Gig (Tim Roth) to ask for help.
Gig's first idea, involving a "business associate" by the name of Dale
The Thug (Michael Rapaport), was foiled by Russ' unwitting snowmobile
salesman Larry (Michael Weston); so they come up with Plan B: with the
help of Russ' Lotto Girl girlfriend Crystal Latroy (Lisa Kudrow) and her
wheezing cousin Walter (Michael Moore), they plan to somehow rig the
state lottery so they can win it.  And - you knew this was coming,
dincha? - Wackiness Ensues.
[Man, I'm surprised I made it through that description before my fingers
fell asleep.]
The Upshot:
John Travolta couldn't leave well enough alone when he stunk up the
joint with his ego-driven BATTLEFIELD EARTH wreck, I see.  That wasn't
punishment enough for his dwindling audience; he had to follow it up
with this sad excuse for a comedy.  One thing, though: he forgot to make
it funny.  I haven't groaned so much at a flick since the reel for
SUPERNOVA started up.
There's so much Stink to go around here, it's hard to know where to
start.  The acting - what little there was of it - was painfully
executed; the writing was done in pale crayon, with no hint of feasible
plot development whatsoever; and director Ephron just needs her butt
whupped and her access to the camera taken away permanently.  This was
the most over-written, under-funny, blindly directed, so-called "comedy"
I think I've ever seen.  It wasn't Dark.  It wasn't Broad.  It was just
D-U-L-L.
It'll be hard for me to choose between this one and Stupornova when the
time comes for Worst Of 2000.  No, let me not tell that lie; SUPERNOVA
still wins by a nose.  But LUCKY NUMBERS came close enough to make me
skulk, growling, from the theater.  Besides the overall stench, the two
movies had something else in common: a lack of opening credits.  And who
could blame them? I know I wouldn't want to take "credit" for either one!
The only good thing to come out of LUCKY NUMBERS was Michael Rapaport,
one of the most underrated White Dudes in the business.  Too bad Dale
didn't take a swing at Ephron with that bat of his.  Mr. Rapaport, you
certainly deserve better.  And Mr. Travolta, after threatening us with
"Battlefield Earth 2: The Ego Returns", you deserve *exactly* what's
coming to you.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
When Darryl Mitchell appeared on-screen as lazy cop Pat Lakewood's
partner, Officer Chambers [as if we needed to see yet more good actors
wasted on this drivel!], I was sure that there'd be lots of Wacky Black
Stuff to come; gotta admit, I was pleasantly surprised to see that
Mitchell was the straight man to poor Bill Pullman's Idiot.  Thank god
for small favors.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Between John Travolta's wack acting and his wackier haircut, he looks
and acts like a morph of Jerry Lewis and Moe Howard.  He really needs to
stop it.  Now.  And somebody should stop director Nora Ephron before she
Kills again.
LUCKY NUMBERS (rating: redlight):
Unlucky me, I wasted 108 minutes of my life watching this mess.

Title
Review for Romeo Must Die (2000)
Romeo Must Die (2000) 
Rated R; running time 120 minutes
Genre: Action 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0165929 
Official site: http://www.romeomustdie.net/  
Written by: Eric Bernt (based on the story by Mitchell Kapner)
Directed by: Andrzej Bartkowiak
Starring: Jet Li, Aaliyah, Delroy Lindo, Isaiah Washington, 
Russell Wong, Henry O, Anthony Anderson, Edoardo Ballerini, 
Jon Kit Lee, D.B. Woodside, DMX
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsromeo.html
Alright everybody, raise your Suspension Of Disbelief Bar higher...a 
little higher...c'mon, Billy, higher than that!...okay, that's just 
about high enough.  Ready for a little high-kickin' adventure and fun, 
with a whole lot of "oh, come on now...but, dayam!" thrown in for good 
measure?  Then step right up and grab your ticket for "Romeo Must Die"...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The Sings and the O'Days are not your Typical American Family: they are 
the Hatfields and McCoys, the Jets and Sharks, the Montagues and the 
Capulets, of the Oakland California riverfront, slugging it out over 
property rights that are meaningful only to a greedy few.
  [Billy, raise that Suspension Of Disbelief Bar back up, y'hear?]
Isaak O'Day (Delroy) wants to get out of the gangster racket and become 
a legitimate businessman, and take his daughter Aaliyah (Trish O'Day), 
son Colin (D.B. Woodside), and right-hand man Mac (Isaiah Washington), 
with him.  Standing in his way is one last deal, securing riverfront 
property to sell to NFL development broker Roth (Edoardo 
Ballerini)--himself also dealing O'Day's rival overlord, Chu Sing (Henry 
O) and his Family: his spoiled son Po Sing (Jon Kit Lee), and Chu's 
lieutenant Kai (Russell Wong).  Isaak and Chu know it's Just Business, 
until someone kills Po--and in the words of Po's ex-cop brother, Han 
Sing (Jet Li), "That...was a mistake". 
The Upshot:
Based on its trailers, "Romeo Must Die" was a Must See Movie for me.  
Sure, I knew it was another in a long line of "chop sockey" action 
flicks that was probably high on flash and low on substance; certainly, 
nothing we've not seen before countless times.  Sure, I knew that 
Aaliyah and DMX would probably not be burning up the screen, thespianly.  
Sure, I knew that "Romeo" was delegated to the Unspoken Ghetto of 
release days for "Black" films--Wednesday nights--most likely because of 
its "violence quotient" (more on this in the "Black Factor" below).  But 
heck, it had Jet Li--the *only* good thing about "Lethal Weapon 4"--so 
it couldn't be half bad, could it?  "Half bad", actually, is a good 
descriptor here.
One thing most people don't go to see "karate" flicks for, is the story; 
just like guys don't really Read Playboy For The Articles, few people go 
to action-adventures expecting to see, well, Shakespeare.  In that 
sense, "Romeo" didn't disappoint too much; the audience was asked to 
swallow some pretty far-fetched stuff (including stunts that would've 
made the folks behind "The Matrix" proud), and to a great extent, we 
played along.  Some of us whilst rolling our eyes, but that's to be 
expected when one can spot the Obligatory Turncoat only a few minutes 
into the movie, and see the unsurprising developments unfold from a mile 
away.  No, the story in and of itself didn't bother me--but the three 
card monty-like misdirection of its underlying premise, did.
What do I mean by that?  Hold on buckaroo, and I'll tell ya: by all 
indications, "Romeo" should have at least the slightest of love story 
Issues, no?  If the movie's title doesn't give that implication away, 
then the "rival gangs with a boy and a girl from different backgrounds 
meet and fall in love" hints in the trailers, would, one would think.  
One would be wrong.  In fact, I'll go so far as to say that virtually no 
genuine "love story" between Aaliyah's Trish or Jet's Han, could be 
found on the reels that I saw, and further, that whoever came up with 
the breathless "tags" for the movie--"A young Chinese businessman in New 
York is asked to broker peace between two mobs..."; "Han soon takes his 
brother's place in the war and becomes entangled in the violence, until 
he falls in love with the daughter of the rival gang's 
leader..."--must've seen a much different movie than did I.  Flirt, they 
did; but if that's what they call "love", I just don't want any.
Good thing, then, that my main interest wasn't in seeing Jet Li and 
Aaliyah lock lips.  What I did go to see was Jet kick butt and take 
names--and he, along with Russell Wong, obliged in high fashion.  I 
would do them both an injustice in trying to describe their martial 
artistry as performed on screen; "poetry in motion" is as close as I can 
get.  Though it was taken a bit too far over the top--my reference to 
"Matrix"-like moves wasn't an exaggeration, nor was it a compliment--Jet 
Li especially impressed me in this, his second American film.  Having 
the skills of Bruce Lee, and the charm and humor of Jackie Chan, Li's 
quiet, yet powerful presence should lead the way for more (and 
hopefully, better) American movie roles in the near future.
All else blended into the background, for the most part.  Lindo and 
Washington gamely gave their Gruff Black Gang Overlords roles their best 
shot, but far outdistancing them were Henry O and Wong; even in his 
scenes sans martial arts, Wong was quite enjoyable to watch, as was O, 
especially when playing against Li.  As casino owner Silk, Rap artist 
DMX barely registered on the radar; but on a positive note, Anthony 
Anderson's comic relief bit as Maurice, one of O'Day's bodyguards, was 
funny enough to elicit a laugh or two along the way.   
All in all, not earth-shaking, but not too shabby for a Wednesday night 
at the movies.  Hold up: a Wednesday night?  Hmmm...
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
   "If it's Wednesday a Black film must be opening".
So says James Surowiecki in his article on the subject of seemingly 
obligatory releases of many "Black" (as Suroweicki calls them, "urban") 
movies on Wednesday instead of Friday.  Though it is not officially 
acknowledged by the folks who decide when releases will occur, the 
pattern of a great deal of "Black" movies being released on Wednesdays, 
can be traced back to 1993's "New Jack City" and "Boyz N The Hood"--not 
coincidentally, the same time that some knuckleheads of the black 
persuasion, decided to ruin it for the rest of Us by opening fire at and 
around a few theaters showing the movies.  
The rest, as they say, is History.  A history that infuriates me on the 
one hand--unspoken or not, one would be hard-pressed to look at the 
trend and excuse it away as Business As Usual--but on the other hand, as 
heinous as it is, I understand why it's being done.  And that leaves an 
awful choice to face: should we choose, even with the best of 
intentions, racism--and I'm sorry, but if the trend holds out, it cannot 
be described as anything other than that, from my understanding of the 
term--for the sake of safety (and unquantified safety at that)?  And if 
not, then what do we do if (when?) the next knucklehead with a pistol 
and a pass to a Friday opening, shoots someone?
The "Salon" article is good reading; check it out.  And don't just stop 
there; watch carefully for the trend yourself.  As long as there are 
short-sighted planners in Hollywood--and ignorant knuckleheads amongst 
Us--there is no doubt in my mind that segregation For The Greater Good, 
shall continue to exist.
[3BC thanks various members of the "scaalist" email discussion group for 
their messages which led to this "Black Factor" segment; more to follow 
in a future "Beyond The Screen" article I hope to write, further 
exploring the subject, its pros and cons, and including specific 
comments from that group.  Special thanks go to Tanya Stephens for 
pointing me toward the Salon article.]
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Politics aside, I don't know if a Friday release would make much of a 
difference here; the appeal is in the butt-kicking, not in the gunplay.  
And in that, it has few rivals--but that only accounts for a few minutes 
out of two hours.  Most def not a good thing.
"Romeo Must Die": 
(rating: greenlight): Green for the kick-butt action and stunts, 
soundtrack by Stanley Clarke (and Timbaland, if you like Hip Hop) and 
for its light humor, but...
(rating: yellowlight): ...Yellow for everything else.

Title
Review for Music of the Heart (1999)
Music of the Heart (1999) 
Rated PG; running time 124 minutes
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0166943 
Official site: http://www.musicoftheheart.com/  
Written by: Pamela Gray
Directed by: Wes Craven
Starring: Meryl Streep, Aidan Quinn, Angela Bassett, Cloris Leachman, 
Gloria Estefan, Charlie Hofheimer, Kieran Culkin, Michael Angarano, 
Henry Dinhofer, Jane Leeves; as themselves: Karen Briggs, Jonathan 
Feldman, Jean-Luke Figueroa, Ramon Diane Monroe, Mark O'Connor, 
Sandra Park, Itzhak Perlman, Arnold Steinhardt, Isaac Stern, 
Michael Tree, Charles Veal Jr. 
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsmusicof.html
I loved "The Red Violin" so much, I was sure that another flick that was
more specifically about violins, would be good; especially with two of my
favorite actresses--Meryl Streep and Angela Bassett--in it.  Was I right,
or, in the vein of "Dangerous Minds", et al, would this be Yet Another
flick where the White Savior Rescues The Poor Ghetto Chulllldrin?
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
"Music Of The Heart" is the true story of Roberta Guaspari (Streep), a
violinist and former Navy Wife freshly divorced from her philandering
ex-husband (his choice), who is pressed to find a job.  Having moved
around in the Navy so much, she doesn't have a lot of prospects in her
suburban environment, where she lives with her mother (Leachman) and sons
Nick (Angarano at 7-years-old; Hofheimer at 17-years-old) and Lexi
(Dinhofer at 5-years-old; Culkin at 15-years-old), until Brian Sinclair
(Quinn), tells her about a teaching job that may be available--in East
Harlem.  Principal Janet Williams (Bassett) is skeptical at first, but
soon she is convinced to let her work as an elementary school substitute
music teacher in her school, where Roberta meets Isabel Vasquez (Estefan),
an assorted batch of students, and later, Dorothea Van Hauften (Leeves),
who may be able to open doors for Roberta and her violin students as time
goes on.
The Upshot:
Remember the old Mickey Rooney movies where, when the gang needs to raise
funds for a project, they just "put on a show!"?  1990's, meet the 40s.
I'll be frank: most of the backstory of this movie was kinda dull; I can't
say that I cared much about Roberta's story as it pertained to her
husband, or her kids, or her mother, or even the strange relationship with
Brian (and boy, did Quinn look weird; haven't seen him in a lonnnng
time).  Even the normally-strong Streep, nor the equally powerful Bassett,
couldn't quite pull the first half of this movie out of the doldrums; and
though Estefan was refreshingly natural in her big screen non-music debut,
she wasn't really all that integral to this flick, and didn't really make
a dent in the snooze factor of the first half.  The young actors (whose
names I didn't catch, so I won't bungle them here) made it worth watching,
but it was a task otherwise.
But skip down to the end of this review, and you'll note I gave it the
greenlight.  Why's that?  Three reasons: the story picked up the pace in
the second half (and the final scenes, which I'm desperately trying not to
give away--but it ain't Rocket Science, folks--were worth the wait.); Wes
Craven, predominately known for his "Freddie Kruger" slasher flicks,
played a soft hand here, only giving in to his horror-flick trickery once
(hard to describe, but there's a scene in the school where there's
movement in the background behind Roberta, and the camera zooms in on her,
that made me wonder if some demented demon in gory makeup would come up
from behind her); and most importantly, the kids were allowed to be
genuine elementary-age kids, not ruffneck hooligans from da hood, read'ta
buss' up a be'ouch, nor insufferably cute Projects projects, waiting for
Missy Roberta to deliver them up from out of bondage.
[WARNING: SPOILER AHEAD] And I have to give this away, sorry: there was a
beautiful moment where Roberta and the students play a song that, as I
mentioned in my "Crazy In Alabama" review, I have come to despise for the
trivial way it's treated: "We Shall Overcome".  But this treatment
honestly left me in tears, due to its sincere beauty.  Only children, I
believe, could've pulled that off; I applaud them heartily for it. [END
SPOILER]
Aside from Wes Craven's soft side, as well as the low-cutesiness quotient
of the students as well as Roberta's kids, there were no real surprises in
this one; the usual tour-de-force that is Meryl Streep, was more subdued
(though I loved the way she handled the kids, with a strong hand), and
Angela Bassett seemed almost an afterthought.  But not every movie needs
to be The! Next! Big! Thing!, after all; "Music Of The Heart" ends as a
Feel Good movie that left me feeling good--and that's just what the doctor
ordered.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]
    As a Black woman, I see the "Black Factor"--things that affect me as a 
    "consumer of color"--in many aspects of life; movies included. Whether 
    from the standpoint of noting Black (and other "minority") cast and crew
    members (if any), to the (lack of) focus toward "people of color" (dag, I
    hate that term), to the out-and-out antagonistic attitude toward Us 
    (Jar-Jar, anyone?), the "Black Factor" (BF) is something that plays as 
    much a role in my film enjoyment as any other aspect of the movie itself.
"Black people don't play the violin."
If you've ever said, or thought, something like that, try to imagine what
it's like hearing it directed at you, violin-in-hand.  And imagine it
coming from a Black person.  Stupid, right?  And unfortunately, all too
common (substitute "skydive" or "go hanggliding"--or any number of
pleasures of which I partake--for "play the violin", and you Feel me).  We
are, far too often, Our own worst enemies when it comes to having access
to non-traditional, non-monolithic, events and life-choices; We
(rightfully) fight tooth and nail for the ability to gain access to
"common areas", then We deride others of Us who go through doors that
aren't usually painted Black.  So you probably won't be surprised to know
that I took great pleasure in seeing so many Black, and Latino, faces in
Roberta's classes (and there are some additional treats to be had in the
final scenes, but I won't give them away).  Almost made me want to take up
the fiddle.
On that ubiquitous Other Hand...one of the scenes that the TV networks
have been showing in the ObStreep interviews, resonated with me, as it
addresses the very point I made in the beginning of this review: Naim's
mother, a Black woman, pulls him out of Roberta's class, saying that she
would not let her son be treated as an object that needed to be "rescued"
by Roberta.  I was glad that it worked out for all parties concerned in
the end (since this is based on a true story, my assumption is that this
is how the situation really happened--though I just read that the folks at
the school upon this is based, have taken offense at how the school is
portrayed.  But that's another story for another time), but the
character's concern is one that's shared by this reviewer, when it comes
to movies such as this; the assumption is that the parents can't, or
won't, make any effort to try to make a better life for their children,
and therefore need the paternalistic rescue attempts of people who
otherwise have no stake in the neighborhood.  The vibe in this movie is
that the teacher just wanted to open up a window that none of the kids had
opened to them before; the extent to which this has been achieved, should
be able to be seen via the real-life students.  Next time I'm in Nuevo
York, I plan on checking that out first-hand. 
Bammer's Bottom Line 
Wes Craven proves he's good for more than just hack-n-slash; though it
won't burn up any ballots come Oscar time, you could do a lot worse with
your box office bucks [can you say, "Bringing Out The Dead"?]  And there
was even a Public Service Announcement giving the phone number to make
donations for Roberta's group, "Opus 118": 212-831-4455.  Do it...for the
Chulllldrin!
"Music Of The Heart":  (rating: greenlight) 
[Bams succumbs to the pressure]: How do you get to Carnegie Hall?  
Can't hurt if you Know Somebody...

Title
Review for Baby Boy (2001)
BABY BOY (2001)
Rated R; running time 126 minutes
Genre: Drama
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/babyboy/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0255819
Written by: John Singleton
Directed by: John Singleton
Cast: Tyrese Gibson, Taraji P. Henson, A.J. Johnson, Ving Rhames,
Omar Gooding, Tamara LaSeon Bass, Snoop Dogg
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbabyboy.html
The very first scene of BABY BOY - featuring the movie's lead character,
Jody (Tyrese Gibson), floating in his mother's womb (as a grown "man",
mind you), and speaking on the dysfunctional psyche of Black Maleness
these days - evoked a feeling of extreme sadness in me, at the current
state of Black Men In America.
Good thing I know that We Are Not A Monolith.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
John Singleton returns to The Hood, this time with a tale about boys not
quite ready to be Real Men - and the girls who enable their
dysfunctional behavior.
Jody, unemployed and not really looking to change that, is a certified
Mama's Boy, afraid to cut the umbilical cord and leave his mother (A.J.
Johnson) to live her own life.  Normal behavior for a young boy, perhaps
- but Jody has two children of his own, by two different babymamas: his
current girlfriend Yvette (Taraji P. Henson), who has still-a-child
Issues of her own to deal with, and Peanut (Tamara LaSeon Bass), who
Jody still hangs onto as backup, just in case.  "Unstable Females"
aside, Jody's got his boy Sweet Pea (Omar Gooding) to watch his back -
and Jody needs all the help he can get.
But change may soon be out of Jody's control: on the one hand, his
mama's new boyfriend Melvin (Ving Rhames), who Jody sees as a thuggish
threat, is moving in - which means Jody might have to move out against
his wishes.  And on the other hand, Yvette's old jailbird boyfriend
Rodney (Snoop Dogg) is due to be released from prison Real Soon Now.  Uh
oh...
The Upshot:
"We Are Not A Monolith".  In the nearly 200 reviews I've written for
3BC, I've included that statement in almost all of them.  But (besides
the explanation I've also included in each of the reviews with a "Black
Factor" section) what does that statement mean?
For starters, it means that the extreme sadness I felt during BABY BOY
need not be taken as a personal burden.  To put it bluntly, I don't know
Those Kneegrows.  Well, that's not exactly true.  I used to know them.
I used to be their neighbor, and if I had stayed any longer, I might
have *become* them.  I wasn't saved from that fate until I moved away
from Detroit and into college and beyond, exercising my own version of
"White Flight".  And even *that's* not quite true.  Some of Those
Kneegrows are members of my family.  If not my immediate family, then
certainly, my extended family.  For if I know nothing else about Being
Black In America, I know that no matter where you move, no matter how
much money you make, no matter how deep in denial you are, ultimately,
you cannot hide from your Blackness.  If you don't acknowledge it for
yourself, then *somebody* in this society will acknowledge it for you.
This, then, is why that extreme sadness does now, and always will,
belong to me - just as the extreme joy We tend to display when one of
Our Own does good, equally belongs to me.
Which brings me back to John Singleton.  Y'all remember him, right?  The
young brother who, ten years ago, won wide acclaim for his breakthrough
movie on (one type of) life in the ghetto?  Unless you've been living
under a rock, you probably know that BABY BOY is a followup to (though
not specifically a continuance of) Singleton's BOYZ N THE HOOD.  But the
followup, as often happens, is not as strong as that from which it
originated.
My biggest problem with BABY BOY is that it had a distinct Been There,
Done That, Got The Ghetto Flava, feel to it.  It possesses neither the
raw energy of its direct predecessor, nor the lyrical groove of the
other third of Singleton's Ghetto Trilogy, POETIC JUSTICE - comparisons
that, though perhaps not strictly fair, are still justified by
Singleton's own wishes, since he himself has grouped these three films
together in the past.  With not much new to add to the genre, one is
left to wonder why Singleton has repeated himself (aside from obvious
financial gains.  Not That There's Anything Wrong With That).
Likewise, the young talent here is not quite up to the task of their
"Boyz" counterparts.  Tyrese Gibson as Jody was fine [uh, as in
"okay"...though he's not bad on the eyes either], as was Taraji P.
Henson as Yvette, one of Jody's babymamas.  But Snoop Dogg was just too
skinny - both in physique and in acting talent - to make much of an
impression on me.  And as a direct "Boyz" to "Baby" comparison, Cuba
Gooding's brother Omar had neither Cuba's charm, nor Cuba's "Boyz"
character Tre Styles' "fish-out-of-water" feel.  Omar relied too much on
a growl and a grunt to see him through.  Honestly, I can't say that I
liked *any* of this lot, far as Important Movies go.  Cube, Gooding, and
Chestnut, they weren't.
None of which to say that BABY BOY isn't worth a look-see.  If not as
forcefully as before, Singleton does still have much of import to say on
the subject of (one aspect of) Black Ghetto Life, both as narrator and
as filmmaker; and some of his directorial stylings are simply brilliant.
On the acting front, Ving Rhames continues his habit of providing
powerful performances (worthy of his "Boyz" counterpart, the magnificent
Laurence Fishburne) in whatever he's in [and I ain't gonna front;
bru'man has a beautiful butt].  Rhames is matched well here by A.J.
Johnson, in an equally strong performance that may unfortunately go
unnoticed.  And driven by a strong soundtrack, BABY BOY provides unique
delights all its own.
My best advice is, go for the history behind BABY BOY, if you must; but
take this film own merits.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
   [I apologize in advance, for this will be my longest
    "Black Factor" to date.]
"Ghetto Wednesday".  A loaded phrase, when you think about it.  I
suppose, in the scheme of things, that it is a small price to pay for
Our films to become noticed.  Some might say there's not a price being
paid at all; merely a strange - and benign - coincidence.  And still
others might say that it is Our fault that such a phenomena exists at
all; if there is any harm, the harm is on Our heads.  I suppose all of
that could be so, and in fact, I know that some of it *is* so.  But try
as I might to ignore it, the perceived existence of Ghetto Wednesday
bothers me.  It bothers me mightily.
It probably hasn't occurred to many people to look at it very closely
(and I am *still* looking, in hopes that it *is* all just an ugly
coincidence, not an Evil Plot conjured up to cause me grief); but there
is a pattern that I and some others have noticed, for "Black-themed"
movies to be released on Wednesdays instead of the customary Fridays on
which most American movies are released.  The problem with this theory?
Two, actually: not all "Black-themed" movies are released on Wednesday,
and not all Wednesday releases are Black movies, "themed", "lead", or
what have you (recent examples of the latter include STAR WARS: THE
PHANTOM MENACE, MISSION: IMPLAUSABLE TOO, and THE MATRIX).
I have some theories on that, too.  To address the first, it occurs to
me (and some of those "others") that it's not merely "Black-themed"
movies that are released on Wednesdays; more specifically, Black movies
with a (perceived?) high "violence" content, are the ones generally
delegated...oh, let me say it plain - segregated - to Ghetto Wednesday.
As for the second, the answer lies in the different reasons behind
Wednesday releases.  For movies like "Matrix", "Star Wars", and the
like, the idea is that a Wednesday release will help to add to the boffo
box office that is expected of them (or that, at least, might be helped
by a jumpstart on the weekend).  Ghetto Wednesday releases, however,
have quite a different origin: harking back to a period in which
"violent" Black movies like NEW JACK CITY were released (on Friday) and
"riots" erupted in some theaters in primarily Black neighborhoods, a
Wednesday release of these kinds of movies, so the mindset goes, could
possibly help to stem some of the initial violent response from folks
having time on their hands on a weekend, by showing them first on a
less-free weekday.  "Ludicrous!", you say?  Perhaps.  But still, the
pattern exists; and I'd really like to be proven wrong about it.
In the end, Ghetto Wednesday could just be a figment of my (and others')
vivid imagination; more likely, it could be a harmless way of Keeping
The Peace, with some Great Father Figure looking out for all of us,
Black, White, and Otherwise.  I suppose it shouldn't bother me so; other
than its built-in segregation (of movies that I tend not to like
anyway), what's the downside?  Then again, I'm sure some folks are
comforted by Zero Tolerance policies at their children's school.  You
know - the policies that all but convict school children of being Little
Monsters for having some of the same kinds of thoughts, notions, and
(how dare they!) ideas that most of us did when *we* were in school.
Non-sequitur?  You might think so.  But I see things like this as being
on the same continuum.  And it bothers me.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I'm glad John Singleton got his "Ghetto Trilogy" filmed and on the
shelf; getting it out of his system, hopefully, means that he's read'ta
Move On, show the film world what else he's got up his sleeve.  The
question remains, though: will We support his Bigger Better efforts, or
are We just blowin' smoke (again)?
BABY BOY (rating: flashing yellowlight):
Here's hoping that Singleton will now focus on the Men amongst Us, and
leave the Boyz behind.

Title
Review for Unbreakable (2000)
UNBREAKABLE (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 115 minutes
Genre: Thriller
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.areyouunbreakable.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0217869
Written by: M. Night Shyamalan
Directed by: M. Night Shyamalan
Cast: Bruce Willis, Samuel L. Jackson, Robin Wright Penn,
Spencer Treat Clark, Charlayn Woodward
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsunbreakable.html
I once watched a movie called GHOST STORY, one that I don't quite
remember except that I was definitely spooked by it.  GHOST STORY stayed
with me, I think, because it reminded me way back then of the vast
difference between your common slash'n'gash horror flick, and
asuspenseful, character-driven and plot-rich, thriller
M. Night Shyamalan, late of THE SIXTH SENSE, reminded me again with his
new thriller, UNBREAKABLE.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Security guard David Dunne (Bruce Willis) is a man living a broken life.
Detached from his wife Audrey (Robin Wright Penn), seen as something he
doesn't believe himself to be by his son Joseph (Spencer Treat Clark),
and unsatisfied with his life in Philadelphia in general, David makes
plans on moving to New York to start afresh.  His plans change, however,
when the train that he's a passenger on, derails - and not only is he
the sole survivor, he also escapes the accident completely untouched.
*Physically* untouched, that is.
Elijah Price (Samuel L. Jackson) too is, quite literally, a broken man.
Elijah suffers from a birth defect that makes his bones brittle.  When
neighborhood kids bully him into becoming a hermit in his own home, his
mother (Charlayn Woodward) challenges him to not make the decision to be
afraid, saying that she would give him a special gift each time he
conquers his fears.  From that, Elijah takes comfort in the world of
comic books, especially those dealing with mythical, super-heroic
characters.
David's life becomes connected to Elijah's in ways David never imagined
- and he finds himself believing the unbelievable.
The Upshot:
This movie belonged to three people: stars Bruce Willis and Samuel L.
Jackson, and writer/director M. Night Shyamalan.
Willis reprises the sensibility toward his character that he had in last
year's THE SIXTH SENSE, again playing a quiet, confused, world-weary
character who had something bubbling just below the surface, waiting to
be ferreted out by...something.  Jackson, effusive and commanding as
always, provides just that something as the brittle Elijah.  The
physical manifestations of these characters - David as the strong and
silent type, Elijah as a man as fragile as glass - belie their true
nature; and in his portrayal of Elijah's inner self, Jackson,
especially, certainly lives up to his powerhouse acting reputation.
The conviction with which Jackson can make a man's knees wobble when
said man dare try to buy a "comic" for his 4-year-old son, is perfectly
matched here with the palpable feeling of anxiety we see behind Willis'
character David's eyes when David has to face up to the fact that, yes,
he might indeed be more than he appears - even to himself.  Willis and
Jackson make a dynamic duo, and they made every scene they were in -
separate or together - something to keep your attention riveted closely
to, so as not to miss a single bit.
But M. Night Shyamalan's handiwork was clearly all over UNBREAKABLE.
Set-up shots of David and the object of his flirtation in the train,
framed images of him next to the stairway in his house, the buildup to
the crash that you could *feel* as a vibration rumbling beneath the mood
music's crescendo, were reminiscent of THE SIXTH SENSE without being
derivative of it.  In this sense, Shyamalan was as much a star of this
show, as Willis or Jackson [hopefully not giving too much away - in more
ways than one].
Robin Wright Penn was adequate as David's estranged wife Audrey, though
she and Spencer Treat Clark as their son Joseph, shared quite a
thrilling scene when Joseph, believing his father to be invincible,
decides to test just how invincible good old dad might be.  I was very
surprised to note that the audience I was in, *laughed* during this taut
scene.
I'm trying to figure out whether that laughter only served to mask our
stress and its subsequent relief.  I *know* our stunned silence, and
near-refusal to leave at the end, was a good indication of the confusion
most of the viewing audience felt at that last scene.  After all the
minutes spent enjoying being twisted and turned in this direction and
that, the final scene felt "off", as if the movie wasn't completely
done.  That, combined with an ill-advised (and, unless I miss my guess,
tacked-on) tag line, brought me right out of the moment.  It took a few
minutes of sitting still and analyzing what I'd seen in the 113 moments
prior, to get me past the somewhat stunning disappointment of feeling I
was just talked down-to, as if Shyamalan didn't think the audience would
Get It in the end.
But don't let me spook you: the 113 moments prior were well worth it.
If nothing else, UNBREAKABLE will make you think about what you've just
watched.  And, in my book, any time a movie makes you pause to Consider,
that's most def A Good Thing.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
M. Night Shyamalan, first with THE SIXTH SENSE and now with UNBREAKABLE,
is fast proving to be the kind of writer/director whose stories bite you
right in the ass.  Thing about bites, though, is that they usually leave
you not quite satisfied.  Almost filling, but just shy of a full meal,
UNBREAKABLE is nonetheless a helluva tale spun by a master craftsman.
UNBREAKABLE (rating: greenlight):
I can't wait to see what ghost story Shyamalan has in score for us next.

Title
Review for Bone Collector, The (1999)
The Bone Collector (1999)
Rated R; running time 128 minutes
Genre: Thriller
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0145681
Official site: http://www.thebonecollector.com/
Written by: Jeremy Iacone (based on the book by Jeffery Deaver)
Directed by: Phillip Noyce
Starring: Denzel Washington, Angelina Jolie, Queen Latifah, Michael Rooker, 
Luis Guzman, Ed O'Neill, Leland Orser, John Benjamin Hickey
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbone.html
I must make a confession right off the bat: this review will be partially
tainted by my bias against thrillers. I don't know what I was thinking
when I decided to review this movie; as strong a Short Black Chick as I
am, I have an extremely weak stomach--and "The Bone Collector" sorely
tested me. Sad to say, I failed the test; not only did I get physically
ill, I cried at the end--and not because this flick was a tear-jerker (it
wasn't, by any stretch of the imagination). All this to say, you must take
my rating with the grain of salt that this most def wasn't a Bammer Flick
to begin with. However, I temper that statement by saying that, genre
elements aside, there are other factors in this movie that I was able to
be as objective as possible about, so don't discount what you're about to
read below just because I needed some Serious Therapy after watching
"Bone".
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
Link Rhyme (Washington) was a Top-Notch NYPD Forensics cop and true-crimes
writer, a Criminologist in the true sense of the term, until his career
(and almost life) is cut short when a huge beam falls on him during a
crime scene investigation. Paralyzed almost completely ("except for one
finger, my shoulders, my head, and my mind"), he is still able to use his
sharp mind and remain on the active duty roster, even from his
hi-teched-out apartment--but he fears the seizures he experiences will
leave him in a vegetative state. He makes a pact with Dr. Lehman (Hickey),
against the wishes of his health care worker, Thelma (Latifah), to
disconnect the health monitors that Richard Thompson (Orser) installed, if
that ever happens.
Meanwhile, on the other side of town...Officer Amelia Donaghy (Jolie)
discovers a gruesome crime scene, which she valiantly protects by stepping
in front of a moving train to stop it from disturbing the evidence.
Catching wind of her balls-y actions, Rhyme enlists her reluctant help,
along with Top-Notch police chemist Eddie Ortiz (Guzman) and Det. Paulie
Sellitto (Ed O'Neill), to stop a sadistic serial killer in his
tracks--much to the dismay of ObAsshole Capt. Howard Cheney (Rooker). But
who is the killer, and why is he committing such gruesome murders?
The Upshot: 
After watching "Bone", I know the "who". It's the "why" that makes me
shake my head with wonder at the lengths movie-makers will go through to
try to "entertain" their audience; or more bluntly, to get the duckets
rollin' in.
Oh, it started evenly enough. If you're into that sorta thing, the gory
thriller aspects were, literally, right out of the book; "Freddie Kruger"
and pals ain't got nuthin' on this crew. I Felt Amelia's Pain when she
said she couldn't handle dealing with the gore the killer left behind, but
had to; I wanted to bolt from the theater many times myself, but I made
the commitment to do this review, and (with my husband's help) forced
myself to look at the screen through my disgust at the nastiness involved.
But my disgust at the plot holes...well, that's a different story (I'll
come back to this in a moment).
For the most part, the actors were adequate, if not good, in their roles.
As foine as Washington is (and more to the point, as good an actor as he
is), he was restrained in this role, out of the necessity of having to act
the part of a totally paralyzed cop. All the gadgets and gizmos in the
room couldn't help him bring more...oompf...to this role; it makes me
wonder how a real quadriplegic actor would've handled it. Still, he wasn't
bad, per se, and during the next-to-last scene (the one that caused my
tension-related cry), he was quite good in what must have been a difficult
part for him to play (oh yeah; my co-reviewer--my husband, Bear--wanted me
to mention the sense of humor Denzel displayed, specifically when he joked
about Jolie's character being in trouble for "molesting the handicapped".
This, of course, must be seen in context to be fully understood). Jolie
was, I think, the better of the two leads; subtly beautiful (I was struck
by the way she looked good without trying to), more akin to "Homicide's"
Kay Howard than Renee Shepard [that one's for you, Jhim], I found her
believable in her role as a Street Cop With Skeletons. Guzman is one of
those great character actors who you always notice, but can never remember
his name. His easy sense of humor and firm grasp of his role made his
character stand out from the background, as did (surprisingly) O'Neill's
Sellitto, and mah gurl Queen Latifah (in Yet Another Role as an aide; but
that seems to be her speed, so I won't sweat it). And the camera work,
hilited in the rain-falling-down shots, as well as a brilliant, MTV-esque
sequence that moved with lightning speed from a street scene up to Rhyme's
apartment, was quite effective (though they went to the rain well once too
many times).
The shortcuts that were taken by the writer and director, though, were
what turned me off, almost as much as the nature of the film itself.
Though Rooker has a history of playing the ObligatoryAsshole, there was no
sense of backstory to show why his assholiness was so assholy, here;
surely, movie writers, there must be one New York Police Captain who isn't
"a living monument to ineptitude", eh? These kind of characters, stoopid
without cause, are just too through. And before I forget, what's up with
having those characters jump into a New York river on "November 9th" (as
the writer, for ghod knows what reason, had Thelma point out)--only to
come out basically dry, and more to the point, not suffer from at least
minor hypothermia? Man, I hate it when the strings show like that.
But the biggest crime comes in the form of the killer himself, the
"motivation" given as the reason he did what he did, and as the movie went
on, the "aha's" to the clues the killer left. It felt as if two writers
worked on this movie: one that handled the killer and Rooker characters,
another that took care of everything else. And the final insult was the
pasted-on final scene that DID NOT FIT the flow of the rest of the movie;
there was an audible "huh?" in the theater. There was one good though
about it, though: it shook the chill that pervaded my body during the
scene that preceded it, right off me.
The "Black Factor"    [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
In my review of "The Best Man", I spoke of "color indifference", the
mindset that, specific cultural issues aside, many experiences are
universal, and don't require an actor of a specific ethnicity to play a
given role (the Whitney Houston TV version of "Cinderella" was a good
example of this; it had actors of multiple ethnicities play roles that
made some people blink--especially with Brandy as Cinderella and
Bernadette Peters as her stepmother). Color-indifferent casting, though
still rare, is happening more often with big-name stars cast in what were
written originally as "White" roles. Washington, here in "Bone", as well
as Morgan Freeman in "Kiss The Girls" and "ER's" Eriq LaSalle's "Lucas
Davenport" from the "Prey" series, have been beneficiaries of such
color-indifferent casting; whatever the motivation behind this, I only
hope it's not just a passing fad.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
If gory thrillers with no real sense of direction, stock characters that
fit the Bad Guy mold to a T, and plot twists that aren't so twisty, are
your Thing, you'll probably be one of the millions that'll make this flick
the Next Big Movie of this week (or so says my husband, anyway; and I
think he's as right as the stylistic rain that kept falling, very
noticeably, throughout "Bone"). For me, though, the sheen on the surface
didn't hide the hollowness within. And be forewarned: you might want to
take a barf bag.
"The Bone Collector":  (rating: yellowlight) 
I tend to require more meat on my bones [bad pun...Baaaad Bammer...].

Title
Review for Wonder Boys (2000)
Wonder Boys (2000) 
Rated R; running time 112 minutes
Genre: Dramedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0185014 
Official site: http://www.wonderboysmovie.com/  
Written by: Michael Chabon
Directed by: Curtis Hanson
Starring: Michael Douglas, Tobey Maguire, Frances McDormand, 
Robert Downey Jr., Katie Holmes, Richard Thomas, Rip Torn 
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamswonderboys.html
As a movie critic, I take copious notes (yes, it's pretty tough to do in 
a darkened theater, but I manage), even though I rarely use them for my 
reviews unless it's been awhile since I've seen the movie in question.  
Usually, I refer to my notepad to pinpoint an interesting bit of action, 
or as a reminder of what the movie is trying to "say".
In the case of this movie, it didn't help.
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
Grady Tripp (Michael Douglas) is a creative-writing professor, constant 
joint-smoker, and burnt-out writer whose current wife (of many previous) 
left him a few hours before he finds out that his girlfriend, university 
Chancellor Sara Gaskell (Frances McDormand) is pregnant--a fact that 
"would greatly surprise" Walter Gaskell (Richard Thomas), Sara's 
husband.  As if that wasn't enough, one of his students, Katie Holmes 
(Hannah Green) has a crush on him; another student, James Leer (Tobey 
Maguire) has the potential to be a top-notch writer, but is...a bit 
off-kilter; and Terry Crabtree (Robert Downey Jr.), his book editor, is 
pressing Grady to finish his second novel.  Oh yeah: I shouldn't forget 
Walter's blind dog Poe, who doesn't like Grady, much to his demise.
The Upshot:
That's pretty much the storyline, I reckon.  But throughout my copious 
notes, I seemed to keep noting, "so what's this story about?"  I still 
don't know.  This, my friends, is Not A Good Thing.
I've been wanting to see this movie from the first time I saw the 
trailers for it.  And from the storyline, it reads like--in the right 
hands--it could be a pretty funny comedy.  With the pedigree the movie 
had going for it--Douglas has been known to be funny in a movie or two; 
McDormand was wonderful in "Fargo" and could certainly tickle a funny 
bone on her own; Maguire, great in "The Cider House Rules" and 
"Pleasantville" would be, if nothing else, a decent straight-man; and 
in-between prison terms, Downey has the acting chops to be capable of 
greatness--from all that, I would've sworn that those were the "right 
hands".  So wha' happened? 
Two things, I think: first, contrary to the misleading trailers, "Wonder 
Boys" was not an all-out comedy.  True, it had some humorous moments, 
but for the most part, it was much heavier on the "drama" part of the 
"dramedy" equation.  Second, it seemed more literary (for lack of a 
better term) than most movies; while some of that can be attributed to 
the movie being about writers, I wouldn't be surprised if writer Michael 
Chabon was more a novelist than a screenwriter.   Strangely enough, that 
particular attribute didn't work in this movie's favor: perhaps because 
I've become so accustom to movies being written as movies as opposed to 
being written as literary stories, the "feel" of this movie didn't click 
for me.  In fact, it wasn't until the ending that it seemed like a 
movie-movie.  And strangely enough, that scene felt out of place.
While I think it would've done better as a comedy than as the thick, 
somewhat dragging Social Statement (of what? I still ask) that it was, 
"Wonder Boys" still had its moments--most of which were populated by 
Robert Downey Jr. in a performance that actually angers me.  It angers 
me because he was so naturally good--something rare in actors these 
days, especially younger actors--that it only highlights the mess he's 
made of his personal life: last I knew, he was in prison for, basically, 
stupidity (something about not fufilling probation terms for his 
habitual drug abuse).  When he's on his game, I'd take Downey over a 
dozen DiCaprios, any day; Robert acts circles around Leo and his posse.  
Just as his costar in "Cider", Charlize Theron, did in "Reindeer Games", 
Maguire disappointed me here.  His depressed (and depressing) James did 
not suit him well; his boyish face betrayed his scripted lines, and the 
bizarre storyline he was involved in, just wasn't working.  As for the 
rest of the cast, Douglas' uncanny resemblance to "Mrs. Doubtfire" threw 
me for a loop at first--and Grady's whole makeup (constant marijuana 
smoker, non-committal boyfriend, "blocked" writer who refuses to 
acknowledge his block) didn't do much for me.  I was never sure what The 
Point was with him (unless it was to say that Drugs Make You Look Bad.  
If so, that was a long way to go to make a weak point).  It was 
refreshing, though, to see what happened between Hannah and Grady; as 
much as I liked "American Beauty" (which has a comparitive situation 
between an older man and younger girl), it was nice to see Holmes play 
Hannah's attraction to Grady, in a non-dysfunctional manner.
I'm still at a loss to know what purpose Quentin "Q" Morewood (Rip Torn) 
played; maybe his Important Scenes were left on the same cutting-room 
floor that Thomas' "Outraged Husband" scenes surely were left on (which 
would be the only explanation I can see for not further exploring the 
dynamic that must have existed between Walter, Sara and Grady).  But 
perhaps that's another movie--the movie that I would've preferred to 
watch way more than this one.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
In one of the many "huh?" moments that seem to be generously scattered 
throughout this flick, a Little Richard-lookalike takes issue with Grady 
having possession of his vehicle, and Does Something About It.  I'd be 
tickled pink if someone could explain what that whole subplot was about 
to me, so I can stop going, "huh?".
Bammer's Bottom Line:
...and continuing on with our "Just Say No" theme for the week 
("Reindeer Games" having led us off), "Wonder Boys" serves as a strange 
vehicle for Michael Douglas, Tobey Maguire, and Frances McDormand; they 
each seemed out-of-place in this trippy tale.  But "Just Say No--NOW!" 
Poster Boy Robert Downey Jr. was brilliant, as he often is when he puts 
his mind to it.  And where has Richard "John-Boy" Thomas been all these 
years, anyway?
"Wonder Boys" (rating: yellowlight): 
I still Wonder about them thar Boys--and about why Downey insists on 
derailing his career.  There's nothing more galling to me than wasted 
potential, and he has it in spades.

Title
Review for Wo hu cang long (2000)
CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON (2000)
PG-13; running time 120 minutes
Genre: Martial Arts/Drama
Seen at: Lowes Star Southfield (Detroit, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.crouchingtiger.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0190332
Written by: Hui-Ling Wang, James Schamus, Kuo Jung Tsai
  (based on the book by Du Lu Wang)
Directed by: Ang Lee
Cast: Chow Yun-Fat, Michelle Yeoh, Zhang Ziyi, Cheng Peipei, Chang Chen,
Sihung Lung, Gao Xi'an, Li Li, Li Fa Feng, Hai Yan, Wang Deming (Tsai)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamscrouchtiger.html
If your idea of A Good Time doesn't include watching a two-hour movie
that scoffs at the laws of gravity, involves warrior chicks kickin' butt
and taking names, and does so without a single line of spoken English,
you might want to skip this review and the movie it speaks fondly of:
CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON.  Obviously, high fantasy isn't your
Thing.
I hope you'll forgive me if I snicker at some of you as I recall how
much you liked STAR WARS...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
In 19th century Qing Dynasty China, warrior Li Mu Bai (Chow Yun-Fat),
seeking a more peaceful existence, gives his Green Destiny sword to
fellow warrior - and the object of his desire - Yu Shu Lien (Michelle
Yeoh), asking her to deliver it to Sir Te (Sihung Lung) for safekeeping.
Yu Shu Lien regretfully does so, but soon afterwards, a stealthy thief
steals the sword from Sir Te's camp.
Suspicion falls upon members of the House of Governor Yu (Li Fa Feng),
who, along with Madam Yu (Hai Yan), their willful daughter Jen (Zhang
Ziyi), and Jen's Governess (Cheng Peipei), have come to visit Sir Te in
preparations for Jen's arranged marriage to nobility.  As Li Mu Bai and
Yu Shu Lien set out to find the thief, they discover there's more to Jen
than meets the eye - including her involvement with a desert marauder
named Lo (Chang Chen).
The Upshot:
It amuses me somewhat that the fantasy-like acrobatics, and the English
subtitles, would be an impenetrable barrier to anyone enjoying CROUCHING
TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON (hereafter, "CT/HD"); with some of the tripe thrown
at American audiences during the M2K movie year, an inventive movie like
CT/HD should be like a breath of fresh air.  My amusement aside, CT/HD
did take some getting used to, I must admit.  But the learning curve
wasn't at all steep; after only a few minutes, the audience I was in
fully got into the spirit of the film, heartily applauding the
magnificent combat scenes, laughing during appropriate moments, and
generally following the story from start to moving finish.
CT/HD was worth any needed extra effort to watch it.  I've long
appreciated the vast talents of Michelle Yeoh (who I first saw in, of
all things, a 007 flick) and Chow Yun-Fat (one of the best things about
1999's ANNA AND THE KING).  They continued to please here, all around;
the actors and their characters seemed to effortlessly compliment each
other on, and off, the fighting arena, Yu Shu Lien's strength of
presence being a good match for Li Mu Bai's confident nobility.  Much
more a surprise was the striking Zhang Ziyi as the reluctant
bride-to-be, Jen.  She was, in every sense of the word, stunning; her
character as spirited as she was beautiful, it wasn't hard to see why Li
Mu Bai was enchanted by the willful Jen.  A strong supporting cast -
including Cheng Peipei in a dual role, Chang Chen as Lo, Jen's sensuous
desert lover, Gao Xi'an as the diligent guardsman Bo, and Li Li as his
diligent daughter Mai - helped to elevate the CT/HD storyline far above
the standard "You Killed My Master!" plot of most martial arts flicks.
Much of the credit for the depth of CT/HD goes to its brilliant
director, Ang Lee, and the equally-brilliant camerawork by
cinematographer Peter Pau.  Recognition and appreciation of movie
artists besides the actors, being my reviewing Achilles' Heel, I
definitely had to sit up and take notice of Lee's and  Pau's handiwork
behind-the-camera.  Credit, too, to CT/HD fight choreographer Woo-ping
Yuen, costumer Tim Yip, and to Yo-Yo Ma, whose cello provided CT/HD with
a haunting musical touch.  Thought THE MATRIX had it goin' on?  You
ain't seen nuttin' until you see Chow Yun-Fat walk on water, or Zhang
Ziyi knock big bad brutes back into yesterday.  And the weapons used
throughout this film kept me - a big-time weaponry fan - salivating (and
at one point, laughing; watch for a late scene with Michelle Yeoh and
Zhang Ziyi, to see what tickled my funny bone).
The lasting beauty of CT/HD is that its pageantry, its tender love
stories, and its humor are never eclipsed by its awe-inspiring action;
each element is as integral as the next.  Ironically, given the
aspersions cast upon the martial arts genre as a whole, the same can't
be said of many standard Hollywood movies these days.  This, I think, is
a key factor in why CT/HD has taken so many people by surprise: who'da
thunk a kung-fu flick could be *deep*?
Even at this length, my review can't do justice to CROUCHING TIGER,
HIDDEN DRAGON; any attempts I make to describe this genre-breaking
movie, fall woefully short of the mark.  Trust me; even if you have to
go out of your way to see it (as I did - Lansing "Podunkville Central"
Michigan still not being a Selected City), it's well worth the trip.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
You'll have to forgive me again - I know that gang involvement is not
truly a Black Factor issue, no more so than any stereotypically
monolithic and destructive activity Blacks are unproportionately
involved in - but I couldn't help but be struck by the parallels to
modern-day street gangs when Lo spoke of his affiliation with the desert
gang that he rode with as being "family", and a "noble" part of his
life.   Realities of gang warfare aside, I wonder how American movie
audiences would take to ongoing depictions of gang members as
sympathetic, even admirable, characters.  Not too well, I'd reckon.
GOODFELLAS and GODFATHERs, not inclusive.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Once I accepted the gravity-lawbreaking, CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON
was as moving a work of art as any I've ever witnessed; a majestic
master stroke from Ang Lee that takes martial arts cinema to a whole new
level.   I will be shocked - shocked! - if Oscar doesn't smile warmly
upon this film.
CROUCHING TIGER, HIDDEN DRAGON (rating: greenlight):
Say what you will about the inherent weirdness in CROUCHING TIGER,
HIDDEN DRAGON; but *one* thing's for sure: this ain't your father's
kung-fu flick.

Title
Review for Toy Story 2 (1999)
Toy Story 2 (1999) 
Rated G; running time 108 minutes
Genre: Animation/Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0120363 
Official site: http://www.toystory2.com/  
Directed by: Colin Brady, John Lasseter, Ash Brannon, Lee Unkrich (co-directors)
Starring: Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Don Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace Shawn, 
John Ratzenberger, Annie Potts, Jodi Benson, Joan Cusack, Kelsey Grammer, 
Estelle Harris, Wayne Knight, John Morris, R. Lee Ermey, David Ogden Stiers
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamstoy.html
I won't be coy; I'll just say it straight: I loved this movie.  If you
hang on my every word, then the rest of this review can wait till later;
hie thee to your local cineplex pronto, bucko.  And be sure to watch the
kids in the front aisle.  If, like I was before I went to see "Toy Story
2", you're in need of a good dose of cheer, the kids in the front aisle
will bring as much of that as watching the movie itself will.  Trust
Bammer on that one.
Ah, you're still here.  Alrighty then; I guess I should earn my keep by
actually reviewing this flick...
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
As the taglines so playfully pun, "the Toys are back in town": the old
familiar faces (and voices) that many of us grew up with--even if "grew up
with" started with the original "Toy Story"--come back to the big screen. 
Our old pals Andy (Morris) and his "living" Toys, cowboy Woody (Hanks),
astronaunt Buzz Lightyear (Allen), Mr. Potato Head (Rickles), Slinky Dog
(Varney), dinosaur Rex (Shawn), Hamm the piggy bank (Ratzenberger), Green
Army Men Sergeant (Ermey)  and Woody's lady, Bo Peep (Potts, complete with
Peep's Sheep), make a return appearance; they're joined by cowgirl Jessie
(Cusack), Stinky Pete The Prospector (Grammer), Bullseye the horse
(Stiers), Mrs. Potato Head (Harris), Tour Guide Barbie (Benson), and
probably the Father of the beanie-baby craze, Al The Toy
Collector/"Chicken Man" (Knight), in a tale that combines humor,
nostalgia, amazing computer animation, and even a Lesson or two, for kids
of all ages [yep, even for us 36-year-old Chicks].  
[STRONGER WARNING: the next paragraph definitely contains detailed movie
plotline information; if you do not wish to be "spoiled" whatsoever, skip
to "The Upshot"].
Lest you think that cast was too large to fit in a 100-minute movie, wait
till you hear the plotline: in a rapid-fire turn of events, Andy shelves
Woody after accidently "breaking" Woody's arm; Woody's shelf-mate, Wheezer
the not-squeaking penguin (which, unless I'm mistaken, is either modelled
after the Linux penguin, or is a character from a rather famous film
short...but I'm digressing again) is destined for the one event Toys hate:
the yard sale!  Woody accidently winds up in the "for sale" bin, from
which Toy-Collector Al--realizing that Woody might actually be a
collector's item--steals him.  This turns out to be a joyous occasion for
Jessie and The Prospector, who belong to Woody's "family"--but not for his
pals Buzz and company, who, remembering Woody's heroic rescue of Buzz in
the original "Toy Story", set off to do some derring-do of their own.  But
will Woody want to leave his new-found family, to go back to Andy, who may
have grown too old to play with dolls?  Hmmm... [end SPOILERS]
The Upshot:
I've taken the chance that some folks [who, obviously, will have forgotten
their Reading Is Fundamental lessons] will be upset at the audacity of my
giving so much of the movie away in the paragraph immediately
above--because it begins to address a subtle, yet very important aspect of
"Toy Story 2": it's more than just a "kiddie movie".  The attention to
detail alone separates it from your average animated cartoon, even those
that are as heavily computer-generated (TV's "ReBoot" comes quickly to
mind--RIP).  But there's something more going on here, something that I'll
address a little later.
For now, what's on the surface is delightful as-is.  
The original "Toy Story" wowed us (especially us techies) with its very
real-looking computer animation; I know I'm not the only one that had to
look more than a few times, before realizing that Andy and the other
Humans, weren't real.  Still, though there are some moments where you'd
swear they blended live-action with animation (check out Al's nose hairs
when he's passed out on the couch after his Cheesy Poofs attack), the
animation seems less precise in this movie than it was in its
predecessor's.  That's not necessarily a bad thing, though; where TS1
built the whole world of Toys and Humans as an introduction to the skill
of the technicians, if not the writers and voices, TS2 has a much deeper
tale.  I found myself wowed by the Pretty Pictures less often; here,
instead, I saw the characters.
And what a great bunch of characters there were!  Without going into
"spoilage" territory, I'll just say that the large cast was served well
enough, with no one character really hogging (oops, sorry Hamm!) the
spotlight the way Hanks' "Woody" and Allen's "Buzz" did last go-round;
and, again with an eye on detail, storylines that took place in TS1 are
built-upon in TS2.  But who would've thought that Mr. Potato Head would
be...[careful, Bammer; the kids might be reading]...would have a chance to
play "house" with his wife?  And remember the puppy Andy got in the first
flick?  Mmmhmm.  If I had to choose a weak spot, I'd go with Rex, who
bordered on whiny; even some of the kids in my group, started rolling
their eyes (on the other hand, my eyes got a workout when Jessie started
in with the Obligatory Disney Song--though after she was done, I was okay
about it because the song moved the story along in a somewhat necessary
fashion).  Though I can't truly recall Stiers (Major Winchester,
"M*A*S*H*") vocalizing Bullseye much, Grammer's take on Stinky Pete
reminded me exactly why I enjoy the TV show "Frasier" so much (would that
my favorite actor on that show, David Hyde Pierce, have been cast in TS2
as he was in my previously-favorite animated flick, "A Bug's Tale".  Alas,
it was not to be).  
By the time the movie was over, I wanted to run home and hug my "Curious
George" non-collector dolls.  Next time I see this movie--and believe me,
there'll be a next time, if only so I can catch everything I missed in
trying to take review notes--I think I'll bring old Curious with me.
The HUMAN Factor:
Frequent readers of my reviews know what is normally written in this
space; but something about this movie compelled me to take a different
tack this time.  Perhaps it's because I'm at a sensitive point in my life,
with a seriously ill family member in the hospital, and other stressors
that I won't bore my readers with--but there was something very
deep-reaching in this movie for me.  Between the concepts brought forth
about family, about friendship and obligations, about the silliness of
mere collecting of "treasure" and disposing of "junk" we no longer care
about, I came away from the movie with an appreciation of things I'd not
really given much thought to since I was a wee one, but that kids take the
greatest delight in.  Especially after seeing Jacob dancing his cute self
into a tizzy in front of the screen when the credits were rolling, to the
big-band-beat of Tom Scott's sax and Robert Goulet's singing "You've Got A
Friend In Me".
4-year-old Jacob, who I'd never met until today, made me grin so hard in
watching him dance, that I asked his parents if I could "interview" him
and his 11-year-old sister Jessica for my review.  I asked them both if
they liked the movie (yes, they both did), who their favorite characters
were (Buzz and Woody for Jessica, Buzz for Jacob; notably, their mom and I
both liked Bullseye the horse, best.  Hmmm.), and if they learned anything
from the movie.  Jessica couldn't really pinpoint anything, though she
politely agreed with my prompts; Jacob, on the other hand, was so hyper
after his delightful dance that he wouldn't stay still long enough for our
"interview", and when he calmed down for a minute, the adult in me seemed
to make him a bit less open than he was during his dance.  Which is,
basically, The Point I'm making: kids seem to have an understanding of the
sheer fun of Fun, fun for its own sake, that adults like me are simply
amazed at in watching it on a screen for an hour-and-a-half.  For me, the
layers that were behind the story in "Toy Story 2", though at first glance
they seemed to be simplistic "morals", made the story all the more deep. 
To Jacob, Buzz was cool, the music had a great beat, and he had a huge
space in which to run amuck for a few minutes.  And the funny thing is, we
were both "right".
Hey, call me a sentimental fool if you will, but some people pay Big Bucks
in therapy to gain that kind of insight; I figure that $7.50 (including a
box of popcorn--and lots of soul-cleansing laughs) ain't a bad tradeoff.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I could feel the pull of the folks behind "Toy Story 2" wanting to impart
The Moral Of The Story to the audience, right near the end; by the last
scene, even my rediscovered inner-peace was starting to roil a wee bit. 
But it was a minor roil, and Jacob's Dance got me back into the smooth
groove.  So forget the gimmicky toy tie-ins (but hey, Tour Guide Barbie
had me rollin', and Mr. Potato Head's reaction...well, see it for
yourself); if you can't picture yourself going to a kiddie movie, go for
the gee-whiz animation, the inside jokes ("Father!")--look, if you just
need a reason, go because Bammer said so, 'kay? 
"Toy Story 2" (rating: greenlight) 
I dare all the bah-humbugers out there to go pick up their favorite
non-commercial toy and remember what it was like to be a kid.  I dare
ya...I double dare ya...I double dog dare ya!  Ah, heck, just go see this
movie!

Title
Review for What's the Worst That Could Happen? (2001)
WHAT'S THE WORST THAT COULD HAPPEN? (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 90 minutes
Genre: Comedy
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.mgm.com/whatstheworst/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0161083
Written by: Matthew Chapman, Barry Fanaro
Directed by: Sam Weisman
Cast: Martin Lawrence, Danny DeVito, John Leguizamo, Carmen Ejogo,
Larry Miller, Nora Dunn, William Fichtner, Glenne Headly, Bernie Mac
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamstheworst.html
Knowing my history of hating every TV show and movie Martin Lawrence has
ever done thus far (I liked him fine as a stand-up comedian, but cannot
stand anything else he's done), I was fully prepared to hate WHAT'S THE
WORST THAT COULD HAPPEN?.  And without having read her review before I saw
the flick, seeing that my partner The Diva already redlighted "The
Worst", I was sure that, given my even lower tolerance for Lawrence, I'd
finally reached my first double triple-redlight year.
Imagine my surprise when I found myself liking "The Worst".  Man, I
can't believe I just admitted that.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
At an art auction, Kevin Caffery (Martin Lawrence) notices a
damsel-in-distress, and gentleman that he is, introduces himself to her.
Faire Damsel Amber (Carmen Ejogo) is distraught over having to sell a
work of art her father willed to her; and, gentleman that he is, Kevin
rescues said art work for the Faire Damsel.  Just as in yon modern fairy
tale, they immediately hit the hay, and, after Kevin tells Amber he's a
high-end thief, they fall in love, she gives him her father's lucky
ring, and they live happily ever after.
Uh, where was I...oh yeah.  Kevin, with the full consent of his new lady
love, plots a big heist with his Trusty Sidekick, Tonto...uh, I mean,
Burger (John Leguizamo), with Kevin's uncle Jack (Bernie Mac) acting as
their Fence.  Their target is Max Fairbanks (Danny DeVito), a
billionaire about to lose the business that he and his wife Lutetia
(Nora Dunn) inherited from  her father; his impending bankruptcy somehow
makes Max attractive to high-end thieves [don't ask.  It involves Math.]
The problem is, Max just isn't ready to be robbed; and in retaliation
for Kevin's actions, Max very legally steals Amber's lucky ring from
Kevin's finger, a ring that Max - as a big I-Ching/tarot follower with
his own psychic assistant, Gloria (Glenne Headly) - is convinced is now
*his* lucky ring.
Wackiness, as you no doubt can guess, Ensues.
The Upshot:
As I implied above, all signs pointed toward me hating this movie.  I
only decided to see it because of Danny DeVito and the supporting cast;
to be sure, I went in spite of, not because of, Martin Lawrence.
Strangely enough, when Lawrence wasn't cheesing and playing the clown,
he was nearly likeable; and in fact, I tired of that over-large cast,
before I was ready to call it quits on this flick.
When Lawrence's trademark over-the-top behavior (see the last five or so
minutes of this movie for a perfect example of just that) was reined in,
he was fine, and so was "The Worst".  It'd never get any statues for
originality, subtlety, or much beyond the Obligatory NAACP/BET(Viacom)
Image Award [hey, don't EVEN sweat me.], but I've certainly seen worse
than "The Worst".
What killed WHAT'S THE WORST THAT COULD HAPPEN? for me was the inclusion
of WAAAAAY too many characters; what ultimately deflated "The Worst" was
its excess.  I won't get into Amber's patent stupidity in so easily
accepting Kevin's "profession"; that's a whole 'Nother Rant For Another
Time.  Here, I'll just ask "why", as in, why give Max an ObBallsBusting
wife, *and* a mistress, *and* a codependent assistant-cum-harpie-cum-
psychick?  Why have not one, not two, but *three* screechy
girlfriends/wives for the thieves to Suffer?  Why the fey cop *and* the
Goofy Security Chief?  Why wasn't the one sidekick thief enough; was
there *really* a perceived need for a Family Fence, plus Bebe Bickerson
and Wife? [and don't forget Bebe's Kids].  Didn't anyone ever teach
these filmmakers the maxim "less is more"?
And it wasn't just the characters who let me down.  Lawrence aside,
DeVito didn't really seem to have his heart in it here; his gruff act
seemed like textbook Louie DePalma, and I just wasn't feelin' him at
all.  John Leguizamo continues to work in vehicles that do nothing to
showcase his raw talent (check out any of his HBO specials, and you'll
see the sad truth in that).  I don't know *what* Glenne Headly was
thinking [other than "Hey, my cupboard is gettin' kinda bare; maybe it'd
be a good idea to go rustle up some vittles this month.  Let's see what
the balance is on yonder checkbook.  Oops."], and the sooner I can
forget the criminal waste of William Fichtner (as fey Detective Alex
Tardio) and Larry Miller (as Goofy Security Chief Earl), the happier
I'll be.
This flick, in the end, could've used better editing - starting with the
writers exercising some self-control and the director yelling "oh HELL
no!" a bit more from time to time.  And with that, I think I'll do some
self-editing, and stop there.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Yank my britches and slap me silly, but I had some liking for "The
Worst".  It exceeded my low expectations, provided a chuckle or two, and
almost made me forget the lack of regard I have for Martin Lawrence's
acting career to date.  For a few minutes, anyway.  Too bad the movie's
execs felt the need to pile on the characters; it overwhelmed what
could've been a Cute Popcorn Flick.  Still, it could've been worse, eh?
WHAT'S THE WORST THAT COULD HAPPEN? (rating: yellowlight):
I gotta wonder if the guys behind this one, *really* thought out that
title.

Title
Review for Chicken Run (2000)
CHICKEN RUN (2000)
Rated G; running time 85 minutes
Genre: Animated
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0120630
Official site (US): http://www.reel.com/chickenrun/
Official site (UK): http://www.chickenrun.co.uk/
Written by: Mark Burton, Karey Kirkpatrick, Jack Rosenthal
Directed by: Nick Park, Peter Lord
Cast: Voices of: Mel Gibson, Julia Sawahla, Miranda Richardson,
Anthony Haygarth, Phil Daniels, Timothy Spall, Lynne Ferguson,
Jane Horrocks, Imelda Staunton, Benjamin Whitrow
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamschicken.html
Like many of My Fellow Americans, my only real exposure to British
Humour has been through the occasional transplanted TV series made over
for an American audience, and through shows like BENNY HILL and
PRISONER: CELL BLOCK H (yes, I know it was Aussie, and a drama.  Hey,
work with me here).  All the more reason why I enjoyed CHICKEN RUN so
much: I didn't have the added burden of having the ready comparison to
its kin WALLACE AND GROMMIT or THE WRONG TROUSERS, for better or worse.
Without hesitation or excuse, I could (and did), in my Anglo-virgin
eyes, enjoy CHICKEN RUN for what it was.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Life on the farm is anything but fun for dese hea' chicks.
Tired of being cooped up for her purchase of eggs (and of living in fear
that the axe will fall the day that her egg-production days are over),
Ginger (Julia Sawahla) dreams of freedom Somewhere Out There, away from
her oppressors, evil chicken farmer Mrs. Tweedy (Miranda Richardson) and
her henpecked husband Mr. Tweedy (Anthony Haygarth).  Ginger gets little
help from her fellow cacklers, featherbrained Babs (Jane Horrocks),
rough-and-tumble Bunty (Imelda Staunton), the scholarly Scotschick Mac
(Lynne Ferguson), or the old cock Fowler (Benjamin Whitrow), since most
of them are caught up in the slave mentality that tells them they are
destined to live out their lives in captivity.  But Ginger ain't havin'
it; and with the help of packrats Nick (Timothy Spall) and Fetcher (Phil
Daniels), and Rocky (Mel Gibson), a cocky flying Rhode Island rooster
who falls out of the sky and into their roost, Ginger believes she and
her chick friends might soon gain their freedom after all...
CHICKEN RUN got the adult-to-children entertainment ratio right, even
moreso than TOY STORY 2 did--and TS2 was one of my top ten flicks of
1999, so you know that's saying a lot.   A good mix of clever allusions
to war flicks of the past (especially THE GREAT ESCAPE and STALAG 17),
plus quick nods to the likes of COOL HAND LUKE and Gibson's BRAVEHEART,
"Chicken" didn't forget to play for the kiddies as well--and it did so
without patronizing the children or insulting its older audience's
intelligence.  For every adult-type inside joke that went over the wee
tot's heads ("bend over and kiss your bum goodbye!"), there was a
message that could be easily grasped by the young ones.  Would that
DINOSAUR had been scripted by this team of folks; it might've been a
much different flick.
But that's too heavy a statement to make here.  The beauty of CHICKEN
RUN is that it was fun to watch, even with its non-bright colors (done
purposefully, I'd say, to denote a World War II-ish time period, as well
as the comparative bleakness of the setting).  In fact, not having seen
the aforementioned WALLACE AND GROMMIT yet (though I'll be remedying
that right soon, I reckon), I can easily compare it to another animated
favorite of mine, A BUG'S LIFE, in its attention to detail and
surrounding environment.  And, like "Bug" in its climax, "Chicken"
addresses the concept of teamwork, another good lesson for kids to take
away.   Not a shabby one for us adults either, come to think of it.
The animation technique used in CHICKEN RUN - claymation - worked
beautifully; there were only a few moments (primarily when the camera
was pulled back for a long shot) that the "drawings" seemed transparent
and the scene didn't look natural (as if a chicken with teeth, and hands
instead of wings, could possibly look natural).  Still, it was
head-and-shoulders above the schizo animation mix in TITAN A.E. with the
added benefit of looking less polished (and therefore, even more
believable) in its backgrounds.
But as good as the animation was, the voice characterizations were even
better; again, a welcome improvement over "Titan" and "Dinosaur" before
it.  Here, the characters were convincing in their chickdom (and let us
not forget about Nick and Fetcher's ratitude), and more important, the
actors seemed in-touch with their characters; they seemed to be having
fun with them.  From the sweet airheadedness of Jane Horrock as Babs
(her "How did you enjoy your Holiday?" as Ginger was brought back from
time in The Hole, had more sincerity in its English lilt than the same
line from an American Gen X actress could ever hope to deliver), to Phil
Daniels and Timothy Spall's delight in playing a couple'a rats, to Lynne
Ferguson's Mac and her playful nod to Scotty of STAR TREK fame, Julia
Sawahla's dogged determination as Ginger, and the overall image of
chickens running around like their heads were cut off - the actors and
their characters almost all worked for me.
Especially, much to my surprise, Mel Gibson.  After his mugging of the
camera in "Lethal Weapon"s 2, 3, and 4, I was ready to write off his
cute butt as one of those grossly overpaid movie stars who have more
money than talent.  As much as the producers balked at an American
"stealing the show" (it's been reported that the production team
insisted that the Yankee Rocky not be the hero here), that's exactly
what happened in any scene where Gibson laid on his considerable charms
as cocky Rocky.  It wasn't so much that the other actors were
lacking--they weren't--but Gibson just shined a wee bit brighter than
the rest, and most surprising of all, he didn't work that last nerve in
doing so.  But on the other end of the spectrum was Miranda Richardson
as Mrs. Tweedy; I know Richardson has the stuff of a good actress, but
in "Chicken", I just wasn't feelin' her.  Here, she was not only mean
enough, she also wasn't given enough lines, making her character seem
more a supporting player than the lead the story suggested.  A minor
quibble, to say the least; even at its worst, CHICKEN RUN just daggone
fun to watch.
The one head-scratcher I came away with was the attitude of the chickens
to their eggs.  One has to wonder if these chickens grasped the "where
do little chickens come from, mommy?" concept.  This, however, was
counterbalanced by the snicker-funny "which came first?" discussion
between rats Nick and Fetcher--which reminds me to remind you: never
leave an animated movie before the credits are over, or you might miss
something "special".
CHICKEN RUN is one of those flicks I look forward to seeing multiple
times with different age groups, to see the different vibes folks of all
ages get from it.  Can't wait to see it with my young cousins--and with
my mother.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
A clever, funny flick with a good sense of Brit style, and a
surprisingly good (without being overbearingly cloying) vocal
performance by Mel Gibson.  Claymation sure has come a long way since
"The California Raisins", eh?
CHICKEN RUN (rating: greenlight):
Now, who's up for a 2-piece and a biscuit?

Title
Review for Bamboozled (2000)
BAMBOOZLED (2000)
Rated R; running time 136 minutes
Genre: Drama
  (forget what the genre labellers are sayin'; this ain't no comedy.)
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0215545
Official site: http://www.bamboozledmovie.com/
Written by: Spike Lee
Directed by: Spike Lee
Cast: Damon Wayans, Savion Glover, Tommy Davidson, Jada Pinkett-Smith,
Michael Rapaport, Mos Def
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbamboozled.html
You are about to read the most schizophrenically lengthy review I have
ever written - which, ironically, marries it perfectly to the movie
being reviewed: Spike Lee's controversial BAMBOOZLED.  Here we go...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Black TV writer Pierre DeLacroix (Damon Wayans) is charged by the White
producer of the Continental Network Systems station Mr. Dunwitty
(Michael Rapaport) to come up with an all-Black comedy show that will
boost CNS's ratings.  But when the "streetwise" Dunwitty rejects the
Harvard-educated DeLacroix's plans to create "the next Cosby show",
DeLa, along with his assistant, Sloane Hopkins (Jada Pinkett-Smith)
decides to create a show so offensive that DeLa would be fired [and thus
allowed to get out of his contract...since, after all, he has "a
mortgage to pay".  Don't ask how being fired will help pay that
mortgage, though.  Too much logic, and all].
Inspired by homeless Black street tap dancer Manray (Savion Glover) and
his partner Womack (Tommy Davidson), DeLa and Sloane come up with the
most heinous show imaginable: "Mantan the New Millennium Minstrel Show",
in which Manray would play Mantan and Womack would play "Sleep 'n Eat";
they both would be made up in blackface ("Black actors in blacker
blackface"), and called "Two Reeee-aaaal Coons".  Manray and Womack,
being in a state of poverty, agree to this (Womack more reluctantly so
than Manray, who'll do anything "longas the hoofin's real"), but DeLa is
ultimately undone when to his surprise not only does the
"nigga"-spouting Dunwitty love the concept, the American TV audience
eats it up.  Sloane and DeLa have a hard time living with this - but not
as hard a time as Sloane's brother Julius, aka Big Black Africa (Mos
Def), a member of the MauMau rap group who takes Issue with the
"comically" blackened minstrels, at the same time as he and his fellow
malt liquor-guzzling self-righteous MauMaus use the word "nigga" as much
if not more than the minstrels themselves.
The Upshot:
And the schizophrenic part?  BAMBOOZLED worked for me on so many levels
at first, that I was so utterly disappointed when it just kept going on
and on, repeating itself without saying anything New, eventually running
out of juice well before it was over.  Had I stopped watching it at a
certain point, I might've declared it a Masterpiece.  As it is, I can
neither fully praise, nor fully denigrate, this movie.  And the funny
thing is, {SOME} Black folks will try to take me to task for that very
thing ["'BAMBOOZLED' was dope!, you Oreo traitor!" ... "'BAMBOOZLED' was
wack!, you Bougie traitor!".  Can't win for losing.]
As a visionary tale, BAMBOOZLED knows few equals.  Spike Lee nailed many
of the dysfunctional Issues Black folks in America have as A People
(and, of course, as the many sub-cultures within the larger,
mostly-undefined Black Culture), and well as The Issue itself: what
exactly does it mean to be Black in America?  Is DeLa less Black than
Julius because Julius is "keepin' it real"?  Is Dunwitty - clearly a
Caucasian - *more* Black than DeLa because Dunwitty considers himself
"street"?  Is the White MauMau Blacker than *all* of them?  And when it
gets right down to it, is there even such a thing as one single "Black
Culture"?
Though Lee's targets were many, and wide (and, depending on who you ask
- for instance, Hollywood's Finest Black Comedy Stars, many of whom
loudly questioned Lee's "right" to do this movie - just plain off-base),
I found his aim fairly accurate, for the most part.  All the
"nigga"-slinging, all the malt-liquor drinking, all the empty mau-mauing
- even the mental separation of Us into "Blacks" and "Negroes" (or,
telling it like it 'tis, "Niggers") that too many of us (me included)
do...when Spike aimed, and hit, it spoke to many of the things I've long
felt were cultural ills with Us here in this so-called Melting Pot.  The
most heinous ill being that WE so gladly supply the Cork, and willingly
apply the ugly Blackface, to Ourselves.
But - and this isn't a small thing - being a Visionary is only half the
battle; to have a successful movie, one must also have successful acting
and directing, a tight storyline, and cohesive editing.  And that is
where BAMBOOZLED ultimately failed.
Granted, a Spike Lee joint doesn't always follow the typical moviemaking
blueprint of your standard motion picture.  To that end, the weird
jumpcuts, the unnatural-feeling scenes, and the strange editing, were
Lee trademarks.  But this film couldn't afford Lee's quirks *and* his
inability to cut out the repetition on the one hand and "grow" the story
on the other *and* an in-your-face storyline, all at the same time.
That, on top of the unbelievability of both Mantan's and Sleep 'n Eat's
Instant Revelations with no good cause (except, of course, the "wake
up!" caused by looking at your cork-blackfaced image in the mirror,
which should make *anybody* say "hmmm...maybe this isn't a good idea
after all"), and Damon Wayans' bizarre choice of a one-dimensional
portrayal of DeLacroix, almost killed the joy of the BAMBOOZLED
philosophy for me.
Great acting by Jada Pinkett-Smith, Michael Rappaport, and an
interesting turn by rapper Mos Def as Big Black Africa, could not
overcome Lee's lack of tight focus, the far-too-easy "instant"
acceptance of the minstrel show by the audience, the completely
incredulous "payoff" involving the MauMaus and Mantan (my eyes truly
rolled), or Wayans' just plain bad acting - and worse, the bad decision
to let him do the narrative voiceover.  The "jolly nigger"-type
collectibles, and the Black actors of the past who did what they had to
do - and having done so, *allowed* a Spike Lee, a Damon Wayans, et al,
to be where they are today - should have supplied the final narrative.
Too bad they weren't really allowed to Speak.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
"We Are Not A Monolith".  It is my daily mantra.  And it applies oh so
well to BAMBOOZLED.  But what, exactly, does it mean?
It means that somewhere out there, there's a Harvard-educated,
stick-up-the-butt, "Negro"-labelling, confused DeLa; and a
status-seeking, hard-working, bougie, confused Sloane; and a
tap-dancing, fast-talking, struggling-to-get-by Manray and Womack; and a
malt liquor-drinking, gun-slinging, pseudo-revolutionary Julius.
And like it or not, they're ALL Black.  Which, of course, lays waste to
the one huge stereotype We seem to be portrayed as on the Idiot Box that
Pierre set out to feed.  If this, more so than the viewer's experience
of the acting itself, was The Ultimate Point of BAMBOOZLED, then bad
acting/directing/editing or not, BAMBOOZLED is indeed a Masterpiece.
One that, when all is said and done, should be seen, no matter your
color.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
BAMBOOZLED, conceptually, is something that Spike Lee should be
applauded for.  Would that the finished product were as great as the
concept behind it.  It pains me to say that; after all, I drove 88 miles
to The Hood just to see a movie that a lot of theater owners in
predominantly White neighborhoods were apparently too chicken to show. I
desperately wanted to love this movie for both its message and the
talent behind it.  The message came through loud and clear; but judging
BAMBOOZLED on its creative merits alone, we have been Hoodwinked.
BAMBOOZLED (mixed rating):
A greenlight rating for what visionary Spike Lee *tried* to Say; but...
...a cautionary yellowlight for the way director Spike Lee Said it.
Spike, I gotta go with what DeLa's mama said about him: you disappoint
me.

Title
Review for How the Grinch Stole Christmas (2000)
THE GRINCH (2000)
(aka DR. SEUSS' HOW THE GRINCH STOLE CHRISTMAS)
Rated PG; running time 105 minutes
Genre: Children's/Comedy
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.meanone.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0170016
Written by: Peter Seaman, Jeffrey Price
   (based on the book by Dr. Seuss)
Directed by: Ron Howard
Cast: Jim Carrey, Taylor Mumsen, Bill Irwin, Molly Shannon,
Jeffrey Tambor, Christine Baranski, Josh Ryan Evans;
Anthony Hopkins (narrator)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsgrinch.html
Three things you should know about Bammer, before we get started:
    -Generally, remixes grind my gizzard.
    -Jim Carrey and his extremely-over-the-top clowning gets on
     my *last* nerve.
    -Dr. Seuss was one of the first heroes I had; hell, he
     Spoke For The Trees before treehuggers were even thought of!
     Mess with him, and somebody's Feelings are gonna get hurt.
So, I probably loathed Jim Carrey's remix of Dr. Seuss' cartoon, "How
The Grinch Stole Christmas", right?  Maybe.  Maybe not.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
He's a Mean One: Mr. Grinch.
In this updated version of the classic tale by Dr. Seuss, The Grinch
(Jim Carrey) has Issues.  He doesn't like all the noise that his
Whoville neighbors 'round the way make - especially the Christmasy noise
they make.  The Grinch, frankly, doesn't like Christmas.
The concept of which astonishes young Cindy Lou Who (Taylor Mumsen) -
though she's having Issues of her own over the commercialization of
Christmas.  Cindy sees her father, Lou Lou-Who (Bill Irwin) buying up
Christmas stuff left and right, her mother, Betty Lou Who (Molly
Shannon) in fierce Christmas light-stringing competition with Martha May
Who-vier (Christine Baranski), and the Maywho of Whoville (Jeffrey
Tambor) discriminating against the Misunderstood Grinch because the
Maywho's beloved Martha once had a Thing for Grinchybaby, and Cindy is
left to wonder just what Christmas is about.
The Grinch has no doubts, though: for him, Christmas is about being
tortured by the Whos, a practice that started when he was yet a wee
Grinch (Josh Ryan Evans).  But this year will be different; this year,
The Grinch and his dog, Max, will stop Christmas for good...
The Upshot:
Quite a few things about THE GRINCH were exactly as I thought, and even
hoped, they would be: director Ron Howard obviously put a lot of love
and care into this project; certainly, he and his production team put a
lot of moolah into set design and costumes.  I also imagined narrator
Anthony Hopkins sonorous voice would pick up where the original cartoon
"Grinch" narrator - Boris Karloff - left off.  Hope against hope, the
key song - "You're A Mean One, Mr. Grinch" - was updated just enough to
be jazzy, but still remained true to the original (ok, I'll admit it: I
liked Carrey's version even *more* than the original song.  Who knew he
could actually sing?).  Overall, my hopes that this production would
remain true to Seuss' Whoville, weren't shattered.
It's where they veered off of Seuss' beaten path, that rankled me.
That, and Jim Carrey being allowed off-leash without a pooper scooper to
clean up behind him.
For the life of me, I couldn't figure out why they decided to explain
Why The Grinch, Grinched.  Some stuff just *is*; let it be, I say -
especially if you're gonna explain it like this flick did.  Needless to
say, my eyes rolled.  Also, I like my Whos unspoiled by Y2K
sensibilities; it twisted my liver that the Maywho was allowed to be
Evil, and sneakily so.  Totally ruined the "everybody comes out for
Christmas any old way" theme for me.
And - can I just say this? - if I never see Taylor Mumsen in another
movie again, it'll be too soon.  Her saccharine-coated Cindy Lou Who
reminded me of the mouse in STUART LITTLE.  And, oooh, I *hated* the
mouse in STUART LITTLE.  Yes, I realize that Cindy Lou is probably
charming the socks off America right now, but I just feel sticky after
being dunked in all that Sweetness And Light.  Ya know what?  I didn't
*care* why she was Conflicted about What Christmas Really Meant.  I just
wanted her gone, gone, *gone*!
Uh...sorry if I got any on ya.  Lest ye think I didn't really like the
movie, ye would be right for those thirty or so minutes that Carrey went
hog-wild without any sense of direction.  And it showed; many of his
shticky bits should've been edited out, no matter how Wacky or Inspired
his antics seemed.  There were far too times when Carrey just went manic
onscreen, but no one in the packed audience went along with him.  But
there were enough good bits of his to generally balance the movie out;
though there were some questionable scenes that I didn't feel were
appropriate for the child-skewed audience [is there a clause that Carrey
puts in his movie contracts that states he must, at some point, crack a
butt-joke?], it's clearly the younger set that will eat this movie up,
and will probably demand an update of the remake.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I'm sure it can't be easy being a Hollywood Filmmaker; they can be boxed
into a damned if you do/damned if you don't corner: if they sprinkle a
few Blacks (and since We're still the Default Minority, it'll probably
remain "a few *Blacks*") in their productions, some folks will scream
"TOKENISM!!!".  But if they *don't* include Blacks, the scream becomes
"WHERE THE BLACK FOLKS AT?".  I don't envy Howard et al their decision,
and maybe the result should just be seen as the "Grinch" Powers That Be
having taken the high road.
But still: Black "Whos", for me, was about as weird a sight as, say,
Black Vulcans.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I'll make about the safest prediction a non-prognosticator ever made:
based on the huge crowds I saw here in Podunkville this weekend, THE
GRINCH will be a monster hit the likes we haven't seen in awhile.  And I
won't begrudge them that: for folks who weren't weaned on the
originator, the duplicator will do just fine.  Really, it wasn't all
that bad, and in some spots (most notably when The Grinch found out he
was nominated for an award), Carrey Wrecked Stuff! (quick Blactionary
definition: "In a few noteworthy scenes, Carrey was amazing!").  Still,
I think I'll stick with the original for now - and maybe when "Grinch"
comes on DVD, I might fast-forward through Cindy Lou's
saccharine-coating and Jim Carrey's fatty hamming.
THE GRINCH (rating: flashing yellowlight):
Just call me Mrs. Grinch...

Title
Review for Serendipity (2001)
SERENDIPITY (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 85 minutes
Genre: romantic comedy
Seen at: Lowes Star Southfield (Detroit, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.serendipity-themovie.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0240890
Written by: Marc Klein
Directed by: Peter Chelsom
Cast: John Cusack, Kate Beckinsale, Jeremy Piven, Molly Shannon,
John Corbett, Bridget Moynihan, Eugene Levy
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsserendipity.html
Once again, I'm apparently bucking the trend: Rotten Tomatoes lists
SERENDIPITY as "rotten", according to roughly 60% of its registered
reviewers.  Say La Vee; I never was much on trends.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
By sheer random chance - or was it fate? - Jonathan (John Cusack) and
Sara (Kate Beckinsale) meet in a New York department store; instantly
attracted to each other, though they are each involved with other
people, Jonathan and Sara coyly try to make a connection.  Sara, being a
big believer in Fate, doesn't give Jonathan much background on who she
is; she offers a test of Fate, and they both fail.  Their connection is
broken, and they go their separate ways.  End of story...or is it?
A few years later, Jonathan is engaged to his girlfriend Halleh (Bridget
Moynihan), and Sara is with her boyfriend Lars (John Corbett).  But
Jonathan and Sara's chance meeting still weighs heavy on both their
minds; Jonathan enlists his best friend Dean (Jeremy Piven) to help him
find Sara - and Sara does the same with her best friend Eve (Molly
Shannon).
But really - what's the chance they'll ever see each other again?
The Upshot:
It's been a long time since I came away from a movie feeling so pleased
across the board.  I was very much taken in by the crisp writing by Marc
Klein, director Peter Chelsom's keen eye for time passages and for New
York (though having recently come back from San Francisco, I found
myself wishing that The City By The Bay had been as lovingly caressed by
Chelsom as was NYC), the soundtrack (which I'll probably buy), and
especially the acting by the four main players.
Which - for the at least half of that acting group - is a huge
compliment, coming from me.  John Cusack gives another solid
performance; his Jonathan could have easily been Lloyd Dobler's big
brother.  Likewise, Jeremy Piven's turn as Jonathan's friend Dean is
indicative of Piven's long history of providing strong character support
in whatever project he's in.  Together, Cusack and Piven took a
situation that could've been easily played for straight yuks, and
endowed it with a humorous but quiet dignity that made me smile.
But it was the fine work by Kate Beckinsale, and especially Molly
Shannon, that brought me up short.  Beckinsale, because as one half of
the dimwitted duo in BROKEDOWN PALACE (shoutout to all my AOHell BP
review "fans"! uh, end sarcasm.), she completely failed to register in
my Good Actress Radar; maybe it was Beckinsale's true Brit voice that
made her Sara work for me here, who knows.  And Shannon, because her
work on SATURDAY NIGHT LIVE and its dreadful long-skit movies, gave me
the hives.  Not so in SERENDIPITY, though; Shannon's understated
portrayal of Sara's friend Eve was so convincingly *normal* that I might
have to take back every nasty thing I've said about her right to breathe
the same air as me.
Eugene Levy's Anal Salesclerk schtick threatened to take this movie to a
place I really didn't want it to go.  And the unsurprising ending was
just that: unsurprising, though I was grateful that Chelsom and Klein
didn't take the totally easy way out by making Halleh and Lars unlikable
cretins that Jonathan and Sara just *had* to dump.  In the end, my
fortunate accidental discovery of SERENDIPITY was that it made a cool
Autumn afternoon a bit more pleasant.  And that's good enough for me.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
What I liked most about SERENDIPITY was its maturity in the face of an
implausible story; these characters were speaking in adult tones, in
spite of the ridiculous nature of this movie's concept.  The best of the
dialogue for them might not be words you or I would use in daily
language, but for me, they were words I *wish* I was clever enough to
use.  In this, SERENDIPITY was Light Romantic Fare at its best.
SERENDIPITY (rating: greenlight):
Okay, so SERENDIPITY is an unabashed chick flick.  Hey, this Chick has
no qualms with admitting to have been charmed outta my socks.

Title
Review for Shanghai Noon (2000)
SHANGHAI NOON (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 109 minutes 
Genre: Action/Comedy 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0184894 
Official site: http://studio.go.com/movies/shanghainoon/index.html  
Written by: Alfred Gough, Miles Millar 
Directed by: Tom Dey 
Cast: Jackie Chan, Owen Wilson, Lucy Liu, Roger Yuan, Xander Berkeley, 
Walt Goggins, Brandon Merrill
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsshanghai.html
Remember back in my ROMEO MUST DIE review where I said that Jet Li 
displayed "the charm and humor of Jackie Chan"?  Well, strap me down and 
slap me silly--because I was just plain wrong.  I like Jet Li, but he's 
no Jackie Chan.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Set in the late 1800s, SHANGHAI NOON is a fun mix of humor, martial 
arts, riffs on and homages to Western flicks ranging from HIGH NOON to 
BLAZING SADDLES to BUTCH CASSIDY AND THE SUNDANCE KID, with a few 
Eastern movie standards ("You killed my uncle!") thrown in for good 
measure.
After Princess Pei Pei (Lucy Liu) is kidnapped away from Forbidden City, 
China and taken to America's western frontier of Carson City, Nevada, 
Imperial Guard Chon Wang (Jackie Chan) is reluctantly allowed to go to 
America along with three other guardsmen, to rescue her.  Fate meets him 
on a train, when Roy O'Bannon (Owen Wilson), a flirtatious train robber 
with a heart o' gold (and a nose for finding gold), crosses paths with 
Chon and eventually teams up with him to help Chon find the princess.  
Standing in their way is the traitorous ex-guardsman Lo Fong (Roger 
Yuan) who is behind Pei Pei's kidnapping, Marshall Nathan VanCleef 
(Xander Berkeley), out to arrest Roy and Chon, and Wallace (Walt 
Goggins), one of Roy's trigger-happy newbie bandits.
The Upshot:
The word best used to describe SHANGHAI NOON is, "fun".  Not just fun-ny 
- though, it was definitely that - "Shanghai" worked well because it 
never took itself too seriously (ya gotta love a Cowboy movie where the 
Indians aren't treated like Noble Savages, and they poke fun at 
themselves), and neither did its two lead actors/characters.  And 
because of its lighthearted approach, I was easily able to ignore plot 
slippages that might otherwise have bugged the daylights out of me had 
"Shanghai" been a more straight-ahead action flick.
The trademark of any Jackie Chan movie comes in his high-energy martial 
arts acrobatics, combined with his usual humorous flair.  And as usual, 
Chan did not disappoint on either end.  Chan is the Dick Clark of 
martial arts movies; the man must be 105 years old by now (I remember 
watching him in CANNONBALL RUN when I was a wee pup myself--and he 
looked about the same age even then), but watching him fly around 
on-screen, doing all his own fighting and stunts, you'd swear that he 
was still a young thing.  It is nothing less than amazing to me, and I 
could watch his movies without the sound on as long as he could keep his 
tremendous kicks (puts Chuck Norris to shame, I tell ya) and punches 
going.  And I defy you to find anything cuter than Jackie Chan getting 
silly after puffing on a peace pipe ("Could be worse; at least he's not 
White"...man, they kept me rollin').
Equally enjoyable, in a different way, was Owen Wilson as Roy O'Bannon.  
I couldn't help but to see shades of a young Robert Redford in Wilson, 
though unlike Redford's Butch Cassidy, Roy was a lot more personable and 
a lot less misogynic.  "Sincere and charming" describes his character 
best; never sarcastic or winking at the audience, you'd be hard-pressed 
to see Roy as a true bad guy, even when he opens mouth, inserts foot. 
But it was the interplay between Roy and Chon (and of course, between 
Chan and Wilson), that most impressed me.  The "Chinese Drinking Game" 
they played had me in stitches, as did their early fight scene together 
(which reminds me: don't believe everything you see in the trailer for 
this flick.  You'll see what I mean). I'd dearly love to see these two 
actors expand on their great chemistry; who knows--maybe they could be 
the next Paul Newman And Robert Redford buddy team.
The beauty of SHANGHAI NOON, though, is that it doesn't just rely on the 
two leads to progress its story.  Lucy Liu's Princess is no shrinking 
violet; as headstrong as she is beautiful, it was quite heartening to 
see that she had some fight in her, and she didn't just sit back and let 
herself get Rescued like a damsel in distress.  And though Roger Yuan 
didn't really distinguish himself in what could've been a plum role as 
bad guy Lo Fong, the same cannot be said of Xander Berkeley; the fun he 
must've had in playing the Marshall in his dueling scenes with Roy, was 
evident during his performance.  It's just too bad that he wasn't given 
more on-screen time.
A couple or three bits didn't work all that well. I never did get what 
Wallace's deal was all about; he seemed to be one bad guy too many.  
Maybe I blinked and missed it--or maybe the meat of their parts were 
left on the editor's cutting floor--but where were the three Imperial 
Guards hanging out over the course of the movie?  And though the tribal 
chief's daughter was apparently a throwback to similar female characters 
in past Westerns, I rolled my eyes at how her story played out in the 
end.  Fortunately, these were minor missteps, and they had a negligible 
effect on my enjoyment of the movie.
Usually, thoughts of movie remakes and part-twos, give me the hives; but 
I didn't get enough of SHANGHAI NOON.  I want more.  If approached 
well--and if Jackie Chan can hold up (and he shows no signs of slowing), 
I could groove on SHANGHAI NOON II: DESTRY RIDES AGAIN.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]
I hesitated on addressing the Black Factor--or more precisely, the 
"Minority Factor"--in this review; after all, Chan & company took such a 
whimsical look at the lives of Chinese and Native Americans in the wild 
wild west of yore ("I don't know why they call me the 'Shanghai Kid'; 
I'm not from Shanghai!") that it seems almost wrong to deal with those 
issues on a more serious basis.  Still, I've not been one to back down 
from examining prejudices - Hollywood's, as well as my own.
The lighthearted approach used in dealing with the issues of race in 
this movie didn't mean that it was glossed-over; it was just treated 
subtlety, and in my opinion, worked all the better for that subtle 
treatment.  Only once did my BS meter go off (Blacks would be welcome in 
a saloon in the 1800s, but not Chinese?), and only once was bigotry 
specifically, directly addressed.  The treatment felt right, though 
issues of Chon's assimilation into western culture (in a "when in Rome" 
fashion) left me vaguely ill-at-ease.
But more disturbing to me, on a personal level, was my own prejudicial 
reaction to this movie--in a roundabout way, most of which had little to 
do with "Shanghai", and more to do with Chan's recent hit movie, RUSH 
HOUR, co-starring Chris Tucker (which I didn't watch for the longest 
time because I, frankly, didn't feel like seeing Tucker play the 
sidekick as court-jester).
The Diva broached this issue in her review of Held Up when she said, 
"Why is okay for me to spend my money watching a stupid Adam Sandler 
movie, but not okay for me to watch 'Booty Call'?"; and it made me stop 
and wonder the same about my own pre-judging of the role of the Black 
Sidekick--like Tucker in "Rush", vs the White Sidekick--like Wilson in 
"Shanghai".  The self-examination left me somewhat disconcerted; I had 
to ask myself if there's really a difference in how the characters are 
written and/or played by their respective actors, and more to the point, 
whether the difference is an actual, tangible thing, or merely my 
perception.
I haven't quite decided yet.  My heart wants to say that a Tucker, or a 
Danny Glover, or a [insert Black Actor as Sidekick name here] is written 
or directed differently than would be a Wilson, or a Gene Wilder, or a 
[insert White Actor as Sidekick name here].  But my head tells me that 
even where there is fault in the writing or direction, there is probably 
also duplicity on the actor's part.  And maybe a bit of some on mine.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Forget MISSION: IMPLAUSIBLE TOO; spend your movie duckets next week on 
SHANGHAI NOON.  It's the funniest movie I've seen all year; Owen Wilson 
is a silly charmer, and Jackie Chan is still one baaad mofo.  And don't 
forget: as with most Jackie Chan movies, do not leave before you see the 
outtakes.
SHANGHAI NOON (rating: greenlight):   
GLADIATOR brought the roar into the summer movie season, but SHANGHAI 
NOON adds the fun.

Title
Review for Down to Earth (2001)
DOWN TO EARTH (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 95 minutes
Genre: Comedy
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.downtoearthmovie.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0231775
Written by: Louis C.K., Lance Crouther, Ali LeRoi, Chris Rock
Directed by: Paul Weitz, Chris Weitz
Cast: Chris Rock, Regina King, Mark Addy, Frankie Faison, Eugene Levy,
Chazz Palminteri, Greg Germann, Jennifer Coolidge, Wanda Sykes
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsdowntoearth.html
You ever feel like you really, really wanted to sneeze - I mean really,
*really*, wanted to sneeze - and no matter how hard you tried, you just
couldn't do much more than let out an insincere snort or two?
Substitute "laugh" for "sneeze" in the above sentence, and you'll know
how I felt while watching DOWN TO EARTH.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The pitch probably went a lil' sum'n like this:
   "There's this guy, see, who's a frustrated jock, and he's on the
    verge of becoming unfrustrated, when this gang of angels - let's
    call them Mr. King (Chazz Palminteri) and his bumbling assistant,
    Keyes (Eugene Levy) - takes him from this earthly veil a few years
    before he was due. The frustrated jock grumbles about this, so the
    angels put him in a dead quarterback's body, and he goes on to win
    the pro championship and lives happily ever after!"
   "What's that?  Warren who?  Ok, never mind.  How about we make him a
    mediocre comic...hey, I know, make him a mediocre _Black_ comic!
    And let's name him Lance Barton (Chris Rock), and put him into a rich
    White guy's body, and have Lance the inner guy try to squeeze up on
    Shaniqua...nah, that's too obvious; let's make her Suntee (Regina
    King) the Social Activist...but Suntee - who can only see the White
    outer guy - hates Wellington The Rich White Guy because he keeps
    ignoring her Activator...er, Activism; and for kicks, let's have
    Well be a lardbutt whose slutty wife (Jennifer Coolidge) sneaks
    around with Well's skanky lawyer Sklar (Greg Germann) to plan Well's
    murder...and hey, for more giggles, let's have Lance - in Well's
    body, but with his Ghetto Mindset fully in place - not only win over
    the hearts and minds of his sassy maid Wanda (Wanda Sykes) and
    uptight Brit butler Cisco (Mark Addy), but also bop up and down The
    Mean Streets Of New York blasting Jungle Music and attracting
    attention from the natives, who'll have no part of Wellington The
    Rich White Guy emulating their musical stylings and cultural
    traditions! Yeah, that'll be FUNN NEEE!"
The Upshot:
Man, this flick was bad, almost to the point of pain.  This movie was
just Wrong in so many ways.  I shouldn't be surprised, not with two
credited directors and a gazillion writers (including, not surprisingly,
Rock himself).
I laughed a few times, but always in isolated, "that was a cute gag",
circumstances.  I spent most of the time wondering about how We can be
so hypocritical at times (see the "Black Factor" for more on this), why
on earth anyone would bring their young child to witness Rock's
typically-foul mouth (ditto), and whether or not someone at the WB would
get the bright idea to make this movie into a weekly series.  I was
about to say "I really hope not", but since I don't watch the WB anyway,
no worries.
I snickered at Wanda "watch me twist my neck" Sykes' antics, but I saw a
lot of the gags (including the Black-man-and-a-taxi) coming from miles
away.  Most of all, I feel sorriest for Regina King (Suntee?  As my bud
Jim Hill would say, render unto me a break) and Frankie Faison
(Whitney), who seem to get enough steady work as The Sidekick, The Comic
Relief, or The Street Hustler, but whose true talents aren't showcased
nearly as much as they should be; that streak continues, here.  As for
the Rock man himself, I have no such remorse for him; he'll get a big
enough paycheck for this one.  And I'll go back to my "avoid remakes if
at all possible" stance.  Until the next flick comes down the pike, that
is.  The things I do for 3BC...
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Take away my Ghetto Pass if you must, but surely, I can't be the only
one who thinks it's the ultimate in hypocrisy for Us to get all offended
and sh...tuff when White comics crack on Black folks using the same
language that *Black* comics use, can I?  Yeah yeah yeah, "only family
can dog family"...I've heard it all before.  What. Ever.
And I've changed my mind; I'm not gonna call out the Black family that
brought their very young son to see this, though I cringed when the kid
starting howling at some of Rock's more...colorful language.  It's not
really that family's fault; not when the idiots running the MPAA gave
this one a *PG-13* rating.  But I shouldn't be surprised: this is the
same MPAA that, in all their sublime cluelessness, gave BILLY ELLIOT an
R rating.  Pardon my french, but the MPAA can kiss my Bl[MPAA WARNING:
LANGUAGE NOT FIT FOR CHILDREN UNDER 13. UNLESS THEY'RE FRENCH.]
Bammer's Bottom Line:
DOWN TO EARTH was a prime example of why I Hate Remakes.  If *this* is
what your movies are gonna look like, Chris, stick with stand-up.
You're a whole lot funnier on stage than in lame flicks like this one.
DOWN TO EARTH (rating: yellowlight):
Hear ye, hear ye: Bammer declares the rest of 2001 "Remake-free Year".
You may go back to what you were doing now.  Have a nice day.

Title
Review for 28 Days (2000)
28 DAYS (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 103 minutes 
Genre: Dramedy 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0191754 
Official site: http://www.sony.com/28days/  
Written by: Susannah Grant  
Directed by: Betty Thomas
Starring: Sandra Bullock, Dominic West, Viggo Mortensen, Azura Skye, 
Elizabeth Perkins, Reni Santoni, Alan Tudyk, Mike O'Malley, 
Steve Buscemi, Marianne Jean-Baptiste, Diane Ladd
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bams28days.html
"Break it up, folks; nuthin' to see here..."
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Gwen (Sandra Bullock) parties like it's 1999; a drink in one hand and 
pills in the other, Gwen and her boyfriend Jasper (Dominic West) go on a 
bender and trash the wedding of Gwen's long-suffering sister Lily 
(Elizabeth Perkins), topping off the day by crashing a "borrowed" limo.
Sentenced to rehab for 28 days [clever title then, har har!], Gwen is 
made to Confront Her Inner Demons alongside other rehab residents, 
including her young, confused roommate Andrea (Azura Skye), 
resentfully-scarred Daniel (Reni Santoni), big lug Oliver (Mike 
O'Malley), Comic Relief/Sensitive Guy Gerhardt (Alan Tudyk), 
ObBlackResident Roshanda (Marianne Jean-Baptiste), addict and celebrity 
baseball player Eddie Boone (Viggo Mortensen), and even her ex-addict 
counselor Cornell (Steve Buscemi)--all learning to Live Life One Day At 
A Time.
The Upshot:
One of these days, I'd like for someone to explain to me just what the 
difference between Julia Roberts and Sandra Bullock is.  Besides the 
$20mil per ploddingly dull picture that Roberts gets and Bullock 
doesn't, I just don't see it.  But then again, I'm not the target demo 
for either of these chicks.  Slot-A Roberts could've easily been plugged 
into this Hole-B flick without it missing a beat, and the only 
difference would be that 28 DAYS would've come away with a 
gazillion-dollar first day box office draw.  And I would've slept 
through her version, too.
There was one--count 'em, one--scene in this entire movie that wound up 
surprising me, and that came at the very end; keeping it as spoiler-free 
as I can, I'll just say that it has to do with whom Gwen didn't Walk Off 
Into The Sunset with.  Other than that, 28 DAYS was a pedestrian movie 
about characters I can't be arsed to care about, getting into situations 
that have been covered to hell and back by actors who actually made me 
want to see What Happens Next.  No one here, not even Comic 
Relief/Sensitive Guy Gerhardt, was anywhere near original; other than 
being a pretty bad poster for the Just Say No types, 28 DAYS did nothing 
to earn its keep.
Well, that's not quite true.  Two other bits in this movie actually kept 
my attention during the short time they were given on-screen: the 
often-funny faux soap, "Santa Cruz", was more interesting than the movie 
that surrounded it ("Tiny clusters of brain tumors" will stay with me 
for awhile); and the very funny background P.A. announcements 
("Tonight's lecture: Are you a blackout drunk, or don't you remember?") 
voiced by Betty (Margo Martindale), drew me out of my near-doze.  Pity 
that these bits were lost within a flick unworthy of these moments of 
ingenuity.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
A situation comedy without the laughs, disguised as a drama, that wound 
up a Tragedy.  Made for a good sleeping pill, though.

Title
Review for Lara Croft: Tomb Raider (2001)
TOMB RAIDER (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 101 minutes
Genre: Action
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.tombraidermovie.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0146316
Written by: Patrick Massett, John Zinman
Directed by: Simon West
Cast: Angelina Jolie, Jon Voight, Iain Glen, Daniel Craig, Noah Taylor,
Chris Barrie
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamstombraider.html
Of all the sins in the world of motion pictures, the most unforgivable
sin is to bore the audience to death.
Which is why TOMB RAIDER is damned to hell.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Based on the best-selling videogame series, TOMB RAIDER stars Angelina
Jolie as Lara Croft, Butt-Kickin' British Archaeologist Babe.
  [insert silly Hollywood plot about how Lara is The Only One who can
   possibly save Earth from the Evil Plan To Rule The Earth And All The
   Other Little Planets by greedy little pissants like Illuminati member
   Manfred Powell (Iain Glen) and Powell's cohort in the person of
   traitorous American archaeologist Alex Marrs (Daniel Craig), using
   only her manservant Hilary (Chris Barrie), TechnoGeek employee Bryce
   (Noah Taylor), The Force carried around by her dead father Lord Croft
   (Jon Voight), and most of all, her handy-dandy Big Guns - oh yeah,
    plus her pistols - here].
The Upshot (WARNING: **DEFINITE spoilers contained below**):
Beyond all the MysticMumboJumbo, beyond Lara's SuperPowers (chief among
them, her PerkyTits), beyond the total lack of character development in
this completely plot-driven movie (Not A Good Thing, when the plot
stinks), there is a question that I kept asking; one similar to the
question Spock had in the similarly-bad STAR TREK 5 when he asked, "why
would God need a starship?"
My question?  Why in the world would someone who had the capacity to
give someone else The Power Of God, do so?  No, really; I need to know.
If you had The Key, the only way to unlock The Mysteries Of The
Universe, something no one else could force from you, because you could
always call a Do Over - would you just say "right; here ya go, mate".
WTF? I mean, WTFF?
Nothing else about this movie mattered to me beyond that question.  It
didn't matter that Patrick Massett and John Zinman wouldn't know a good
story if it fell on its knees and offered them a Lewinsky, or that Simon
West apparently only watched the second, gut-bustingly awful "Indiana
Jones" flick [maybe the much-superior first and third installments
weren't available at Blockbuster that weekend], or that Angelina Jolie's
Humorous Bits were delivered in such a staccato voice, they may as well
have been absent, or that NOT ONE of the supporting characters'
backstories, made the slightest bit of bloody sense (not that their
front stories were any better).  No, none of that mattered, nor did the
admittedly well-executed stuntwork of TOMB RAIDER - all because of that
damnable question.  Or, more to the point, because of its only logical
answer.
Thanks, guys, for trashing another hero of mine, with illogic, bad
plotting, and useless background characters.  Thanks a bleepin lot.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I'm pissed.  Sorry, but there's no better way to put it.  I'm completely
ripped.  I had anticipated this movie for so long - mostly because I
thought Jolie was absolutely perfect for it.  And this is the thanks I
get?
I'm just glad Hollyweird has no interest in developing a QBert movie.
TOMB RAIDER (rating: flashing redlight):
The upside?  It's pretty much a sure bet that there won't be a "Tomb
Raider 2".  How could there be?  They've already used up their Power Of
God chip; where would one go from there?

Title
Review for Whole Nine Yards, The (2000)
The Whole Nine Yards (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 105 minutes
Genre: Comedy 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0190138 
Official site: http://www.nineyards.net/  
Written by: Mitchell Kapner
Directed by: Jonathan Lynn
Starring: Bruce Willis, Matthew Perry, Rosanna Arquette, 
Michael Clarke Duncan, Natasha Henstridge, Amanda Peet, 
Kevin Pollak, Harland Williams
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsnineyards.html
I can give or take Bruce Willis; he's ok as an actor, but he generally 
doesn't come close to rockin' my movie-watchin' world.  I only know that 
Matthew Perry is on TV's "Friends" because I always flip quickly past 
that show as soon as its theme song comes on.  But the man of the "Nine 
Yards" Hour for me was Michael Clarke Duncan, who played "Frankie Figs" 
Figueroa here.  After seeing him shine so brightly in my favorite flick 
of 1999 - The Green Mile- I made it a point to catch anything he's in 
from now on, to see if "Green" was just a fluke, or if he'd always be 
typecast as the Big Black Guy (with, of course, a Heart Of Gold).  But 
I'm getting ahead of myself.
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
-From the official web page:
   Nicholas "Oz" Oseransky (Matthew Perry) is a nice dentist
   dentist living in suburban Montreal. His new next door neighbor,
   Jimmy "The Tulip" Tudeski (Bruce Willis), is  a hit man hiding
   out from a dangerous Chicago crime family. Despite their 
   differences, Oz and Jimmy have one thing in common: someone's 
   trying to kill them both. For Jimmy, avoiding a couple of hired 
   killers is child's play. But for Oz, it's a whole new ball game.
   To stay alive, they're going to have to stick together - Jimmy 
   with his cunning and cold-blooded accuracy and Oz with his 
   dental tools.
The Upshot
When I found out that "Nine" had a sneak preview locally, I checked out 
its official movie site;  after I read the above description, I rolled 
my eyes, held my nose, and got my tickets.   And was pleasantly 
surprised to find out, once again, that, PR Machines often misinform and 
mislead the public about their product; that is, there's way more to The 
Whole Nine Yards than that lame description would lead you to believe.
The story started out slow (and no, I don't mean "slowly"), and ended 
with a whimper instead of a bang.  But that middle...by the time I 
finally left the theater, I had already resolved to watch it again next 
week when it's released nationwide.  The storyline was nothing to write 
home about--we've seen variations of it before--but the way it was told 
is what made this comedy work.  It had a very natural flow to it: 
something that doesn't often happen in comedies, especially not the 
sitcom variety. I found myself wondering where the time went, and almost 
surprised that it was ending so soon when it was over (and not in the 
"that's it?" way I was with Eye Of The Beholder). And if by some stretch 
of the imagination, "Nine" could technically be labelled a "sitcom", it 
wasn't like any I've seen before.  I never had a problem with suspending 
my disbelief [well, rarely, as in the case of Ms. Arquette and Mr. 
Pollak; but I'll get to that later]. I'm looking forward to going again, 
if only to catch the bits I missed the first time around.
A nice touch was the use of jazz throughout; in these days of 
"soundtracks" being really just a vehicle to promote whichever singers 
or rappers the producer happens to be in bed wi...er, like, it's 
refreshing to hear music that's actually part of the movie, rather than 
tacked on to sell CDs.  Of course, with Cynthia Biddle having gotten a 
lot of screen time in "Nine", the question is begged whether she 
was...liked...by the "Nine's" producer herself.  But no matter; I'd 
rather hear jazz that counts, than rock or rap that doesn't.
The actors and their characters, though, were the real story behind 
"Nine".  During his heyday in the "Moonlighting" TV series and Die Hard 
movies, Willis hogged the spotlight away from his co-stars; whether on 
purpose or accidently, he treated the world as if it were his very own 
personal stage.  Not so in "Nine"; here, his "Tulip" was much more 
subdued, but at the same time, (for lack of a better word) commanding.  
There's a noticeable shift partway through the movie, when Jimmy takes 
on a mean streak and the old hammy Willis starts to come to the fore, 
but that doesn't last for long, and Willis again blends in with the 
not-quite-ensemble cast.  With the caveat that I haven't yet seen The 
Sixth Sense in its entirety, I opine that "Nine" is Bruce Willis' best 
work since Die Hard (the original, of course).
Matthew Perry really surprised me; I fully expected his Oz to be a 
one-dimensional doofus, pratfalling his way across the screen only to 
speed past Go, collect his $200 Bucks, and go back to his TV show.  
Well, he did sorta-kinda, but in a charming way.  Though Oz too easily 
became "wise" about halfway through the flick, and his relationship with 
Jimmy's estranged wife Cynthia (Natasha Henstridge) worked my nerve, I 
looked past that.  Oz getting creamed by Figs, running into glass 
doors--hey, that was just plain funny.  Sue me for liking physical 
comedy; I Loved Lucy, too.
Dragging the movie down somewhat were Rosanna Arquette as Oz's screechy 
wife Sophie, Harland Williams as Buffalo Steve, a "hitter" that Sophie 
hires, and surprisingly, Kevin Pollak's Janni Gogolack, leader of the 
Chicago Hungarian mob that Jimmy ratted on (which is the reason why he 
moved to Canada in the first place).  Janni was basically a one-trick 
pony in this movie; his schtick was the way he slowly mumbled and 
"mispronounced" words in a supposedly Hungarian accent [(ObInsideJoke) 
Gee's Faffamems, it weren't]. Worth only a quick chuckle or two, it 
seemed a waste of Pollak's talents. Buffalo Steve was nothing more than 
(literally?) a stiff; though (I guess) the character was needed to 
advance the story, there was far too little explanation of what he was 
there for, to make him work.  And not to be outdone by her sister 
Patricia "Gots Ta Fix Mah Teefes" Arquette, Rosanna just made me wanna 
smack Sophie upside the head whenever she opened her mouth and out 
spilled the most phony French-Canadian accent I've ever heard.  Yeah, I 
know Sophie was supposed to be unlikable, but was Rosanna?  Still, these 
were minor quibbles, to be sure; they were distractions, but not 
detrimentally so.
There's one part of the movie that really ground my liver, though; I 
won't get into it, because it'd spoil the whole thing too much, but it 
shouldn't be hard to figure it out once you've seen it through to the 
end.  Maybe I'll open up a discussion of it on the "Viewer Voices" 
webboard after the movie opens nationwide next week.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Today, Bammer's having a two-for-one special: I dish on the "Black 
Factor" and the "Female Factor".  Ain't it kewl?
So, how did Michael Clarke Duncan acquit himself?  Quite well, I 
thought.  There were no vestiges of John Coffey to be found in Duncan's 
portrayal of Frankie Figs, one of Yanni's crew, sent out to get Jimmy.  
His natural "bigness" notwithstanding, my fears of his being typecast as 
the Big Black Guy, were unfounded; unlike Coffey, Duncan didn't play 
Figs as Larger Than Life.  Yes, he's Big, and yes, he's Black--but 
neither were really The Point here (except in as much as a hitman's 
hitman needs to be foreboding to put the fear in their target).  The 
truth will out in future films, of course, but for now, Frankie Figs was 
as far as Duncan could get from John Coffey; and the good thing is, both 
John and Figs were served well by the same actor. 
As for the "Female Factor", leaving all thoughts of the Arquette sisters 
aside [gives me the hives just to think of that family.  Who says the 
Baldwin Brothers are the only sibling scourge of Hollywood?  I know I 
don't say that...but I do digress.], the FF is represented well in 
"Nine" by two actresses.  The first is Natasha Henstridge as Cynthia: a 
pretty version of Julia Roberts, Henstridge seemed to know her "place" 
in this movie was to be pretty and frustrated, and she came through 
admirably; in this, she should be able to challenge Roberts' crown as 
"Highly Paid Actress With No Real Talent".  But stealing the show was 
the fall-out funny Cynthia Peet as Jill, the Dental Assistant With A 
Twist.  Already funny when the audience thought she was "just" a 
secretary, Jill had me rollin' in almost every scene she was in, 
especially after Oz told her about "The Tulip".  Peet's enthusiam was 
contagious, and seemed to make the other actors performances go up a 
notch or two: the scenes with Jill, Oz, and Jimmy interacting, were 
great to watch--as was Cynthia and Jill's scene together.
I think I'll be following Amanda Peet around the Big Screen, too.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
If I had to describe The Whole Nine Yards in one word, that word would 
be "fun"; the story was fun for the audience (after the slow start), and 
the cast and crew seemed to be having fun telling the story.  That's a 
rare combination in movie comedies these days, what with "comedy" being 
co-opted more and more with "drama" to make "dramadies".  Bammer sez, 
ain't nuttin' wrong with being straight (but intelligently) funny.  More 
comedies oughta try it, dig?
"The Whole Nine Yards" (rating: greenlight): 
Mark the calendar, y'all: on February 12, 2000, Bammer actually liked a 
"broad comedy".  Will wonders never cease...

Title
Review for Highlander: Endgame (2000)
HIGHLANDER: ENDGAME (2000)
Rated R; running time 85 minutes
Genre: Action
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0144964
Official site: http://www.highlanderendgame.com/
Written by: Wayne Beach, Simon Davis Barry
Directed by: Christian Duguay
Cast: Adrian Paul, Christopher Lambert, Bruce Payne, Lisa Barbuscia,
Ian Paul Cassidy, Adam "Edge" Copeland, Damon Dash, Sheila Gish,
Jim Byrnes, Peter Wingfield, Donnie Yen
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshighlander.html
After sitting through the torture that was this gag-inducing movie, I
feel sorriest for those faithful "Highlander" fans of both the original
movie starring Christopher Lambert as Connor MacLeod of the Clan
MacLeod, and the followup TV series starring Adrian Paul as his kinsman,
Duncan MacLeod; fans who waited all these years for the lightning that
once was Highlander to strike again.  And this lame longform (emphasis
on "long") version of a bad music video is the thanks they get?
It's been awhile since I've seen a movie that both sucks and blows at
the same time.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The main characters in the "Highlander" series and movies are an unknown
quantity of immortals (as in, men and women who can only die if one
removes their head from their body) who walk the earth in anticipation
of The Quickening (a gathering of immortals in which they go, excuse the
pun, head-to-head), with the end result being only one immortal left
standing.  After all, There Can Be Only One.
Some immortals - including the MacLeod kinsmen - see these duels as a
necessary evil.  Connor, even moreso than Duncan, after the latest Love
Of His Life is done in by a mysterious stranger.  Hoping to be rid of
the curse of immortality, Connor hides away in Sanctuary, on holy ground
(the one place where immortals do not do their dastardly deeds).  But
the Big Kahuna Immortal, Jacob Kell (Bruce "needs a membership to
Overactors Anonymous" Payne) knows no such boundaries; he seeks revenge
on Connor for Connor's having killed his "unarmed" priest father
centuries ago, when Kell Senior helped to burn Connor's mother at the
stake when the Kells discovered that Connor was...oh, must this madness
go on???
The Upshot:
The original HIGHLANDER movie was something of a cult hit, to the best
of my recollection; Christopher Lambert always struck me as someone
whose acting was probably best served when done in his mother tongue,
but the whole time-traveller concept from the first movie, was fun
enough to give in to, and served as fuel for many similar types of
flicks which followed.  Parts two and three were utter bollocks, but
they were easily forgotten - because those of us who liked the series,
starring Adrian Paul as Connor's kinsman Duncan, simply replaced the
conflicting bits of fodder with new canon from the series' creators.  It
also helped when Lambert made periodic guest appearances on the series,
so for awhile, all was well.
As with many syndicated TV series, holes began to develop in the show's
structure, and after awhile, HIGHLANDER the series fell off my radar.  I
kept up with it just enough to know that there was supposedly a movie
"in the works" (and remember, this was a few years ago that I first
heard this), and I waited.  and waited.  and waited.  for something to
come of it.
I had almost forgotten about the movie, until I saw it pop up on a few
"coming attractions" sites.  After seeing this travesty, I wish I'd
never seen any parts of those sites.
HIGHLANDER: ENDGAME is such a weak piece of sh...detritus, I hate
mentioning it in the same breath as the cheesy, but fun, series and
original movie.  This version Stinks, with a capital "S" - mostly
because the movie's Powers That Be took a good, already-established
concept, and wiped their butt with it in favor of one of the most lame
plots possible: a super-immortal, after all this time?  And suddenly,
Duncan also has this riot chick pop up from seemingly out of nowhere, as
part of his Distant, Secret Past?  That'd be like...like...like Captain
Kirk, suddenly finding himself with The Son He Never Knew He Had. Give
me a effin' break, will ya?
The only thing - and I do mean, the ONLY thing - that saved this flick
from the redlight district, is its use of mostly-effective "flashbacks",
similar to those done in the series (and, I believe, the original
movie).  They were the best thing about the series anyway, as the
"flashbacks" show the two leads in all their playful glory.  But can
someone explain for once and for all why Adrian Paul always seems to get
a thicker brogue the further back in time Duncan goes?
Too bad those "flashbacks" couldn't just be extracted from the whole
film, transplanted back to the small screen (where, I say in my
completely unopinionated manner, it belonged in the first place), and
made into a decent bon voyage to the series.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
All that, and Diva's Brotha Rule is in full effect too?  Will the
madness *ever* end?  Sheesh!
Bammer's Bottom Line:
What a horrible ripoff!  Highlander fans, y'all deserve better than this
dreck.  But please, Hollywood, no mas, no mas.
HIGHLANDER: ENDGAME (rating: flashing redlight):
I hope the term "endgame" is a promise, not an idle threat.  Man, did
this one blow.

Title
Review for Insider, The (1999)
The Insider (1999) 
Rated R; running time 152 minutes
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0140352 
Official site: http://www.theinsider-themovie.com/  
Written by: Eric Roth (based on the article by Marie Brenner) 
Directed by: Michael Mann
Starring:  Al Pacino, Russell Crowe, Christopher Plummer, Diane Venora, 
Philip Baker Hall, Gina Gershon, Wings Hauser, Debi Mazar (Debbie De 
Luca), Lindsay Crouse (Sharon Tiller), Stephen Tobolowsky (Eric 
Kluster), Colm Feore (Richard Scruggs), Bruce McGill (Ron Motley), 
Michael Gambon (Thomas Sandefur), Rip Torn (John Scanlon), Lynne Thigpen 
(Mrs. Williams), Hallie Kate Eisenberg (Barbara Wigand), Robert Harper 
(Mark Stern), Nestor Serrano (FBI Agent Robertson), Pete Hamill (N.Y. 
Times Reporter), Cliff Curtis (Sheik Fadlallah), Renee Olstead (Deborah 
Wigand), Mississippi Attorney General Michael Moore (Himself), Robbie G. 
Tomlin (Sammy Bergman), Clyde Lee (WRTV 6 Newscaster), Eyal Podell 
(Lowell's Son), Madeleine Reller (Lesley Stahl), Chris Ufland (Doug 
Oliver)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsinsider.html
Remember way back in December when I reviewed "Any Given Sunday" and 
wondered if, as an actor, Al Pacino had grown as tired as his football 
coach character was?  Well, based on his performance in The Insider, 
Pacino is as full of piss and vinegar as he was back in his Dog Day 
Afternoon prime.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
In a movie populated with far too many characters to give proper 
attributes to in this small space, the central characters of Jeffrey 
Wigand (Russell Crowe), Lowell Bergman (Al Pacino) and Mike Wallace 
(Christopher Plummer) stand out most.  Jeffrey Wigand, a scientist and 
V.P. at tobacco giant Brown & Williamson, is pursued by CBS' "60 
Minutes" producer Lowell Bergman after Wigand is fired from B&W and 
Bergman is given anonymous tips by an insider that tobacco companies 
knowingly and willfully put harmful chemicals in their cigarettes to get 
smokers hooked on them.  Even though Wigand has been fired, he hesitates 
to talk to Bergman and reporter Mike Wallace about the company, due to a 
confidentiality clause he signed with B&W, and in fact Wigand finds 
himself under increasing harassment and smear campaign tactics from 
unnamed sources (who he naturally assumes are connected to B&W) to keep 
his mouth shut.  
After Bergman convinces him that Bergman and a group of lawyers he hires 
can protect Wigand, Wigand agrees to be interviewed by Wallace; but that 
confidentiality clause comes back to haunt both men when Bergman, 
Wallace, and Executive Producer Don Hewitt (Phillip Baker Hall) are put 
under pressure by CBS' legal department, led by Helen Caperelli (Gina 
Gershon), to drop Wigand's interview from the "60 Minutes" story.  
Remarkably, the CBS executives do just that, leaving Wigand to suffer 
the smear campaign alone, after his wife Liane (Diane Venora) and 
children leave him.  Bergman, however, has other plans...
The Upshot:
Let me be perfectly frank: I didn't go to see "The Insider" because I'd 
heard it was Da Bomb.  I didn't go because I had 2.5 hours of free time 
on a lonely Saturday night (trust me, I didn't), nor because I had a 
hankerin' to see a Good Guy vs Bad Guy fable.  I'll be straight-up with 
you; I went to see this flick for the same reason that tens of 
Jonny-come-lately critics and moviegoers went to see it after its 
re-release: because it was nominated for an Academy Award.  I'll not put 
forth any illusions that I cared for the tone of this film, for its High 
Moral Stance about the trials and travails of the Little Whistleblower 
versus the Big Bad Tobacco Company in the one corner, and the Evil Media 
Empire in the other.  I mean, to me, this movie rested squarely on the 
same continuum of last year's simple-minded, ridiculously hyped (and 
sheeple-ly watched) Titanic flick: Little Man Blow Whistle.  Big Bad 
Tobacco Company Squash Little Whistleblower. Evil Media Empire Leave 
Little Whistleblower Twisting In Wind. Little Whistleblower Fight Back. 
Good Triumphs Over Evil.  End Of Movie.  And to an extent, that's how 
it's laid out for the viewer.
That extent, of course, doesn't do much justice to the powerhouse 
performances by Pacino, Crowe, and the underappreciated Plummer, an 
actor whose characters always have the same sly grin that a Rottweiler 
might just before he tears you a new one.  Crowe garnered an Oscar 
nomination for his against-type performance, a nod which he richly 
deserved; an Aussie whose next big flick, Gladiator, has him filling 
Kirk Douglas' sandals, Crowe sinks his teeth into this meaty role and 
digs in--even when it gets Weird.  And the aforementioned Pacino puts in 
a solid performance that makes me wonder why he, too, wasn't seriously 
considered for a nomination.  Lack of character flaws aside (though it 
was a central issue for me that both Bergman and Wigand were presented 
as Put-Upon Heros with little culpability), they both did an outstanding 
job in keeping the noticeably-longish movie going smoothly, for the most 
part.  
Michael Mann's direction, on the other hand, tended to get in the way 
for me; while I'm sure there are critics out there, hailing Mann's 
so-close-up-the-nose, you-wanna-grab-a-tissue closeups as the pinnacle 
of cinematic art, I found them as tedious as Weigand's hallucinations 
were laughable.   Mann didn't totally screw the pooch--his artistic use 
of light and shadows, and beautiful shots of the Mississippi coastline, 
really worked for me, as did his general direction of the actors 
themselves.  But those closeups gave me a daggone headache.
As for the movie itself, in the end, it all boils down to this: the 
movie, as good as it may have been, failed to impart a sense of Urgency! 
in me, because of the times we live in in American society.  Crooked 
politicians, slimy lawyers, opportunistic Media outlets, 
morally-bankrupt businesses: they're all part and parcel of The System 
in which we all are trapped; for all its chest-thumping, this movie 
isn't telling us something we don't already know. 
As I said earlier, there are far too many characters--and actors--to 
properly attribute from this lengthy film (thus, the addition of 
character names next to the credited actors above but not mentioned in 
the body of this review).  Try as I might, I can't even remember half of 
the characters that the Internet Movie Database lists in starring roles 
(and the Flash-laden official movie site doesn't help much).  But for 
all of the pomp and circumstance surrounding the main players, there's 
one scene late in the movie, involving two character actors playing 
lawyers (one of whom is Wings Hauser, and the other whose name escapes 
me right now, though he's one of those actors whose face you never 
forget) that was the highlight of this flick for me, so much so that I 
find myself often repeating the name-I-forget's memorable line.  Keeping 
this great scene as spoiler-free as I can, I'll summarize it thusly: at 
Weigand's relatively informal hearing in Mississippi, Hauser's 
character, a lawyer for the tobacco interests, continually harangues 
Weigand, telling him he can't break his confidentiality agreement; he 
does this to the objection of name-I-forget, who reminds Hauser's 
character that they aren't in a jury trial and he should just chill.  
Hauser's character, of course, fails to chill, and as their argument 
comes to a head, name-I-forget breaks off with "The Saaavern State 'a 
Mih-sippi is tellin' you to shut! the! hell! up!".  Or something like 
that.
Maybe you had to be there, but it had me rollin'.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I actually hesitate to bring this up within the context of the BF, 
because the comparison isn't valid strictly along these lines--but since 
I've read it bandied about in many email messages forwarded hither and 
yon, I'm hoping that the inclusion of the comparison within this space, 
will bring an end to the playing of this particular race card:
It's no secret that "The Insider" as well as another current movie based 
on a true story, "The Hurricane" starring Denzel Washington, are 
"burdened" by untruths, if not outright lies, included as "dramatic 
license".  Where "Insider" acknowledged these "fibs" in disclaimers 
displayed in the end credits, "Hurricane" did not, and "Hurricane" 
seemingly suffered the consequences for it, in both bad publicity and, 
likely, in not being given an Oscar nomination.  Some would say that an 
unspoken consideration was the two movie's racial makeup--"Hurricane" 
being, in their eyes, a Black movie.  To that, I say, get over it--and 
remember that Denzel picked up a Best Actor nod for that role.  Fibs and 
all.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
"Tobacco companies put Bad Stuff in cigarettes so that smokers will 
continue to ignore the limp warnings on the ciggy packages, and puff 
until their lungs are coated black with tar?  Noooo, really?  And The 
Media has no backbone, hiding behind The Peoples Right To Know whenever 
it suits them?  Git outta heah, ya gotta be kiddin me!  What's next, 
you'll tell me that "Titanic" was a dumb piece of fluff about a big boat 
that Hit Iceberg, Go Boom?"  Duh, so what's new?
"The Insider" (rating: greenlight):
Good performances that are as much wasted on a "No sh*t, Sherlock" tale.

Title
Review for My Dog Skip (2000)
My Dog Skip (2000) 
Rated PG; running time 95 minutes
Genre: Family Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0156812 
Official site: http://www.mydogskip.com/  
Written by: Gail Gilchriest (based on the book by Willie Morris)
Directed by: Jay Russell
Starring: Frankie Muniz, Diane Lane, Luke Wilson, Kevin Bacon, 
Caitlin Wachs, Bradley Coryell, Daylan Honeycutt, Cody Linley
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsmydogskip.html
"Beyond The Mat" was the only movie I had planned on seeing this 
weekend; Diva had already reviewed "Erin Brockovich" (and I had no 
desire to see that one), I thought "Final Destination" would be too 
scary for me (ObHa: Ha!), and I had seen most of the other flicks 
showing at my local cineplex.  But because a friend suggested I go see 
it when I get a chance, and because I got to the theater too early for 
"Beyond", I found myself watching "My Dog Skip" in the interim.  I think 
I'll go back to sleeping in late on the weekend.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Willie Morris (Frankie Muniz), a young boy growing up in Yazoo, 
Mississippi in the 1940s, was the only child of Jack (Kevin Bacon) and 
Ellen Morris (Diane Lane); befriended only by an adult neighbor, Dink 
Jenkins (Luke Wilson), and picked-on by Big Boy Wilkinson (Bradley 
Coryell), Henjie Henick (Daylan Honeycutt) and Spit McGee (Cody Linley), 
Will was a very lonely boy once Dink went off to the Army during World 
War II--until Skip (Moose), a Jack Russell Terrier, came into his life.
The Upshot:
Some books just don't translate well into movies; this one, like "Wonder 
Boys" before it, is one of those movies.  The evidence that "proves" "My 
Dog Skip" is a piece meant to be read more than watched, comes from the 
necessity of the narration by Harry Connick Jr.; as written, if it 
weren't for that narration, the viewer wouldn't have the foggiest about 
what was going on.  Far too many times, we were told, not shown, the 
motivations and actions of the characters; while this is to be expected 
of the dog--after all, he couldn't speak for himself--hearing Connick 
(as Adult Will) tell us over and over again that "Skip made me what I 
am!  He helped me Grow! and Learn! and I kept Learning!" quickly got on 
my last nerve.
It didn't help that bits and pieces of this movie (based on a true 
story) felt like deja vu.  We've seen the Picked-On Boy Battling 
Neighborhood Bullies ("The Boy Who Could Fly"), The Picked-On Boy 
Getting The Girl ("Forrest Gump"),  the Picked-On Boy Getting Over On 
Adult Bad Guys ("Home Alone")--you get the picture.  And the adult 
situations that we've not seen dealt with maturely before in a 
children's story--mainly, how returning vets deal with the effects of 
war--were given such short shrift in lieu of the dog's story [yes, I've 
seen the title.  Still.], they may as well have not been addressed at 
all.  True story or not, if the filming of this story had improved on 
those things we've already seen, or given a new twist to them, it 
wouldn't have been nearly the issue it was with me; but this treatment 
just left me bored, waiting for something to Happen.  It never did.
The movie did have its charms, though.  Muniz looked like he stepped 
right out of a Norman Rockwell painting, and his Southern accent was one 
of the few that stuck around throughout the entire flick; as Rivers 
Applewhite (what a name!), Caitlin Wachs was a very cute partner to 
Muniz;  and the "Show And Tell" scene brought back fond grade school 
memories for me.  Oh, I did so love show and tell...sigh
The one thing that didn't work in its favor was the dog itself.  The 
"actor", Moose, is a regular on the TV series "Frasier"; I love the 
series, but don't care for the dog nor his character there, "Eddie".  
Likewise here in the movie, his "cute" factor quickly wore off, and all 
the poor kiddies drawn in by the cute commercials and trailers, saw 
everything that might possibly get their attention happen in the first 
20 minutes or so; the rest was a rather trite trip down Nostalgia Lane 
for the oldsters amongst us.
I'd hate to think that, for a movie revolving around an animal to be any 
good, said animal would need to be either animated or voiced by a human; 
scoff if you will, but Harry Connick's narration in the place of Danny 
DeVito's voiceover as a dog in "Look Who's Talking Now", isn't much of a 
bargain.  Uh, on second thought...
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
A truly missed opportunity for this movie the came with handling the 
issue--hinted at in the film, but not really addressed--of segregation.  
We saw images on screen of Blacks being made to sit in the balcony at 
the local movie house, and Blacks playing ball separately from Whites, 
but other than a few "Colored people can't do so and so"'s here and 
there, it was as if the viewer was supposed to infer, from past 
knowledge, that there were racial problems in Will's life that he 
probably eventually came to grips with.  But perhaps that's best, after 
all; I guess I should be happy that he wasn't made out to be the Civil 
Rights Crusader like his counterpart in "Crazy In Alabama", but, still.  
But boyo, Will sure did Learn from that dog of his, yessiree bob!
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
I'm sure this was a pretty sweet book.  But as a movie, it just doesn't 
cut it; the kids in the audience were bored after the puppy grew up--and 
most of the adults had already fallen asleep well before then. "A dog" 
pretty much sums it up. 
"My Dog Skip" (rating: yellowlight): 
In dog years, that's seven yellowlights.

Title
Review for Coyote Ugly (2000)
COYOTE UGLY (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 94 minutes
Genre: Drama [I guess.]
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0200550
Official site: http://studio.go.com/movies/coyoteugly/index.html
Written by: Gina Wendkos, Jeff Nathanson
Directed by: David McNally
Cast: Piper Perabo, Maria Bello, Adam Garcia, Izabella Miko,
John Goodman, Tyra Banks, Bridget Moynahan, Melanie Lynskey,
Adam Alexi-Malle
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamscoyote.html
Oh, I had all manner of Spiffy Things to say about COYOTE UGLY in this
customary Leadoff Bit of mine - but I think I'll just cut to the chase
with the one thing that kept overwhelming me throughout my whole time
watching it:  **YAWN**
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Fame!  I wanna live forev...oops, wrong flick.
A mere 42 miles away from The Big Apple is still too far a distance to
travel for Violet Sandford (Piper Perabo), a semi-orphaned songwriter
who loves her Dad (John Goodman), but needs to prove that she can Make
It There.  Violet strikes out on her own, the naivete that surely comes
from living a mere 42 miles away from The Big Apple, firmly in place.
Of course, she soon learns that in the Mean Streets, it's a Dog-Eat-Dog
world - and if she is indeed going to Make It, she'll have to develop a
fiercer Bite.  That, and stop being so gullible: a trait that made her
fall for the oldest trick in the "new girl in the Big City" book when
she's led to believe that smooth-talking busboy Kevin O'Donnell (Adam
Garcia) is a music club owner.  Though even that connection might not
have done her much good: see, she has this big stage fright Issue.
Seems like Violet just can't get a break.
Enter the women of Coyote Ugly, a "bar" that sells more Funky Diva
Attitude than it does booze.  When Violet overhears Coyote Divas Zoe
(Tyra Banks), Cammie (Izabella Miko), and Rachel (Bridget Moynahan),
talking about how well they're paid for doing their combination
bartender/dancer/Funky Diva Routine, Violet convinces bar owner Lil
(Maria Bello) to let her become a Coyote, which might possibly become
the avenue for her break into Show Bidness.
And on tomorrow's episode of "All My Young And Restless Children"...
The Upshot:
Sorry, fellas; I know that many of y'all were chompin' at the bit to
find a non-violent antidote to the ubiquitous Chick Flicks that you seem
to think dominate movie screens.  But to those who think that some
anorexic-looking Victoria's Secret-wearing ubermodels shaking their
booties on a bar provides that long-needed salvo, I ask you: is that
really the best you could do?
And I say it for a reason other than the one those of you who liked this
flick, might like to believe.  Nope, I ain't hatin' on those ubermodels
because they're Beautiful.  If I could be said to be hatin' on them at
all, it's because "Coyote's" characters and their Issues were downright
BORING.  Snooze-worthy, ABC Afterschool Special-boring.  And the worst
thing about the movie trailers wasn't that they gave away the whole plot
["Plot?  We don' need no stinkin' plot!"]; it's that the trailers pretty
much showed all the movie's titsnass - which was the best, and most
briefly shown, thing about this otherwise trite flick.
I can just picture that first meeting by this movie's Powers That Be,
when they heard about the real-life Coyote Ugly bar..."Hey guys!", I can
hear them saying; "there's this great tittie bar over yonder where the
girls jump up on the bar and get down, get funky, get loose, like TGI
Fridays On Steroids, woohoo!  Yeah, and they pour more liquor on
themselves and on their customers than into the liquor glasses!  Doesn't
it sound Kewl?  Shouldn't we make a Movie of it?  Huh, storyline?  Who
needs a storyline?  Let's just throw a few shots of titsnass in there,
that'll make the horny 14-year-olds start buying tickets, yeah!  Ok, ok,
I guess we need some type of storyline, gosh darn it.  Lesseee...nah,
let's not bother with telling the story of how these girls came to be
Coyotes; we just need 'em for tittielation.  I got it: let's throw in an
Obligatory Love Story between Violet and Aussie Dude Kevin!  And let's
have Kevin's past be Mysterious!  And let's not forget to throw in
something about her mother's Tragic Past and how it becomes Violet's
Performance Anxiety Issue!  And hey, d'ya think we might be able to work
those backstreetnsync98degreesboys in there somewhere?  No...ok then,
let's just roll with what we've got, we'll make a Mint!"
And as is usually the case, the short-sightedness of Hollywood types
that see only dollar signs in front of their eyes when they're reading a
script, screwed this pooch.  They could've had an interesting, yet
entertaining, look at the Stuff that made the real Coyote Ugly what it
is [from all reports lately, a tourist attraction overrun with
mouthbreathers who can't differentiate reality from movies.  But I have
little sympathy for the bar; hell, what'd they expect?]  "Who needs to
bother with that real-life thing?", Mr. Hollywood probably said; "We got
titsnass!"  Which would've been fine - except they didn't even have much
of *that*; certainly not much more than they showed in the giveaway
trailers.  And minus the titsnass, the movie was one big snoozer.
The actors, confined within the limitations of the script and direction,
["Ok girls, shake your booties! Ok, Cut!  Ok Piper, you and Adam do
something Mushy And Romantic here!  Ok, Cut!] perform their dubious
tasks adequately, though Piper Perabo just does nothing for me.  She
played naive as Just Plain Dumb, and the results of each of her actions
were telegraphed a mile away [show of hands for those who know the
answer to this one: what happens when you let your best friend store a
big wad o' dough in your paper-thin-walled apartment's refrigerator?
Thought so.]  John Goodman's Big Lug Dad was amusing at first, but
eventually wore as thin as Violet's walls.  Bridget Moynahan showed some
gusto as Scary Spice...er, Rachel, but it all really amounted to lame
setups to show how well Violet could Overcome.  Only Maria Bello showed
up with any semblance of subtlety; her Lil was understated at first (if
she was one of "Charlie's Angels", she'd be The Smart One), and I had
high hopes for her.  Until the writers dashed my hopes upon the Wall Of
Happy Endings.  bah.
Hey, I don't see nuttin' wrong/with a little bump-n-grind.  But too
little, in a movie that's played up to be about Strong Chicks Owning
Their Sexuality (but doesn't even come close) just grinds my gizzard.
Forget the Brittany Spears angle and the dialogue even a porno writer
would eschew; lets have more tittielation, Mr. Hollywood!
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I have to give the filmmakers some credit in their adding a new twist on
Diva's "Brotha Rule" in the form of Tyra Banks' character Zoe [though, I
reckon that should really be the "Sista Rule", eh?]. And as a bonus (as
well as an aside to Diva and Tanya), I got my first taste of the "Spot
The Spot" game, in the form of the ObBlack wedding guest dancing with
one of White guests (and trust me: it was mere Background Noise.  If
those two characters were dating one another, I'm Barbara Bush).  You're
right, Diva and Tanya: playing "Spot The Spot" can be fun!
[I'll explain later, via email, to those who are curious about whathell
"Spot The Spot" means]
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Take away the titsnass, and you have an "ABC Afternoon Special" story.
They should do all the gawkers a favor, and wrap all the titsnass up in
a bright red 15-minute-peepshow bow.  Better yet, save the peepshow
quarter, and just watch the commercials.  Same difference.
COYOTE UGLY (rating: flashing redlight):
Christina Agiluerra, Brittany Spears, Leann Rhimes...same difference.

Title
Review for Hanging Up (2000)
Hanging Up (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 92 minutes
Genre: Comedy/Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0162983 
Official site: http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/hangingup/index.html
Written by: Nora Ephron (based on the story by Delia Ephron)
Directed by: Diane Keaton
Starring: Meg Ryan, Diane Keaton, Lisa Kudrow, Walter Matthau, 
Adam Arkin, Cloris Leachman, Jesse James 
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshangingup.html
As the middle of seven sisters, I've been anticipating seeing "Hanging 
Up" for weeks now.  Surely, I thought, they'd be addressing Issues like 
the ones I've had with my younger and older siblings for thirtysomething 
years now.  Surely, I thought, the Female Factor would be in full 
effect.  Surely, I thought, I'd leave the theater with a better 
Understanding of the mystique that is sisterhood--or at least pleased at 
having been able to identify with the chicks on screen ("yeah girl, my 
sister tried to play that sh...tuff too!") 
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
In what probably sounded better On Paper than what was actually 
realized, Eve (Meg Ryan), Georgia (Diane Keaton) and Maddy (Lisa Kudrow) 
are sisters who really strain to have Issues with each other, with their 
dying father (Walter Matthau), with their estranged mother (Cloris 
Leachman), and with the phones that seem to rule their lives. 
The Upshot
Take note: this will be the shortest review I've written to 
date--because there's really not much to tell.  This movie can be summed 
up in a single phrase: the Ephron sisters (Nora and Delia, co-writers of 
this dud) need to keep their boring Issues to themselves. 
I tried, lord knows I did, to find something to write about.  The 
storyline just bored me to tears, being linear and obvious as it was; 
the acting was tedious; the dog was as unnecessary as the unfortunate 
inclusion of Adam Arkin as Eve's husband Joe and Jesse James as their 
son Jesse (not that they did anything wrong, per se, only that they were 
just so much dead wood in a forest full of logs); Diane Keaton's 
directing debut was uninspiring; and the whole phone gimmick was too 
through after the first or second time it was crammed down the viewers' 
throats.  Except for Leachman's somewhat interesting role as the mother 
who didn't want to be a mother, nothing else about this movie justified 
it taking up 92 minutes of my life. 
I won't take up more minutes of your life trying to make more out of 
this by-the-numbers movie than needed.  You won't laugh, you won't cry, 
you won't feel moved to tell your sisters you love them.  You'll only 
wonder why Mom and Dad Ephron didn't send their girls to writer's camp. 
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
If you've seen the trailers/commercials for this flick, you've seen the 
movie.  No, not just the best parts, I mean that you've seen the 
*movie*; the other 90 or so minutes are just filler.  Boring, trite 
filler at that.  Guess I'll have to wait for The Black "Hanging Up" to 
see my sisters and I on the big screen, after all. 

Title
Review for Gossip (2000/I)
GOSSIP (2000) 
Rated R; running time 90 minutes 
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0176783 
Official site: http://www.movies.warnerbros.com/gossip/index.html  
Written by: Gregory Poirier
Directed by: Davis Guggenheim 
Starring: Lena Headey, James Marsden, Norman Reedus, Kate Hudson, 
Joshua Jackson, Eric Bogosian, Sharon Lawrence, 
Edward James Olmos (Detective Curtis)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsgossip.html
You Know The Movie You're Watching Is Stupid When...
...you stop bothering with taking notes on it and start wondering about 
silly stuff--like, do clubs that Disaffected White Teens frequent, 
really have big huge bathrooms and big huge bedrooms with big huge beds 
in them?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Girl-Next-Door Cathy Jones (Lena Headey), Richie-Rich-Playboy Derek 
(James Marsden), and Strange-But-Loveable Travis (Norman Reedus) are 
Bored with living a life of privilege at their college, and even more 
bored with doing actual school work.  Given an assignment to write a 
paper on the effects of rumor and innuendo by their Professor (Eric 
Bogosian; is his character ever actually given a name?  If so, I missed 
it.  Not that I care.  But I do digress.), the trio decide to make it a 
group study by starting a rumor to see how far it spreads and what form 
it takes when it gets back to them.  
Partially because Jones hates rich folks (though she is decidedly fond 
of Derek "because he's nice"), they decide to make rich stuck-up Naomi 
(Kate Hudson) and her boyfriend Bo (Joshua Jackson) the target of their 
rumor.  After Derek watched Bo try to have sex with the drunk, teasing, 
but Just Say No-ing Naomi, Derek convinces Jones and Travis to start a 
rumor that Bo and Naomi actually had sex, though Bo apparently walked 
away from a passed-out Naomi.  And once the rumor spreads like Magical 
Wildfire across campus, Naomi--who didn't remember having said Yes--is 
convinced that Bo raped her; she reports his act to Detective Kelly 
(Sharon Lawrence), who proceeds to investigate him.  Seeing their little 
rumor take a Nasty Turn, Jones wants to put an end to it, but is met by 
some resistance by Derek, who may have a secret or two of his own.
Movies like GOSSIP (and its act-alike kin, BROKEDOWN PALACE) are an 
insult to hard-working White high school and college students 
everywhere.  They are not unlike BOOTY CALL to Black youth, in that both 
types of movies present their subjects as childish brats who need to be 
under constant adult supervision, lest they go off and do Stupid Stuff 
just so they can piss their parents and/or teachers off.
In GOSSIP, the lines are drawn quickly.  Derek is established as a liar 
and womanizer early on, saving the audience from having to Discover that 
for ourselves; likewise, Travis is shown to be The Weird One, and 
maintains that persona throughout most of the flick.  Strangely enough, 
Lena Headey chooses to play Jones with a constant smirk on her face, 
which only serves to make her character less likable; had she taken her 
character seriously and not constantly assault the audience with that 
winky smirk, Headey may have actually pulled off a more convincing 
performance. I spent the first half of the movie wondering what any of 
these characters saw in each other (especially once The Truth was 
revealed about one of them); by the second half, I no longer cared.  I 
simply prided myself on having the ability to sit through this torture 
without screaming obscenities at the screen.
As for the "adults" in this flick, I had to wonder why Edward James 
Olmos and Sharon Lawrence were so obviously slumming.  Is this what 
Lawrence left NYPD-BLUE for?  Not that she was getting much more play 
there; I guess this role must've been seen as a step up, after having 
been ignored for so long on that show.  And I don't know *what* Olmos' 
deal was; maybe they pay well for sleepy walk-throughs these days.  Eric 
Bogosian is another matter entirely.  One that I would just as soon 
forget.
I would say that the entire movie is telegraphed, leaving no surprises 
to be found; but that would be only partially true, if only because of 
the final scene.  But could these folks leave well enough alone and let 
the twist stand on its own?  I'll answer that by directing your 
attention to the redlight at the bottom of this review.
Ye gods, this was a bad movie.  Isn't there a cable channel we can 
restrict these kinds of vapid flicks to?  Criminy...we can Put A Man On 
The Moon; surely, we can Stop This Madness!
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
This one almost pulled out a yellow light solely on the basis of its 
twist ending--until they had to go and mess that up with a lame 
"explanation".  lord, save me from Disaffected Teen Flicks.
GOSSIP (rating: redlight): 
Pssst...c'mere...lemme tell you a secret: "Gossip" stunk.  But don't 
tell anybody...

Title
Review for Vertical Limit (2000)
VERTICAL LIMIT (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 126 minutes
Genre: Action
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.spe.sony.com/movies/verticallimit/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0190865
Written by: Robert King, Terry Hayes
Directed by: Martin Campbell
Cast: Chris O'Donnell, Bill Paxton, Scott Glenn, Robin Tunney,
Izabella Scorupco, Nicholas Lea, Alexander Siddig
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsvertical.html
By all rights, I shouldn't have liked VERTICAL LIMIT.  After all, Action
Flicks usually aren't my thing, especially mindless (or, in the case of
this movie, overly-earnest almost to the point of unbelievability)
Action Flicks.  So it came as a shock to me when I realized that not
only did I like this movie, I was thrilled, and even *surprised*, by it.
I reckon this was one of those times when you just had to sit back and
enjoy the ride.  And boy, whadda ride...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Our Earnest Young Hero, mountain-climber Peter Garrett (Chris O'Donnell)
is estranged from his fellow mountain-climbing sister Annie (Robin
Tunney) after a tragic accident involving their father (Stuart Wilson)
leaves Peter not ever wanting to climb again.  Peter learns that Annie
has joined the climbing crew of mega-billionaire Elliot Vaughn (Bill
Paxton), an eccentric adventurer who's using the planned climb up the
Really Big Mountain called "K2" as a publicity stunt coinciding with the
inaugural flight of his Majestic Airlines [Richard Branson...calling
Virgin Airlines' Richard Branson...]
Of course, Vaughn, an Evil Megalomaniac in disguise, has a Secret, one
which involves the Wizened Mystic climber Montgomery Wick (Scott Glenn),
who has plans of his own for the Evil Megalomaniac once Wick finds out
that Vaughn plans to go up K2 with a climbing team, led by Best Damn
Climber Tom McLaren (Nicholas Lea).
But when something goes Terribly Wrong with the climb, Earnest Peter
insists on rescuing his now-Damsel In Distress sister and company,
enlisting the aide of Wizened Mystic Wick, Comic Relief Aussie Dudes
Malcolm and Cyril (sorry; I can't find their credits listed *anywhere*),
Sensitive And Prayerful Guide Kareem (Alexander Siddig), and Medic
climber (and Peter's potential Warm Place To Put It) Monique Aubertine
(Izabella Scorupco).
Don't be fooled though: despite what the credits say, Chris O'Donnell
isn't really the star of this show.  No, the *real* focal point of this
flick is the mountain itself; K2, in all its treacherous glory, was far
and away the big kahuna here.
The Upshot:
If my rampant capitalization of those characterizations make me seem
cynical about all the Types that make up the characters of VERTICAL
LIMIT, it's because my genuine liking of this flick really surprised me.
In my book, there's little about the mix of an Earnest Young Hero, a
Damsel In Distress, an Evil Megalomaniac, an Wizened Mystic, etc., that
should Do It for me.  But yet, it did; *they* did.  Or, perhaps more
correctly, the mixologists - director Martin Campbell and
cinematographer David Tattersall - thrilled me with Gee Whiz action
shots galore.
The audience never had time to fret over the relatively-transparent
plotline, because whenever there was a moment to sit there and think
"hey, waaaait a minute...", **BOOM**! you're hit with something new
comin' 'round the mountain.  This kind of plotting couldn't hold the
movie up by itself - there's only so much Thrilling Action one can take,
even as good as "Limit"'s Thrilling Action was.  Fortunately for
VERTICAL LIMIT, a few of its characters - namely Bill Paxton's Vaughn,
the surprisingly well-used (and no, not That Way) Monique, and humorous
brother climbers Malcolm and Cyril - added a whiff of credible storyline
to the action surrounding them.
There are brief subplots involving the Pakistani army (as a
plothole-filled excuse to use devices which go **BOOM** way easily) and
one character's great need for Revenge, both of which strain the
viewer's ability to suspend disbelief just up to the point where Big!
Action! comes into play again.  I was able to work around it; some
viewers may not be able to do so.
VERTICAL LIMIT is one of those rare Action Flicks that overcomes (if not
transcends) the genre in which it resides; it maintains its high
excitement level throughout, keeps the viewer guessing about what comes
next, and even lets its supporting characters have more interesting bits
than the so-called stars have.  If only for its potentially big
surround-sound thump, VERTICAL LIMIT is most def on my "can't wait till
it's on DVD" list.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
"Story?  We don' need no steenkin' story!"  Seriously, though, VERTICAL
LIMIT was a helluva rollercoaster ride, from beginning to end; truly a
thrill a minute. If you don't mind a see-through plotline and story
resolution you can predict from a mile away, VERTICAL LIMIT is the
Action Flick to catch this season.
VERTICAL LIMIT (rating: greenlight):
Don't worry: I won't end this with a lame "Eagles" punchline.  I'll
leave that one to the movie.

Title
Review for Perfect Storm, The (2000)
THE PERFECT STORM (2000)
Rated R; running time 135 minutes
Genre: Drama/Action
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0177971
Official site: http://www.perfectstorm.net/
Written by: William D. Wittliff (based on the book by Sebastian Junger)
Directed by: Wolfgang Petersen
Cast: George Clooney, Mark Wahlberg, Diane Lane, John C. Reilly,
John Hawkes, William Fichtner, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio,
Michael Ironside, Allen Payne, Janet Wright, Karen Allen,
Bob Gunton (Alexander McAnally III), Rusty Schwimmer (Big Red),
Josh Hopkins (Lt. Barry Ennis), Cherry Jones (Edie Bailey),
Dash Mihok (Lt. Kenny Mitchell)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsperfect.html
There's a scene in THE PERFECT STORM where the six Glouchester
swordfishermen look out over the bow of their ship and see nothing but
plain ugly skies coming ahead of them, knowing full well that they'd
soon be heading into that ugliness, since home was that'away.  As a
frequent long-distance motorcyclist, I could Feel Their Pain; many a day
have I put on my raingear and cursed the sky for what it was about to
let loose on me.  But after seeing this movie, and remembering that it
was based on a true story, I think it'll be a long time before I
complain about Nasty Weather again...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Based on the true story, THE PERFECT STORM tells of a group of
Glouchester, Massachusetts swordfishermen in October 1991 who find
themselves caught up in something much bigger than themselves, and who
only want to get through it and go home.
Captain Billy Tyne (George Clooney) feels the pressure to Go Fish put on
him by the owner of the boat he loves so much--the "Andrea Gail"; owner
Bobby Brown (Michael Ironside) compares Billy unfavorably to fellow
captain Linda Greenlaw (Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio), who just brought
in a near-record haul of swordfish.  Needing to get out of his slump,
for pride's sake as well as to make money for himself and his crew,
Billy convinces crewmen Bobby Shatford (Mark Wahlberg), Dale "Murph"
Murphy (John C. Reilly), David "Sully" Sullivan (William Fichtner),
Michael "Bugsy" Moran (John Hawkes)  and Alfred Pierre (Allen Payne), to
go out one more time that fatal October.  The October when three monster
storms converged on their Atlantic fishing grounds to create the perfect
storm.
The Upshot:
This film had a ton of hype, from awareness of the book by Sebastian
Junger and especially from the trailer depicting the huge tidalwave the
"Andrea Gail" tried to ride out.  And from my seat, it lived up to the
hype--and then some.
[It's almost a joke to me that sharing the results of this true story
could be considered giving away spoiler info, but I'll play along].
The human stories revolving around that tragic incident, were intensely
played--especially the relationship between Bobby and his girlfriend
Christina (Diane Lane).  Generally speaking, Mark Wahlberg doesn't move
me much; but he and Lane had a chemistry in their short screen time
together that made their love story seem almost epic.  And a "love
story" of a different kind, between George Clooney's Captain Billy and
Walberg's Bobby, was best realized during their storm scenes together.
The two actors are said to have a great working relationship, and it
showed (though an early scene where Billy tells Bobby his Reason For
Being A Fisherman, felt somewhat stilted).  Clooney gets much lip for
the underwhelming movies he's been in, with implications made that he's
just a Hollywood Pretty Boy with more connections than talent.  I don't
know about all that, but he comes across as Just Folks in the interviews
that I've seen of him; and his excellent portrayal of Billy Tyne in
"Perfect" should quiet any rumblings about his perceived lack of talent.
Good, too, were the performances by supporting players John C. Reilly
(as Murph, a newly divorced dad who, much to my surprise, got along
decently with his ex), William Fichtner (as Sully, who Murph decidedly
did not get along well with), and especially John Hawkes as Bugsy.
"Especially", I say, because Bugsy's short time with Irene was as sweet
as Bobby and Christina's more intense love story, while having the added
benefit of seeming more downhome; more real.
I found fault with what seemed at first to be an inexplicable inclusion
of a second rescue attempt involving a sailboat in the Bahamas.  Aside
from the strange leap of logic that involved [uh, isn't Massachusetts
damn near a country away from the Bahamas?  So, uh, why would the same
US Coast Guard crew try to rescue both that sailboat and the "Andrea
Gail"?  And uh, was there no other crew available anywhere near
Massachusetts?], that subplot seemed an unnecessary distraction to the
main story at first.  And as usual, Karen Allen (as Melissa Brown, one
of the people on the sailboat) proved once again that her pinnacle
performance, in RAIDERS OF THE LOST ARK, was more a fluke than a
breakthrough.  All was made Right, however, when the Coast Guard
rescuers came along; the story itself picked up, and the remarkable
scenes with the helicopter crew, negated any Issues I had with Allen.
But to be sure, the storm itself, and the depiction of such in this
movie, was as real a "character" as any of the human players involved.
I heard more than one person in the audience say that they felt like
they were right in the thick of the storm; that's a pretty accurate
description of my experience while watching those roiling waters.  I'm
not one to get seasick, but I felt like I needed some Dramamine after
watching this flick.  And not just from the waves, either; the movie
jumped from Bermuda to "Boston" and back so rapidly at points, I got
dizzy from trying to keep up.  This was made more difficult by the fact
that I couldn't always hear the dialogue over the storm, most especially
with most of Allen Payne's dialogue.  I was able to get the general
drift, but I think I'll have to watch "Perfect" a second time to catch
what I missed.   Not that I mind seeing it again.
THE PERFECT STORM could've made the mistake of being only and solely
about that huge tidalwave--and more to the point, about the whiz-bang
computerized special effects that went into making a movie
storm--forgetting about the human story behind the tragedy.  I am glad
it did not; and further, I'm surprised that the movie encompassed far
more than the story of the ill-fated crew of the "Andrea Gail".  Though
he did so at times to the detriment of that central story, director
Wolfgang Petersen skillfully included the tale of folk who tried to
rescue the fishermen as well (not having read the book, I can't know
whether this was more Junger's doing, or Petersen's; either way, I can
diggit).  And though there could've been more backstory shown, and
especially more attention paid to the folks left on-shore (more, that
is, than just Bobby's girlfriend Christina, or his mother Ethel, played
by Janet Wright), I found myself more often than not, riveted by the
action on the screen.  And, the drama got my attention, too.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I would be remiss if I didn't mention Allen Payne (who played Alfred
Pierre, the Other brother who was gettin' much love from a chick
on-shore).  Very remiss--considering the fact that the movie didn't
mention him much.  He seemed to disappear into the background, like a
speck of dust caught up in a towering tidalwave; except for the interest
of historical accuracy (and not a little need for Diversity, I bet), he
may as well not have been here.  Mebbe this flick was just too big for
him, who knows; perhaps a more authentic islander should've been cast
(what was that accent supposed to be, anyway?  For all I know, Alfred
could've been a Frenchman, not a West Indian).  But it sure was a long
way from his best work to date, JASON'S LYRIC, to his imitation of
driftwood here.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I have to admit that I mis(pre)judged this "book" by its cover; unlike
that Titanic joke, THE PERFECT STORM is a spectacular blend of
heart-pounding action and heart-breaking, heart-felt drama.  If Wolfgang
Petersen and company--and yes, that does include George Clooney--don't
get some kind of Oscars recognition for this one, there's something
fishy goin' on here...

Title
Review for Bedazzled (2000)
BEDAZZLED (2000)
Rated R; running time 93 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0230030
Official site: http://www.bedazzledmovie.com/
Written by: Larry Gelbart, Harold Ramis, Peter Tolan (based on the
              story by Peter Cook)
Directed by: Harold Ramis
Cast: Brendan Fraser, Elizabeth Hurley, Frances O'Connor, Orlando Jones
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbedazzled.html
The heavy message and soul-searing images in BAMBOOZLED took a lot out
of me, so I looked forward to seeing a light comedy afterwards.  And
BEDAZZLED was about as light as it tolerably gets.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
BEDAZZLED, a remake of the 1967 Faustian romantic comedy starring Dudley
Moore as the hapless soul willing to sell his soul to Peter Cook's
Devil, stars Brendan Fraser as Elliot Richards (aka The Hapless Soul)
and Elizabeth Hurley as The Devil.
Poor dorky Elliot is a computer consultant living the stereotypical geek
life; he tries too hard to get people to like him, his co-workers
(including a restrained Orlando Jones as Dan) don't want to hang out
with him, and the girl of his dreams, Allison (Frances O'Connor), barely
knows he's alive.  When Elliot wishes aloud that he'd do anything to
have Allison in his life, The Devil appears - to see if "anything"
includes Elliot's soul, in exchange for seven "be careful what you wish
for" wishes.
Naturally - you guessed it - Wackiness Ensues.
The Upshot:
You've heard me say it before: remakes generally grind my gizzards.
This one, though, didn't seem to bother me as much, for some reason.
Elizabeth Hurley is no Peter Cook; likewise, Brendan Fraser can't touch
the Comedy Stylings of Dudley Moore.  But Fraser and Hurley worked
reasonably well together, the ObPuns weren't too obviously painful [The
"DV8" Club.  Ha.] and the supporting players were given enough to do
(especially in the basketball wish segment) to not totally make one
wonder why they were given individual names (instead of "Elliot's Friend
One, Two, and Three").  And though the movie petered out once the
"...and what did we learn?" phase kicked into high gear, the fun of
watching dorky Elliot come back even more wacky as the butt uuuuugly
Sensitive Guy, was worth suffering through the obvious Lesson we were
meant to learn about Being Happy With Ourselves.
[Why yes, that was the shortest review I've done to date.  What else is
there to say?  "I laughed, I didn't cry, I didn't want to run away and
join the circus"?  It was a fun way to waste 93 minutes.  It's not
exactly brain surgery, y'know].
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I must've gotten too much of whatever The Devil gave to Elliot to make
him so emotionally sensitive.  Can't figure out why else I'd notice the
opening credit labels "she" placed on the jumping African ("Bad Credit")
or the old Black diner patron ("Tips 5%").  I'm sure it was just an
after-effect of having been Awakened by BAMBOOZLED not long before
watching this movie.  Besides, the BF in BEDAZZLED can't be all that
bad, considering who "God" wound up being...
Bammer's Bottom Line:
A cute remake that is neither earthshakingly funny nor overly
sacrilegious (to the original, that is), BEDAZZLED provided enough
laughs to make it worth seeing once.  Though unless you're a glutton for
punishment like me (having seen four new movies over two days), you
might want to put it off for the matinee.
BEDAZZLED (rating: flashing yellowlight):
But now I miss Dudley Moore and Peter Cook that much more.

Title
Review for Homeboy, The (1999)
THE HOMEBOY (2000)
Rated R; running time 95 minutes
Genre: Comedy
Official site: http://www.thehomeboy.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0160370
Written by: Rick Kronberg
Directed by: David Gebroe
Cast: Dave McCrea, David M. Wallace, Downtown Julie Brown,
Benjamin J. Cain Jr., Soby, Keith Hunter, Victoria Rong, Ben Wang,
Audrey Mar
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshomeboy.html
When reviewing independent flicks, especially those where I was asked to
honestly critique them, I'm always concerned about how my review might
impact negatively on that filmmaker's career.  Not to brag on myself - I
haven't ruined any careers yet (I think) - but I sure don't want to be
the one responsible for squashing the next [insert name of Great
Director, here].  Then again, I also don't want to be responsible for
unleashing the next [insert names of abominable directors of
MONKEYBONED, STUPORNOVA, LAME TAME WEST, UNLUCKY NUMBERS, et al, here].
Still, I worry about the fine line between giving my honest opinion, and
wanting to promote films outside of the mainstream.  The big studio-paid
boys and girls, I figure, can take care of themselves; I reserve the
bulk of my wrath and disdain for them with no hesitation.  But, I'm
getting ahead of myself.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
After a three year drought following his breakout hip hop CD, rapper
MC*2 [uh, Squared, as in "that Einstein sh*t"] (Dave McCrea) finds
himself teetering on the precipice of "Beyond The Music" status; things
are so bad for Squared in his suburban New Jersey home, that he only has
club soda to offer his guest with their cheeze doodles and caviar.  Even
Squared's prize kitchen sink - er, sorry; Wentworth - no longer loves
him.
With the help of agent Don (Soby) and producer Jarvis Alley (Benjamin J.
Cain Jr), Squared does an interview with entertainment reporter Tallulah
Jones (Downtown Julie Brown), who doesn't take kindly to the White
rapper calling Jarvis "nigga" - a phrase which she objects to as "ugly"
and "despicable", but that Jarvis himself seems more tolerant of hearing
come from long-time friend Squared.  "After all," the men reason, "it's
'nigg...A'".
Upset after Jones threatens to expose what she implies is Squared's
latent racism, Square is surprised to find out that the sink...er,
sorry; Wentworth...repairman is not mild-mannered Wendell Everyman, but
is instead Squared's childhood icon, White hip-hop legend Hoolie
Hooligan (David M. Wallace).  The question is, is Wendell ready to give
up his low-key life and become a Hooligan again?
The Upshot:
With a lead like the one above, I bet you thought I'd spend the next few
paragraphs apologizing for what I perceive to be a bad movie.  Guess
again.  I can't, in good conscience, call THE HOMEBOY a *good* movie,
but with one notable exception, it did manage to keep me interested, and
entertained; and it even provoked a few laughs and an AMEN! or two along
the way.
Since I mentioned a "notable exception", let's get him out of the way
first.  David M. Wallace, as Wendell/Hoolie, did absolutely nothing for
me.  Bad enough that his accent was far more indicative of
Australian/New Zeland origins than his purported British citizenship -
and that either way, I could barely make out a thing he said throughout.
No, Wallace's true crime is that he played Hoolie much too Large, to the
point where his irritation factor extended far beyond the reaction
Hoolie was *supposed* to induce in the viewing audience.  I found myself
extremely grateful for those moments when Hoolie would shuthell up; his
every utterance made me want to thrash him with that huge spanner.  A
little less Hoolie, or even just a wee bit more subtle Hoolie, would've
worked better for me (yes, I know: "Hooligan".  There's that Subtlety
thingy again...)
With Wallace playing Hoolie like there's no tomorrow, there wasn't room
enough for me to despise Downtown Julie Brown (the oldschool MTV-jock
most in need of a duct-tape-to-mouth operation).  She was used just
sparingly - and effectively - enough to keep my "must beat down Downtown
Julie Brown at every possible occasion" tendency at bay.
Actors I have Issues with aside, I was pleasantly surprised by Dave
McCrea's portrayal of Squared.  The big gold chain on the video's back
case cover should've clued me in that his would be more of an old school
rapper portrayal than a more modern day bile-spilling Eminem-wannabe
(though Squared got checked on his paradoxical statements quite nicely;
and conversely, Eminem isn't given a break, considering that he's more
complex than the media prefers to portray him.  But that's Another Issue
For Another Time).
McCrea was well-matched by Benjamin Cain's calm, sensible producer,
Jarvis Alley.  Actor Soby (huh?) threatened to work my last nerve, but
he had some of the best lines in the movie (with no sense of context to
go on, you'll just have to trust me that "oh jesus...it's with a 'k'!"
is one of them).  And in true "imitation is the best form of flattery"
fashion, director Dave Gebroe's decision to follow in Kevin Smith's
footsteps by having Keith Hunter play Beatbox as a Silent Bob-like
character (even more humorous, considering a beatbox is anything *but*
silent), worked well for me.
But you know what, Gebroe?  I *really* could've done without that nasty
toilet scene.  Fo' real doe.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
   Two "Ethnic Factors" for the price of one:
Though the whole bit with Squared falling hard for a Chinese Chick
(played by Victoria Rong) was way out of control, adding very little of
consequence to the rest of the movie [except the nasty toilet scene, for
which Gebroe needs an old-fashioned butt whuppin], the reaction of Lin
Chan's mother (Audrey Mar) and father (Ben Wang) to the new couple, was
great, both as mere entertainment, and as a quick peek into the politics
of mixed marriages.
And of course, the central Issue of the movie - namely, who can, and
cannot, use the term "nigga/nigger" - was handled well here.  In fact, I
would've been just as happy if Gebroe and company had concentrated
exclusively on this issue, excising Hoolie Hooligan altogether.  Still,
I applaud Gebroe for the way he addressed, and ultimately "resolved",
the "nigga" conundrum.
[and, for the record, I don't go for *anyone* using that term.  ya dig?]
Bammer's Bottom Line:
It's easy to judge a videotape by its cover.  In the case of THE
HOMEBOY, with its thug-lite posing White rapper and friends lingering in
the background, that prejudgement would be a mistake.  Uh, except for
that Hooligan character.  He was pretty much the way he looked on the
cover.  Ooh, what a weirdo.  But if weirdo characters in the vein of
Kevin Smith's creations don't turn you off, or if you're more into
Vanilla Ice than Eminem (assuming you even know who either is), THE
HOMEBOY might be worth a look-see.  My props to producer/director Dave
Gebroe for defying my expectations...but you might suggest to Mr. McCrea
that that snarl of his isn't the best way to cruise chicks, eh?
THE HOMEBOY (rating: flashing yellowlight):
Well, that was...strange.  I can't say that I liked it; it'd be more
accurate to say that I found it intriguing, bizarre, "Dogma"-like in
spots - and quite truthful, in its way.  And yeah, strange.

Title
Review for Disappearing Acts (2000) (TV)
DISAPPEARING ACTS (2000)
unrated (for cable); running time 115 minutes
Genre: Romantic Drama
Seen at: Detroit's Masonic Temple (Detroit, Michigan premiere)
Official site: http://www.hbo.com/disappearing/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0243220
Written by: Lisa Jones (Based on the novel by Terry McMillan)
Directed by: Gina Prince-Bythewood
Music by: Meshell Ndegeo'cello with Cato
Cast: Wesley Snipes, Sanaa Lathan, Regina Hall, Lisa Arrindell Anderson,
John Amos, Clark Johnson, Michael Imperioli, Kamaal "Q-Tip" Fareed,
CCH Pounder, John Beasley, Aunjanue Ellis (Pam)
Home Box Office Premiere Saturday December 9, 2000, 9pm Eastern
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsdisappearing.html
The name "Terry McMillan" on a book cover, seems to strike fear in the
hearts of [SOME] Black men; one glance, and [SOME] guys automatically
decide that the book will be filled with Black feminazi-ism at its
worse.  A deserved reputation?  Maybe; her WAITING TO EXHALE novel (and
its film adaptation) certainly did little to dissuade [SOME] of My
Brothers' belief that she's Out To Get Them.  By all rights then,
DISAPPEARING ACTS, one of McMillan's earlier works - and this film
adaptation of it - might also be seen as more of the same bashing.  Not
by me, though; at least, not the film.  If anything, I saw the film as a
celebration of the struggles, and triumphs, people in love go through
every single day.
Which is to say, don't believe the hype, fellas; Ms. McMillan doesn't
have it in for alla y'all.  Just the triflin' ones...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Zora Banks (Sanaa Lathan) is a struggling singer-songwriter looking for
her big break.  Franklin Swift (Wesley Snipes) is a construction worker
also struggling - just to keep a gig in the sometimey construction
business.   Zora and Franklin have big dreams: she, of quitting her job
as a music teacher and recording her songs; he, of renovating Brooklyn
brownstone buildings in his own contracting business.  They cross paths
when Zora moves into a brownstone Franklin is helping rebuild - and
their lives will never be the same.
Both Zora and Franklin have Issues in their lives that they don't fully
disclose, that threaten their burgeoning relationship when those issues
come to the light.  Zora is used to some of the finer things in life;
Franklin's a down home guy doing the best he can to get by.  Neither of
them were looking for love: but as it tends to, love found them.  But is
love enough to keep two such different people together?
The Upshot:
I liked McMillan's book well enough when I first read it years ago (back
before anybody ever told me she was a "man-hater"); but there's
something about the film adaptation of it that raises it to another
level.  Was it the electrifying chemistry that stars Sanaa Lathan and
Wesley Snipes had as lovers Zora and Franklin?  Was it director Gina
Prince's magical touch behind the camera?  Was it screenwriter Lisa
Jones' softening of McMillan's original harsher tone?  Was it the
beautiful musical score and soundtrack?
Yep; you betcha.  It was all that.  And a tasty bag 'a chips.
I was skeptical about the romantic pairing of Snipes and Lathan, but
they pulled it off beautifully.  In fact, their coupling overshadowed
much of the rest of the story, to the point where the co-stars all
seemed to be an afterthought.  With a lesser cast, this might not have
been as big a deal; but when you have talent like CCH Pounder (as
Franklin's mother), John Amos (as Franklin's father), John Beasley (as
Zora's father), and Clark Johnson (Franklin's friend Jimmy) going to
waste, it lessens the experience somewhat.  As Zora's bougie girlfriends
and her would-be music producer, Regina Hall (Portia), Lisa Arrindell
Anderson (Claudette) and Q-Tip (Reg) got a good bit of screen time, but
I would've gladly reduced their time to see more of Franklin's
interactions with his friend Jimmy, their relationship with her father
and his mother and father, his sometimey boss Vinny (Michael Imperioli),
his "Issues" from his past, and his implied problems with some his White
co-workers.  In other words, it would've been good to see more of those
outside life forces driving Zora and Franklin in their everyday lives.
Still, for each moment of my missing the potential of a supporting cast
member, Snipes and Lathan made up for it, and then some.  Theirs was a
very credible, and evenhandedly-told, love story portrayed in all its
hills and valleys.  My assessment of Franklin (the movie version, if not
the book) differs with 3BC Guest Star Apryl Voner - my companion for the
Detroit premiere - in her review of DISAPPEARING ACTS.  But for one or
two scenes, I felt that Snipes, with the help of the director and
writer, flavored Franklin with something more than the bland "No Good
Man" spice - for which I applaud them all.  Lathan's lip-synching was
off - hopefully, she won't play a singer in the future - but given the
interplay between Lathan and Snipes, her missed attempts in this aspect
were easy enough to ignore.
Due to Prince's unique director's eye (her black and white stills were a
brilliant move), Jones' understanding of the heart and soul of
McMillan's written word, and especially Snipes' and Lathan's steamy love
scenes - in *and* out of bed - DISAPPEARING ACTS is a movie that, even
moreso than HBO's production of INTRODUCING DOROTHY DANDRIDGE, could've
easily been released as a feature film.  But I ain't mad at HBO; I'm
just glad I'm a subscriber.
The Interview:
I had an unexpected chance to interview Sanaa Lathan before the
premiere; and though I wound up asking her only a couple, fairly lame,
questions, Lathan graciously responded, abating some of my nervousness.
When asked how she sees herself in the brave new world of Black actors
finally getting some meaningful roles in mainstream Hollywood films,
Lathan said she hopes to maintain her integrity, and get the kinds of
roles she is capable of doing great things with.
If Lathan keeps going down the same trail she blazed with films like THE
BEST MAN, LOVE AND BASKETBALL, and DISAPPEARING ACTS, she'll do just
fine.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
     [Watch Bammer get her Eviction Notice from the 'hood...]
Ok, put the kiddies to bed; I need to talk to the Grown Folks.  *My*
Grown Folks.
My People, My People...can I be for real tho'?  Too bad, I'm gonna:  We
need to stop clownin' in the theater.  Yes, I *did* say that.  And I'll
do it again: We need to quit.
I was too through with the premiere audience's chatter, with their
laughter at inappropriate times (the girl was *sick*; since when is that
funny?) and with all the childish, loud giggling during Franklin and
Zora's sex scenes.  Fine, We don't know what head is all about - or so
the myth goes.  But dag, was it necessary to drown out relevant dialogue
with all the tittering whenever Wesley's bootie showed on screen?  Yes,
it *was* fine...but get over it already, okay?  Can We *pretend* that
We've been out before?  I'm just glad I get HBO, and can watch this show
tonight in the comfort of my own bed.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
If you have access to HBO [and no, that *doesn't* include hot-wiring
cable in just so you can get this flick.  Ya Heard.], by all means,
catch DISAPPEARING ACTS as it premieres Saturday December 9 at 9pm
Eastern.  "Acts" is must see-TV:  Wesley Snipes and Sanaa Lathan
positively SIZZLE on the screen, Gina Prince's direction is top-notch,
and screenwriter Lisa Jones does a good job of toning down Terry
McMillan's perceived bent towards men-bashing.
DISAPPEARING ACTS (rating: greenlight):
Here's to more of these types of mature, realistic, sensuous
slice-of-life movies starring Black actors, coming to screens big and
small.
[Catch the premiere of the HBO original film DISAPPEARING ACTS on
Saturday December 9, 2000, 9pm Eastern, with additional air dates on
December 12, 17, 20, 25, and 28].

Title
Review for Dinosaur (2000)
DINOSAUR (2000) 
Rated PG; running time 82 minutes 
Genre: Animation 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0130623 
Official site: http://disney.go.com/DisneyPictures/dinosaur/  
Directed by: Eric Leighton, Ralph Zontag 
Cast: The voices of D.B. Sweeney, Ossie Davis, Julianna Margulies, 
Samuel E. Wright, Alfre Woodard, Max Casella, Hayden Panettiere, 
Joan Plowright, Della Reese, Peter Siragusa
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsdinosaur.html
Way back when, I fell in love with a movie called THE BEAR, a film that 
explored the non-animated, non-comical lives of two bears fighting 
against man and nature.  When it finally came out on DVD, I bought it, 
savoring the memory of having seen a rousing story told without the 
trickery of singing beasts and wisecracking sidekicks. I mention this 
because, for a short while, I had a glimmer of a hope that - given the 
beautifully epic sweep shown in its previews - DINOSAUR could also tell 
its tale without smarminess, or at least with the finesse of a TOY STORY.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
After being mistakenly dropped, as an egg, into a group of lemurs--among 
them, father and group leader Yar (Ossie Davis), mother Pilo (Alfre 
Woodard), Zini (Max Casella), a hopeful (hopeless?) bachelor and Comic 
Relief, and daughter Suri (Hayden Panettiere)--Aladar the dinosaur (D.B. 
Sweeney) is brought up as a member of the lemur family.  Aladar and the 
lemurs' world is changed forever when giant meteors fall onto their 
island, and they find themselves among other plant-eating dinosaurs, led 
by Darwin-loving Kron (Samuel E. Wright), his heart-of-gold sister Neera 
(Julianna Margulies), tough guy Bruton (Peter Siragusa), Baylene the 
slow-moving Brachiosaur (Joan Plowright), and Eema (Della Reese), a 
Weary Ol' Styrachosaur--all searching for the "nesting grounds", while 
trying to stay two steps ahead of the dreaded meat-eating Carnotaurs.
The Upshot:
Actually, I'm probably being unfair to DINOSAUR in comparing it to the 
cinematic wonders of a "Bear" or the Fun Enough For An Adult (But It's 
Made For A Kiddie) fare found in a "Toy Story"; then again, with the 
oodles and oodles of dough Disney dumped into this project, you'd think 
they'd remember the number one rule: make the story interesting.
Instead, they blew their wad on making the pretty pictures, and 
scripting some awfully pedestrian lines which were proffered up by good 
actors like D.B. Sweeney, Ossie Davis, Joan Plowright, and Alfre 
Woodard--all actors whose talents belie what sounded like mere 
journeymanism on their parts.  I was never convinced that these were 
anything but actors reading scripted lines (don't laugh; Toy Story had 
me every step of the way); instead of seeing big dinos and silly little 
monkeys, I found myself listening for familiar voices ("yep, that's 
Julianna Margulies reading 'Neera', sounding a whole lot like 'Carol 
Hathaway'...and hmmm, I wonder what James Earl Jones would've sounded 
like as 'Kron'...").    
The filmmakers seemed to count on childrens' love of dinosaurs (and, uh, 
hasn't that fad played out by now?  Last I checked, Pikachu was the 
in-thing with the young'uns) and All Things Disney, to carry the day by 
coming to see this movie in droves.  That they'll get the kids in, I 
have no doubt.  Will the movie keep their hyperactive attention?  Well, 
that's another story.  Will it reel in the adults?  Well, it's a 
certainty that it didn't keep my attention.  
Why?  That one's easy: it lacked the spirit of fun, going instead for 
the preachiness of  pounding a number of morals into the audience's 
head, to the point where I went begging for aspirin for the headache I 
developed.  It certainly didn't help that for some bizarre reason, a 
narrator was tacked on to the beginning and ending, a'swingin' away with 
the Whifflebat Of Exposition.  I reckon it's not A Good Thing when you 
start rooting for the bad meat-eating dinosaurs to corner the cute 
little plant-eaters and thrash them about the head until they just shut 
up, ya think?  And if I see and hear another wisecracking movie monkey, 
I think I might do Damage.
[And at risk of being roasted by parents of young kidlets everywhere - 
"This is a children's film, you insensitive cad!" - let me just say that 
Black folk ain't the *only* ones who talk at the movies.  Maybe It's 
Just Me; maybe it's asking too much to expect parents to tell their 
children that, no Billy, it's not polite to scream at the top of your 
lungs every time you get bored and want more JuJu Beans.  Yeah.  It's 
probably Just Me.]
DINOSAUR certainly had its Moments.  On the technical front, it was 
drawn beautifully, and the creatures' movements seemed to be handled 
realistically (as much as one could expect); the lemurs, for instance, 
were made to move in a somewhat-sideways gait, not the straight-ahead 
walk of, say, apes. [And, speaking of lemurs, correct me if I'm wrong--
but since when would there be dinosaurs occupying the same era as lemurs?
I mean, *talking* lemurs are bad enough; d'ya really expect me to swallow
the lemurs talking before their proper time? I think not!]  Story-wise, 
I chuckled a few times at Della Reese's Weary Ol' Black Chick lines.  
And if you've seen the long trailer--the one without the talking 
lemurs--you've pretty much seen the most exciting part of the flick.  
But a few Moments here or there do not an interesting story make, 
especially in a movie that's supposedly a Big Summer Event.  The 
animation-lover in me was dazzled by the drawings, but like a 
badly-dubbed karate flick, the pictures and the sound didn't quite match 
up.
I don't doubt for a second that this movie will make a gazillion dollars 
this year and beyond, judging from the number of rather loud (but, 
noticeably, not laughing) kids in my audience.  Still, box office 
considerations aside, DINOSAUR is a big and pretty airhead of a movie.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
DINOSAUR may have been great eye candy to look at--and until the monkeys 
first spoke, it was indeed beautiful, without distraction--but they 
forgot to build something into this movie: heart.  Fun- and story-wise, 
the toys in Toy Story and the ants in A Bug's Life ran circles around 
the big dino brutes.  One thing in its favor, though: at least there 
were no singing prehistoric critters.
DINOSAUR (rating: flashing yellowlight): 
This one's sense of wonder went extinct about 10 minutes in.

Title
Review for Green Mile, The (1999)
The Green Mile (1999) 
Rated R; running time 188 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0120689 
Official site: http://www.thegreenmile.com/  
Written by: Frank Darabont (based on the novel by Stephen King)
Directed by: Frank Darabont
Starring: Tom Hanks, Michael Clarke Duncan, David Morse, Doug Hutchison, 
Michael Jeter, James Cromwell, Bonnie Hunt, Sam Rockwell, 
Jeffrey DeMunn, Barry Pepper, Harry Dean Stanton, Patricia Clarkson, 
Graham Greene, Dabbs Greer, Eve Brent, Gary Sinise
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsgreen.html
Wow.  Awesome.  Wonderful.  Excellent.  Speechless. 
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Set in 1935 Louisiana, "The Green Mile" revolves around a few good men 
(and a couple'a scoundrels, a Chick or two, and a mouse) caught up in a 
bad situation.
In Louisana's Cold Mountain State Penitentiary, Corrections Officer Paul 
Edgecomb (Tom Hanks), along with his fellow guards Brutus "Brutal" 
Howell (David Morse), Harry Terwilleger (Jeffrey DeMunn), and Dean 
Stanton (Barry Pepper), are responsible, with the help of trustee inmate 
Toot-Toot (Harry Dean Stanton), for preparing Death Row inmates to walk 
the Last Mile (called the Green Mile here because of the green-colored 
floor tiles) to "Old Sparky"--the electric chair.  Inmates Eduard "Del" 
Delacroix (Michael Jeter) and Arlen Bitterbuck (Graham Greene) are 
joined by "Wild Bill" Wharton (Sam Rockwell), an vile inmate who Warden 
Hal Moores (James Cromwell) describes as a "problem child", and John 
Coffey (Michael Clarke Duncan), a magnificently large man accused of 
raping and killing two young girls--and in a study of contrasts, Coffey 
is brought in to Death Row's E-block by Percy Wetmore (Doug Hutchison), 
a small (in every way) man whose sense of self-worth is achieved solely 
through his connections to the state governor.  Edgecomb and his crew's 
task of leading the inmates to their death, as calmly as possible, is 
hindered by Percy's small-mindness - but Coffey has a special gift that 
will play a significant role in all of their lives (not to mention the 
life of a wee rodent...)
I prepared myself for "The Green Mile" keeping a few things in mind from 
what I've read about the movie in the trade mags, and saw in various 
trailers: first, that the character John Coffey was a big ("huge", 
actually, fits better) Black man accused of rape and murder in the South 
of the 1930's--which is to say, there'd likely be plenty for me to write 
about in the "Black Factor"; second, that there was some conceptual 
"magic" involved in the story (which meant that my Suspension Of 
Disbelief bar would have to be raised a bit); and third, that I'd 
probably want to go to the bathroom beforehand, since at 3 hours and 15 
minutes (with trailers), it'd be a long stretch.  Armed with the 
knowledge of these things, and that this flick is based on horror 
novelist Steven King's novella, I went in prepared for anything to 
happen.  And came out awed. 
Reminiscent of King's previous against-the-grain work, "The Shawshank 
Redemption", TGM lived up to its hype, and then some.  The protagonists 
in each--Morgan Freeman and Tim Robbins in "Shawshank",  Hanks and 
Duncan here--have similar roles to play in each others' lives; and 
though "Shawshank" was more about the prisoners than "Mile", they both 
reflected excellently on how prison affects the guards as well as the 
guarded.  (As an aside, I had the privilege of watching both "Shawshank" 
and "Mile" with a Corrections Officer--my husband, Bear--and was 
heartened by his saying that he tries to be the kind of guard that Paul 
was; though "The Green Mile" was a fable, the idea that the kind of 
guard that Percy was--a troublemaker who could only be strong if others 
were weak--was not someone to be emulated, wasn't lost on either of us).
The performances were outstanding; there was hardly a missed note from 
any of the actors.  Of the three leads that are normally bandied about, 
Hanks was as Oscar-worthy as he has been in the past, playing a man 
whose pain goes deeper, much deeper, than the physical ailment from 
which he suffers (man, it's hard to believe that this is the same actor 
from TV's "Bosom Buddies", eh?); Hutchison made me want to pimp-slap 
Percy every time I saw him (which is to say, Hutchinson did his job 
well); and if Duncan doesn't get a nomination from this, There Is No 
Justice In Hollywood (yeah, I know; I'm just sayin'); who says that Big 
Men can't act?  
But the "secondary" characters and actors don't get enough props for 
their roles in this flick, so let me remedy that here.  As I said in my 
review "Crazy In Alabama", David Morse is one of the most underrated 
actors in the business; neither acquiesent nor living up to his moniker, 
Brutal had my attention in every scene he was in, and it's a tribute to 
Morse's acting skills that he was more than able to hold his own against 
the Powerhouse Three that are Hanks, Duncan and Hutchison.  DeMunn and 
Pepper blended more into the background, but that's pretty much where 
their characters should've been; Cromwell, like Morse, is an 
extraordinary character actor, and his warden, grieving over the illness 
of his wife Melinda (Patricia Clarkson) showed a more tender side of 
Cromwell than he usually plays (Clarkson, on the other hand, just on 
this side of hammy; fortunately, we didn't see her for long).  Michael 
Jeter, as creole inmate Delacroix, was interesting though a little 
annoying; Green's Bitterbuck was barely there; having only a few lines, 
maybe his performance mostly wound up on the cutting-room floor; but the 
inmate to watch was the villainous (though amusing at times) Wild Bill.  
Whoever came up with the term "over-the-top", must've had Sam Rockwell 
in mind; but "over-the-top" was what Wild Bill called for, and Rockwell 
delivered.
As Jan Edgecomb, Bonnie Hunt once again added a playful quietness to a 
supporting-wife role, that matched Hanks' Paul Edgecomb nearly perfectly 
(the picnic scene with their knowing glances, was nice to see with 
someone I've shared such glances with); and nearly stealing the show was 
Harry Dean Stanton as Toot-Toot.  Besides the creepiness of the actor 
sharing a name with one of the characters, Toot-Toot was a riot ("still 
prayin' down here!").  And though he was in a 
blink-and-you'll-almost-miss-it cameo, Gary Sinise, Hanks' co-star from 
"Forrest Gump", makes an appearance as Coffey's lawyer 
(court-appointed?) Burt Hammersmith, that, had it been dragged out, 
would've impacted negatively on the believability of the story.
All that said, I'm glad I waited until this morning to write my review 
(I watched it late last night, and was exhausted, but gladly so, when I 
finally got home); the passage of time gave me a chance to reflect more 
objectively on it, which allowed me to recognize some flaws that I all 
but ignored last night.  Length aside, "Mile" did lay the 
mystical/spiritual nature of Coffey on pretty thick; I haven't read 
King's book, but one couldn't help but notice The Point that was being 
driven home, especially in the scene where Coffey holds Edgecomb hands 
to "share a piece of himself" with Edgecomb.  Building on to this, the 
weakest link in the movie was the flash-forward to Old Paul (played by 
Dabbs Greer, reportedly because Tom Hanks didn't look right in Old Folks 
makeup); if we hadn't gotten The Point from Coffey and young Edgecomb, 
Old Paul made sure we did, with his speech to Elaine (Eve Brent).  It's 
too bad that this was included; it provided unnecessary foreground noise 
that distracted from the story, told well enough in the timeframe of the 
1930s.
But that was a minor hiccup; the body of the film played just fine.  So 
fine that, if I can ever block out 188 minutes of my time for it, I plan 
on seeing it again.  Can't think of a better recommendation than that.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
It takes a strong Black man, secure in his Blackness and acting 
capabilities, to agree to play what on the surface appears to be a 
"simple nigra"; but Michael Clarke Duncan (a former ditch digger; 
"Entertainment Weekly" did a six-part spread on "The Green Mile" that is 
good reading for a lot of background details on the movie and its cast 
and crew) was wise enough to know that Coffey needed to be played 
exactly as he played him.  Coffey's humbleness belayed an inner strength 
that was felt by all the characters--yes, even the vile ones; and unless 
I miss my guess, that was no accident of acting on Duncan's part.  Good 
for him, I say.
Further, the idea that TGM was Yet Another "White man redeems the 
pitiful pathetic Black man" film, is dispelled not long into the movie; 
in fact, the opposite is more accurate.  So to those who saw it and 
tripped out on his "yassuh boss" acting, remember the times and the 
character that Duncan was playing, and talk to someone that was from the 
South in the 1930s to see if his characterization was on the money or 
not.  And to those who haven't seen it and are still trippin', go see 
it, or hush up.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I liked this quote from Jim "Chante" Hill so much, I asked him if I 
could use it here: 
  "If you crank out as many books as [Steven King] has, you're bound 
   to get a good one every now and again.  'Mile' is excellent, because
   like 'Shawshank' it is not a traditional horror movie but is rather
   an exploration of the good and the evil in man, cast in stark relief
   by the confines of prison."
I couldn't have said it better myself.
"The Green Mile" (rating: greenlight) 
A green light for "The Green Mile".  Seems apropos, no?

Title
Review for Girl, Interrupted (1999)
Girl, Interrupted (1999) 
Rated R; running time 127 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0172493 
Official site: http://www.girlinterrupted.com/  
Written by: Written by James Mangold (based on the book by 
Susanna Kaysen)
Directed by: James Mangold
Starring: Winona Ryder, Angelina Jolie, Clea DuVall, 
Vanessa Redgrave, Whoopi Goldberg, Brittany Murphy, Elizabeth Moss, 
Jared Leto, Jeffrey Tambor, Travis Fine
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsgirl.html
Back in mid-December, one of our readers requested that we review "Girl, 
Interrupted", primarily because she's a big Angelina Jolie fan.  Well, I 
have good news and bad news...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
Based on a true story, Winona Ryder plays Susanna Kaysen, a young writer 
who, on the insistence of her therapist and parents after she chased a 
bottle of aspirin with a bottle of vodka ("I had a headache"), checks 
herself into the Claymore mental institution for "a short rest", leaving 
behind Toby (Jared Leto), about the closest thing she could claim as a 
"relationship".  There, she meets a variety of residents, including her 
new roommate and compulsive liar, Georgina (Clea DuVall, who I swear I 
remember from something, but even a cursory glance at the IMDB doesn't 
help me remember exactly what...ah, I see it: she was in a couple "ER" 
episodes); Daisy (Brittany Murphy), a "daddy's girl" in more ways than 
one; Polly (Elizabeth Moss), who is nicknamed "Torch" for reasons which 
become obvious as the film progresses; and the vibrant Lisa (Angelina 
Jolie), a firebrand and troublemaker, who Susanna comes to depend on.
Amongst the staffers are Dr. Wick (Vanessa Redgrave) and Dr. Potts 
(Jeffrey Tambor), who Lisa tags as "ther-rapists"; John (Travis Fine), 
an orderly who (inexplicably) comes to like Susanna, and she, him; and 
Nanny...uh, Nurse Valerie (Whoopi Goldberg), a no-nonsense, 
afro-puff-wearing nurse there to show Susanna the way back to good 
mental health.
The Upshot:
The good news is that Angelina Jolie was mostly decent in this movie.  
Though she played Lisa a bit over-the-top at times (especially in the 
way too corny and opaque end scenes), she and Vanessa Redgrave as Dr. 
Wick, were the bright spots of the story.  Jolie especially surprised 
me; having seen her for the first time in "The Bone Collector", this 
iteration of her was extremely different (the sign of a good actor being 
that he or she can easily lose themselves in the role they're playing).  
Looking much younger and less pretty here, her character reminded me of 
Jenny in "Forrest Gump"--taken to an extreme.  Jolie seemed to rise 
above the material, and have a lot of fun with it; Redgrave, normally 
quite the Dramatic Actress, seemed equally at ease with her character.  
I didn't recognize her at first (A Good Thing), but was quite pleased 
with the results of her portrayal.  
Would that I could say the same for the rest of the cast, especially a 
very spaced-out looking Winona Ryder.  She wasn't bad, exactly; it's 
just that, like Val kept saying, she never seemed like she really 
belonged in an institution.  "Well, DUH, Rose!", I hear ya saying; 
"wasn't that the point?"  Uh, no, not exactly.  It may have been the 
point that the character never really should've been institutionalized, 
but the actress shouldn't shine through the character, either.  What I 
mean by that is, I never saw Susanna, Depressed Writer when I looked at 
her; I only saw Wynona Ryder, Barely Emoting Actress.  That, my friends, 
is Not A Good Thing.
The other patient characters were also not really that bad; they just 
seemed to be there to fit whatever stereotypes of slightly-loony 
characters, needed to be filled.  DuVall was effective and quite 
charming as Georgina, but Murphy just spooked me out; I couldn't wait 
for her to get off the screen.  Everyone else was either quirky or just 
plain weird--staffers included.  "Cuckoo's Nest", it wasn't.
But my main beef is with the story itself.  It may have been based on 
the real Susanne's time in Claymore, but it couldn't have felt less real 
to me.  I can't for the life of me figure out why Susanne would have 
willingly stayed in a place that she knew she didn't belong in, or why 
she'd sign herself in in the first place (yes, I know what they said, 
but I didn't buy it for a moment).  And though I could easily believe 
that Susanne would be tagged with a negative label due to her 
"promiscuous behavior", it's hard for me to believe, in the "Decade Of 
Love" that the 60s were, that she'd remain institutionalized for 
seemingly little more than her choice in bedmates.
The institution itself didn't seem the horror that the trailers would 
have it being; even Val herself said that State institutions were a 
living hell, comparatively.  Mind you, I wouldn't want to be committed 
to either one, but except for a few straightjacket and "padded cell" 
scenes, the horror aspect was never really conveyed with any 
believability.  And without that, it all did seem, as Val said, that 
Susanna and Lisa (and to a lesser extent, the other patients) were just 
"lazy and self-involved".  And that's just boring to watch.
Nothing in the movie felt all that original; the phrase "derivative of" 
kept popping up in scene after scene.  The scene straight out of "Biloxi 
Blues", with the residents reading Susanna's journal, only made the 
whole feeling of "seen this before" worse; by the end, I was "calling" 
the scenes before they played out.  And most of the time, I was right.  
Definitely Not A Good Thing.   
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Whoopi, Whoopi, Whoopi.  Chile, what we gwinta do with you? 
[/end sarcasm]
It's funny; the two movies I've seen this weekend ["Supernova", of 
course, doesn't count as a movie.  But that's another rant for another 
time] have had the same basic complaint about them, covering opposite 
sides of the spectrum.  In "The Hurricane", some have complained that 
the characters Rubin and Lesra were mere pawns of the Guilty White 
Liberals, there to be Saved by the knights in White armor.  Here in 
"Girl", Whoopi is seen by some (yes, yours truly included) as Yet 
Another nanny figure, there as a wetmaid for Missy's Young'uns to suckle 
on the teat of her Wisdom.  And the "funny" thing is, Susanna as much 
said the same about Whoopi's character, Val.  
Should there be a problem with Whoopi playing "Black nursemaid" 
(Susanna's words.  My sentiment.) to not only the characters in this 
flick, but more than her fair share of others she's played in (starting 
with "Clara's Heart")?  Should we be tired of this same ol' same ol' by 
now?  Should I take it as a personal affront, because in some ways, I 
look like Whoopi?  Probably not, but yet, I do.  Maybe that's my Black 
Factor cross to bear.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Perhaps with a better cast, or more compelling story, this movie 
could've Meant Something; perhaps not.  I was never emotionally involved 
in this film--and, despite their histrionics, neither were most of the 
characters.  And would somebody please find Whoopi a decent role to play?
"Girl, Interrupted": (rating: yellowlight)   
Methinks the young actresses took too many sleeping pills.  That, or 
somebody slipped a mickey into the concession stand popcorn.  **yawn**

Title
Review for Saving Grace (2000)
SAVING GRACE (2000)
Rated R; running time 93 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0195234
Official site: http://www.saving-grace-movie.com/
Written by: Mark Crowdy, Craig Ferguson
Directed by: Nigel Cole
Cast: Brenda Blethyn, Craig Ferguson, Martin Clunes, Valerie Edmond,
Tcheky Karyo, Phyllida Law, Jamie Forman, Bill Bailey, Tristan Sturrock,
Clive Merrison, Leslie Phillips, Diana Quick, Linda Kerr Scott,
Ken Campbell
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamssavegrace.html
When one speaks of The War On [some] drugs, at least here in the Un-tied
States, pictures of burnt-out crackhouses, doped-up kids, ghetto
drive-bys, and dealers dripping in gold, (stereo)typically come to mind.
Rarely does one conjure up a picture of a quaint little old lady Doing
What She Has To to get by.
SAVING GRACE conjures up that very picture, in its Veddy British way.
And as a lifetime Uhmerkin gal who grew up in a Uhmerkin Innercity
(Detroit), I had quite a time reconciling its images with those images
we're shown every night at 6 and 11 on this side of the Pond.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
In a small coastal town in Merry Olde England, Grace Trevethen (Brenda
Blethyn), a recent widow and avid horticulturist, discovers to her
horror that not only was her philandering husband screwing around behind
her back with another woman, he also had some Shady Dealings that left
her in serious debt.  With the threat of her home being taken away from
her, Grace turns to her former Scot yardsman Matthew (Craig Ferguson)
for advice.  Matthew, who partakes of Demon Weed on a regular basis with
local doc Dr. Bamford (Martin Clues), helps Grace hatch the idea to take
some of Matthew's dying marijuana plants and sell them.  That's right:
sweet middle-aged Grace will become a [gasp] drug dealer!
With Grace now reduced to "having" to sling dope to make ends meet, can
Hilarity still Ensue?
The Upshot:
The first thing you should know about SAVING GRACE is that, at least by
American standards, it's fairly absurd.  Maybe I live a Sheltered Life,
but within *my* circles at least, had The Whole Town known I was doing
what Matthew and Grace were doing, I dare say that neither of us would
be doing it for long; between that cop taking us in toot sweet, or the
neighbors stealing our brightly-lit stash, I have no doubt that here in
near-suburban Podunkville, the chances that we'd have a Grace in our
backyard are slim-to-none.  And yes, that _is_ considering the fact that
there are plenty of corrupt cops, and known dopehouses, to go around.
You should also know that it's a given that British Humor is
somewhat...drier...than what's commonly seen on TV tubes and theater
screens here in the States.  "Benny Hill" and "Monty Python" aside, I've
found Brit Humor to be interesting, but a lot more subdued, than the
general Laugh Out Loudedness that permeates so many American comedy
flicks these days.  Not that that's A Bad Thing per se; it's just
different.
All those caveats aside, the folks involved with SAVING GRACE looked
like they were having a bowl...er, a ball.  Though this movie stretched
the limits of my Disbelief at times, the major players involved with it
were quite pleasing to watch (one of the best things being that they
looked like people that'd live in such a place; no teased hair and
spoiled-brat acting on these actors' parts, no siree!) and root for.
Which raises Yet Another interesting question: is it kosher to root for
these - let's call a spade a spade, shall we? - for these drug dealers?
Is it ok to do so - as long as the person slinging the dope isn't your
everyday ghetto dweller (and only doing it because she "has to" - unlike
those ghetto dwellers, who must so obviously enjoy the fringe benefits
of living a life of crime that they don't follow their True Calling in
life)?  See, maybe it's Just Me, but I can't quite get around the
hypocrisy of the whole situation, especially in an era where (in *this*
country, anyway), there's little sympathy shown for people that do
exactly that: sell dope because, in their minds at least, they _have_
to.  Makes it kinda hard to laugh at someone doing it to keep a
300-year-old house, you know?
Maybe the humor is in the cute way that Grace takes her first drag, to
experience what it is she's selling, for her edification.  Maybe there's
humor in the Upstanding Town Ladies getting high from mistaking cannabis
leaves, for tea leaves.  Maybe the cuddly doc-as-dopehead is humorous.
They all are, humorous, really; the townspeople were folks I wouldn't
mind having as neighbors, the doctor could teach his American colleagues
a thing or two about how to work with their patients, and there's
something quite cozy about a town staying up each night to watch your
greenhouse light up like a bottle rocket.  And maybe SAVING GRACE is on
the same continuum as, say, a Cheech And Chong flick.  No?  Alright
then: if not, *why not*, hmmm?  Hey, I'm willing to listen; tell me the
difference, at base, between Grace lighting up, Cheech (or Chong)
lighting up, and Shaniqua From The Projects lighting up.  I'm all ears.
Anyway...the performances in "Grace" were all solid, even though near
the end the story started to get less and less credible.  The scenery
was beautiful, the actors comfortable in their roles, and the writing
was fairly tight (though I found myself lost at times, trying to compare
British/metric measures to the ones we silly Yanks use.  Hey, it never
caught on here; sue me).  As Grace, Brenda Blethyn mixed humor and
pathos quite well, and presented the audience with a performance that
puts some of our best and brightest young movie stars, to shame; given
her storyline, she could've easily stunk up the screen, and it is to her
credit that she was able to cultivate what might have been a pathetic
character, into what ended up as a beautiful blossom.  The same could be
said about much of the rest of the cast, especially Martin Clunes as the
dopey doc; and when his character uttered the line (paraphrased) "Why is
marijuana illegal, yet the drug alcohol, is not?", I wanted to shout
"preach, brudda!"
On the whole, the movie was enjoyable enough, and in a perfect world,
that would be all that needed to be said.  My problem is that the
ongoing War On [some] Drugs here in the New World, made SAVING GRACE
lose a little something in the translation.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
A quick recap, first: in my review of COYOTE UGLY a few weeks back, I
mentioned a game called "Spot The Spot", and suggested that interested
readers contact me by email to find out what the game was about.  "Spot
the Spot" is a pasttime The Diva and a friend hipped me to (and that I
wasn't very comfortable with at first).  The idea apparently came from
watching too many Woody Allen movies; you know, the ones where he's in
deeply-urban Manhattan, yet there's no Black or Brown folks to be found?
As most of you who emailed me guessed, "Spot The Spot" is a game where
you note the Black or Brown token in a movie, the one that you *know*
was put there for Inclusion's sake.  In "Coyote", it was the Black guy
abstractedly dancing with the White woman at wazzername's friend's
wedding (and no, Tyra Banks didn't qualify as Spot.  Three guesses as to
why - and the first two are wrong).
Another example, relevant to this weekend's movies: while watching
SAVING GRACE yesterday, I noticed Spot (in the form of an
offensive-looking - to me - and rather large, "pickaninny"-type doll in
one scene) primarily because there were no Blacks in the movie at all,
up until then.  Thing is, though, it was _natural_ for there to have
been no Blacks in that movie's setting, so Spot *was* out of place (and
particularly so in that scene.  For the life of me, I don't know why
that small town would have the Black equivalent of an Indian Chief Cigar
Stand in its window).  Contrast this with the other movie I saw
yesterday: Whipped.  This was a movie that took place in New York City,
where I'd fully expect to see an abundance of not only Black folk, but
all kinds of Ethnic People.  Yet, it wasn't until one of the last scenes
that I saw Spot, in the form of one of Mia's girlfriends.  In full
neck-twisting mode.
I don't know whether to be (more) offended by "Grace"'s version of Spot,
or "Whipped"'s .
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Yes, it's just jokes, I know.  Yes, British Humor is an acquired taste.
And yes, everything doesn't have to be about race and the assumptions
one makes based upon who is holding the joint at the time.  But my mind
keeps jumping back to this question, which I'd like to hear an honest
answer to: in America, at least, given our attitudes about The War On
[some] Drugs, and our (mis)perceptions and prejudices about who is a
criminal and who isn't, how different a movie would this have been if
the little old lady in question, wasn't a little old _White_ lady?
Never mind; I already know the answer to that one.  Time to call a truce
on this hypocritical War, I say.
SAVING GRACE (rating: flashing yellowlight):
You don't have to be high to enjoy this flick - but being English might
help.

Title
Review for Heartbreakers (2001)
HEARTBREAKERS (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 122 minutes
Genre: Comedy
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.mgm.com/heartbreakers/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0125022
Written by:Stephen Mazur, Paul Guay, Robert Dunn
Directed by: David Mirkin
Cast: Sigourney Weaver, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Gene Hackman,
Ray Liotta, Jason Lee, Nora Dunn, Anne Bancroft, Jeffrey Jones
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbreakers.html
And Now For Something Completely Mindless.  And, funny.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
It's old one-two con: Dear Old Mom Angela (Sigourney Weaver) left-hooks
some poor fool into marrying her, then daughter Page (Jennifer Love
Hewitt) sucker-punches the schmoe by seducing him into a compromising
position, so that The Jilted Bride can collect on blackmail...er, I
mean, alimony.  All in the family, I reckon.
After snagging philandering chop-shop owner Dean Cumanno (Ray Liotta)
this way, Page wants out of the mother-daughter con game to set up her
own separate scams.  Angela doesn't think Page can hack it, but
reluctantly agrees to break up, until an IRS Agent (Anne Bancroft)
bursts their bubble.  Needing some quick cash, Page agrees to one more,
big con, so the two set off for prime Rich White Guy hunting grounds:
Palm Springs.
There, they pick out tobacco billionaire William B. Tensy (Gene Hackman)
as their new mark; the constantly-hacking Tensy seems an easy enough
mark, though Page would rather go after younger game.  But complicating
things for them both are Tensy's stern, dedicated housekeeper (Nora
Dunn) and Jack (Jason Lee), a bartender (and more?) with the hots for
Page's alter con-ego.  Could True Love be in the cards for Page?
The Upshot:
Well, it's not completely mindless.  Nope, that's MONKEYBONE territory.
HEARTBREAKERS was more like DIRTY ROTTEN SCOUNDRELS with tits.  Oh boy,
am I gonna hear it for that one.
Despite all the flailing about, the ObLoveStory between Page (Love
Hewitt; LH, from now on) and Jack (Jason Lee, who I can't stop seeing as
Azrael from DOGMA.  Trust me; that's not A Good Thing.) was the least
interesting thing about HEARTBREAKERS, though I was shocked when I
realized that I actually liked both characters and their actors - taken
separately.  No, what HEARTBREAKERS had going for it was more an
ensemble groove, with each character, and actor, adding their own zesty
spice to the mix.
Sigourney Weaver, in one of her best comedic performances since WORKING
GIRL, and Ray Liotta, in one of _his_ best performances, *period*, in a
lonnnnnng time, had great comedic timing together, as did - much to my
shock - Weaver and LH (who I wouldn't have bet could Hold Weaver's
Jockstrap; thanks, Jim Hill, for that image).   As it stood, LH was much
more convincing as the put-upon condaughter, than as the Love Interest;
I could live with that, though, because the con was The Thing.  And
though his was a one-trick pony, Gene Hackman's hacky cigarette baron
character, William B. Tensy, kept me grinning for most of the movie.  I
wasn't crazy about his payoff scene, but I've gotten a lot of mileage
out of that statue [go see the flick, to catch my meaning].  The cast
seemed to get much giggles playing off each other; that translated well
to the audience, as we giggled right back.
There's not much depth to HEARTBREAKERS - certainly, nothing Exciting!
And! New!, despite the lame "I'm like this because I have Male
Abandonment Issues" subplot - but sometimes, a good laugh is its own
reward.  And lord knows, after the dismal early 2001 movie season, we
need all the rewards we can get.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Um...how about the "Chick Factor" instead?
I admit I don't have much first-hand experience at being a horny guy who
has, apparently, never seen a push-up bra he didn't like, so somebody
help me out here: what is it about a curvy chick flashing her tits, that
makes guys stoopid?  I mean, didn't Julia Roberts already Go There with
"Airhead Broccoli" (or whateverthell it's called)?  Are fellas really so
desperate that all it takes is a little whiff of pus...er...femininity,
to make y'all give away the farm?  Well, somebody sure thinks y'all are,
given all the Curvy Busty Chick Snags An Idiot plots in comedies these
days.  But maybe I'm just playa-hatin' because I know I won't look half
as good as Ms. Weaver, when *I* turn 50.
Bammer's Bottom Line
No, it's not THE STING, nowhere near it.  But HEARTBREAKERS was a funny,
lighthearted comedy - and who doesn't like to laugh?
HEARTBREAKERS (rating: greenlight):
HEARTBREAKERS was a turn-your-brain-off-and-just-enjoy-it kinda flick.
Hey, everything can't be Deep, y'know?

Title
Review for Contender, The (2000)
THE CONTENDER (2000)
Rated R; running time 126 minutes
Genre:Political Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0208874
Official site: http://www.thecontender-thefilm.com/
Written by: Rod Lurie
Directed by: Rod Lurie
Cast: Joan Allen, Gary Oldman, Jeff Bridges, Sam Elliott,
Christian Slater, William L. Petersen, Saul Rubinek, Robin Thomas
(William Hanson), Mike Binder (Lewis Hollis), Philip Baker Hall
(Oscar Billings), Mariel Hemingway (Cynthia Lee), Kathryn Morris
(FBI agent), Kristen Shaw (Fiona Hathaway)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamscontender.html
My jaded snarkasm is, I think, my biggest movie-watching handicap.  Let
one teeny bit of nonsense be shown on screen - like, say, the portrayal
of an Honest Politician - and WHOOSH; the air just squirts right outta
my Disbelief's Suspension, sending it tumbling...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The Clinton era is over, yet there's another Democratic White House -
with Yet Another Sex Scandal on its hands: this time, involving an
ex-Republican of the female persuasion.
The Vice-President Of The United States has died, and President Jackson
Evans (Jeff Bridges) searches for a replacement amongst his Democratic
party.  A candidate, Governor Jack Hathaway (William L. Petersen), is
proposed after he heroically tries to rescue a woman whose car crashes
into the river in which he's fishing.  But the shadow of Ted Kennedy is
cast much too wide for Hathaway to escape, and Evans and his Chief Of
Staff, Kermit Newman (Sam Elliott), reject Hathaway on the basis of
possible misperception and potential innuendo.
Wanting someone who Looks Good above all, Evans - much to the dismay of
Newman and fellow staffer Jerry Tolliver (Saul Rubinek) - decides on
naming Senator Laine Hanson (Joan Allen) as his new VP.   Insisting that
the reason for not wanting Hanson in the number two spot has nothing to
do with her gender, but that she certainly wouldn't be appointed "just
because" she's a woman, young Democratic Senator Reginald Webster
(Christian Slater)  seeks out Shelly Runyon (Gary Oldman), the
Republican chairman running the VP confirmation committee, asking if he
could be part of Runyon's committee.  Before the conformation hearings
begin (using tactics that "even the FBI wouldn't touch"), Runyon and
Webster discover that Hanson may have had a Sordid Past: as a college
freshman, she was rumored to have been part of a fraternity/sorority
gang-bang.  Armed with that knowledge, Webster, and especially Runyon,
set out to destroy any chance of Hanson ever seeing the White House from
the Seat Of Power.
The Upshot:
Like NURSE BETTY before it, THE CONTENDER was chock full of good
performances leading to a dead-end.  Joan Allen, one of the best parts
of the movie PLEASANTVILLE, was excellent as the downtrodden,
too-good-to-be-true Senator Hanson [which reminds me: if she was already
a Senator, why did the scandal not break when she was running for that
office?  Silly me, asking logical questions again].  Gary Oldman, as the
sleazy slimy Shelly Runyon, sent chills down my spine.  Once again, he
submersed himself fully into a role in which he acts and looks
completely different from his previous roles; why his name isn't brought
up when his contemporaries like Streep and DeNiro are mentioned, is
beyond me.  In two strong supporting roles, Christian Slater's naive
junior Senator, and especially Sam Elliott as Kermit [Kermit?  WTF???]
Newman, often Own the scenes they're in.  And even though Jeff Bridges'
food-obsessed version of the President was too comical for me to get
behind, he was Clinton-esque enough to be believable throughout the
first 100 or so minutes of this flick.
So why'd THE CONTENDER fail to get the 3BC equivalent of two thumbs up?
This movie was like the best passage in dancehall tune: the passage
itself may be great, but in the end, the song just repeats one phrase
over and over.
The "one-phrase" in "Contender" split itself in two: on the low octave,
it's "Republicans Are Bad, Mean/And Ugly Too"; and in the high register,
it's "Look At The Honest Politician Done Wrong/And Taking It Up The
Wazoo".  And both notes, hit repeatedly and fair loudly, were enough to
deaden my eardrum. Especially with that "Honest Politician" bit.  The
light went out on that search a long time ago.
THE CONTENDER was a slow-starter, picked up with a twist near the
three-quarters mark, and comes complete with a Big! Speech! reminiscent
of Michael Douglas' turn in THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT.  In this, it's very
much like the political campaign of the GoreBush morph Borg: it looks
like it's saying something Real, but it's really just mouthing the words
without any real feeling.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Setting aside the fact that, unless I misremember, the only speaking
part a Black actor got in THE CONTENDER was that of a White House waiter
[and how's that for a rosy outlook of Our role in the Democratic
future?], let's focus on The Female Factor and how it comes back to The
Black Factor, shall we?
What peaked my curiosity most is that, in some ways, the words "Female"
and "Black" could be used interchangeably in this movie; couldn't you
just hear those Senators saying "I don't mind that he's Black, but I
won't vote for him simply because of that!", or even better, "This is
what comes of Affirmative Action!", and meaning the same thing aimed at
a White woman or a Black man? And yes, I know that there are actually
Black women in relatively high-ranking political positions; but get
real: besides that nutcase that the equally nutcased Pat Buchanon has as
a running-mate, do you really think that an American presidential
candidate is anywhere near ready for a Black woman as the Vice
button-pusher?
Terms being somewhat interchangeable or not, though, I doubt that a
political movie that did interchange them would ever be made.  Unless it
was a Black movie.  Make that, a Black comedy. Starring the Wayans
Brothers as Stepin and Fetchit.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
My lack of respect for the whole of American Politicians having informed
my Suspension Of Disbelief that it was time to give up the ghost, I just
couldn't take this movie at face value.  THE CONTENDER was a pretender
to the throne.  An idealistic pretender, sure; but I defy anyone to find
a Senator Laine Hanson hiding out inside any of the corrupted charlatans
who are our elected representatives.  grumble.
THE CONTENDER (rating: flashing yellowlight):
Hey, I think I'm on to something: "The Pretender" is a much better title
for a portrayal of an Honest Politician, eh?

Title
Review for Straight from the Streets (1998) (V)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsstreets.html
The official website notes that "Straight From The Streets is a feature 
length film based on the realities of urban life, expressed through the 
artistic medium of rap music and hip-hop culture".  Being a child of the 
70's myself, I'm...resistant...to most of what I've seen and heard in 
hardcore rap music--but having an open mind, I agreed to review this 
documentary (produced and directed by Keith O'Derek).  After looking, 
unsuccessfully, for the DVD, I actually found it on tape at the local 
Blockbuster Video [quite a feat, considering Lansing "Where Tha Black 
Peeple At?" Michigan ain't exactly Culture City, USA].  If it were up to 
me, it would be included in every Blockbuster.
The Story:
This real-life documentary hooked me with a quote by Kahlil Gibran...
    "And there are those who talk and without knowledge or forethought, 
   reveal a truth which they themselves do not understand.
     And there are those who have the truth within them, but they tell 
   it not in words.
     Yesterday is but today's memory, and tomorrow's dream."
...and revolted me with some unattributed statistics...
   -California's prison budget: 3.1 billion dollars
   -In 1996, California spent more on prisons than on higher education
   -16 new prisons have been built in California since 1984...and 25
    more were slated to be completed by the end of the [20th] century
   -Blacks are arrested for drug offenses five times more often than
    Whites
   -Blacks are charged under the "three strikes" rule seventeen times
    more often than Whites
   -California's fastest growing prisoner population is Black women
   -There are five times as many Black men in jail than there are
    enrolled in universities
...and after the revulsion passed, the jaded part of me resisted those 
statistics, almost justifying them ("well, nobody made those dummies do 
the bad stuff they did to go to prison!"). But one sobering thought 
squashed my inner grumblings: there but by the grace of God, go I.
The remainder of this documentary put a "face" on the statistics, in a 
way that has rarely been seen; ironically, in a way that my other 
current "Spotlight On..." film review - the drama, Thicker Than Water - 
couldn't begin to approach.  While I'm on the subject of "Thicker", I 
incorrectly compared it and "Streets" by labelling them both as movies 
about "the rap scene"; that's only partially true, about both of them.  
If I were to sum up "Streets", I'd have to do it in the words of a 70's 
soul tune: "Life ain't so easy/when you're a Ghetto Child".  The rap 
scene was a mere backdrop to the picture of L.A. from the eyes of 'hood 
residents, from the 1992 riots to 1995's Million Man March.
O'Derek takes us on a journey through the 'hood by way of interviews 
with the famous and infamous. Denzel Washington is briefly seen, talking 
about wanting to lobby Washington DC to "make positive change"; but the 
majority of time is spent talking to rappers like Ice-T, Ice Cube, and 
Snoop -- or, more correctly, by letting them do all the talking.  He 
also talks with up-and-coming rappers Kam (my personal favorite speaker 
of the bunch; I felt myself being drawn in by what he had to say, as 
time went on), Shiff (who is followed throughout the documentary), Lady 
Of Rage (who had some interesting views about "bitches and hoes"; 
considering her tag, you just might be surprised by what she had to say)  
among many others.
In an inspired move, O'Derek interweaves footage of the 1968 Watts riots 
with the 1992 L.A. riots--and strangely enough, though much lip service 
has been paid to the '68 riots being "righteous", you get the feeling 
that 30 years didn't really change much in the way Black folk were 
viewed; agree with either or not, We were far and wide seen as 
opportunistic savages, both times.
Over time we see, up close and personal, the effects of the 
highly-publicized (but rarely explored by mainstream media) gang truce, 
and meet Tony "Bogard" Thomas, who spearheaded the truce--and we see the 
consequences when the truce is broken.  Though the majority of time is 
spent highlighting Black neighborhoods and residents, the issue of 
coalitions and separatism between Blacks and Latinos was also explored.  
All in all, the name of the game was not so much rap as a business, but 
rap (and "low riders", and "tagging", and even to some extent, banging) 
as an expression of life.
I was tempted at first to play off "Straight" as an extended version of 
"Cops"; my doing so would've done it a great injustice: O'Derek was no 
simple voyeur into a world in which he had nothing vested, and neither 
were those whom he interviewed.  He neither glorified that world, nor 
condemned it; instead, he left the 'hood speak for itself, in its own 
words.
The Upshot:
I found myself more easily identifying with Denzel Washington--someone 
who the rest of the celebrities interviewed would no doubt be considered 
an "outsider" (even though he, like me, came up from the same streets as 
Cube & Co. did, albeit at a much different time.  Hell, the difference 
feels like we came up in a much different *universe*).  I found my 
normal knee-jerk reactions to the knuckleheads and bangers fading into 
the background, replaced by a willingness to truly listen to what they 
were saying.  I'm not born-again Hard, but I can certainly appreciate a 
different viewpoint than I did before.  I still say that "both" [as if 
there were only two] sides need to shut up for a few years and really 
listen to what the other side has to say; and I believe that coalition, 
not separatism, is the only way any of us are gonna get out of this 
jungle alive.  But a thought occurs to me: what if The Powers That Be, 
in full recognition of the power of coalition, really is doing all It 
can to keep the powerless us (in all the variations of "us"), powerless?  
Hmmm...
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
There are many aspects of this documentary that I can't begin to address 
in this small space; I reckon you'll just have to see it for yourself.  
Be sure to check out Straight From The Streets, available for purchase 
direct from Upfront Productions, and hopefully for rent at a Blockbuster 
near you; contact FilmNU@aol.com for more information.
"Straight From The Streets"  (rating: greenlight): 
"Straight" is a sobering look at a way of life which many of us will 
never know firsthand; even those of us who grew up in the ghetto of old 
(and by the way, unlike some of my contemporaries, I wear my ghetto past 
in pride), can't really Feel what it's like now, unless we do more than 
look in from the outside.  While I found myself boggling at the "Ices" 
(Ice Cube and Ice-T) seemingly excusing everything under the sun that 
Black folk do (including that which we do to each other), as if We are 
mindless children who don't know any better--it is undeniable that there 
is something way out of wack when more money is spent on incarceration, 
than on education.

Title
Review for O Brother, Where Art Thou? (2000)
O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU? (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 103 minutes
Genre: Adventure Comedy
Official site: http://studio.go.com/movies/obrother/index.html
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0190590
Written by: Ethan Coen, Joel Coen (based on Homer's "The Odyssey")
Directed by: Joel Coen
Cast: George Clooney, John Turturro, Tim Blake Nelson, Charles Durning,
John Goodman, Michael Badalucco, Chris Thomas King, Holly Hunter,
Stephen Root, Wayne Duvall, Ed Gale, Ray McKinnon, Quinn Gasaway,
Lee Weaver, Mia Tate, Christy Taylor, Musetta Vander
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsobrother.html
Do me a favor: the next person that tells you George Clooney is a
talentless, pretty-boy hack, pop 'em in the mouth.  Better yet, take
them to see O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU?.  If they ain't convinced by his
magic therein, there just ain't no convincing 'em.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU? is a down-home, no-place-like-home, road
story, in the vein of one of the first, and best, of them: Homer's epic
poem, "The Odyssey".
In depression-era Mississippi, three rather...confused...convicts -
Everett Ulysses McGill (George Clooney), Pete Hogwallop (John Turturro),
and Delmar O'Donnell (Tim Blake Nelson) - bust out of the chain gang
they're on in search of the $1.2mil treasure Everett told them he stole.
Everett, a self-made leader who is as concerned with his hair and the
pomade that keeps it slicked as he is with the treasure they're after,
doesn't inspire much confidence in the hotheaded Pete or the somewhat
dimwitted Del; but since he's the best they've got, they reluctantly
follow his lead.  The threesome are cautioned by an old soothsayer (Lee
Weaver) that their way would be fraught with dangers to overcome, but
our three heroes are determined to see their odyssey through.
Along their journey, they come across some situations epic and
not-so-epic, involving Pete's backcountry cousin Wash (Frank Callison)
and son Bog (Quinn Gasaway); Tommy Johnson (Chris Thomas King), a
guitarist at a crossroads in his life; a radio announcer (Stephen Root)
whose "can" allows a surprising outlet for the trio plus one; Homer
Stokes (Wayne Duvall), a reform candidate for Governor who really means
it when he says he represents the Little Man (Ed Gale); a trio of sweet
siren temptresses (Mia Tate, Christy Taylor, Musetta Vander); and many
more creatures, great and small.  The threesome are searching for many
things - including redemption and divine intervention - but, like the
Ulysses of centuries ago, what they want most is to find their way Home.
The Upshot:
Ok, ok, maybe a quick poppin's too drastic [DISCLAIMER: anyone who'd
give someone else a pop in the mouth on my say-so, needs their head
examined.  Go, quickly, and get thyself Healed, for I have no such Power
over thee].  After all, Clooney can't be held harmless for some of the
bad press he's gotten; for too long, he seems to have gotten by with his
sloe grin, puppydog eyes, and Classic Actor looks.  But that's neither
here nor there; in the "Odyssey"-inspired O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU?,
Clooney more than holds his own against the likes of Actors' Actors John
Turturro, Charles Durning, and Holly Hunter.
In fact, it's Hunter (Penny) that set in mind the movie that "O Brother"
reminded me most of: the Coens' equally quirky (though somewhat better)
RAISING ARIZONA, in which she costarred with another "Brother", John
Goodman.  "O Brother" survives the comparison; though it's not quite as
"groundbreaking" as "Arizona" was, for my money, O BROTHER, WHERE ART
THOU? is just as much fun.
The treats in "O Brother" came from all sides: for one, while each actor
was given a chance to shine - Clooney and the hilariously deadpan Tim
Blake Nelson, especially - the ensemble effort that the Coen Boys seem
to inspire, was evident.  Within this large cast, from John Goodman's
broad portrayal of conman Big Dan Teague, to Michael Badalucco as George
Nelson, the gangsta who wouldn't accept the name society would deem him
fit to hold, to the multiple "Odyssey"-esque characters in between, the
players built each segment of "O Brother" onto the next, layering its
rich tones along the way.  Second, behind the scenes, the Brothers Coen
worked their magic in a way I haven't seen from them since FARGO (I'd
love to say more, but it'd involve too many spoilers).  I wonder what
they could possibly come up with next to top these two films.
If anyone involved with this dynamite production could be said to be
flat, it would have to be Charles Durning; I've seen his Governor Pappy
act one too many times in similar Good Ol' Boy roles, and it quickly
wore a nerve for me.  And besides, Paul Newman portrayed the Guv'ner
>From Louisiana much more memorably in BLAZE a few years back.
It's quite amazing to find a movie that actually has me anxious to go
back and read old grade school literature [where's my old copy of Homer,
anyway?].  And, the bonus of watching Clooney move in way I've never
seen him move before?  Priceless.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
    And speaking of "Magical Negroes"...
I'll be the first to admit that Lee Weaver, as the old blind soothsayer
who first sets Everett, Pete, and Del off on their adventures, occupies
that archetype; soothsaying, after all, *is* Magical, no two ways about
it.  I'm not sweatin' that role at all; it is as it was *supposed* to
be, so I suggest that anyone who wants to get Up In Arms about it,
should take a pill.
I *do*, however, have a bit of a bone to pick with Chris Thomas King's
rather dull portrayal of Tommy Johnson, a role apparently inspired by
the fabled story of blues guitarist Robert Johnson.  But my quibble with
King, I reckon, is one that he could never overcome - because for the
life of me, I can't imagine anyone ever doing a better job at playing
Robert Johnson than the incomparable Joe Seneca, as he did in
CROSSROADS.  Sorry Chris; you never had a chance.
Bammer's Bottom Line
The real test of a greenlighter, for me, is whether I'd want to see the
movie again, if only eventually.  "O Brother" passed that test and then
some - because I was ready to re-watch this flick immediately.  If only
to hear the "Soggy Bottom Boys" work it again.
O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU? (rating: greenlight):
Just found my old Ancient Lit textbook.  Hmmm.  Uh...anybody got any
cliff notes I can borrow?

Title
Review for Jui kuen II (1994)
THE LEGEND OF DRUNKEN MASTER (1994; dubbed in English in 2000)
Rated R; running time 102 minutes
Genre: Comedy/Action
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0111512
Official site: http://www.legendofdrunkenmaster.com/
Written by: Edward Tang, Tong Man Ming, Yuen Chieh Chi
Directed by: Lau Ka Leung
Cast: Jackie Chan, Ti Lung, Anita Mui, Lau Ka Leung, Wing-Fong Ho,
Chin Kar Lok, Ken Lo, Ho Sung Pak, Felix Wong
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsdrunken.html
There comes a time in every Chick's life when she has an epiphany so
mind-blowing, it forever alters her life, causing her to grow up far
quicker than she expected to, and making well-done hamburger patties out
of her Sacred Cows.
My time came Sunday, with the realization that Bruce Lee isn't the
greatest martial artist the movie world has ever seen.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
THE LEGEND OF DRUNKEN MASTER humorously tells the story of Chinese folk
legend Wong Fei-Hung (Jackie Chan), young master of the "Drunken Boxing"
kung fu style of martial arts.
In this almost plot-overloaded movie, Wong Fei-Hung and his hapless
brother Cho (Lau Ka Leung), travel by train with their father, Dr. Wong
Kei-Ying (Ti Lung), bringing medical supplies back to their home.  Part
of their supplies - some medicinal ginseng - gets mixed up in the
baggage of the Ambassador (Ken Lo), leading to a struggle between
Fei-Hung and a mysterious old man, Tsan (Felix Wong) over the package.
The struggle gets especially interesting when Fei-Hung tries to impress
Tsan with his Drunken Boxing style of kung fu (which he doesn't do
nearly as well when he's *not* drunk).
Wong also has comical misunderstandings with his father, who doesn't
want Fei-Hung to either fight *or* drink - both of which, of course,
Fei-Hung does in abundance; with his mother, Madame Wong (Anita "Lucy
Ricardo, reincarnated" Mui); and with friendly rival Ching Ho Sang (Chin
Kar Lok), who spars with Fei-Hung for the attention of the lovely Fong
(Wing-Fong Ho).  Fei-Hung and his Folks face epic battles with the
Ambassador (who has the fastest kicks I've ever seen), his minion Henry
(Ho Sung Pak), and a rather hot bed of coals.
Sober, Fei-Hung is good; but to do Drunken Boxing the way it needs to be
done, he has to get good and toasted, which he does on more than one
occasion.  And what commences are some of the outright funniest skits
and amazing martial arts scenes I've ever seen in one movie.
The Upshot:
Ok, so maybe I exaggerated a wee bit; maybe Chan didn't exactly Rock My
World, but he did shake the foundations a bit.  It really was quite
eye-opening to see just how Bad the man is - and in a relatively
unpolished, six-year-old movie, no less!
To some, the plot of a martial arts movie is like the plot of a porn
flick: most people don't bother paying attention to the words; they just
want to get to the Action [the same has been said about Black "booty
call" comedies, so don't Trip over the analogy].  Which goes to show you
how warped we westerners can be sometimes - because the plot was
well-developed in "Legend".  Still, I won't lie; I got lost in the
backstory with the English Overlord (I think that's what he was supposed
to be), to the point where I totally dismissed him whenever he came
on-screen.  I imagine part of my confusion comes from the fact that I
haven't seen the film "Legend" is a sequel to - 1978's DRUNKEN MASTER -
and thus don't fully know who's who within Fei-Hung's circle of friends
and enemies.  I'm fairly sure that I got some of the names mixed up in
"The Story" above, unfortunately.
But the point remains: this movie was a lot more than the "chop socky"
so often dismissed when we see a "Karate Flick".  Sure, the kung fu was
there at base, and rightly so (I'd pay to see those scenes by
themselves, especially the final battle; it was that good).  But the
humor was *strong* - especially with Anita Mui; I swear I cracked a rib
on her account! - and I even found myself crying with sadness when
Fei-Hung got chewed out by his father.  Add some interesting cultural
references on top of that, and you have yourself a well-rounded movie.
Granted, it's no CITIZEN KANE; but could Kane drink like a fish and then
kick serious butt?   Thought not!
It's funny: I was just telling some friends about how much I enjoyed the
DVD release of SHANGHAI NOON, a Jackie Chan east-meets-west flick I
reviewed earlier this year.  Besides the great DVD features available in
this cut, Chan's trademark outtakes and behind-the-scenes bits show the
true measure of his technical and cinematic skills.  But who knew it
would take a six-year-old flick like "Legends" to finally make me bow to
the master?
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I have never, ever, laughed harder, or damn near cried my eyes out, at
"just a karate flick", the way I did during "Legend".  Bruce Lee was
baaad, no doubt; but Jackie Chan is The Man.  Chan has stood the test of
time, and *still* comes out swinging.  Sit down, Steven Segal; take a
hike, Jean Claude Van Damme.  Check out this older Jackie Chan flick,
and see what Legends truly are made of.
THE LEGEND OF DRUNKEN MASTER (rating: greenlight):
I still love me some Bruce Lee, and I always will.  But the king is
dead: long live King Jackie.

Title
Review for Fantasia/2000 (1999)
FANTASIA 2000 (non-IMAX) (2000)
Rated G; running time 74 minutes
Genre: Animated
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0120910
Official site: http://disney.go.com/DisneyPictures/fantasia2000/
Written by: Don Hahn, Irene Mecchi, David Reynolds; Hans Christian
Andersen (story: "The Steadfast Tin Soldier" )
Music by: Paul Dukas (from "L'apprenti sorcier"), Edward Elgar (from
"Pomp and Circumstance March No. 1"), George Gershwin (from "Rhapsody
in Blue"), Ottorino Respighi (from "Pines of Rome"), Camille Saint-Saens
(from "The Carnival of the Animals"), Dmitri Shostakovich (from "Piano
Concerto No. 2"), Igor Stravinsky (from "The Firebird"), Ludwig van
Beethoven (from "Symphony No. 5 in C minor, Op. 67")
Directed by: James Algar ("The Sorceror's Apprentice"), Gaetan Brizzi
("Firebird Suite"), Paul Brizzi ("Firebird Suite"), Hendel Butoy ("Pines
of Rome", "The Steadfast Tin Soldier"), Francis Glebas ("Pomp and
Circumstance, Marches #1, 2, 3 and 4"), Eric Goldberg ("Rhapsody in
Blue", "Carnival of the Animals"), Don Hahn ("Host Sequences") Pixote
Hunt ("Beethoven's Symphony No. 5, Allegro con Brio")
Cast: voices of: Walt Disney (Mickey Mouse), Wayne Allwine (Mickey
Mouse), Tony Anselmo (Donald Duck), Russi Taylor (Daisy Duck)
Segment hosts/performers: James Earl Jones, Quincy Jones, Angela
Lansbury, Steve Martin, Bette Midler, Penn Jillette, Teller, James
Levine, Itzhak Perlman, Leopold Stokowski, Deems Taylor
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsfantasia2k.html
   [We interrupt this review for a wee bit of Personal History.
    Readers anxious to skip this somewhat excessive filler and
    Get On With It, are directed to the next section, "The Story".]
I was, in my mother's words, a "peculiar child".  I didn't like pizza
until I was 18 years old.  Unlike the other girls, I thought Barbie
dolls were stupid, and much preferred collecting rocks.  I had to be
forced to wear a dress.  And, oh yeah: I hated Mickey Mouse with a
passion.
To be sure, I loved (and still love) cartoons.  But I was an old-school
TOM & JERRY and WOODY WOODPECKER kinda Chick, and proud of it; who
needed goofy old Donald Duck when you could have the much-cooler Daffy
Duck (and Elmer Fudd, to boot)?  Until Bugs Bunny And Pals were co-opted
by The Man, I was right there with them.  And though I'm definitely
enamored of modern 'toons like A BUG'S LIFE and the TOY STORY series, I
see them more as Pixar creations than true Disney productions.  So it
should come as no surprise that I missed the original FANTASIA the first
time around (which makes sense, since I'm not 60 years old.  But I
digress.)  Okay...to be more precise (and somewhat less flippant), I
never took the opportunity to see the first movie when I had the chance.
After watching the dance of light and sound that played on my senses
while watching FANTASIA 2000, I came to the conclusion that dear ol' ma
was right: I *was* a peculiar child.
   [We now return you to our regularly-scheduled review.  As always,
    we thank you for your patronage.]
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
A blend of traditional animation artistry and modern-day computer
technology, FANTASIA 2000 melds visual delights with grand classical
music scores to create a feeling of sorts more so than to tell a
straightforward, scripted story--advancing the wish of Disney founder
Walt Disney, 60 years after its original release, that Fantasia be a
constant "work in progress".  The modern version updates the classic
segment "The Sorcerer's Apprentice", and adds six new segments, all done
by different directors and creative teams, and introduced by famous (but
in the grand scheme of things here, insignificant) entertainers-as-hosts.
The Upshot:
My description of "the story" is woefully lacking.  It's hard to
describe the beauty of the images and music in words that would make
sense in this forum.  But I reckon it's my job to try.
The narrator introduced the first segment, set to Beethoven's "Symphony
No. 5", by saying that there are three kinds of music: music that tells
a story, music that paints a picture, and music for its own sake--and
further saying that the segment that follows is an example of the
latter.  I would respectfully disagree with that statement; that first
segment, with its beautiful colors which came alive, albeit with no
specific purpose in mind, seemed an example of all three kinds of
"music".  Indeed, most of the segments painted a picture that resonated
in a way that a traditional telling of the intended story, could hardly
approach.  And if the first segment, with its shapes that morphed
smoothly from undefined objects to colorful "butterflies" and beyond,
didn't exactly tell a story, I'd hazard to say the the remainder of the
segments certainly did.
The visual artistry of each segment was well-matched by the beautiful
music chosen for it, though in some very unique ways ("What would happen
if you gave a yo-yo to a flock of flamingos?", indeed!). From the
surreal image of lighter-than-air whales (set to "Pines Of Rome") to the
playfulness of a non-conformist flamingo ("Carnival Of The Animals"),
and especially the wonderous mating of composer George Gershwin's
"Rhapsody In Blue" with artist Al Hirschfeld's unique view of New York
City, FANTASIA 2000 allowed me to re-live fond memories of a time where
cartoons were fun without being overly hip, cynical, and devoid of
inspiration.
The remaining segments were a mixed bag.  The classic "The Sorcerer's
Apprentice" seemed to not have aged as well as I'd hoped (though you
couldn't convince the kids in my audience of that; one squealed "it's
Mickey Mouse!" in unrestrained delight).  Likewise, Donald and Daisy
Duck's turn at being helpers for Noah ("Pomp and Circumstance, Marches
#1, 2, 3 and 4") was less than an unqualified success (but it won me
over by reminding me of my youngest son's recent graduation from high
school).  And I'm of the opinion that "The Steadfast Tin Soldier"
should've remained on that backshelf that host Bette Midler said it
lingered on for so long; it was easily the weakest of all the stories.
But all these sins were forgiven by way of the breathtakingly
bittersweet closing segment, "Firebird Suite".  This normally-jaded
reporter is not ashamed to say that I smiled, I cried, and I cheered, at
the end of this magnificent segment.
That each of the seven segments could get my animation-loving attention,
was not surprising.  That they could grab my interest in their
non-verbal storytelling to the point where I didn't want to leave at the
end, was a delight--one that I am anxious to repeat again (and again).
Next time, sans notebook and pen.
If there was a low point to this film, it came with the Obligatory
Famous Entertainers' "hosting" segments, in which the likes of Steve
Martin, James Earl Jones, Penn and Teller, Bette Midler, and Quincy
Jones, among others, served as a reminder that Hollywood thinks very
little of its audience--and thus, we viewers need to have actors-as-cue
cards read to us "explaining" what we're about to see, since we're
obviously too unintelligent to either figure it out for ourselves, or
individually read introductions that could've easily been splashed
onscreen between segments.  While I have nothing against the performers
(and indeed was relieved that a Robin Williams or a Jim Carrey weren't
invited to overpower what amounted to brief cameos), I do so hate having
my intelligence insulted thusly.  Fortunately, the brevity of each
introductory segment--and the delight in hearing a surround-sound moment
in one of those in-between moments (you'll have to go to see what I
mean)--outweighed my irritation with them.
One unexpected thing, though, was a great surprise for me: there was an
actual Black Factor moment to be had, that had nothing to do with either
of the Joneses, within the triumphant "Rhapsody In Blue" segment (I'd
describe it in detail, but that'd just ruin it for ya, eh?).
All-in-all, FANTASIA 2000 was a brilliant production that will most def
see me in the audience again.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
FANTASIA 2000 is a visual--and aural--masterpiece; true eye candy in
every positive sense of the term, it reminded me of all the reasons I
loved the fully-orchestrated cartoons of the 40s and 50s.  I feel sorry
for today's generations; between all the butchering...er, editing...of
classic cartoons, and the Saturday morning dreck they currently have to
sit through, kids today truly don't know what they're missing.
FANTASIA 2000 (rating: greenlight):
A stunning work of art; but now I have to see it on IMAX--and wait
anxiously for the DVD...

Title
Review for Christmas Story, A (1983)
A CHRISTMAS STORY (1983)
Rated PG; running time 94 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0085334
Written by: Jean Shepherd, Leigh Brown, Bob Clark
  (based on the novel by Jean Shepherd)
Directed by: Bob Clark
Cast: Melinda Dillon, Darren McGavin, Peter Billingsley, Ian Petrella,
Scott Schwartz, R.D. Robb, Zack Ward, Yano Anaya, Tedde Moore,
Jeff Gillen (Santa), Patty Johnson (Head Elf), Drew Hocevar (Male Elf),
John Wong (Chinese Waiter), Jean Shepherd (narrator-as Adult Ralphie)
DVD standard features (region 1): "Pan And Scan" (non-widescreen);
theatrical trailer; scene access.  Languages & Subtitles: English,
French, Spanish
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bammerchristmas.html
I've long been a "save the best for last" kinda Chick.  I blame it on my
Childhood [whine]; growing up Poor [sob] as I did, saving the good stuff
till the end was a Coping Mechanism [boohoo] I developed early on.
That's the only "good" reason I can think of for having put off
reviewing one of the best movies out there, period, for so long.
I guess my tendency towards being a lazy so-and-so might also have
something to do with it.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
In 1940's Indiana, all the hyperimaginative Ralphie (Peter Billingsley)
wanted for Christmas was a genuine Red Ryder 200-shot Carbine Action Air
Rifle.  Not much to ask for, right?
Not if you ask Ralphie's Mom (Melinda Dillon), who firmly believes that
he'd shoot his eye out.  Ralphie's Dad (Darren McGavin) doesn't have
much to say on the subject, though; he's too busy fending off the
dreaded Bumpus Hounds, fighting a furnace that fights him back, and
considering what to do with the Major Prize he received from "Italy".
Ralphie's little brother Randy (Ian Petrella) is no help either; Randy
has his hands full making a mountain out of a molehill of mashed
potatoes.  And on top of all that, Ralphie, his brother, and his friends
Flick (Scott Schwartz) and Schwartz (R.D. Robb) find themselves under
the tyranny of neighborhood bully Scut Farcus (Zack Ward) and his
diminutive friend Yano Anaya (Grover Dill).  If only Ralphie had his
trusty Old Blue BB gun, he'd save the day!
His English teacher, Miss Shields (Tedde Moore), might just be Ralphie a
save-the-day chance, when she assigns his class a normally-dreaded Theme
to write.  And this year's theme? "What I Want For Christmas".
The Upshot:
Another reason for my not having reviewed this movie until now, is that
I found myself a little overwhelmed by the task.  How does one describe,
in short form, the smiles and shrieks of laughter one has experienced
over more than 15 years of seeing the same great movie over and over,
without sounding like a babbling, fanboyish fool who talks too much?
Wait...don't answer that...
Strangely enough, for quite a few of those years, I never even saw A
CHRISTMAS STORY  in its entirety; I didn't see it during its original
theatrical run, and every time I'd catch it on TV, I'd almost literally
*catch* it on TV, usually while channel surfing during the
otherwise-boring Christmas TV Season.  In fact, it wasn't until about a
year or so ago that I finally got a chance to see it all the way
through.  Boy, I sure didn't know what I was missing.
A CHRISTMAS STORY is a rare combination of solid, unwhitewashed family
fare, and down home humor, wrapped up with a pretty bow by a stellar
cast, a surprisingly good director, and a brilliant storyteller
("writer", I've always thought, is too small a word for those talented
few who can tell Stories that are as meaningful when spoken aloud as
they are on paper).
The 1940's never seemed as much fun as it did in "Christmas", and that's
as it should be.  Previous depictions of The Good Old Days were
downright *boring*.  Not so with this retelling; though A CHRISTMAS
STORY was an 80's flick, it had none of the earmarks of that bizarre
period in history, and unless I miss my guess, it kept the spirit of
Jean Shepard's novel intact.  That Shepard, with his distinctive voice
and storytelling flair, acted as narrator, only added to the authentic
feel of "Christmas".
Ralphie's friends, family, and neighborhood, resonated with me because
it reminded me of the close-knit, but slightly warped, neighborhood of
my youth.  Much of the credit for the genuine atmosphere of the
last-nameless family certainly goes to the actors playing them.  In the
non-cutesy roles of the imaginative Ralphie and his goofy younger
brother Randy, Peter Billingsley and Ian Petrella (respectively) have a
freshness untainted by the smartaleckyness of a Macauley Culkin in the
irritating HOME ALONE series.  I Felt Melinda Dillon's (humorous) Pain
as Mom when she tried, and failed, to eat a hot meal for want of
satisfying her family's need for a second helping; but while her
stay-at-home Mom was certainly a product of her times, she had a spark
in her eye and a strength in her voice that let the audience know that
her Time would, surely, come.  Supporting players like Scott Schwartz as
the triple-dog-dared Flick, Tedde Moore as the put-upon teacher, Zack
Ward and Yano Anaya as big bully Scut Farkus and his shortstuff toady
Grover Dill, round out a brilliantly-realized cast.
But for me, "Christmas" was delivered on the talents of actor Darren
McGavin as the turkey-lovin', furnace-fightin', hounddog-hatin',
cussin'-up-a-storm Dad.  I kid you not: tears *roll* whenever I watch
the histronics Dad goes through whenever he's tackling any of life's
tough problems - like what to do with his Major Award and such.
McGavin, for me, was nothing less than perfect playing a role with as
much versatility, considering previous (and future) dramatic roles he's
played, as a Robert De Niro would come to possess.
And just color me Floored when I found out that Bob Clark, director of
that cinematic wonder called PORKY'S, helmed "Christmas".  It's like
night and day: A CHRISTMAS STORY is about as far away from PORKY'S as
SUPERNOVA is from being a real movie.  [Of course, Clark went on later
in his career to direct the horrid BABY GENIUSES.  Go figure].  In any
case, I tip my hat to Clark for his excellent eye and ear for what was
needed to let the fabulous Jean Shepard's lovingly-told tale, come to
pass.  Which reminds me: I have to look for the book "Christmas" was
based on, Shepard's novel "In God We Trust, All Others Pay Cash", to
read over the holidays.  If it's true what They say about films made
from books - "the book is always better than the movie" - reading that
novel will be a good gift to myself.
I gotta cut this overlong review; I could go on and on about this film,
and I'd *still* leave something out ["fa ra ra ra ra"...awww mannnnn, my
sides hurt just thinking about it].  No matter how many times I watch A
CHRISTMAS STORY, I can't help but to grin when Ralphie Goes Off on Ol'
Yellow Eyes, or when Dad rassles with the Bumpus Hounds, or when the
pre-bulimic Randy plays This Little Piggy, or when Flick demonstrates
one more place one shouldn't put one's tongue, or when Mom plays with
Dad's Ball, or...hell, just go watch the movie; you'll see what I mean!
DVD Thingies:
If there's anything wrong with this "Christmas" DVD, it'd have to be the
lack of extras.  There aren't any special DVD Thingies to speak of,
though seeing the original trailer was kind of a kick.  And having no
widescreen option, made Bammer an unhappy camper; I know more than a few
lovers of this "Story" groused at having to watch it in pan & scan on
DVD (though that's better than all the editing that happens to it on
commercial TV).  But I'm easy; I'd watch this movie against a brick wall
if I had to, it's *that* good.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I need to stop being such a "save the best for last" kinda Chick; my
review about one of the mostest bestest movies I've ever seen, should've
been posted long ago, sorry.  A CHRISTMAS STORY is the kind of genuinely
heartwarming, yet sincerely funny, family flick that you wouldn't mind
watching at any time of the year.  DVD Thingies or no, it's a worthy
addition to your movie shelf.
A CHRISTMAS STORY (rating: greenlight):
Remember, kids: you'll shoot your eye out!

Title
Review for Elevator, The (2001) (TV)
THE ELEVATOR (2001)
Rated TV-PG; running time 48 minutes
Genre: Drama
Article about the movie:
   http://www.southend.wayne.edu/days/9800/front.htm
Written by: Gail Parrish
   (winner of the "2001 Dreambuilder Celebration Scribe" award)
Directed by: Jim Friedman
Cast: Christopher B. Duncan, Greg Lauren, Elizabeth Berkley,
Leslie McCurdy, Matthew Jaeger, Michael R. Hays, Jill Courtney Chenault,
Vincent Clark, Council Cargle, Michael "Melik" Brown, James Bonadio,
Stephanie Massacki, Emily E. Podleski
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamselevator.html
For a neat "six degrees of separation" connection I almost had with this
movie, check out ">http://www.3blackchicks.com/elevator6degrees.html> -
then come back and read the rest of this review.  I'll wait.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Charles Baxter (Bruce) is a White, highly-paid power attorney
representing Rich White Guy Robert Jessip (Michael R. Hays), a racist
tyrant who wants to put a plant in a Black community that's taken for
granted because it doesn't have much power to fight against the likes of
Jessip.  Charles' wife Celeste (Elizabeth Berkley) thinks he's sold his
ethics to the highest bidder, and appeals to Charles' colleague Carter
(Matthew Jaeger) for help in showing Charles the way back to the
idealistic law student he used to be.
Meanwhile, on the other side of town...Bruce (Christopher B. Duncan), a
Black janitor, is haunted by demons in his past, and is set to go off
Any Minute Now.  His wife Cheryl (Leslie McCurdy) fears the consequences
of his actions, for their sake as well as for the future of their son
(Vincent Clark).
Charles and Bruce step into an elevator at the courthouse, and THE
ELEVATOR breaks down just before Charles is set to give his closing
arguments - and Charles is confronted with that which makes Bruce such
an Angry Black Man.  What do Bruce and Charles - two men as different as
Night and Day - have in common?  Hmmm...
The Upshot:
Let me say this right now: you have to ignore some Basic Rules Of
Civilized Living while watching this short film.  For instance, you must
forget the reality that cellphones just do not work in elevators;
really, when was the last time you got into a lift, and could talk
without that dreaded "signal lost" message popping up?  Yet, Charles and
Carter have no trouble freely conversing on their cells.  Uh huh.  And
while you're ignoring the Law Of Broken Connections, you might as well
let your Disbelief stay Suspended up there when watching: Carter "tell"
the Judge (Council Cargle) to Talk To The Hand (and doesn't get his
little butt whupped!)...and the strange lack of any outside concern (or
rescue workers) for the broken elevator...and the
ObBlack-Female-Neck-Twisting done by Jill Courtney Chenault; very
out-of-place, considering she played the supposedly-professional
Prosecuting Attorney...and especially any scenery chewed up by the
wildly overacting Michael R. Hays (as fat cat Robert Jessip),
desperately trying to pad each of his 15 Minutes Of Fame with some of
the most ridiculous stuntacting I've seen in awhile.
But these are all minor inconveniences when weighed against the
near-brilliance shown by the two leads, Christopher B. Duncan as Bruce
[the Black Man so Angry, he doesn't have a last name!], and Greg Lauren
as Charles "Goldie" Baxter [hey, he has three names...probably stole one
from Bruce...]  Duncan and Lauren's performances were strong enough to
overcome the niggling issues I'd normally be obsessed with, in a lesser
movie (and truthfully, considering the time and budget limitations
Friedman found himself under, the cast and crew did an admirable job).
I kept having Superman moments when watching Lauren - who bears a
striking resemblance to a young Christopher Reeves - but his acting was
solid, and given the storyline, quite believable.  And Duncan kept me in
mind of Lawrence Fishburne; though Duncan's scowl often threatened to be
his only means of facial expression, the forcefulness of his character's
convictions, and the interesting interaction between these two actors,
was quite exciting to see.
Of the supporting cast, Leslie McCurdy as Bruce's wife Cheryl, wasn't
given much to do - but her tender scene with Bruce was nicely
understated, and vital in providing some insight into where Bruce was
coming from; and as Charles' wife Celeste, Elizabeth Berkley stayed just
on this side of cloying; she threatened to cross into "irritant"
territory, but avoided the hazards inherent in having such a short
amount of time to blend "activist" and "shrew" into a cognitive whole.
Credit must certainly given to writer Gail Parrish for writing her
script in a way which allowed Bruce's story to unfold as it did, leaving
us, like Goldie, to discover the truth rather than be hit upside the
head with it.  And though flashbacks were used a bit more than I
might've liked (not to mention the...interesting...costuming choices),
credit, too, goes to director Jim Friedman for creating an almost
claustrophobic feeling between the two men - and by extension, this
black and white society in which we live.  Taken as a microcosm of the
Issues we in America have with separating past from present, personal
from institutional, and guilt from responsibility, THE ELEVATOR is well
worth watching - and discussing afterwards.
On his TIME SLOT cable show, in response to my statement that racism is
a learned condition, Melik (host of TIME SLOT, and, yes, that Melik: the
"Reporter" listed in the credits above.  Watch for his performance, in
"Elevator" y'all; and if you haven't already, check out my 6 Degrees
tale.  But I digress.)...uh, Melik once asked me if racism can then be
unlearned.  I submit to you, ladies and gentlemen of the jury, that
movies like THE ELEVATOR, "prove" that racism, like all forms of
ignorance, can indeed be unlearned.  Maybe not as tidily, in an hour or
less.  But I gotta believe it can be.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
A good premise at base by writer Gail Parrish (despite problems in
execution of that premise), and solid performances by Christopher B.
Duncan and Greg Lauren, lift THE ELEVATOR to laudable heights.
THE ELEVATOR (rating: greenlight):
I still wish I'd had the chance to review my son in it, though.

Title
Review for Tigger Movie, The (2000)
The Tigger Movie (2000) 
Rated G; running time 75 minutes
Genre: Family (animated)
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0220099 
Official site: http://www.tigger.com/
Written by: Jun Falkenstein (based on the story 
             by A.A. Milne)
Directed by: Jun Falkenstein
Starring: the voices of Jim Cummings, Nikita Hopkins, 
Peter Cullen, Ken Sansom, John Fiedler, Kathy Soucie, 
Andre Stojka, John Hurt, Tom Attenborough
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamstigger.html
The Diva and I have an unwritten agreement for our 3BC reviews: she 
watches all the scary movies - I can't handle them at all, as evidenced 
in my reaction to The Bone Collector- and I, in turn, go to the assorted 
kiddie fare.  It's been a fair trade so far, but the downside, for my 
part, is that as an adult without small children to use as "cover", I 
feel kinda silly going to see these kid flicks.  "Toy Story 2" 
notwithstanding, I realized early on that the ongoing struggle I'd have 
would be to temper my natural inclination toward expecting Greatness 
from each and every movie I watch, with the understanding that some 
things just aren't written for old fogies like me.  That in mind, I was 
almost sure that I'd be watching a movie that I'd be making lots of 
allowances for in the end.
That said, a funny thing happened on the way to the end of "The Tigger 
Movie" ...
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
In this animated rendition of A.A. Milne's "Winnie The Pooh" stories, 
narrated by John Hurt, Winnie The Pooh bear (voice of Jim Cummings) 
takes a back seat to Tigger (voice of Jim Cummings).  Tigger is an 
extroverted tiger who bounces his way in and out of the hearts of his 
friends Pooh, Eeyore the donkey (Peter Cullen), Piglet (John Fiedler), 
Rabbit (Ken Sansom), Owl (Andre Stojka), the human boy Christopher Robin 
(Tom Attenborough), kangaroo Kanga (Kathy Soucie), and especially 
Kanga's son Roo (Nikita Hopkins), who looks up to his good friend Tigger 
as a big brother.  Tigger's habit of joyfully bouncing all over the 
place irks the serious Rabbit and tires everyone but Roo out, but Tigger 
doesn't let them steal his joy for long.  But his joy over being "the 
only Tigger" turns to sadness when he realizes that being the only one, 
means he's without a family; seeing him so sad distresses Roo, who 
enlists Pooh bear and the others to help him find Tigger's family - with 
potentially disastrous results...
The Upshot:
There's a cartoon strip called Calvin And Hobbes that, like this movie, 
features a tiger (Hobbes) as one of the main characters (but unlike 
Christopher Robin from the "Winnie The Pooh" books and movies, the human 
Calvin is an at times bratty and irritating, though almost always funny, 
perpetually 8-year-old boy).  The first few times I read that cartoon 
strip (mind you, as an adult), I found it incredibly dumb; for the life 
of me, I couldn't figure out what could possibly be so funny about the 
little jerk, and why he had a tiger, of all things, following him 
around, doing equally jerky things to neighbor Suzie and to Calvin's 
parents.  It made absolutely no sense to me, and I was just about to 
write it off as a loss, till one day the paper ran a strip in which 
Calvin was going on vacation with his parents, and had Hobbes in the 
back seat with him - and Hobbes was shown to be a stuffed toy tiger.  
Could'a knocked me over with a feather; up to that point, I had no idea 
that the "live" Hobbes existed only in Calvin's vivid (as it was by then 
made clear to me) imagination.  That single strip not only revealed new 
layers of Calvin (and Hobbes) to me, it also taught me a lesson the 
likes of which the phrase "never judge a book by its cover" could never 
do in its staticness.
I had a similar reaction at one point during "The Tigger Movie": there I 
was, only halfway watching this flick, really thinking ahead to the time 
when I'd get home, get this review out of the way, and get some 
much-needed sleep - then seemingly out of nowhere, I had one of those 
"aha!" moments where things suddenly became incredibly clear to me.  
Maybe it was just a single word spoken; more likely, it happened during 
one of the scenes when the on-screen pages of the book turned as if 
narrator John Hurt was a father reading the story to his children - and 
I was transported back to a place in time where Winnie The Pooh, Tigger, 
Eeyore, and Christopher Robin were as real to me as Hobbes was to 
Calvin.  And as silly as it sounds, that "aha!" moment washed over me 
and made the movie come alive.  It was quite a cool Moment for me; I 
wasn't able to hold on to it as long as I would've liked, but it stayed 
with me long enough to make a difference in the way I watched "Tigger".   
And the best thing about the Great Revelation was, it allowed me to be 
comfortable in the knowledge that even if the 37-year-old me couldn't 
totally relax and let this children's movie be a children's movie 
without the added tres cool wink-nudges that more sophisticated fare 
like "Toy Story 2" had built-in, at least the kid me could appreciate 
the memories of the simple lessons about what family really is, that can 
be be found in "Tigger" and the like.
Once I recovered (mostly) from the "aha!", I was able to sit back and 
enjoy the ride with less distraction (except for the rather loud, but 
cute, kids surrounding me).  Before the Great Revelation, "Tigger" 
seemed to be a fairly run-of-the-mill, not very well-drawn cartoon that 
seemed better suited for viewing on TV; that feeling didn't change much 
- I still believe that it didn't really need to be a theatrical release 
- but the issue no longer was reason enough to not enjoy the movie for 
what it had to offer.  Though most of the Obligatory Disney Songs (and 
what's a Disney movie without Obligatory Disney Songs?) made me stir in 
my seat a few times, I found myself enjoying Tigger's big production 
number; it actually tied in with the general theme of the movie, without 
feeling like a forced fit.  And though its comparatively "primitive" 
artwork can't compete with TS2 in the eye candy department (except for 
one noticeably beautiful shot when the sun shines directly on Tigger as 
he and Roo travel through the 100 Acre Wood), that same primitive look 
is faithful to the artwork we've seen countless times during "Winnie The 
Pooh" TV specials.  Overall, the nostalgic flavor that came with the 
look of "Tigger", worked in its favor.
It's fairly evident that "The Tigger Movie" was probably destined for 
direct-to-video release before other recent animated movies got boffo 
box office results; Hollywood execs, after all, are not known for 
passing up potential bankrolls if they can help it.  And though the 
quality of this movie, from both a graphical standpoint as well as in 
its storyline, isn't quite up to the level of TS2, its lack of 
sophistication, nuance, and "inside gags" didn't stop me from enjoying 
"Tigger" for what it was.  In fact, its honest simplicity made me 
appreciate it for exactly that; the bouncy Tigger, scatterbrained Pooh, 
hilariously deadpan Eeyore, and sweetly vulnerable Roo, wouldn't have 
been the same had they been written as more adult-friendly characters.  
Kids of all ages will appreciate that--but only if they're kids at heart.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
Too often, adults let our adulthood get in the way of a good 
old-fashioned bounce (though the way I heard it was, Tiggers Pounce.  
But that's just semantics, I reckon).  Sometimes it's best to drop the 
mask of sophistication and just let a lullaby be a lullaby; sometimes, 
simple *is* better.  To be sure, "The Tigger Movie" was no "Toy Story 
2".  It wasn't really even a "Stuart Little" (as cloying as *that* 
similarly-themed movie was, it did have its Moments).  But maybe that's 
as it should be; there's gotta be room in this world for a Pouncing 
Tigger - and a Roo who loves him - right?
"The Tigger Movie" (rating: greenlight):
Tiggers Pounce.  I can diggit.

Title
Review for Original Kings of Comedy, The (2000)
THE ORIGINAL KINGS OF COMEDY (2000)
Rated R; running time 117 minutes
Genre: Comedy (concert)
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0236388
Official site: http://www.kingsofcomedymovie.com/
Directed by: Spike Lee
Performers: Steve Harvey, D.L. Hughley, Cedric The Entertainer,
Bernie Mac
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsorgkings.html
Let's get one thing straight, from jump: if one is to speak of kings of
comedy - especially filmed concert-comedy, and most especially in terms
of originality - any exclusion of the name Richard Pryor, immediately
calls ones sanity into question.  Not to mention the magnitude of ones
cajones.  So, are Misters Harvey, Hughley, Entertainer [yes, I know],
and Mac heirs to Pryor's crown, or just mere pretenders to the throne?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Named after the long-running comedy tour that began in 1997 and ended on
the same stage in 2000, THE ORIGINAL KINGS OF COMEDY was filmed at the
Charlotte Coliseum on February 26th and 27th, 2000, and features
stand-up comedians and actors Steve Harvey, D.L. Hughley, Cedric The
Entertainer, and Bernie Mac.  The four men are shown not only on-stage,
but also in short behind-the-scenes bits that give the audience a brief
look at what motivates These Four Kings to do what they do best.  Look
and listen closely, and you might find that what you see on-stage, is
not necessarily what you'd get in Real Life...
The Upshot:
I think Pryor can breathe easy [hmmm...all things considered: no pun
intended].  This foursome is good, no doubt, but it'll take a lot more
than their approximately 30 minutes of stage time each, to wipe away any
memories of RICHARD PRYOR: LIVE ON THE SUNSET STRIP from my mind.
That said, past the "trash-talk" title of this Spike Lee joint, the four
"Kings" comedians do fit the bill for an audience that is used to their
brand of comedy - and, let's face it: that audience consists mostly of
cultural Blacks, and Whites who are Down.  Not to say that any of the
four were purposefully exclusionary - they weren't.  It's just that I'd
be very surprised to hear that Mr. And Mrs. Mainstreet were as laid out
throughout most of this concert, as many of the members of my (mixed
ages and races) viewing audience were at times.
[Hmmm...maybe I've gotten off to a bad start here.  Mr. And Mrs.
Mainstreet, feel free to go see the "Kangs" (as Steve Harvey jokingly
said the "country-ass" audience referred to them).  You can be Down too.
Anyway...]
Each of the four comics have had successes in similar venues: Harvey
hosts IT'S SHOWTIME AT THE APOLLO and is the star of THE STEVE HARVEY
SHOW TV series; Hughley was the original host of BET's COMIC VIEW (back
when it was funny) and like Harvey, is also star of a self-titled TV
series (THE HUGHLEYS); Cedric The Entertainer was the host of the second
year of COMIC VIEW (back when it was still funny, though well on the way
to becoming the unfunny joke that it is today) and co-stars on THE STEVE
HARVEY SHOW; and Bernie Mac, along with his ongoing role on MOESHA, has
appeared in movies like LIFE and ABOVE THE RIM.  But in this comedy
concert, it was their skills as veteran stand-up comedians, that came
into play.  With varying degrees of success.
Those "varying degrees" were strange, considering that each of the four
had very similar routines - granted, spiced with their own personal
flava.  If you kept track, you'd note that each of them touched on Old
School ways, on male/female relationships, and on the
ObWhiteAudienceMembers and how "we're different...but really, we're the
same", amongst other similar topics.  Of course, such is the Stuff of
comedy, especially the comedy of My People.  The way some of the
comedians were better at that Stuff than others, though, put me in mind
of IROC car races: since the vehicles are similarly equipped, the winner
is determined solely on his or her driving skills.  And in this case,
Steve Harvey - playing concert host while doing his own schtick - won
the Kings' Race Of Champions.
Harvey, a self-proclaimed "country boy" [though all of the Kings were
Country, dag!] had both the Charlotte and the theater audience right in
the palm of his hand.  He worked the crowd like a master (to say that he
reminded me of Johnny Carson in this, is a compliment), and almost
everything out of Harvey's mouth, was flat-out funny.  D.L Hughley, who
followed Harvey, wasn't as "on" as I've seen him in the past.  I've
never heard this particular routine of his before, but it sounded too
familiar; too...tired.  I found myself wishing he'd do his brilliant
"Come Back With Me" nostalgia "tour" (which reminds me: I need to find
that tape...).
Up next was the always-stylish Cedric The Entertainer, and while he
couldn't quite top Harvey, he also pumped up both audiences.  I know
*I'd* pay for a recording of "Peanut Butter...No Jam".  Closing the bill
- in my opinion, a mistake - was Bernie Mac.  The thought that kept
coming to me while watching Mac was, "what the hell is he so mad
about?".  The second thought was, "...and why should I care?".  Not a
good thing when you're supposed to be laughing at the jokes.  True, I
snickered now and then, but Mac never took off for me.  And neither did
the relatively flat ending.
Unless I miss my guess, Spike Lee should take blame for that virtual
thud.  That, the ineffectiveness of too many of the background bits [why
not spend some time telling us about the tour itself?  Or why such
talented men aren't making hand-over-fist like buttcheek-spreaders like
Jim Carrey?  Why'd you short-change the off-stage bits, Spike?], and
especially the terrible editing job done on this film.   And can you get
less impersonal than to keep showing the auto-tracking camera moving
back and forth across the stage?  The cold feeling of the shots almost
negated the energy that Harvey & Company generated.  Still, Lee deserves
props if only for bringing this concert to a wide audience.  After all,
when's the last time you saw a comedy concert released theatrically?
Taken on its own merits, THE ORIGINAL KINGS OF COMEDY was a successful
comedy concert; more successful in some parts (any time Steve Harvey was
on-stage) than in others (Bernie Mac's show-closing routine, Spike Lee's
filming, the poor editing, and the "off" feeling some of the non-concert
bits), but overall, a good show to watch.  But it does beg two related
questions: one, why a theatrical release? (possible answer: not
everybody gets HBO?); and two, why MTV Films?
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Thank you, Brother Spike, for providing me with the grindstone for
today's Black Factor Axe.
"How's that?", you say?  Well, I'll tell ya: it has been said that Lee
chose MTV Films over BET as a vehicle for producing "Kings" primarily
because, in a word, BET is notoriously cheap toward its performers
(something to the effect of Lee wanting to be paid in something other
than "sodas and subs").  Say what you want about the guy, but in this
case, I say, more power to ya, Spike.
Ahhh, BET: home of the wannabe-a-goldtooth-gangsta video manual, the
return of the minstrel show (aka, the latter years of COMIC VIEW), and
the never-ending infomercial.  BET: the Graveyard for any and every old
Black TV show - as long as it was a comedy (and usually, a lame one).
BET: The Hoochie Network.  Yes, Brother Spike was right on the money, in
more ways than one.  And if Lee's word ain't good enough for you, check
out the comic strip THE BOONDOCKS by Aaron McGruder (available online at
http://www.boondocks.net/).  McGruder's strip frequently provides
pointed - and funny - commentary on the sad state of BET.  Bammer sez
check it out.
Now, don't get me wrong; BET owner Robert Johnson knows how the game is
played in the capitalistic society known as Corporate America.  We can
bitchnmoan until the cows come home, but at the end of the day, Johnson
uses BET to line his pockets with dough.  And maybe that's as it should
be; after all, Johnson is really no different than the owners of any
other television network, who are also out to line their pockets with
dough, and produce pablum just as unpalatable as anything on BET.  But
one thing is certain: given Johnson's bottom line, the history of BET to
this point, and how We sometimes view anything Black-related, We delude
Ourselves when We think that BET is *anything* deeper than what the name
implies: a television network that (purports that it) provides
entertainment either primarily for, or about, Blacks.
Still..."Black Entertainment Television", my melanin-enhanced behind.
With a notable few exceptions (Tavis Smiley, TEEN SUMMIT, BOBBY JONES
GOSPEL, and maybe one or two more), it's been a LONNNNNNNG time since I
was Entertained by anything on BET.  As always, Your Mileage May Vary.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
"Kings"?  Hmmm...more like Clown Princes (and Bernie Mac, more a
Squire).  Still, the foursome did well, with Steve Harvey conducting the
How To Work An Audience clinic of a lifetime.  I have no idea whathell
was up with Spike Lee's poor filming and editing, though.  This joint
looked downright ugly.
THE ORIGINAL KINGS OF COMEDY (rating: greenlight):
But though his illness may have left Richard Pryor long past his stage
performing time, King Richard is *not* yet dead.  Long live the King...

Title
Review for Best in Show (2000)
BEST IN SHOW (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 90 minutes
Genre:Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0218839
Official site: http://www.bestinshowonline.com/
Written by: Christopher Guest, Eugene Levy
Directed by: Christopher Guest
Cast: Michael Hitchcock, Parker Posey, Catherine O'Hara, Eugene Levy,
Christopher Guest, John Michael Higgins, Michael McKean,
Jennifer Coolidge, Patrick Cranshaw, Jane Lynch, Larry Miller,
Ed Begley Jr., Fred Willard, Jim Piddock, Bob Balaban
(Dr. Theodore W. Millbank III), Don Lake (Graham Chissolm),
Jay Brazeau (Dr. Chuck Nelken), Linda Kash (Fay Berman), Cody Greg
(Zach Berman)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsinshow.html
If you've ever watched the real-life Westminster Dog Show - and as an
unabashed Dog Person, I have, many times - you'll recognize the dogs
running rampant in BEST IN SHOW.  But as is often the case, the Wacky
Humans owned by those dogs, are the real show...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Conformation dog shows, in which purebred dogs are judged against the
physical standards of their breeds to vie for the ultimate "best of
show" championship (as opposed to field trials which tests dogs for
their obedience and similar abilities) - and more important, the lengths
that the human "owners" of the dogs go through to get the coveted Blue
Ribbon - are the target of satire in this "mockumentary" revolving
around the fictitious Mayflower Dog Show.
The dogs and their hilarious humans, are:
-Beatrice the neurotic Weimaraner, whose humans are high-strung
  Illinois yuppies Hamilton Swan (Michael Hitchcock) and his wife
  Meg (Parker Posey) - most likely the cause of Beatrice's many
  Issues;
-Winky the scruffy Norwich Terrier, hailing from Fern City, Florida
  and bringing the man-magnet Cookie Fleck (Catherine O'Hara) and her
  two-left-footed salesman  husband Gerry (Eugene Levy), along for
  the show;
-Hubert the laid-back Bloodhound, accompanied by Pinenut,
  North Carolina's own Good Ol' Boy Harlan Pepper (Christopher Guest),
  dog fancier and owner of The Fishin' Hole;
-Tyrone the pampered Shih Tzu, cohabitating along with his sister,
  Miss Thang (uh, Miss Agnes) with Tribeca New York gay couple
  Scott "Ice Ice Baby" Donlan (John Michael Higgins) and
  Stefan Vanderhoof (Michael McKean);
-And the prissy Poodle and two-time Mayflower winner, Butch, who
  lives at the Cabot Mansion with young, rich Anna Nicole-esque
  Sheri Ann Ward Cabot (Jennifer Coolidge) and her very old, very
  silent husband Leslie Ward Cabot (Patrick Cranshaw), and is being
  Shown at Mayflower by the rather butch in her own right
  Christy Cummings (Jane Lynch).
Ok, so I'll say a bit more, but it all just comes back to my first
statement.  I can't remember when I've laughed more at a satire.  BEST
IN SHOW did an excellent job of deflating the craziness surrounding the
bizarre world of conformation dog shows.
The writing and directing were tight, and the human's performances were
spot-on wacky, though Michael McKean's Stefan was the most straight [uh,
no pun intended] of the lot.  Still, I hesitate to point out any of the
actors here, they were all just that good; and the fact that they could
play these caricatures with such straight faces, most def earns my
praise.  Hmmm...actually, I should point out that in addition to the
great bits from all the actors mentioned in "The Story" above, Larry
Miller as Max Bergman, one of Cookie's many ex-boyfriends, Ed Begley Jr.
as the manager of the hotel Taft, and Fred Willard as Mayflower
announcer Buck Laughlin, also had me in stitches.  Miller's
suicide-prevention guy was a straight-up riot; Begley's character had
one of the best lines of the movie (something about rock stars and
toilets; listen for it); and Willard had me rollin' with Buck's
irreverent asides about the dog show, while the hapless dog expert
Trevor Beckwith (Jim Piddock) tried but failed to keep Buck on-track.
What amazes me most of all is that all the dogs used for this movie,
were real-life show champions - meaning that the real owners either had
a healthy sense of humor about themselves, or had no idea of what they
were getting into.  Either way, it's a delicious irony.
BEST IN SHOW tickled my funny bone in the way that only a mockumentary
about a subject I hold Near And Dear, could.  Whether you're a dog or a
cat person, you should see this flick.   Unless you're a completely
out-there dog or cat person, and can't laugh at yourself.  Don't worry;
the rest of us will laugh at you.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Reminiscent in tone to RAISING ARIZONA, with more than a passing
resemblance to McKean's mockumentary SPINAL TAP, BEST IN SHOW certainly
was this movie week's Blue Ribbon winner, and ranks right up there with
the year's best flicks.  I don't think I'll ever be able to watch
Westminster the same way again.

Title
Review for Mission to Mars (2000)
Mission To Mars (2000) 
Rated PG; running time 113 minutes
Genre: Science Fiction
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0183523 
Official site: http://movies.go.com/m2m/  
Written by: Jim Thomas (based on a story by Lowell Cannon)
Directed by: Brian De Palma
Starring: Gary Sinise, Don Cheadle, Connie Nielsen, Tim Robbins, 
Jerry O'Connell, Kim Delaney
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsmission.html
It was an odd coincidence that the first trailers for "Mission To Mars" 
came out right around the time when NASA's Mars Lunar module got lost in 
space.  It was almost a joke (although at $165 million, not a very funny 
joke) at the time, that "Mission" had as much a chance to succeed as 
that failed space mission did.  And though it took first place in its 
first weekend, a lot of reviewers said that, as a movie, it was a 
critical failure.  What does Yours Truly say?  Well, I reckon you'll 
have to read on to find out.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Beginning in the year 2020, Mission Commander Luke Goddard (Don Cheadle) 
prepares, with the support of friends and fellow astronauts Woody Blake 
(Tim Robbins), Woody's wife, Dr. Terri Fisher (Connie Nielsen), 
scientist Phil Ohlmyer (Jerry O'Connell) and "stick jockey" Jim 
McConnell (Gary Sinise), for an historic mission: the first manned 
mission from Earth to Mars.  But when a "mysterious force" causes a 
disaster on Mars, stranding Luke and possibly his team, his support team 
sets off from Earth on a rescue mission that puts them in as much risk 
as those they're attempting to bring back.
-Except for two specific pieces of music (the opening Zydeco piece, and 
the Van Halen "dance" number), the background music was truly awful.  
Whoever came up with the bright idea to have Cheesy Organ Music 
throbbing in the background, should be taken out behind the woodshed and 
severely scolded - just before they're dropkicked right out of the movie 
business.  
-If this movie is any indication, future space missions will be 
commercial-laden: "product placement" takes on a whole new meaning when 
your brand name is written in great big letters along the side of a 
rocketship.
Ok, actually, make that three things I noticed right off: the third 
being the genuine "closeness" I perceived between the characters.  I 
know I said pretty much the same thing in my "What Planet Are You From?" 
review, but the feeling of real camaraderie struck me even harder here.  
Struck me so hard, in fact, it moved me to tears at one point (you'll 
know the point when you see the movie).  
There have been real-world scientists, along with not a few laymen and 
movie critics, who've taken "Mission" to task for where it went wrong; 
but there have been just as many who've praised it for where the movie 
got the science, and the story, right.  I fall squarely in the latter 
camp.  I don't know from physics, or whether an orbit around Mars should 
be asynchronous or bsynchronous; but I do know a well-told, heartfelt 
story when I see one, and that's what I saw during the 113 minutes of 
"Mission".  True, it had its flaws; it often got thick on the melodrama, 
and Kim Delaney (playing Jim's dead wife Maggie, via home movies) proved 
herself once again to be a fifth wheel in the presence of much greater 
actors.  And did I mention that godawful music?
But I easily looked past its flaws and saw the essential human story it 
told.  I found the tight-knit group of characters entirely believable, 
got a warm 'n fuzzy feeling from watching their interactions, and was 
simply blinded - in a good way - by the science of it all.  The special 
effects were brilliant, but not so-much-so that they overwhelmed the 
story itself.  And I still can't speak of the spacewalk scene without 
feeling a lump in my throat.
After his terrible miscalculation in "Reindeer Games", I was heartened 
to see Sinise bounce back so strongly here.  Cheadle's performance was 
likewise strong [and you know I gotta feature him in the "Black Factor" 
below], O'Connell was humorous but not stupidly so, and though Nielsen 
suffered by comparison in her "alone" scenes, her chemistry with Robbins 
was right on the money; they made a great couple, and I'd love to see 
them act in something together again. 
Will we Earthers really reach Mars by 2020?  Well, we missed the "Space 
1999" deadline already, and a lot of "futuristic" movies and TV series 
of the past will soon be shown to have been a little more optimistic of 
the advancement of the human race than we've proven ourselves to be 
capable of thus far.  But the question for me is not so much "Will we 
get out there?", or even "Who else will we find when we do?" - but 
instead, "What will we do about each other *here*?"
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
"Mission Commander Luke Goddard, played by Don Cheadle".  Man, do I love 
typing that.  A powerful actor whose "quietness" almost - but not quite 
- masks his incredible acting abilities (c.f. "Devil In A Blue Dress"), 
he succeeded where Angela Bassett failed in the dreadful "Supernova" 
earlier this year: neither making his "Blackness" pronounced, nor 
putting it away in shame, Cheadle, through Luke, built on the legacy of 
a very few Black actors who've slowly chipped away at that old 
stereotype (began with "Logan's Run", I believe; correct me if I'm 
wrong) that the Black "race" won't survive in any meaningful way, into 
the future.  Cheadle joins a chosen few in making space, on the Silver 
Screen, "safe" for Black Folk again.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
While no "The Right Stuff", "Mission" had its heart in the right place.  
And the way I see it, "heart" is what propelled it well out of the 
lesser orbit of that other dramatic space flick of 2000...uh, y'all know 
the one I mean.  I just can't bring myself to type the name of that most 
dreadful collection of frames of moving images running swiftly together 
which would normally be called "film" but could not by any stretch of 
the imagination be honoured with such a label, so soon after I've eaten.
"Mission To Mars" (rating: greenlight): 
This flick did what even the noteworthy "The Green Mile" couldn't do: it 
made me cry.  And for all its flaws, that goes a long way towards 
proving its worth, in my book.

Title
Review for Dogma (1999)
"Dogma" (1999) 
Rated R; running time 128 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0120655
Official site: http://www.dogma-movie.com/  
Written by: Kevin Smith
Directed by: Kevin Smith
Starring: Ben Affleck, Matt Damon, Linda Fiorentino, Alan Rickman, 
Chris Rock, Salma Hayek, Jason Mewes, Kevin Smith, Jason Lee, 
George Carlin, Barret Hackney, Jared Pfennigwerth, Kitao Sakurai 
 [Note: though it's likely Old News by now, to minimize on a 
  potential "spoiler", I've intentionally left out the credit for "God". 
  o, the irony...] 
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsdogma.html
This one was a tuffy; I've stewed over it for a couple of days, trying to
keep the Objective Reviewer side of me separate from my
unsure-how-it-all-works Spiritual side, in order to rate this flick solely
on its merits on celluloid [knowing what I knew about this flick
beforehand, I made sure the non-objective side of me was anesthetized
before I entered the theater.  She's still asleep...shhh...]  For the most
part, I've succeeded--that actually wasn't the hard part--but it occurs to
me that in excising my (lack of?) faith from the picture, I may have
played right into writer/director Kevin Smith's dastardly plans. 
The Story (WARNING: EXTENSIVE spoilers contained below):
In this mostly-unfunny comedy, Matt Damon and Ben Affleck (respectively)
play Loki and Bartleby, AWA (Angels With Attitudes).  They have Issues
with the Big G because, as Old Testament angels, they were cast out of
heaven for going against God's will (Loki was the Angel Of Death, and
Bartleby tried to get him to chill one day.  Big no-no, it seems; the Old
Testament God wasn't havin' it).  Banished to Wisconsin until the end of
the world, they hear about a loophole: in an effort to get parishoners
back in church, Cardinal Glick (George Carlin) invokes a dogmatic rule
that would wipe the slate clean for any and all sinners who pass through
the arch of his New Jersey church--and because the dogma of The Church is
considered canon, Loki and Bartleby reason that what's good for mortals is
good for angels, too.
Meanwhile, on the other side of town...Metatron, the embodiment of the
Voice Of God (Alan Rickman) contacts Bethany (Linda Fiorentino), an
abortion clinic worker with religious Issues of her own, and enlists her
to stop the angels from going through the arch.  In classic Road Movie
form, she meets a series of folks on the way: Jay and Silent Bob (Jason
Mewes and Kevin Smith), who she sees as the Prophets Metatron predicted,
but who see her as an potentially great lay; Rufus (Chris Rock), the 13th
Disciple who insists that he was left out of the bible because he was the
only Black Disciple; Serendipity (Salma Hayek), a Muse who somehow ended
up in a strip club; and on the side of Evil, Azrael and the Stygian
Triplets (Jason Lee; Barret Hackney, Jared Pfennigwerth and Kitao
Sakurai), Lucifer's henchmen and do-ers of bad deeds, such as beating Bud
Cort's character, old man John Doe Jersey [ooh, such a clever name] into a
coma.
The Upshot:
Ok, let's get this out of the way now: "Dogma", to my understanding of the
meaning of the word, is blasphemous.  Anyone who's seen the movie (and
that's an important qualifier, folks) and came away with a different
conclusion, is either in straight-up denial, is an atheist, or simply has
a different dictionary than me.  With scenes like the one where an angel
swears profusively at a nun, it won't ever be seen the Pax Network, that's
for sure.  I say again: "Dogma", to my understanding of the meaning of the
word, is blasphemous.  But here's the kicker: the blasphemy is directed
not at religion (that is, the faith of the believer) but at Religion (that
is, The Organization Known As "The Church").  Specifically, Religion in
the form of the Catholic Church (which, in my youth, I called
"stand-up-sit-down-stand-up-kneel").  And as someone who's had Issues with
The Church (specifically, The Baptist Church, aka "The Fashion Show". But
that's another rant for another time.), I Feel him.  For now, I'll leave
it at this: my lasting impression of the film is that Smith, as expressed
through Affleck's Bartleby, is indeed a religious man (or at least, like
some of us, has spiritual leanings that aren't quite fully realized), and
that his anger at The Church would be dissipated if The Church's rules
would have less impact than The Golden Rule.  And again, I most def Feel
that.
That aside, my feelings about the movie as a movie (versus the movie as a
Statement) are a lot less forgiving.  I was irritated at "Dogma" far too
often to recommend it unconditionally (case in point: you'd have to
totally drop your suspension of disbelief that God wouldn't be hip to what
Loki and Bartleby were up to; and worse was the "explanation" of why that
was, which, like a greek tragedy's Deus Ex Machina, magically made itself
known at the end of the flick); and worse were some of the
characterizations by actors who seem to have called in their parts. 
Amongst the sinners are Carlin's Cardinal (which, given his recent HBO
special where he totally thrashes The Church, makes his particular sin
unforgivable), Rickman (the actor must've imbibed the tequila that his
Metatron character kept spitting out; certainly, his Bad Guy in "Die Hard"
was much more convincing), Lee (a hammy devilette with horns...gimme a
break.  What, they couldn't get Jim Carrey?) and especially Fiorentino,
totally unbelievable in what should've been a key role; she damn near put
me to sleep with her bored-stiff acting.  And let's not forget the
(Smith's words, not mine, folks) "Shit Demon".  Actually, let's. 
But by far, the brunt of the blame goes to Damon and Affleck (and, of
course, Smith's pen).  Damon's Loki was just way too out-there, cussin'
for cussin's sake [and you'll remember, dear reader, that I had the same
Issue with Cuba Gooding Jr. in the crime-against-humanity, "Chill
Factor".]  Unique unto himself--and rather scary--at first, I had to
remind myself that Loki was after all, the Angel Of Death.  And Damon
played that to a T, initially; the Mooby scene was a little over-the-top,
but I daresay the folks at Disney probably turned a whiter shade of pale
after seeing it.  Affleck, too, played Bartleby rather nicely to begin
with; his Good Cop to Loki's Bad Cop, worked for awhile.  But then, it all
came tumbling down after the train scene; suddenly, they both got an
epiphany, and inexplicably (especially as far as Loki is concerned)
switched characterizations--and ruined any chances of redeeming the movie
from there forward.  And to top it off, the closing scene was corny and
hokey, as if Smith ran out of shock-value stuff to toss at the viewer,
yielding to conventionality at the end.   
There were, however, bright spots in the most unexpected of places.  Chris
Rock, as usual, was the funniest thing in the movie (though I had a Chris
Issue which I'll get to later); Salma Hayek, after her "Wild Wild West"
fiasco, totally surprised me by being pretty durn good here, certainly
measurably better than Fiorentino; Kevin Smith (yes, *that* Kevin Smith),
for being Silent as Bob, was amusingly expressive; and Jason Mewes...man. 
His wacked-out Jay was simply a trip.  Once I got over the shock of his
behavior, I kinda dug him.
In the end, I had a love/hate relationship with "Dogma"; I was mad at it
for not being what it could've been, but appreciated it for what it was. 
Even if I didn't always agree with it.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]
Chris Rock is, some might say, the reigning king of topical Black comedy. 
I don't know from all that, but of all the young Black turk comics on the
scene, he most def made a good choice as Rufus, the forgotten Disciple. 
At turns funny and thoughtful, I was With his character all the way up to
one point: the point when he called Jesus "that nigga".  Religious issues
aside, those words coming out of the same mouth that, in his HBO comedy
special "Bigger and Blacker", said "I love Black Folks...but I hate
'niggas'", was just too incongruous to me.  Yes, I know that those words
actually started from the writer's hands and not from Chris' lips, but
still.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I'm still somewhat at odds with myself over how I feel "Dogma", at least
from the standpoint of a mostly-objective movie viewer.  I know full well
what the folks involved in it were trying to do, but in all their
eagerness to be Bold! And! Controversial!--while at the same time stay
user-friendly (read: not alienating the target box-office demographic) by
going for the funny bone (and missing), they left something to be desired
in the execution.  Still, you gotta give Smith & Crew an attaboy for
having the nads to at least give it ye olde college try.
The bottom Bottom Line? "Dogma" gets my greenlight rating if only because
I feel compelled to see it again, flaws n' all.
"Dogma" (rating: greenlight) 
The Spirit was willing, but the Flesh was weak, yes; but it had Teeth,
which is more than most mainstream flicks have going for them.

Title
Review for Pollock (2000)
POLLOCK (2000)
Rated R; running time 119 minutes
Genre: Drama
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.spe.sony.com/classics/pollock/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0183659
Written by: Susan Emshwiller, Barbara Turner (based on the book by
  Steven Naifeh and Gregory White Smith)
Directed by: Ed Harris
Cast: Ed Harris, Marcia Gay Harden, Amy Madigan, Jeffrey Tambor,
Robert Knott, Bud Cort, John Heard, Val Kilmer, Sada Thompson,
Tom Bower, Jennifer Connelly, Sally Murphy, Molly Regan,
John Rothman, Annabelle Gurwitch, Isabelle Townsend, Barbara Garrick,
Everett Quinton, Stephen Beach, Jill Jackson, David Leary,
Donna Mitchell, Frank Wood, Julie Anna Rose
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamspollock.html
There's an ex-brother-in-law of mine who, like Jackson Pollock at one
time, was a starving artist (and not ever much more than that), and who,
like Pollock, drank heavily when he decided The World Was Against Him.
There's a good reason he's an "ex-"; and there's an equally good reason
that this ex- will probably never achieve even a small fraction of
Pollock's notoriety in his lifetime (or - sadly, more apropos for the
career of a painter - after his death).
Not that this ex-relative of mine is anywhere near the status of a
Jackson Pollock, mind you.  It's just that having known this wasted man,
helped me to see beyond the strange monotone drone this movie at times
had for me, and understand the demons Pollock faced, a wee bit better.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Let's get the largest spoiler out of the way now, so that anyone who
isn't familiar with The Life And Times Of Jackson Pollock, can start
hating me right away: Jackson Pollock is dead.
Though of course, this movie deals more with his life, than his death.
POLLOCK begins with a woman, bearing a copy of "Life Magazine", seeking
an autograph from a man who looks like the troubles of the world lay in
his steely eyes; then it flashes back to Greenwich Village, New York in
November of 1941, 9 years earlier.  At that time, Jackson Pollock (Ed
Harris) spent as much time drinking, walking through life in a daze, and
complaining to his brother Sande (Robert Knott) about the attention his
fellow artists were getting ("F*ck Picasso!", he raged), as he did
painting - much to the consternation of his pregnant sister-in-law.
Enter abstract artist Lee Krasner (Marcia Gay Harden), who moves rapidly
into Pollock's life, his business, and his bed.  Impressed with
Pollock's work at the start, Krasner soon sets him up with gallery owner
Peggy Guggenheim (Amy Madigan), who allows Pollock to work on commission
for her gallery.  The world doesn't seem to be ready for him, though;
he's seen as an original, but that doesn't immediately translate to
sales, and he becomes frustrated, and drunk, in waves.  Pollock and
Krasner eventually move away from the big city, into a more peaceful, if
not prosperous, existence on Long Island.   But even after he recreates
his abstract art style of painting - using thrown and dripped strands of
paint in a style called Action Painting, in which the process of
painting becomes as important as the finished product - that doesn't
seem to be enough to take Pollock to the next level.
That is, until "Life Magazine" takes a notice of his work, thrusting him
into the limelight.  Bringing with it, its own new set of demons...
The Upshot:
The most subjective of the creative arts, Art, I fear, is one of those
things in life that you either Get, or you don't.  That goes double for
movies about Art.  And so I'll tell you true: for a large part, I just
didn't Get POLLOCK.
Oh, I understood the "starving artist" concept, and the "they don't
understand what I'm trying to Say here" concept and the "tortured soul
in another plane of existence" concept and all.  I just don't Get folks
sitting/standing around trying to decide what a given painting "means";
especially one that - let us be for real, here - looks like a child made
a mess on the canvas.  Similarly, I didn't Get the gist of what this
film was trying to tell the audience, past the madness that comes with
coloring outside the lines, so to speak.  But most of all, I didn't Get
what all the people in this cast - especially "names" like John Heard
(as Tony Smith), Val Kilmer (Willem de Kooning) and to a lesser degree,
Sada Thompson as Pollock's mother Stella - had to do with anything in
Pollock's life.  Yes, I *know* they were real-life people, but looking
at the cast of characters, I can't even remember who half of them were.
For all the interaction they had with him, the filmmakers could've pared
the cast down easily by half, and spent more time delving into the Whys
of Pollock's madness, and his genius.
All that said, I certainly groked the main performances by Ed Harris as
the artiste Jackson Pollock, and especially the tour-de-force by Marcia
Gay Harden as Lee Krasner, fellow artiste, and - for want of a better
term - Jackson's keeper.  I failed to see what, exactly, Krasner
could've possibly seen in Pollock that would allow her to take so much
of his crap for so long, but Harden brought an intensity to the role -
especially in her closing scenes - that definitely earned her every
ounce of Oscar gold that she got.  Harris and Harden made a dynamic duo;
where Harris' Pollock was moody and tempestuous, Harden's Krasner was a
whirlwind, sure of herself, with the no-nonsense attitude of a woman who
"knew her place" - and welcomed it.  Hard to believe they could've
stayed together as long as they did, but, Strokes For Folks.
Combined with good showings by Amy Madigan (Harris' real-life wife) as
gallery owner Peggy Guggenheim and Jeffrey Tambor as art critic Clement
Greenberg, and the outstanding directing of Harris himself (I loved his
use of quiet shadows throughout; Jackson's and Lee's first love scene
was nothing less than a work of art), POLLOCK was an enjoyable, if
slightly irritating, peek into a way of life that I don't I'll ever
fully understand.  I only wish that with as large a cast as this movie
had, I could've gotten more from the big picture.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I enjoyed POLLOCK more on the strength of stars Ed Harris and especially
Marcia Gay Harden, than the overall movie itself.  But I appreciated
this literal art flick for its glimpse into the tortured soul of an
artist, even though the artist it put me in mind of, deserved all the
torture that came to him.  Who, me, bitter?
POLLOCK (rating: greenlight):
But sorry, some of Pollock's paintings *did* look like nothing more than
just dribbled paint.  Maybe I'm just not meant to Get It.

Title
Review for Rules of Engagement (2000)
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT (2000) 
Rated R; running time 123 minutes
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0160797 
Official site: http://www.rulesmovie.com/  
Written by: Stephen Gaghan (based on the story by James Webb)
Directed by: William Friedkin
Starring: Tommy Lee Jones, Samuel L. Jackson, Bruce Greenwood, 
Guy Pearce, Ben Kingsley, Blair Underwood, Anne Archer, 
Philip Baker Hall, Nicky Katt, Hayden Tank, Amidou (Dr. Ahmar), 
Mark Feuerstein (Captain Tom Chandler), Dale Dye (General Perry), J
ihane Kortobi (Little Girl)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsrules.html
If you had told me this time last week that there was even the most 
remote chance that I'd damn near fall asleep while watching anything 
starring acting powerhouses Samuel L. Jackson and Tommy Lee Jones, I 
would've laughed in your face.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Colonel Terry Childers (Samuel L. Jackson), a highly-decorated, 
no-nonsense field Marine, is assigned to "babysit" the Ambassador 
Mourain (Ben Kingsley), his wife (Anne Archer), and their son  Justin 
(Hayden Tank), during a protest by Yemeni citizens at the Yemen Embassy.  
He sends the terrified Ambassador and his family on their way, and 
proceeds to try to get the situation under control.  But something goes 
terribly wrong; when the protestors start shooting and killing Marines, 
Childers orders Captain Lee (Blair Underwood) to give the order to the 
Marines to "waste the motherf---ers", under the "rules of engagement": 
policies and procedures put forth by the US President and Secretary Of 
Defense that allow US military forces to take actions they deem 
necessary to protect themselves from hostile forces.
National Security Advisor Bill Sokal (Bruce Greenwood), needing a 
scapegoat to take the focus off the government's part in the death of 83 
Yemeni citizens, demands that Childers be courtmartialed for murder, and 
brings in Major Mark Biggs (Guy Pearce), a very capable military lawyer 
who has spent more time behind a desk than behind a rifle, to prosecute 
the case.  Knowing what he's up against, Childers seeks out 
newly-retired Colonel Hays Hodges (Tommy Lee Jones), with whom Childers 
served a tour of duty in Vietnam in 1968, saving Hodges' life when he 
was under severe fire by the enemy.  Hodges, however, doesn't have the 
confidence in himself that Childers has; seeing himself as only a 
"shot-at Marine" and a very weak lawyer, Hodges reluctantly takes 
Childers case--but soon discovers that things in this case may not be as 
they seem.
The Upshot:
I briefly watched CBS's early morning news-light program on Monday, and 
caught the tail end of Gail wazzername's review of this movie [which 
reminds me: though I can't remember her last name, it's undeniable that, 
even with the dismal ratings of this pseudo-news telecast, Ms. 
Wazzername should be considered a "nationally known Black reviewer".  
That last bit will mean something to those of you who've read the 
history behind 3BC.  But I digress].  I was more than a little shocked 
to hear her use terms such as "powerful" and "emotional" when describing 
this flick's contents.  I guess we must've watched two different movies; 
I've seen more emotions in a loaf of bread that anything I saw within 
"Rules".
The onus for this rests squarely on the shoulders of three men: director 
William Friedkin, and actors Samuel L. Jackson and (to a somewhat-lesser 
extent) Tommy Lee Jones.  Friedkin lost me early on; once that camera of 
his started looking like something straight out of NYPD-BLUE, I knew it 
would be a struggle to take this movie seriously.  Of course, it doesn't 
help that "Rules" has a very derivative, been there/done that feeling.  
It suffers from the comparisons with A FEW GOOD MEN, COURAGE UNDER FIRE, 
and for that fact, PLATOON.  And with the big push these days, post- 
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN, toward movies about World War II, one has to wonder 
why Vietnam was the (bad) choice for a starting point here. 
As for Jackson and Jones, to say I was disappointed, would be an 
understatement.  I've always thought I'd be happy to watch these two 
read the Yellow Pages; but even that would've been more exciting than 
their flat performances in "Rules".  The normally-explosive Jackson had 
exactly three moments of powerful clarity: the first was his vintage 
Samuel L. "motherf---ers" outburst; the second was the Obligatory Fight 
Scene Between Friends (Childers and Hodges)--which led to Childers 
blurting out the cliched "you're nothing a drunk!" (which itself led to 
me rolling my eyes and groaning in dismay at the cliche); and the last 
was the also Obligatory, though still enjoyable, courtroom scene where 
Major Biggs confronted him about the original outburst.  That's it; 
everywhere else, Jackson could've been played by his stunt double, and I 
wouldn't have noticed.  Jones fared a little better; though he played 
against type in his portrayal of a Colonel without command--of himself, 
primarily--he did show a few moments when his strong acting skills were 
brought to the fore.  These moments were too few and far between, 
though, and I began thinking that his character shared between THE 
FUGITIVE and DOUBLE JEOPARDY would be a lot more fun to watch than the 
boring Colonel Hodges.
In a nutshell, I never once felt any real chemistry between Jackson and 
Jones; any feints toward Childers and Hodges supposed friendship rang 
hollow, and everything between Childers' outburst and the completely 
flat and unimaginative ending, felt like so much filler, with the 
outcome of the trial a foregone conclusion.  The outrageous epilogue 
only added insult to injury, but by that time, I was more than ready to 
quickly exit, stage right.
The supporting cast, had they been used to the extent of their 
abilities, might have made this movie somewhat more bearable.  Ben 
Kingsley playing a cowardly Ambassador?  Hey, that had legs; why didn't 
they explore it more?  Blair Underwood as a Captain asked to order the 
execution of what he thought were innocent citizens?  What a subplot! 
hmmm...but he's out of the movie almost as quickly as he was there.  
Philip Baker Hall as the senior General Hodges, playing against Jones as 
Hodges Jr., with the addition Nicky Katt as Hayes Hodges the third?  
Talk about your generation gap!  Talk about your clash of titans, 
between Hall and Jones!  Talk about your...what do you mean, they never 
really "talked" about it?  
Talk about a waste of potential.  There were a bright spots, however: as 
the "unfeeling" prosecutor, Guy Pearce's Major Biggs made more of his 
part than was probably written in the script.  Pearce, along with Anne 
Archer in her turn as the Ambassador's wife, and Hayden Tank as her 
convincingly frightened son, showed the only real emotion in this 
otherwise linear movie.
In the end, I had the same feeling of disconnect with "Rules" that I had 
with THE INSIDER, in that both of them presented the viewer with a 
"duh!" situation: "Big Tobacco/Government Evil Empires seek targets to 
take the brunt of the blame for their own Evildoing?  Duh!".  The 
difference between an "Insider" and a "Rules", though, is that the 
former engaged me with interesting--and interested--performances by the 
cast and crew.  "Rules" never came close; laughingly lame special 
effects (could that blood have looked more fake?), bad camerawork (clue 
number 1: please leave Shaky-Cam on ER and NYPD-BLUE where it belongs), 
ill-advised casting decisions (clue number 2: 1968 was more than 30 
years ago; if Tommy Lee and Samuel look exactly like they looked in 
1968's Vietnam, I'm a monkeys uncle.  Next time, don't be so cheap; 
splurge on younger lookalikes for the flashback scenes) and most of all, 
off-the-mark performances by its lead players, totally shot any chance 
that I could suspend my disbelief long enough to just ignore the bad for 
the little good that was there.
I can live with being The Only One who didn't find this movie 
compelling; the majority of reviews I've read thus far, pretty much laud 
"Rules" as the best movie of this dismal film season.  No matter; I 
stand firmly behind my opinion that there was precious little on the 
screen that came across as heartfelt.  The director and his 
actors--Jones and Jackson in particular--played by numbers that have 
been played much better in the past by actors with nowhere near the 
talent they have, and for those in the audience paying attention beyond 
the smoke and mirrors, that was the true insult. 
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
If I hadn't seen the neutering of two of the biggest bulls in the acting 
arena today--Tommy Lee Jones and Samuel L. Jackson--with my own two 
eyes, I wouldn't have believed it was possible.  Who'da thunkit?
RULES OF ENGAGEMENT (rating: yellowlight): 
In a word, "Rules" was disengaged.

Title
Review for Rat Race (2001)
RAT RACE (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 125 minutes
Genre: comedy
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.ratracemovie.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0250687
Written by: Andy Breckman
Directed by: Jerry Zucker
Cast: Rowan Atkinson, Kathy Bates, Dean Cain, Lanai Chapman,
John Cleese, Whoopi Goldberg, Cuba Gooding, Jr., Seth Green,
Wayne Knight, Jon Lovitz, Breckin Meyer , Kathy Najimy,
Paul Rodriguez, Amy Smart, Dave Thomas, Vince Vieluf
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsratrace.html
Though it was a childhood favorite of mine, I'm scared to watch It's A
Mad, Mad, Mad, Mad World ever again.  Scared because in watching it, I
just might realize that it's just as dumb as RAT RACE was.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
The rats in RAT RACE are all too human.  In a bizarre play on Willie
Wonka and the Chocolate Factory, Vegas casino owner Donald Sinclaire
(John Cleese) offers his version of a Golden Ticket to eight "lucky"
stiffs, with the promise of a $2mil payoff for the winner of a race from
Las Vegas to Silver City, New Mexico.  These are the players, in what
should have been a madcap comedy:
  -Enrico Pollini (Rowan Atkinson), a goofball Italian citizen
   who has a medical problem that might prevent him from getting
   anywhere too quickly;
  -Vera Baker (Whoopi Goldberg) and Merrill Jennings (Lanai Chapman),
   a mother-daughter team who just met--27 years after Merrill was born;
  -Owen Templeton (Cuba Gooding, Jr.), a pro football referee who
   half the men in America are mad at for messing up a coin toss
   [Yeah, you heard me, a coin toss.  Not a vital, mis-called play.
   Not a blatant foul.   A coin toss.  Can you tell my eyes damn near
   rolled out of their sockets?];
  -Duane Cody (Seth Green) and his bejeweled brother Blaine
   (Vince Vieluf), con men who can't quite pull off a proper con;
  -Randy Pear (Jon Lovitz), a soccer dad trying to keep wife Bev
   (Kathy Najimy) from discovering he wants to have a wee bit o' fun
   on their vacation;
  -Straight-laced lawyer Nick Shaffer (Breckin Meyer), who never did
   anything illegal in his life until he hooked up with goofy pilot
   Tracy Faucet (Amy Smart).
Here's where I'm supposed to say "...and Hilarity Ensued".  Uh huh.
The Upshot:
Based on the trailers I saw, I admittedly went into RAT RACE with low
expectations - and they were met.  It wasn't as bad as I thought it
would be - the inclusion of Cuba Gooding, Jr. in comedy mode,
especially, initially scared me off - but "it could've been a lot worse"
just isn't my idea of a sparkling movie recommendation.  True, it could
have been; but I figure movies cost too daggone much to watch these
days, to be satisfied with only having your intelligence insulted "just
a little".
The biggest problem with RAT RACE for me was that it just plain wasn't
funny; not funny enough, anyway, to mask some huge logic holes (I'd say
"plot holes", normally, but there was no real plot.  "Character
development?  We don' need no stinkin' character development!").  Had I
laughed harder - or more often - I might not have had time to notice the
many implausible scenarios, starting with the biggest two: the Vera
Baker/Merrill Jennings (Whoopi Goldberg/Lanai Chapman) relationship, and
the completely implausible airport antenna situation upon which the rest
of the movie's hijinx [or should I say, "lowjinx"?] was built.
As with its brother in implausibility, Face/Off (which offended me so
much, I left the theater before it was over), once my disbelief was
suspended so high it developed altitude sickness, there was no saving
this flick.  Unlike Face/Off, however, RAT RACE had no other qualities
that held my interest.
Hmmm...that's not exactly true.  In discussing the movie with The Diva,
I had to admit that the whole Barbie subplot, especially the hilarious
conclusion, was indeed funny; and less funny, but still somewhat amusing
before it got tired, was the side betting going on by the big rollers.
But being that these were only a small part of the flick, and after
being asked to swallow this movie's lame, sellout conclusion, Jon
Lovitz's nod to Henry Godwin, and Dave Thomas' deadpan lawyer schtick,
only just barely pulled this film out of redlight territory.  I would
say that director Jerry Zucker ought to stick with Airplane! and Naked
Gun, but their time has passed, too.
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]
New readers of my reviews are often intimidated by my "Black Factor"
commentary.  Ignoring those who totally (and usually, blindly) miss the
point for a second, there are others who take issue with my questioning,
for instance, Black actors acting like buffoons in what is supposed to
be a comedy.
And up to a point, I agree: all other characterizations being equally
buffoonish, a Black actor in a comedy should not be held to a different
standard by being made unnaturally Noble.  Indeed, I'd rather see a
funny actor of whatever race being allowed to be funny, over them being
made the Hero just to avoid the tricky subjects of race, class, and
culture (which, really, doesn't avoid them at all.  Folks like me are
chompin' at the bit to razz a pedantic, paternalistic filmmaker; one who
has the nads to admit that, yes, racial situations do exist, earn at
least my admiration for their tenacity).
So this BF is purely a jab at Cuba Gooding Jr., and not at The Machine
which would make him act the fool.  He does that to himself without much
help.  The man is brilliant as a serious actor; I've enjoyed him
thoroughly, without pause, in films like Boyz N The Hood and Men Of
Honor.  But please, somebody, spank his  agent's ass if Gooding decides
to do another comedy.  Save me the effort of another "This Moment In
Black Buffoonery" created just for him.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I suppose I should mention John Cleese, and Kathy Bates, and Rowan
Atkinson, in here somewhere.  There.  They're mentioned.  And for the
stupidity that was RAT RACE, that's about all they deserve.
RAT RACE (rating: yellowlight.gif):
Not even a funny invocation of Godwin's Law, could save this drowning
mouse.

Title
Review for Kid, The (2000)
DISNEY'S THE KID (2000)
Rated PG; running time 104 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0219854
Official site: http://disney.go.com/disneypictures/thekid/
Written by: Audrey Wells
Directed by: Jon Turteltaub
Cast: Bruce Willis, Spencer Breslin, Emily Mortimer, Lily Tomlin,
Jean Smart, Chi McBride, Richard Jenkins, Jeri Ryan
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsthekid.html
You wanna know what grates my cheese? [go ahead, nod. You know you
wanna.]  Ok, I'll tell ya: doofus creativity-challenged movie executives
who cut-n-paste together movie trailers that might as well be released
as mini-movies, since they show almost all the best parts of the flick
in question (and do so a kabillion times before the movie opens, at
that) - and certainly give away way more of the movie than the audience
needs to know, not allowing that magical "aha!" moment when we Discover
what's happening in a film for our at least halfway-intelligent selves.
Between those oafs in the movie business, and their TeeVee
promo-creating counterparts, I'd like to round 'em all up and take
grandaddy's best belt to their ig'nant little hides, I tell ya.
And if that's the biggest rant I could muster up about DISNEY'S THE KID,
then I reckon it had to be a pretty decent movie.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Russ Duritz (Bruce Willis) is, in a word, a jerk.  At least, that's what
the world thinks of him, and he plays the part well.  Russ, a nearly
40-year-old professional image consultant who admittedly gets off on
telling people what to do, has little patience for displays of emotion
or affection, especially as concerns his father, with whom he has
lingering Childhood Issues (which, as we find later, develop into Adult
Unfulfillment Issues).  Everyone - from his put-upon pseudo girlfriend
Amy (the delightful Emily Mortimer), put-upon assistant Janet (the
somewhat delightful Lily Tomlin), professional boxer and Russ' client
Kenny (the not as delightful, but good looking baldie Chi McBride), and
Diedre Lafere (the surprisingly delightful Jean Smart), a very friendly
TV anchorwoman he met on a plane - thinks Russ is in dire need of a soul
makeover, not to mention, a clue.  And he just might find both in
8-year-old Rusty (the sho'nuff delightful Spencer Breslin), who has a
whole lot in common with Russ.  A younger version of Russ, that is.
The Upshot:
Bruce Willis, near as I can tell, has three acting personas: there's the
Serious, Silent type, like the characters he played in flicks like THE
SIXTH SENSE and DIE HARD [1 only; 2 and 3 were pale imitations.  See
also: Mel Gibson in "Lethal Weapons 2-36"]; the Sincerely Humorous type
that he shared with his audience in the early days of the MOONLIGHTING
TV series; and then there's the Gotta Get Pi-zaid type that helped to
further stink up an already malodorous HUDSON HAWK.  Of the three, I
prefer his Sincerely Humorous persona.  That's the one that showed up in
The Kid - and from all appearances, his co-stars grooved with that
persona, too.
Willis performs remarkably well as a man who has filled his life with
Big Status-y Things to try (unsuccessfully) to fill the gaps that come
from a life's dream deferred.  Neither mawkish nor completely
irredeemable (consider: would a total jerk *really* pay for someone
else's groceries, just to get out of a grocery store quickly?  Force his
way through the line, sure; but, pay in full?), his Russ has a mid-life
crisis of a different sort than we're used to seeing.  Here, Russ'
discovery comes through the mirror of his younger self, who sees the
"small" things older Russ *doesn't* have - a meaningful job, a family,
heck, even a dog [how could he not have a dog, sheesh!] - as the true
mark of a life gone wrong.   It would be easy for that character to be
played as a kick-me target to laughed at; it is much to Willis' credit
that, for the most part, he avoids derision in that sense.
Each of the lead actors and their characters seemed to Play Well with
Willis - and he, in turn, gets an A for Sharing Playspace (Reasonably)
Nicely with them.  Emily Mortimer was a nice discovery for me here
(though, I must admit, she would've made a better "best friend" type for
Russ than a possible girlfriend.  Jean Smart absolutely sizzled
on-screen and provided more than a match for Bruce Willis; hard to
understand [she said, tongue firmly in-cheek] why the choice was made to
pair Willis with the younger actress instead.  Ah, Hollyweird).  The
screeching irritant of Renee Zellwiger in ME, MYSELF & IRENE having been
the last (non-cartoon) female lead I'd been exposed to, Mortimer
provided a pleasant contrast in her very user-friendly approach to a
character that could've easily been played as cloying and pathetic in
the wrong hands.  Mortimer's "hands" reminded me of some of the better
works of actress Minnie Driver; I look forward to seeing more of
Mortimer in movies to come.
Similarly, both Jean Smart and Spencer Breslin exceeded my expectations.
Smart, most notably known for her time on CBS-TV in DESIGNING WOMEN, was
always too broad a broad in that show; here, she kept the Good Ol' Girl
drawl in check, delivering a much more subtle, yet substantial,
performance in a role that was kind of strangely written in the first
place.  It threatened to be *over*written, but she pulled it off
nonetheless.  And even though many of his best lines were already
trailer-spoiled, Breslin's Rusty, bless his chubby little heart, had me
in stitches at times, and - remembering my own sometimes torturous
childhood - nearly in tears at others.  If nothing else, he deserves
hosannas for having more in common with child actor Haley Joel Osment
from THE SIXTH SENSE, than with the bratty Macaulay Culkin from HOME
ALONE (for now, at least.  I'll keep a good thought for Breslin; we
don't need another Culkin loosed upon us).
That's not to say, of course, that DISNEY'S THE KID didn't have its
faults.  "Kid" almost included too many characters (Chi McBride's boxer
Kenny, who Russ seeks out to help him teach Rusty how to defend himself,
was right on the edge of being a Diversity Addendum), the smarmily-cute
level got notched up near 11 a couple of times, and some obvious Issues
(for instance, the big How'd It All Happen In The First Place question)
might have, in a lesser flick, left me gasping for fresh air.  But "Kid"
had enough good clean fun, acted and filmed breezily, to balance it all
out.  I found myself laughing, and smiling, with ease, throughout this
Disney flick.
Issues of trailer-spoilage by numbnut preview creators aside (which, to
its credit, the movie overcame), you'll learn nothing new in DISNEY'S
THE KID that you haven't seen before in other "childhood reversal"
flicks like BIG ("Kid"'s sibling in overall theme), for instance.  Then
again, it might just be that in our rush to get from Here to There, we
adults have forgotten those lessons that BIG and DISNEY'S THE KID are
trying to teach us, if we'd only listen.  Or maybe, it's just as good an
excuse as any to laugh at ourselves for an hour our two.  Can't beat
that with a stick, eh?
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Not for nothin', but it must be said: whathell was Kenny Edmonds
thinking???
(Watch the movie, during the wedding scene, or buy the soundtrack.
You'll see - better yet, you'll *hear* - what I mean).
Bammer's Bottom Line:
If you liked Tom Hanks' turn in BIG - and I loved Tom Hanks' turn in BIG
- you'll like this flick.  DISNEY'S THE KID is a feel-good movie that
won't leave you feeling guilty for playing along with it, even though
kids were watching and laughing at the same jokes as we adults laughed
at.  Now if I could just hunt down the stoopid trailer-makers that give
away damn near the whole movie, like the vermin that they are...
DISNEY'S THE KID (rating: greenlight):
I wouldn't be a kid again if you paid me; but I wonder how 8-year-old
Rose would Like Me Now.  Hmmm...

Title
Review for Virgin Suicides, The (1999)
THE VIRGIN SUICIDES (1999)
Rated R; running time 98 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0159097
Official site: http://www.virginsuicides.com/
Written by: Sofia Coppola (based on the novel by Jeffrey Eugenides)
Directed by: Sofia Coppola
Cast: James Woods, Kathleen Turner, Kirsten Dunst, Josh Hartnett,
Hanna Hall, Chelse Swain, A.J. Cook, Leslie Hayman, Anthony DeSimone,
Jonathan Tucker (Tim Weiner), Noah Shebib (Parkie Denton), Robert
Schwartzmann (Paul Baldino), Lee Kagan (David Barker), Chris Hale (Peter
Sisten), Joe Dinicol (Dominic Palazzolo), Suki Kaiser (Lydia Perl,
Insensitive Reporter), Dawn Greenhalgh (Mrs. Scheer), Allen
Stewart-Coates (Mr. Scheer), Sherry Miller (Mrs. Buell), Jonathon
Whittaker (Mr. Buell), Michelle Duquet (Mrs. Denton), Murray McRae (Mr.
Denton), Paul Sybersma (Joe Larson), Susan Sybersma (Mrs. Larson),
Roberta Hanley (Mrs. Weiner), Peter Snider (Trip's Dad), Gary Brennan
(Donald), Charles Boyland (Curt Van Osdol), Dustin Ladd (Chip Willard),
Kristin Fairlie (Amy Schraff), Melody Johnson (Julie), Sheyla Molho
(Danielle), Ashley Ainsworth (Shelia Davis), Courtney Hawkrigg (Grace),
Francois Klanfer (Doctor), Mackenzie Lawrenz (Jim Czeslawski), Tim Hall
(Kurt Siles), Amos Crawley (John), Andrew Gillies (Principal Woodhouse),
Marilyn Smith (Mrs. Woodhouse), John Deans-Buchan (John), Jaya
Karsemeyer (Gloria), Leah Straatsma (Rannie), Sally Cahil (Mrs. Hedlie),
Tracy Ferencz (Nurse), Scot Denton (Mr. O'Connor), Timothy Adams (Buzz
'Rope' Romano), Joe Roncetti (Kevin Head), Hayden Christensen (Jake Hill
Conley), Michael Michaelessi (Parks Dept. Foreman), Megan Kennedy
(Cheerleader), Sandi Stahlbrand (Meredith Thompson), Neil Girvan (Drunk
Man in Pool), Anne Wessels (Woman in Chiffon in Pool), Mark Polley
(Cemetery Worker #1), Kirk Gonnsen (Cemetery Worker #2), Catherine Swing
(Mrs. O'Connor), Sarah Minhas (Wanda Brown), Michael Pare (Trip
Fontaine, 1997), Danny DeVito (Dr. Horniker), Scott Glenn (Father
Moody), Giovanni Ribisi (Narrator)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsvirgin.html
I grew up in 1970's Detroit, not very far from Grosse Point--the setting
in both time and place for this movie--but it might as well have been
set in a galaxy far, far away in the year 2525, for all intents and
purposes.  It's like my Grandfather Wolfe used'ta say: "Some things are
universal; but some shit's just Weird."
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Life according to The Virgin Suicides shows that 1970's Grosse Pointe,
Michigan to be a place of superficial calm and temporary beauty; the
beauty would be erased by the cutting-down of numerous dead trees that
lined the neighborhood, and the calm would be shattered by neighborhood
gossips, scavenging reporters, and a strange family for whom the word
"dysfunctional" was probably coined.
Mr. and Mrs. Lisbon (James Woods and Kathleen Turner) are completely
out-of-touch with their five teenage daughters, 13-year-old Cecilia
(Hanna Hall), 14-year-old Lux (Kirsten Dunst), 15-year-old Bonnie
(Chelse Swain), 16-year-old Mary (A.J. Cook), and 17-year-old Therese
(Leslie Hayman).  The neighborhood boys [their names are listed above;
hellifi could tell you which one was which] are fascinated by the girls,
especially after Cecilia commits suicide--and local stud, Trip Fontaine
(Josh Hartnett), takes a liking to Lux.  Unfortunately, Lux's burgeoning
libido, and Trip's massive brain spasm, combine for disasterous effects
for the four remaining sisters.
The Upshot:
In my review of AMERICAN BEAUTY earlier this year, I disagreed with The
Diva's AB review, on the basis of how she saw the dysfunctions in the
families that were its primary focus; but Diva could've as easily been
writing on-point about the Lisbon family - and more precisely, about the
disconnect I felt with damn near everything about "Virgin".  That last
bit is key: because where I felt that I "knew" good old Lester and
Carolyn and the rest of the gang, I haven't the slightest clue _what_
the Lisbon family's deal was.  And what's more: I just couldn't bring
myself to care.
Maybe it was the sheer number of unexplained - no, make that _undefined_
- characters.  Lux was fairly easy to pick out of a crowd; Kirsten Dunst
is a force to be reckoned with, even when everything around her seems to
be less-than-gelled.  And the Trip Fontaine character, as played by Josh
"Young Tommy Lee Jones" Hartnett, also seemed otherworldy.  Looking at
the movie on terms of these two characters and actors, you get a
*completely* different vibe than what happens when the rest of the
motley crew joins in.
Most of the other characters, and moreso, the actors who played them,
seemed to be in a psychedelic haze, wondering what exactly their
Motivation was supposed to be.  Particularly jarring were James Woods
and Kathleen Turner (who hasn't aged well at all, poor girl) as Ma and
Pa Lisbon; both actors seemed worlds away from what their resumes have
shown they're capable of.  As for their characters, all signs pointed to
their Major Problem being somehow involved (to a detrimental point) with
religion.  I think.  Or maybe it was just the ill-effects of being in a
community full of neighbors as rotten as the rapidly dying trees, who
knows.  Or, cares.  The rest [say it in a B&W Gilliganese fashion -
"...the movie star/and the rest..." - and you'll Feel me] of the
characters - with possibly the exception of Chase (Anthony DeSimone) -
blended into a chorus of sorts, having no real distinguishing marks to
tell one from the other.  The credits for the cast list ironically told
me more about who was who, than anything I saw on-screen. I included the
detailed cast and character list above, just for giggles; it would take
a supreme act to make me want to actually include all of the numerous
undefined players within the body of this review.
To her credit, though, writer/director Sophia Coppola showed some
gutsiness in putting "Virgin" together.  Knowing her primarily as
Francis Ford Coppola's sproggen, and the worst thing about a pretty bad
rendering of GODFATHER 3 (1 and 2 were masterpieces; wha'happen?), I was
prepared to write this one off early on, and probably would not have
gone to see it at all had it not been for favorable buzz about this
project [makes me wonder just what movie those critics saw; but, Strokes
For Folks].  Coppola was a lot more competent than I would've given her
credit for, and though I couldn't catch her groove, I could definitely
see her distinctive style shining through.  Wasn't quite enough to win
me over, but still, I give props where props are due.
Usually, when I see based-on-a-book movies that I don't particularly
like, I have a hankerin' to read the book.  Not so, this time.  One
thing, though: whoever decided that this film was a "dark comedy", was
probably smokin' whatever Trip left behind in his roach clip.  Just Say
No, dude; Just Say No.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I used to sweat it when I watched an Art Fillum and just didn't see what
everyone was raving about. Bump *that*; I haven't got time for the pain.
Call me uncouth if you wanna - hey, I've been called worse - but I just
couldn't get with this one.  I like my Dysfunctional Families a little
more understandable in their dysfunctions; weird for weird's sake just
goes right past me.  So when's American Beauty coming out on DVD, eh?
THE VIRGIN SUICIDES (rating: yellowlight):
Certainly killed two hours of *my* day.

Title
Review for Bait (2000)
BAIT (2000)
Rated R; running time 119 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0211938
Official site: http://www.baitmovie.com/
Written by: Tony Gilroy, Adam Scheinman, Andrew Scheinman
Directed by: Antoine Fuqua
Cast: Jamie Foxx, David Morse, Doug Hutchison, Kimberly Elise,
Mike Epps, Robert Pastorelli, David Paymer (Wally), Jamie Kennedy
(Blum), Nestor Serrano (Boyle), Kirk Acevedo (Ramundo), Jeffrey Donovan
(Julio), Megan Dodds (Walsh), Tia Texada (Tika)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbait.html
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Bristol (Doug Hutchinson), a Weird Compugeek with a sadistic streak,
along with his bumbling partner Jaster (Robert Pastorelli), steals $42
million in gold from a Manhattan gold reserve, and in the process
Bristol kills two guards, causing Jaster to wig out (with the obligatory
"you said no guns!" cliche) and leave Bristol to fend for himself.  At
the same time, petty thief Alvin Sanders (Jamie Foxx) and his brother
Stevie (Mike Epps) plan to break into a shrimp...er, prawn factory in
Brooklyn.  Alvin is, of course, caught by the cops, and just happens to
bunk with the also-caught Jaster, who may have told Alvin a lil' sum'n
sum'n about where the gold is hidden before Jaster leaves his cell.
At least Treasury Agent Edgar Clenteen (David Morse) thinks so; and with
the aid of (completely unconvincing and unintentionally-humorously
overblown) Modern Technology, sets up Alvin as live bait to reel in
Bristol by "leaking" info through The Internet that Alvin knows where
the gold is - unbeknownst to Alvin, who wants to go straight to win back
the love and respect of his girlfriend Lisa (Kimberly Elise).
There's Other Stuff, but you get the picture, eh?
The Upshot:
Sometimes, "that didn't Stink" is the best you can say about a flick;
and in the case of BAIT - which, admittedly, I didn't hold much hope for
from jump - that's enough for a middle-of-the-road yellowlight rating.
All that to say, this'll be a fairly short review.
The sillyness of the setup itself (Weird Compugeek Plots Revenge On Feds
By Offing Those Who Stand In His Way While Tough Cop Grimaces And
Unknowing Clown Clowns), the too-long by thirty minutes length of BAIT
(which reminds me, it was obviously cut: one scene shown in all the
trailers I saw on TV, where Alvin humorously confronted his unknowing
mother when he breaks into her house, was inexplicably cut out.  And the
movie still weighed in at a top-heavy two hours long), the
wifflebattedness of David Morse's hardnose cop character, the cheesy,
tired, wanna-be-a-playa clowning by Jaime Foxx and Mike Epps - all these
things conspired to completely underwhelm me.  And, apparently, the rest
of the American movie public, as witnessed by the anemic box office draw
($5.3 million) of BAIT in its opening weekend.  I'll put it this way: as
much as I love David Morse as an actor, I'd really rather just forget
his role in this movie.  For that matter, I'd really rather just forget
this movie.
About the only surprise was seeing Kimberly Elise.  I cannot explain
why, but I was expecting to see a light-skinned actress playing Alvin's
neglected girlfriend; and when Elise opened the door, I got a pleasant
shock.  Indeed, Elise was the best thing about this whole flick to me,
and I kept watching simply for her sake.  Well, her, and that fine
brother who played the unnamed Federal agent.
[I'd normally explain the significance of light/dark skin in The "Black
Factor", but for some reason, I just can't be arsed to care enough about
this flick to do so.  For your further edification, fast-forward to the
Jigaboo/Wannabe sequence in Spike Lee's SCHOOL DAZE].
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Jaime Foxx failed to cash in on his outstanding performance in 1999's
ANY GIVEN SUNDAY, David Morse pushed the Tough Cop buttons too hard, his
THE GREEN MILE co-star, Doug Hutchinson, played Weird to little
effect...all around, BAIT just failed to hook me.
BAIT (rating: yellowlight):
Not exactly Stinky Bait, but it certainly wasn't very fresh.

Title
Review for Titan A.E. (2000)
TITAN A.E. (2000)
Rated PG; running time 95 minutes
Genre: Animated/SciFi
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0120913
Official site: http://www.afterearth.com/
Written by: Ben Edlund, Randall McCormick
Directed by: Don Bluth, Gary Goldman
Cast: Voices of: Matt Damon, Drew Barrymore, Bill Pullman, Nathan Lane,
Janeane Garofalo, John Leguizamo, Tone Loc, Ron Perlman
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamstitan.html
Of all the Chicks in 3BC, I'm the one voted Most Likely To Review A
Cartoon.  It should come as no surprise, then, that I chose to review
TITAN A.E. this week--as opposed to The Diva, whose words on the subject
sounded something like "I sure didn't wanna review that mess".  Mebbe I
shoulda oughta listened to her words of wisdom.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
In the year 3028, a Bad, Bad bunch of aliens known as the Drej [Bad
aliens! Bad, Bad aliens!] inexplicably blast the planet Earth, and its
inhabitants, away like so many buzzing flies.  That would be
that--except for the fact that a group of secret...uh, whatever they
were...knew the Drej were coming and evacuated a bunch of Earthlings
just before the Drej arrived.
One of the secret...whatever they were's, Tucker (Ron Perlman), asks his
good buddy Tek (Tone Loc) to take Tucker's young son, Cale (Matt Damon)
with him in one of the evacuating ships so that Tucker could go do some
Secret Stuff with the Secret Spaceship known as the Titan--knowing he
may never see Cale again.  Feeling abandoned, Cale grows up with a chip
on his shoulder about dear old dad and humans--the few that are left,
anyway--in general.  Jaded, he feels all the more cynical when another
human, Joe Korso (Bill Pullman) shows up with alien shipmates Preed
(Nathan Lane), Stith (Janeane Garofalo), Jar-Ja...uh, Gune (John
Leguizamo), and the human female slash potential love interest (slash
[Luke]Warm Place To Put It), Akima (Drew Barrymore)--with the message
that Cale may hold the future of humanity in his hand.
The Upshot:
I found this flick pretty hard to wrap my reviewing braincells around,
mostly because it never found its legs enough for me to invest any care
in what was going on on the screen.  It was clearly derivative of many
movies, both animated and traditional; in various places, I was reminded
of STAR WARS, HEAVY METAL (though HM had a much better musical backbeat;
"Titan's" music seemed much more cheesy by comparison), the "Star Trek"
movies, and even a Bruce Lee flick or two.  But in its lack of developed
backstory (in spite of the storyline presented, the viewer is left
wondering why much of the action takes place), it put me in mind of the
most disasterous collection of moving images of the century: none other
than SUPERNOVA  [OW!  Uh, Sorry about that.  I had told my fingers to
never type that dreaded name again...]
That's not a very fair comparison, to be sure.  Even in its worst
moments, "Titan" was nowhere near as galling as "Stupornova".  But as
with that piece of sh...um, detritus, "Titan" certainly bit off way more
than it could chew, story-wise.  With this movie's enormous leaps of
logic [Uh, how did Cale so easily pilot every spacecraft he encountered?
*How long* does it take to rebuild an old, dilapidated ship, again?  And
why bother putting the Drej speech in subtitles, when obviously Cale
Magically understood every word as if Big Poppa Drej spoke perfect
English, huh, why? WHY?], I felt my eyes rolling faster than a bowling
ball down the gutter lane.
Like their voice counterparts in DINOSAUR, the actors don't add much
character to their characters--and unlike DINOSAUR, the actor's voices
aren't readily distinguishable (though Nathan Lane, bless his sarcastic
lil' heart, gave it ye olde college try).  This, I think, was to
"Titan's" deficit.  After all, Matt Damon and company had to have been
paid a pretty penny for their, in essence, voice-overs; if one couldn't
tell these highly-paid actors from Joe Schmoe From Kokomo, one would
think the producers didn't get their money's worth, eh?
All those things could be forgiven, had the animation been top-notch.
With a name like Don Bluth (THE SECRET OF NIMH, AN AMERICAN TAIL, ALL
DOGS GO TO HEAVEN) behind it, good animation should've been a given,
right?  It should've.  It wasn't.  Worse, it seemed schizophrenic, with
the human and alien characters drawn by Bluth in traditional (for him)
cartoon style, but the ships, planets, and various backgrounds,
obviously computer animated.  This gave the movie a disjointed feeling,
with the computer animated sections overpowering the traditional
drawings (note, for example, how stiff the characters look in the
windows of the computer animated spaceships, as if they were stills of
dolls sitting in their seats).  Anytime the viewer is
taken-out-of-the-moment by such jarring revelations, that's most def A
Bad Thing.
In spite of everything I've written above, I don't want you, gentle
reader, to go away thinking that TITAN A.E. was bad.  Spirit-less,
lacking in humor, and poorly-thought-out, sure.  But not bad.  Anything
that (ObQuickieBlackFactor) includes even a brief movie moment
confirming that Minorities Are Part Of The Future, can't be *that* bad,
can it?
Bammer's Bottom Line:
It's just too bad TITAN A.E. couldn't make up its mind and go either
full-out as traditional animation, or hi-tech CGI sci-fi.  Not that it'd
make much difference either way, I reckon; it never impressed me as
being much more than a half-hearted attempt at wrapping a movie around a
soundtrack that'll no doubt sell millions.
TITAN A.E. (rating: yellowlight):
On a "Star Trek" comparison scale, this one felt more like the STAR
TREK: THE MOTION PICTURE dud than the much-better STAR TREK 2: THE WRATH
OF KHAN.

Title
Review for Red Planet (2000)
RED PLANET (2000)
Rated R; running time 110 minutes
Genre: Science Fiction
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.redplanetmovie.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0199753
Written by: Jonathan Lemkin, Channing Gibson (based upon a story by
Chuck Pfarrer)
Directed by: Anthony Hoffman
Cast: Val Kilmer, Carrie-Anne Moss, Tom Sizemore, Benjamin Bratt,
Simon Baker, Terrence Stamp
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsredplanet.html
The five-second Bammer review: YAWN.
Those needing a wee bit more substance in their reviews, are invited to
read on.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The year: 2057.  Twelve billion people living on Earth.  Something's
gotta give - and increasingly, it's Earth's natural resources.
For 20 years, Earth scientists sent unmanned probes to Mars, hoping to
stimulate life there, to one day allow some of Earth's citizenry to
colonize Mars.  When the oxygen levels on Mars start dropping, "Houston"
sends a crack team of their top people to Mars to investigate.  The team
includes: tough-as-nails [but Soft inside!] Mission Commander Kate
Bowman (Carrie-Anne Moss); techie Robby Gallagher (Val Kilmer), who the
team teasingly calls their "Space Janitor"; Dr. Quinn Burchenal (Tom
Sizemore), a Geneticist with Science constantly on the brain; Lt. Ted
Santen (Benjamin Bratt), mission co-pilot and resident Stud;
Terraforming Specialist Chip Pettengill (Simon Baker), picked for the
mission as a last-minute replacement; and Dr. Bud Chantillas (Terrence
Stamp), former scientist and current Seeker-Of-Light.
And let's not forget AMEE, the robot WonderDog; prepped for exploration
as well as military mode, AMEE is one terminator that you do *not* wanna
tick off.
The Upshot:
I'm firmly convinced that at this point in human existence, movies about
missions to Mars, are doomed to be bad (contrary to what I wrote in my
review of MISSION TO MARS, which I, admittedly, overrated because of its
Tender Love Story.  Hooboy, did I take a wrong turn there.  But I
digress.)
RED PLANET was, in a word, boring.  And in a few more words, it had plot
holes wide enough to drive a truck through, uninteresting characters
that you were glad to watch die one at a time, a storyline that was
laughingly thin with weak feints toward having Big Philosophical
Discussions, multiple Deus Ex Machinas (one in particular that had the
Geek in me up in arms; anyone with working knowledge of How Modems Work,
will see what I mean), and the dumbest, most unintentionally funny
excuse for an Evil Monster that I've seen in a long time.  Oh, but the
movie *did* have irrelevant-to-the-scene Sting songs constantly playing
in the background, and - proving that it was Modern! And! Hip! - lots of
references to The Web.  Oooh.  I'm impressed.
I give "Planet" credit for almost coming to life near the end [ironic
that the more characters died off, the more interesting the movie got],
and for avoiding the easy "Matrix" way out by not making Carrie-Anne
Moss' character Melt around all the flying testosterone [at least, not
completely].  The movie certainly *looked* Pretty enough, though the
strange etch-a-sketch (without the surrounding plastic) directional
thingies the characters were so fond of using, made me long for Mr.
Spock's Tricorder.  And I gotta admit that that Braless Space Commander
closeup even got *my* attention (must be cold up there, eh Commander?).
But considering that RED PLANET was held back for months to keep it out
of direct competition with MISSION TO MARS, you might think that they'd
spend a little time adding some...oh, I dunno...*entertainment* to it or
something.
And what a waste of Tom Sizemore; hell, of Moss (who at least had a few
sparky moments) and Terrence Stamp, too (Val Kilmer, though, was his
usual wooden self).  Director Anthony Hoffman oughta be pimp-slapped for
having all that powerful acting ability at his fingertips, and leaving
it lost in space like that.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
The good news: there were no Black astronauts in this "futuristic" space
flick to test out Diva's "Brotha Rule Of Science Fiction" (in which the
Black astronaut/scientist/comic-relief is usually the first to die).
The bad news: there were no Black astronauts in this "futuristic" space
flick.
The better news: there were no Black actors wasted in this stunningly
boring space flick.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
It might be that Mars exploration is too far ahead of our time to allow
filmmakers to create a good, realistic, adventurous Mars space flick
just yet.  Or it might be that with all the Modern Technology gizmos
that we humans have, it's NASA that's behind the ball, not keeping up
with *us*; who knows.  One thing's for sure: until Classics like "The
Jetsons" come to fruition, none of these "To Mars...And Beyond!"
pretenders to the throne have a real prayer of impressing an
increasingly techno-aware American Public.  Unless, of course, they have
"Star Wars" somewhere in the title.
RED PLANET (rating: yellowlight):
Crash-landing at a theater near you...

Title
Review for Light It Up (1999)
Light It Up (1999) 
Rated R; running time 100 minutes
Genre: Drama
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0172726 
Official site: http://www.foxmovies.com/lightitupcs.html  
Written by: Craig Bolotin
Directed by: Craig Bolotin
Starring: Usher Raymond, Rosario Dawson, Robert Ri'chard, Fredro Starr, 
Forest Whitaker, Vanessa L. Williams, Sara Gilbert, Clifton Collins, 
Judd Nelson, Glynn Turman 
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamslightup.html
High school was the most hellish part of my childhood; I was truly lucky
to leave it alive and mentally intact.  So when I saw the trailers for
"Light It Up", I could identify with some of the stuff happening.  On the
other hand, as a mother of a 17-year-old high school senior, I could also
Feel the situation from the adult's point of view.  But I'm getting ahead
of myself...
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
"Light It Up" takes place in Lincoln High School, a run-down mess of a
school in the inner-city; many of its windows are broken or completely
gone ("It's so cold in here," one of the students says, "you can see the
sentences!"), water drips from the nasty ceilings, and the rooms are so
overcrowded that some of the students have to stand along the wallspace. 
The movie tells the story of six students--Rodney (Starr), a thug at the
exterior that may have more going for him on the inside than he lets on;
Rivers (Collins), a quick-witted hustler with a heart; Lynn (Gilbert), a
loner who gets some bad news early on; Stephanie (Dawson), an honor
student who is seen as uppity because she's trying to get out of "the
hood"; and Ziggy (Ri'chard), a sensitive artist and narrator of the story,
who, along with his friend Lester (Raymond), sets off a confrontation with
the authority figures at Lincoln.  These include Principal Armstrong
(Turman), who's overworked, underpaid, and too busy to hear about the
deplorable classroom conditions the students and teachers--especially Mr.
Knowles (Nelson)--have to work in; and school cop Officer Jackson
(Whitaker), "a $5 cop with a $50 attitude".  Things come to a head after
Jackson is accidently shot and the students (tagged the "Lincoln 6" by the
media) take matters into their own hands.
The Upshot:
For reasons that I'll speak on in detail in "The Black Factor", I wanted
very much to like "Light It Up".  I battled with myself between giving it
a green- or yellow-light rating, even though the writing was second-rate,
the subplots were thin, the execution was sloppy, and the excess
baggage--namely, Williams as Audrey The Negotiator--wasn't trimmed more. 
Edit the movie a bit and you'd have the makings of a good Afterschool
Special, or better yet, an HBO movie.
But this flick had its heart in the right place.  There was enough of a
balance of decent actors across the age spectrum (though truth to tell,
except for Raymond and Ri'chard, the "kids" looked a wee bit long in the
tooth) that it seemed neither a teen flick, nor an overly preachy morality
play (not too preachy, anyway, though it did try to work that nerve). 
Usher (who, as a Urban Contemporary singer, really needs to keep his shirt
on more) and Fredo (a rap artist in his other life) were surprisingly
good, though one-dimensional; the rest of the cast amiably went through
their paces to the mildly-surprising ending.
My biggest problem with this movie is that, like the kids, it didn't have
any real depth of focus; it didn't know what it wanted to Say.  Besides
the main Issue that struck me right where I live, its under-use of any of
the adults (other than Jackson; my jury is still out on Whittaker's
portrayal, though it's nice to see him as something besides the perennial
"good guy" lately), and inexplicable addition of Williams, put the onus on
Usher et al to carry the load.  Unfortunately, with the script they were
given to work with, they weren't up to the task.  More soapy than
authentic, it managed to strum the violin strings without adding the rest
of the band to provide a complete orchestration.  
It's funny; not long after I watched this movie, I came home to find "The
Negotiator" on HBO; starring Samuel Jackson and Kevin Spacey, that movie
ran circles around "Light It Up" in telling its hostage story (though I
have Issues with how both movies resolved the hostage situation; so as to
not spoil it, I'll post a message addressing these Issues on the 3BC
"Viewer Voices" webboard for further discussion).  Would that "Light It
Up" writer/director Bolotin had taken better Cliff's Notes from "The
Negotiator"; it might've gotten the respect that Rodney said the students
wanted.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]
    As a Black woman, I see the "Black Factor"--things that affect me as a 
    "consumer of color"--in many aspects of life; movies included. Whether 
    from the standpoint of noting Black (and other "minority") cast and crew
    members (if any), to the (lack of) focus toward "people of color" (dag, I
    hate that term), to the out-and-out antagonistic attitude toward Us 
    (Jar-Jar, anyone?), the "Black Factor" (BF) is something that plays as 
    much a role in my film enjoyment as any other aspect of the movie itself.
This one's more a "Inner-City Factor" than just a "Black Factor":
I'm oft heard to remark that today's younger generation is, in a way,
soft--specifically, the kids who are wannabe thugs by day, but come home
to a warm meal, an allowance, and heck, a house, for that matter.  MOST
children of working- and middle-class parents have been raised in a time
when they always knew what a Nintendo is; when their gym shoes (and I'm
aging myself by calling them gym shoes) often cost more than all the rest
of the clothes on their bodies; when they didn't have to use wire pliers
as a makeshift tuner for their (black and white) TV; when they didn't have
to depend on condiments to fill their stomachs when mama's cabinet was
bare--which was most of the time [all y'all former Sugar or Mayonnaise
Sandwich eaters, can I get an Amen?]
But on that ubiquitous Other Hand...not all kids--and let's be real
here--Black and Latino kids--are thuggish gangbangers, trashing everything
in their path (human and inanimate) just for the hell of it.  Most of
them, from what I've seen, are just like we were: confused, trying to make
their way in life the best they can, wanting a good life, and given
guidance by authority figures that give a damn, willing to work for it. 
And unlike us, they have to deal with the true bangers on a daily basis,
as well as a society that, like Jackson and Armstrong, has already made
its mind up about them before they even had a chance to prove otherwise.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Though "Light It Up" loses ratings points for being thick with plot holes
and soap-opera cliches, this reviewer Heard what they were saying about
how we all need to take the time to listen to each other--students and
teachers, parents and children alike.  If nothing else, it provided a bit
of good after-movie conversation between my husband, my son, and myself. 
Can't beat that with a stick, eh?
"Light It Up" (rating: yellowlight) 
"The Negotiator" could teach "Light It Up" a thing or three about how to
script a hostage movie; but if you're willing to listen, "Light It Up"
could teach you a thing or three about today's youth.

Title
Review for Bandits (2001)
BANDITS (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 123 minutes
Genre: crime adventure with random and yet unfunny "comedic" elements
Seen at: Lowes Star Southfield (Detroit, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.mgm.com/bandits/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0219965
Written by: Harley Peyton
Directed by: Barry Levinson
Cast: Bruce Willis, Billy Bob Thornton, Cate Blanchett, Troy Garity,
Bobby Slaton
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbandits.html
So, what do you do when the very first scene in a movie has you rolling
your eyes...and you've barely made it through the credits?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
Impulsive Cool Dude Joe (Bruce Willis) and his Neurotic Hypochondriac
Buddy Terry (Billy Bob Thornton) are escaped cons [roll] on the run, who
decide - rather, Joe decides on the cuff; the more careful Terry just
hangs on for the ride - to get back into the bank robbing business.
Needing to come up with a plan, they settle on a scheme to make enough
money doing bank heists to front a legit restaurant business in Mexico.
Being Gentlemen Bandits, they decide to take the unusual tack of
kidnapping bank managers and their families the night before a holdup,
taking them to the bank the next morning, thus causing as little
disruption as possible.  It is in Mom & Pop USA's homes where Hilarity
begins to Ensue.
The duo becomes a trio when Terry is nearly run over by almost equally
neurotic (and definitely sex-starved) Bored Housewife Kate (Cate
Blanchett), who pisses Terry off and melts over Cool Dude Joe's Manly
Manliness [roll]. They grow into a foursome when Joe brings on his
Braindead Stuntman Cousin Harold (Troy Garity) to drive the getaway car
[ooh roll].
Meanwhile, this unnecessarily long flick is further elongated by a
completely unnecessary "America's Most Wanted" take off, with Bobby
Slaton as a reporter tracking the "notorious" Sleepover Bandits, and
their supposed hostage Kate, across Oregon and Califunny, to what could
be their ultimate showdown.
The Upshot:
It is my custom to give my readers a "spoiler" warning, since any plot
info I divulge in "The Story" might be something for which the audience
did not want to be forewarned.  I needn't have bothered with BANDITS,
though.  This movie is actually its own self-contained spoiler, leaving
traces of itself all over the theater floor.  I wasn't surprised by a
single frame of it, not for one millisecond.  Every plot device,
inanimate or human, was clearly recognized for what it was from the time
it showed on-screen.  Forget the "too much information! They've shown
all the best bits!" trailers in the weeks before its release; BANDITS
spoiled *itself*.
In more ways than one.  I'll admit that I lost interest in this train
wreck early on, when Joe got all High And Mighty about being called out
his name by Kate when she chided him about stealing hard-earned moolah
from The Little People.  'Nonsense!', spewed Joe; 'this bank money is
FDIC-insured, I'm just stealing from the government who stole from us'.
PeeYEW, who left that fetid meat out on the editing table?
The only reason BANDITS doesn't get my full redlight wrath is because
you gotta love somebody named Billy Bob who doesn't also have most of
his teeth missing, fly a rebel flag at a civil rights picnic, and have a
broke down trailer for a home.  As often happens, Billy Bob Thornton
plays the only interesting character in the bunch.  His Terry is the
only one - and I do mean the! only! one! - I didn't feel like taking a
baseball bat to every time he opened his mouth.  And even then, Billy
Bob Thornton's presence just barely moved this flick to yellowlight
territory.  I especially cringed at e-v-e-r-y  s-i-n-g-l-e  m-o-v-e by
Kate; then again, Cate Blanchett tends to have that effect on me.
Terry's neuroses made him interesting, in a way that Joe's and Kate's
didn't even come close to, not to mention Harold the ObDoofus.  I found
myself cursing the day that Barry Levinson ever saw Wills and Blanchett
and thought, "aha!"
Not that Levinson - former writer, director, and producer of TSFKABDSOT
(ask somebody), HOMICIDE: LIFE ON THE STREET - gets a pass.  Indeed, I
blame him most, especially for that bile-inducing payoff at the end.
Come on, guy, you once wrote for HOMICIDE cops on TeeVee; you *know*
better than that!  Shame on you, Levinson.
An internet friend of mine (who, coincidentally, is a member of the same
ex-"Homicide" list I'm on) asked me if I thought the "Once Upon A Time
In China" parody movie IRON MONKEY, was over-the-top.  My response?
True story or not, given the crap that BANDITS asks its viewers to
believe about Mom And Pop USA eagerly welcoming these bandits into their
homes...well, give me "over-the-top" for $200, Alex.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
     [...or, "watch Bammer piss some people off"]
Every now and then, I like to play a game called "Imagine It With Black
folks".  Wanna play?  Sure you do.
"Imagine Joe and Terry as Black bank robbers, traipsing across the
countryside, robbing banks and being generally thought of as Charming
Goofs...and no one ever calls the cops."  Can ya see it?
Then again, I can't really see this mess with *White* folks, so...
Bammer's Bottom Line:
You mean, I dragged myself out of my Warm Comfortable Bed on a rainy
Sunday morning for *this*?  Bah.
BANDITS stole two hours and three minutes of my life.  I'd like it back,
please.

Title
Review for Woman on Top (1999)
WOMAN ON TOP (2000)
Rated R; running time 83 minutes
Genre: Romantic Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0206420
Official site: http://www.womanontopmovie.com/
Written by: Paul Mayersberg
Directed by: Mike Hodges
Cast: Penelope Cruz, Murilo Benicio, Harold Perrineau Jr.,
Mark Feuerstein, John de Lancie
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsontop.html
Hey, I'll admit it: the built-in double entendre of WOMAN ON TOP was
more than enough to draw me to the theater to see it.  That, and the
chance to see the gorgeous Penelope Cruz [which leads me to an
observation: how many straight men would you ever "hear" admit to how
gorgeous a given *male* is, hmmm?  But I digress.] strut her stuff
alongside Mark Feuerstein (one of my favorite actors from ABC's ONCE AND
AGAIN series) in a comedy, was all I needed to spend 83 minutes in a
dark theater looking at a projection on the wall.  It was enough to get
me there; but would it be enough to hold my interest?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Brazilian-born Isabella Oliveira (Penelope Cruz) has two great
qualities: she's extremely beautiful, and she's a great cook - and one
strike against her: debilitating motion sickness.  It affects her to the
point where she can't move at all unless she controls her movement; she
has to drive, she has to dance lead, and during sex, she has to be the
one on top.
This creates a problem with her equally beautiful husband, restaurateur
and balladeer Toninho Oliveira (Murilo Benicio); a man's man who takes
the credit for his successful restaurant while his chef wife does all
the work in the background, Toninho just can't hack not being in control
of every facet of Isabella's life, and rebels in the best way he knows
how: he has a quickie with one of their neighbors.
Isabella, outraged, leaves Toninho and flies - with terrible motion
sickness - to San Francisco, where she hooks up with her childhood
friend Monica Jones (Harold Perrineau Jr.), who happens to be a
transvestite [and thankfully, not a "tragic" one; Perrineau looked good
as a woman, dayam!]  After a wee struggle in looking for a job, Isabella
gets a teaching gig in a local culinary school, which leads to her
discovery by TV Producer Cliff Lloyd, who is as awe-struck as nearly
every other man (and, woman) by Isabella's beauty as well as her cooking
talents, as is Lloyd's boss, Alex Reeves (John de Lancie).  But even as
things go well for Isabella, she still finds herself missing one
important thing: control.
The Upshot:
Let's go back to The Story for a minute, to the part where I said
"Toninho just can't hack not being in control of every facet of
Isabella's life" - because that's where my first problem with the
beautifully-filmed and lead-casted WOMAN ON TOP begins: I didn't get
that impression right off.  Yes, the script did mention it here and
there, and yes, from all the generalizations of Brazilian men and
"their" women that I've ever heard, I could believe it; but precious
little in the early bits of the movie, convinced me that it was such a
Problem that it became unbearable to Isabella.  In fact, I was surprised
that events played themselves out as quickly as they did in this short
(time-wise; long, story-wise) film; the audience was treated to many
idyllically-romantic scenes of the two beautiful lovers doing what comes
naturally to them, a couple quick glances of Isabella's Control Issues,
then BAM!, her Control Issues (and his sudden need to be On Top himself)
break them up.  Uh...huh?  Where'd that come from all of the sudden?
Problem two: we switch quickly to San Francisco, where we meet Monica
"RuPaul with better makeup" Jones and swiftly learn, in the space of a
sentence or two from Monica and Isabella in their bathtub scene (an
interesting set-up, to be sure) of their Long-standing Childhood
Friendship.  These quick snippets - and the similarly speedy
introduction of TV Producer Cliff Lloyd - seemed an afterthought, a way
of identifying the characters without giving the audience a solid look
at what they were made of.  It felt rushed, as if the filmmaker was
hurrying to get to a certain point in the movie, only to repeat that
point over and over again.  Which leads me to...
Problem three: the sense of deja vu.  That is, the feeling that the
movie constantly repeated itself; how irritating, then, that the film
switched gears from being too little, too quickly, to being too much,
too often.  Hard to believe that in the space of only 83 minutes, a
movie can Say what it had to Say, and still have, oh, a good 40 minutes
of filler added.  This part of WOMAN ON TOP was classic Lather, Rinse,
Repeat: Isabella and Toninho Lovingly Gaze at each other, they embrace,
they have a Misunderstanding; Lather, Rinse, Repeat.  Isabella
smells/tastes something that reminds her of Toninho, she remembers
making love to him, she gets flustered and angry; Lather, Rinse, Repeat.
Toninho pursues a reluctant Isabella, he sings love ballads to her
(complete with travelling band), Monica says something Sassy; Lather,
Rinse, Repeat.  This happens ad nauseam throughout the movie, enough to
give *me* motion sickness.
Three things that WOMAN ON TOP did have going for it, and that elevate
it from the mundane straight-yellowlight rating, were the strong
attractiveness of, and chemistry between, Cruz and Benicio; the
funkiness of Perrineau's Monica Jones (save the broadness of the
character, it was hard to remember at times that there was a *man* under
all that!) until he...uh, she...eventually wore that Go Girl thing out;
and the best, most non-commercial soundtrack I've heard in ages.  Alas,
these strengths were not enough to make this one-note film work its
magic in the end; while there were pleasant moments scattered
throughout, the moments didn't congeal into a satisfying whole.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
    [Or, to be more precise for this movie, the "Ethnic Factor"]
Another thing bothered me about this movie, though I'm not sure whether
it should have; whether it was reasonable for me to expect to gain
Cultural Understanding from a comedy about people who happen to be
Brazilian simply because I'd never seen a comedy about Brazilians
before.  What bothered me here is that I came away feeling that the only
thing I Learned about Brazilians is that they make great music and great
food.
The most ironic thing about Isabella's Issue with the Network TV Suits'
insistence on her show not being "so ethnic", is that the only thing
that seemed at all ethnic about "Passion Food", was Monica's dress and
Toninho's backup band.  "Sexy as all get up"?  Sure.  But "ethnic"?
Hmmm.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
I wavered on rating this film: part of me wanted to give WOMAN ON TOP an
unabashed greenlight for its beautiful Brazilian music and its even more
beautiful stars, Penelope Cruz and Murilo Benicio.  My Greenlight,
though, generally indicates that I'd pay to see a movie again - and I
just don't think that's the case, here.  Still, it's worth seeing once,
if only to see Harold Perrineau Jr. outdo RuPaul's schtick.  Man, whadda
woman...
WOMAN ON TOP (rating: flashing yellowlight):
WOMAN ON TOP was teasingly Spicy, to be sure; but like many Hot things,
its Heat alone wasn't enough to satisfy my appetite, and left my thirst
unquenched.  But I will be buying the soundtrack, sho'nuff.

Title
Review for Bounce (2000)
BOUNCE (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 120 minutes
Genre: Romantic Drama
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.miramax.com/bounce/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0186894
Written by: Don Roos
Directed by: Don Roos
Cast: Ben Affleck, Gwyneth Paltrow, Tony Goldwyn, Joe Morton,
Caroline Aaron, Alex D. Linz, Johnny Galecki, Natasha Henstridge,
Jennifer Grey
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsbounce.html
Actually, I made a mistake in something I wrote above: this film's genre
shouldn't include the word "romantic" in it at all.  Of course, the
mistake was really not mine; blame it on reportedly real-life lovebirds,
Ben Affleck and Gwyneth Paltrow, who did everything they could to
convince the audience that they're Not Really Seeing Each Other.  Too
bad that convincing shows *onscreen*.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The Moral Of The Story?  Lies Are Bad.  Ask Buddy (Ben Affleck) and Abby
(Gwyneth Paltrow), two needy people who need to work on keeping their
stories straight.
When his plane got delayed in Chicago, advertising agent Buddy Amaral
("amoral", get it?) hooked up with two strangers, Greg Genello (Tony
Goldwyn) and Mimi (Natasha Henstridge) to pass the time away.  Wanting
to Get To Know Mimi Better, Buddy gave Greg his ticket voucher - a clear
breach of federal regulations, as Flight Attendant Janice Guererro
(Jennifer Grey) finds out (she helped Buddy's scheme to get Greg home to
his wife and kids).  Fed regs would be the least of Buddy's concerns,
however: after the plane - which *he* was supposed to be on - crashes
with Greg aboard, Buddy has Deep Guilt about what happened.  And,
keeping with the Theme, Buddy becomes an ugly drunk, much to the dismay
of his boss/business partner Jim (Joe Morgan).  Still not feeling
guilt-free, Buddy seeks out Greg's wife Abby (Gwyneth Paltrow), to
somehow try to make up for what he did.  Meanwhile, The Widow Abby has
Issues of her own to deal with: namely, her unforgiving older son Scott
(Alex D. Linz), her still-trusting youngest son Joey, her Nosy But
Well-Meaning friend Donna (Caroline Aaron), and a job for which Abby
is not very qualified, but has to do to make ends meet.
Buddy lied to Abby about how he came to find her. Abby lied to Buddy
about how she lost her husband. I'd say "and, of course, Wackiness
Ensues", but that'd be going against the moral of the story, I reckon.
The Upshot:
I swear, at times, watching BOUNCE go through its by-the-numbers paces
was like watching paint dry.  I'm not exaggerating.  Seriously; it's in
my review notes: "Here comes the Sad Guitar Music...now is the time
Buddy feels Remorse..."; and after Buddy and Abby met: "Here comes the
Sad Guitar Music again...now is the time for the Kiss..."
And so forth.  BOUNCE was an exercise in tedium, like watching a
read-through for a play that you just *know* is gonna bomb.  The movie -
and its characters - took itself *way* too seriously, much to its
deficit.  Me, I couldn't stop snickering.
What's funniest about BOUNCE, is that it's not even "So Bad It's
Good"-worthy; this one was just...there.  I'd dearly love to pick fun at
the high-fallutin' "Academy Award Winner Ben Affleck...Academy Award
Winner Gwyneth Paltrow" pronouncements, but the blame only partially
lies with those two.  More shameful was the TV Movie Of The Week script,
which put words into its characters' mouths that I daresay did *not*
belong there.  C'mon, guys; do people *really* talk like that?  I mean,
honest-to-goodness conversations between men and women just don't sound
*anything* like the overly-sentimental speechifying from Affleck, or the
- whateverthell it was that Paltrow failed to put across.  Even more
than Affleck (who at least *tried* to show some emotion, genuine or no),
Paltrow's monotone droning made me reach for a non-existent volume
control button.
The shame of it all was that Tony Goldwyn - one of those great actors
that you recognize immediately, but never remember the name - was offed
so soon.  He's about the only one of the bunch that seemed to believe in
what he was doing.  And though Gay Friend Seth (Johnny Galecki) was 
animated enough, the whole feel of the movie was flat, as if the 
actors were all only doing what they were doing because some lame 
director was yelling out lame
instructions at them.  There was no sense of discovery, of natural
progression from here to there; blink, and suddenly Things Changed, for
reasons that seemed murky, character development-wise.  In the end, that
was just it: there *was* no real development; just actors, Acting.
Fourth wall?  Hell, I could see the fourth ceiling, fourth floor, fourth
table, fourth chair...
I guess I called it right, back when I first saw previews for
Bounce, when I predicted it would be "RANDOM HEARTS-lite,
with the mindlessness of FINAL DESTINATION thrown in for bad measure".
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
At this point in his career, Joe Morton seems to be the kind of "go-to"
guy that Hollywood loves to use in situations that call for a solid, but
"safe", Black actor.  This is no slight on his part - he plays the kinds
of Everyman roles that are the earmark of a good character actor - but
it makes me wonder whether he's tapping his full potential yet.  No, I
don't need to see Yet Another 'Banger (plus, Morton's long-in-the-tooth
for that), and no, I don't want to pigeonhole Morton, or *any* Black
actor, for that fact, into "Black Roles".  I just wish he would play
something more than "safe", y'know?
But please, Mr. Morton, not another BLUES BROTHERS 2000, okay?
Bammer's Bottom Line:
There's little doubt in my mind that "THE GRINCH" will bounce BOUNCE
right out of America's theaters.  That's too bad, too; with "Grinch" not
being strong enough to keep most adults' attention, we *need* an
intelligent, thought- or emotion-provoking, romantic tale to escape to
during this holiday season.  Sorry; BOUNCE just ain't it.
BOUNCE (rating: yellowlight):
Man, Affleck and Paltrow have *no* chemistry together on-screen.  Good
thing they're Not Really Seeing Each Other, eh?

Title
Review for Frequency (2000)
FREQUENCY (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 124 minutes 
Genre: Drama/Sci-fi 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0186151 
Official site: http://www.frequencymovie.com/  
Written by: Toby Emmerich 
Directed by: Gregory Hoblit 
Starring: Dennis Quaid, Jim Caviezel, Elizabeth Mitchell, 
Andre Braugher, Noah Emmerich, Shawn Doyle, Daniel Henson, 
Stephen Joffe, Michael Cera
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsfrequency.html
Some movies are easy to pick or pan; their brightly shining goodness 
(KEEPING THE FAITH) or dull, throbbing badness (WHERE THE MONEY IS) make 
it easy for me as a movie critic to greenlight those that I'd recommend 
my readers rush out to see, or redlight those that should be taken out 
with the day's garbage.
And then there are flicks like FREQUENCY; movies that have Issues that 
prevent me from giving them an unqualified greenlight, but that I still 
liked well enough to not apply the slow-your-roll brakes on for a 
yellowlight rating.  These are the movies, indeed, that make writing my 
reviews all the more hard.  Thus, I'm writing this on Sunday afternoon 
instead of last night after I came back from the theater, which allowed 
me to sleep on it.
But enough of this filler; on with the show.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The pretty lights in the sky--the storm known as the aurora 
borealis--have a surprise in store John Sullivan (Jim Caviezel), a 
Queens cop who still mourns the death of his father Frank (Dennis Quaid) 
30 years past.  As the movie opens, John, his best friend Gordo (Noah 
Emmerich), and Gordo's son Gordy Jr. (Michael Cera) discover a chest 
belonging to Frank, a firefighter during 1969; the chest contains a 
shotgun, pictures of his father--and a ham radio ("so this is what 
people used before the net, huh?") that will link him to his father in 
ways he never believed could happen.   
The radio allows John to reach out to his past and change it, affecting 
the lives of not only he and his father, but also of his mother Julia 
(Elizabeth Mitchell), the young Gordo of his past (Stephen Joffe), 
John's current boss and his father's best friend, Satch DeLeon (Andre 
Braugher), and even John himself as a young boy (Daniel Henson).  But 
changes made in the past have a direct effect on the future--John's 
present time--and because of these changes, a serial killer may have 
been allowed another chance to kill again.
Issue #1: the movie's treatment of the concept of time travel, through 
what writer Toby Emmerich (brother of Noah, who plays Gordo) calls 
"multiverses".  If you can't get past this concept and suspend your 
disbelief from the start, you will likely not be able to enjoy this 
flick.  I got past it, though I still have questions about how 
"multiverses" effect some parts of the character's lives, but not 
others.  For instance, in a scene shown in the movie's trailer **[MINOR 
SPOILER AHEAD]**, a big deal is made of the 1969 Frank putting his 
wallet in a common area for the 1999 John to find (immediately, not "in 
the future". These notes are gonna make me dizzy); similar situations 
occur throughout the movie.  That's all well and good--but if that's the 
case, why don't other everyday changes to the environment from 
"now-time" 1969, affect the now of 1999? (Yeah, definitely dizzy).  
Shouldn't simple things like the 1969 Sullivans taking items in and out 
of the refrigerator, making the bed, or even going to the bathroom 
(ugh), leave marks on the 1999 Sullivans' lives?  Hmmm... **[END MINOR 
SPOILER]**
Issue #2: the way director Gregory Hoblit chose to let the viewer know 
there was some Important! Stuff! about to happen.  Hoblit all too often 
hit the audience the dreaded Whifflebat Of Exposition, by way of using 
closeups on things that Joe Viewer should pay close attention to, as 
they would be of great import later on in the story.  There's an aurora 
borealis storm out tonight...wham!  And look! at that dead cop's 
name...wham! And watch...wham!...things drop...wham!...simultaneously... 
wham!...in slow motion...WHAM-0!   But even with that Whifflebat hitting 
me upside the head as often as it did, I still missed a couple of key 
sequences that left me wondering what was going on at certain points in 
the movie.  Lucky for me, my husband caught me up afterwards.
Issue #3: Call me picky, but if you're gonna begin with one 
premise--that using a ham radio requires you to hold down the talk 
button ("keying") to transmit--you damn well should stick with that 
premise.  I'd rather be asked to believe that you don't key the mike to 
talk, than to have characters start keying at first, but later have 
radio conversations from clear across the room with no microphone in 
sight, much less actually pushing the damn button.  Hey, I've walked out 
on movies for less; I cannot stand having my intelligence insulted, and 
this singular detail pushed my buttons.  
With all those Issues in the way, you might think I didn't like the 
movie, but actually, I did.  Though it wasn't great, it was good enough 
to keep me interested in what was going on; and the sense of sincerity 
that came across from the actors--especially Dennis Quaid and Jim 
Caviezel--made it convincing, even if it's a bit far-fetched.  Given the 
nature of the parts they're playing, a father and son caught up in what 
seems like an implausible situation, Quaid and Caviezel go beyond the 
gimmickry  in science fantasy, making the viewer believe that they have 
genuine affection for one another.  It borders on saccharine at times, 
but the movie rarely suffers for the melodrama inherent in such a tale.  
The supporting players, especially Noah Emmerich as the humorous yet 
never buffoonish Gordo, and Shawn Doyle in a particularly slimy but 
pivotal role, did well in their parts; and the younger versions of John 
and Gordo (Daniel Henson and Stephen Joffe) never came off as typical 
bratty movie kids.  The special effects and opening titles were 
well-done, and the attention paid to story-continuity, except with 
regards to one character (noted below), was noteworthy.  And if nothing 
else, FREQUENCY succeeds because it does leave the viewer pondering the 
question at its base: "What if...?"
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Issue #4: One of the best actors you've Never Seen--Andre Braugher as 
Satch DeLeon cum "Frank Pembleton".
Three side issues regarding Braugher, actually: one, his was the only 
character that did not age well.  Given that there were 30 years between 
the time that he knew both Sullivan men, Satch should have looked a lot 
older than he did in his scenes with Caviezel.  Most of the other 
characters aged correctly, but except for a few bags under his eyes and 
a gray hair or two, there was hardly any noticeable change in Satch.  It 
bothered me that I had to be reminded of last week's Rules Of Engagement 
when watching this movie; on both movie sets, whoever dropped the ball 
in Makeup, needed to be whupped.
Two, the bizarre decision to cast Braugher as a cop here; after watching 
him work magic in "The Box" as Detective Pembleton on NBC-TV's HOMICIDE: 
LIFE ON THE STREET, it was extremely disconcerting to see his character 
placed in much the same situation--and even dressed the same way, 
complete with Pembleton-like suspenders.  It was downright rude that, in 
this similar role, he had to address someone else as "Frank"--his 
character's name on the TV show.  And it was a criminal act when one 
interrogation scene with Satch and John bore shades of Frank and the 
execrable Falsone from "Homicide".  It felt like I was having a bad LSD 
flashback--and I've never touched the stuff.
And three, you've "never seen" this actor play to his full potential, 
unless like me you've seen him in "Homicide", or in the Spike Lee Joint, 
GET ON THE BUS. More's the pity--because Braugher's one baaad mutha 
[shut yo' mouth], when he's allowed to cut loose.  Forget the 
conditional "Black"; he's one of the best actors out there, period.  
Here's to Braugher, being Seen.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
FREQUENCY had lots of plot holes, and some things that made my eyes 
roll; and casting Andre Braugher in a very Frank Pembleton-like role, 
was unnecessarily confusing as far as this former "Homicide" viewer is 
concerned.  But it was interesting enough to have my husband and I 
discuss it for almost an hour after we saw it, so I'm giving it a 
qualified greenlight.  Not great, and the science (fiction) is iffy, but 
the special effects were very well done, and the audience was cheering 
and crying in all the right spots.  It's certainly worth a look-see.
FREQUENCY (rating: greenlight): 
But stop me before I say something corny like "received transmission 
loud and clear".

Title
Review for Nurse Betty (2000)
NURSE BETTY (2000)
Rated R; running time 112 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0171580
Official site: http://www.nurse-betty.com/
Written by: John C. Richards, James Flamberg
Directed by: Neil LaBute
Cast: Morgan Freeman, Renee Zellweger, Chris Rock, Greg Kinnear,
Pruitt Taylor Vince, Tia Texada, Crispin Glover, Harriet Sansom Harris,
Aaron Eckhart, Kathleen Wilhoite (Sue Ann), Sheila Kelley (Joyce),
Allison Janney (Lyla), Sung Hi Lee (Jasmine), Laird Mackintosh
(Dr. Lonnie Walsh)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsnurse.html
Have you ever found yourself watching a movie that you know you're
"supposed" to like, but it just fails to grab you like you thought it
would?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Betty Sizemore (Renee Zellweger) is stuck somewhere between Wonderland
and Oz.
A stone soap opera junkie living and breathing the serial "A Reason To
Live", waitress Betty is unable to cope with reality when she sees her
rotten car salesman husband Del (Aaron Eckhart) scalped by wired hitman
Wesley (Chris Rock) and his much more Zen accomplice, Charlie (Morgan
Freeman).  So Betty creates her own reality: her mind convinces her that
she is the ex-fiancee of Dr. David Ravell, a fictional soap opera
character played by George McCord (played by Greg Kinnear).  Betty so
believes she is destined to be with Dr. David - remember, the fictional
soap opera character played by a fictional actor played by a real [I
suppose] actor - that she takes off from Neverneverland, Kansas, to
pursue her dream man, much to the dismay of local yokel Sheriff Ballard
(Pruitt Taylor Vince) and reporter Roy (Crispin Glover), who wonder just
how involved Betty was in Del's death.
And following Betty in hot pursuit are Wesley and Charlie, who want
something Betty may not know she has...
The Upshot:
All the signs were there.  I should've loved this movie.  It's my kind
of flick: weird in a RAISING ARIZONA kinda way, filled with great
acting, and one that avoided the easy out of making the local yokels
look butt-dumb (as witnessed by Charlie's opening conversation with
Del).  With all of that going for it, you might think I'd be tickled
pink after watching NURSE BETTY.  I wasn't.
To be sure, it had its good points.  Through "Betty", I gained a whole
new level of respect for Renee Zellweger.  Rarely has an actor been more
perfectly cast; she had Space Cadet down.  I've loathed Zellweger in
previous movies [THE BACHELOR especially, though I can't blame her
entirely for ME, MYSELF, AND IRENE.  There's more than enough blame to
go around for that one], but she shined brightly as Betty in "Betty".
Equally good was Morgan Freeman, though I always have to contend with
the fact that he reminds me of my mama's preacher, Rev. Isaac [except
for the cussin'.  By Mr. Freeman, not Rev. Isaac.  uh...] when I watch
Freeman on screen.  Still, Freeman is always a joy to watch; he classes
up the joint in most every movie he's in.
The balance of the surrounding, supporting cast also defies my
relatively low-rating of "Betty".  Rarely have I enjoyed most of the
supporters of a main story the way I did in this movie; from Greg
Kinnear's surprisingly light touch with David/George (more of a
sarcastic actor in his previous turns, Kinnear's performance here might
go unfairly unnoticed.  Bammer sez notice it) to Crispin Glover's (for
once) not-over-the-top Roy, to Tia Texada's out-of-the-blue-friend Rosa,
to Harriet Sansom Harris as Ellen the world-weary bartender (hard to
believe she plays Bebe on NBC's FRASIER, eh?), the people living in
Betty's Neighborhood were a fun bunch o' folks.
With all that, why'd I give NURSE BETTY the cautionary flashing
yellowlight?  It's simple, really, having had a little something to do
with the nosebleed my Disbelief got from having to be Suspended for far
too long at far too great a height.  The aforementioned RAISING ARIZONA
was farce at its finest, and though it did stretch the imagination, I
could easily see its situations play themselves out.  But never, not for
one second, did I even *begin* to believe that Charlie, Zen hitman
though he might have been, would go gaga for Betty the way he did.
That, combined with "Betty"'s lack of a strong voice on either side of
the comedy scale - it wasn't broad enough to be good farce, nor dark
enough to be a great black comedy - diminished my enjoyment of the tale.
And once my Disbelief got an altitude migraine, that was all she wrote.
Everything went downhill from there.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I started to not even included the BF here; after all, NURSE BETTY never
directly dealt with it (much to its credit, says I), so...why me, why
here, why now?  Alas, it has more to do with what I read about the movie
before it came out, than the movie itself.
I received a forwarded email message from one of 3BC's readers that
described the characters of Wesley and Charlie as "drug dealers" instead
of the hitmen they clearly portray in this movie.  While on the one
hand, I probably shouldn't trip over such things, and on the other a
thug is a thug is a thug, I got my Dander up over the description.
After all, the Hitman Profession is a time-honored calling in Show
Bidness (witness THE GODFATHER, GOODFELLAS, THE SOPRANOS, et al) - but
nobody loves a drug dealer (NEW JACK CITY), eh?  Well, maybe except for
an older White British female drug dealer (SAVING GRACE).  Hmmm...
Took a while for my Dander to recover from that little faux pas, it did.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Not for nuthin', but the Governor of the Great State Of Michigan -
Republican stalwart John Engler - was in my NURSE BETTY audience
yesterday.  I wonder what Gov. Engler thinks of a comedy in which two
Black guys scalp a White guy, wax philosophic about the honorable nature
of murder, and almost come out as sympathetic characters.
But I should leave him alone: after all, stalwart Republican Governors
deserve a night on the town, too - even if it is to enjoy depictions of
the Hollywood Violence they claim to detest.  Hmmm...
NURSE BETTY (rating: flashing yellowlight):
This flick could've stood a transfusion of Wacky Hilarity, or Dark
Pathos.  The middling ground it seemed content to stand on, was its
ultimate undoing.

Title
Review for Black and White (1999)
BLACK AND WHITE (2000) 
Rated R; running time 100 minutes
Genre: Drama 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0165643 
Official site: http://www.blackandwhitefilm.com/  
Written by: James Toback
Directed by: James Toback
Starring: Power, Raekwon, Bijou Phillips, Brooke Shields, 
Robert Downey Jr., Mike Tyson, Ben Stiller, Allan Houston, 
Claudia Schiffer, William Lee Scott, Gaby Hoffmann, Kidada Jones, 
Eddie Kaye Thomas, James Toback, Elijah Wood, Joe Pantoliano, 
Sticky Fingaz, Method Man, Garry Pastore (Benny Bones), 
Kim Matulova (Kim), Jared Leto (Casey), Scott Caan (Scotty), 
Stacy Edwards (Sheila King), Marla Maples (Muffy) 
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsb&w.html
Not this time: with BLACK AND WHITE having come out so quickly on the 
heels of fellow Ghetto Wednesday Release ROMEO MUST DIE, I decided to 
stage my own mini-protest by not seeing it on opening day last 
Wednesday--holding out until Friday or later--to do what little I could 
toward ending the Ghettoization of American movies.
But by the looks of this mess, maybe I should've extended my protest 
indefinitely.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Of the more clearly defined roles, this is as near as I can call it:
Mike Tyson (as himself) inexplicably hangs around dispensing Wisdom to 
neighborhood Scarface-wannabe Rich Bower (Power) who himself hangs on 
the one hand with rapper Cigar (Raekwon), for whom Rich is trying to get 
a record deal with Arnie Tishman (James Toback, who also wrote and 
directed B&W), who, of course, doesn't take either Cigar or Power 
seriously until they come to see him with a White lawyer-type, to whom 
Arnie laments about thuggish ruggish rappers; and on the other hand, 
with a group of White kids--chief amongst them Charlie (Bijou Phillips), 
Charlie's boyfriend Wren (Elijah Wood), their friend Marty King (Eddie 
Kaye Thomas), and Marty's brother Will (William Lee Scott)--who see 
themselves, and the Black rappers they hang with, as "niggas".  In the 
friendly, familial sense, of course. 
 [End Sarcasm]
But I'm not quite finished: Rich's other pat'na, basketballer Dean 
(Allan Houston), finds himself in a jam at the hands of both his White 
anthropology student girlfriend Greta (Claudia Schiffer) and Mark Clear 
(Ben Stiller), who offered Dean a bribe--and then some.  And on top of 
it all, documentarians Sam Donager (Brooke Shields) and her gay husband 
(yes, you read right) Terry (Robert Downey, Jr.) follow the 
self-proclaimed "niggas" around with a video camera, to try to gain some 
Understanding of just what makes these White kids want to imitate Thug 
Life.
The Upshot:
The tone was set early on in the movie; or at least, it could have been: 
moving from the opening scene of Charlie and her friend Raven (Gaby 
Hoffmann) being "used" (with their consent) by Rich as stone freeks, to 
a more staged-feeling scene with Charlie confronting her white-bread, 
upper-middle-class parents with her "Black" talk, dress, and lifestyle, 
you get the sense that there something Important was about to be 
addressed.  What would Mommy and Daddy do if they knew what their 
daughter was doing in the middle of the park just before she came home?
Had Toback chosen to stick with this part of the story, or even done a 
true documentary on the White kids, B&W would've struck a true chord in 
these times when Black culture - or more precisely, the sub-culture of 
hip-hop - is co-opted more by middle- and upper-class White youth than 
by Blacks (many of whom, like Kidada Jones' character Jesse, are trying 
to get out of the very way of life these White kids strive to emulate).  
Charlie and her cohorts were the most poignant part of the movie, and 
truly exploring their stories might have gone a long way towards really 
getting down to the brass tacks of Black and White life, at least the 
portion of it represented by those on screen.
Instead, Toback chose to take the easy, patronizing way out, by 
trivializing the White kids, ignoring most of the "Black story" except 
to (unintentionally) laughably attempt to paint Rich and his crew as 
mobster-lite thugs, and by inexplicably casting "names" such as Brooke 
Shields, Ben Stiller, and Claudia Schiffer, in roles that were downright 
painful to watch.  Shields was good in THE BACHELOR as a high-society 
type played full-bore; here, she just looks damned goofy in 
pseudo-dreadlocks and nose ring, which works against her attempt to come 
across as an outsider only minimally trying to be accepted.  
Half-stepping on her part just didn't work; her character should've 
either been all the way Down, or woefully short of the mark.  Stiller, 
obviously slumming, was just as wasted; his character's entire subplot 
could've been jettisoned, to no ill-effect, taking Dean and Greta down 
the drain with him.  And every time Schiffer opened her mouth, I wanted 
to slap it shut; her mere presence offended me in a way that's only 
understandable when you hear her character's ridiculous advice to 
Dean--"just be who you are"--not to mention her scene with Stiller.  It 
grinds my gizzards just to think about that tripe again.
There were surprises to be found, however, pleasant and unpleasant.  On 
the down side, I felt sorry for Joe Pantoliano, as District Attorney 
(and Will and Marty's father) Bill King; throughout his excruciating 
scene with Stiller, "Joey Pants" looked like he was looking for the 
quickest exit out of this flick.  On the up side was a triple threat: I 
never thought I'd say this, but Mike Tyson has a future in acting, even 
if it's just acting as himself.  As he did in WONDER BOYS recently, 
Robert Downey Jr. continues to rise above poor material given to him.  
And as hoodie-rat Charlie, Bijou Phillips stole the show; full of the 
gruff and bravado that Power should have been displaying, Phillips' 
Charlie was the one character who remained consistently worth watching 
throughout this movie.
Three decent performances out of a movie of tens of bad ones, though, is 
never A Good Thing.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I'll set my own intolerance of the ignorance behind propping oneself and 
ones friends up as "niggas", aside for a second.  Above and beyond that, 
the true shame of this film is that Toback didn't listen to his own 
words, said through his characters Charlie, Cigar, and Dean: Charlie 
spoke of wanting to be something other than she was, but realized that 
it was probably "just a phase" that she'd grow out of; Cigar complained 
about being treated by the White kids as "animals on display" (as did 
Tyson, of Sam); and Dean, in a reasonable voice just before his 
character went stoopid, told Real Truth about Whites and Blacks 
(paraphrased): "there's no one single type of 'Black' or 'White' person; 
we're all different".  
And I'll go out on a limb here by saying that Toback needs to get a real 
education in Ghetto Life before attempting something like this again.  A 
good schoolin' might lead him to asking the tough questions of his 
mimicking White kiddlet characters, like, "Do you also imitate the 
fellas when they're pressed for Driving/Shopping/Breathing While 
Black?", or "How quickly do you pick yourself up off the ground after 
you're slapped upside the head by the first Black person who doesn't 
take too kindly to your liberal use of the term 'niggas'?".  Inquiring 
minds want to know, Mr. Toback; were you too caught up with the hip-hop 
banter to do more than treat your characters as displays in a zoo?
Maybe it's Just Me, but I'm thinking that those sentiments could be made 
into a good film.  Toback, unfortunately, doesn't seem to be up to the 
task.  John Singleton, anyone?
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
If you just must see Black And White - and I'm sure there will be more 
than a few of you who just must - don't go into it expecting to Learn 
anything, save this: knuckleheads come in all colors.  But you knew that 
already, eh?
BLACK AND WHITE (rating: yellowlight): 
Here's a free clue for writer/director Toback: when you look at the 
world only in terms of Black and White, you often miss the greyshades.  
Or didn't you hear what "Dean" said?

Title
Review for A.I. Artificial Intelligence (2001)
A.I.: ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE (2001)
Rated PG-13; running time 150 minutes
Genre: Science Fantasy
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.aimovie.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0212720
Written by: Steven Spielberg
Directed by: Steven Spielberg
Cast: Haley Joel Osment, Jude Law, Frances O'Connor, Sam Robards,
Jake Thomas, William Hurt, Jack Angel, Robin Williams
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsai.html
You know, going into a given Spielberg flick, that you'll be
manipulated.  But there's manipulation, and then there's Manipulation.
And damnifi don't feel Used.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Once upon a time, there was a boy who found a pet alien and a phon...uh,
no, that's wrong...once upon a time, there was a boy who could hear
weird tones and saw the shape of a mountain in nearly everything around
him...hmmm.
Ok, get this: sometime in the Distant Future (though still supposedly
within the 21st century), the Greenhouse Effect will have melted the
polar ice caps, causing the oceans to rise, climates to become chaotic,
and other global Bad Stuff to happen.  Because of this shift in life on
earth, people have to get a license to become pregnant [hmmm...not a bad
idea...] and robots - the likes of which current technology has no clue
- have become essential.
But Professor Hobby (William Hurt.  My, how the mighty have fallen since
THE BIG CHILL.  But I digress) pushes the envelope; more than just
creating helpers for Man, Hobby feels the need to play God, by creating
a robot who can Love.  And what purer love exists than the love a child
has for his mother?
The (robot) child?  One David (Haley Joel Osment), created for mother
Monica (Frances O'Connor) and father Henry Swinton (Sam Robards), who
are in grief over the coma that their birth son Martin (Jake Thomas) is
in.  David is Special, the first of his kind - and that scares the
Swintons, especially when he and Martin interact.  David, hoping to
become a Real! Live! Boy! so that Mommy will always love him, hooks up
with Gigalo Joe (Jude Law), a robot created for those who want to "get
they freak on" with no muss and fuss.  David and Joe ask The
Wizard...uh, Dr. Know (voice of Robin Williams) to help them find the
Blue Fairy so that David can click his heel three times and wind up in
Kansas, complete with his own Toto in the form of Talking Teddy, The
SuperToy (voice of Jack Angel).
The Upshot:
"Manipulated" is too calm a word.  ohickyfrickinpoo, I've been Slimed.
A.I.: ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE wasted no time pulling out all the
Tearjerker stops.  It was far too obvious, though; not a single tear was
jerked from my eyes.  In fact, my eyes were screaming out for rest
(aided and abetted, no doubt, by the many snorers around me).
The two faces of A.I. - slow and plodding on the one side, and
excruciatingly cutesy and manipulative on the other - arise from the two
directors who've had their hand in this mess: the late Stanley Kubrick,
and the ever-repetitious Steven Spielberg.  And since Kubrick is no
longer with us, the shoulders that must bear the brunt of this pile of
feces, are Spielberg's.  All the Bad Acting, all the ill-thought out
plotting, all the attempts at jerked tears, all the
emphasis-on-special-effects-at-the-cost-of-a-sensible-story, all the
misguided and terribly unsubtle harkings-back to previous Spielberg
Blockbusters, all the snore-inducing hours between the opening credits
and the closing credits - all of these and more, are Spielberg's cross
to bear.
   -Yet Another Distant Future where the only things that are
    significantly  different, are cars?  Hookay.
   -"I see dead peo"...uh..."I wuv you Mommy";
    "I wuv you too, David; that's why I'm Abandoning you."?  GMAFB!
And if I ever see Talking Teddy on screen again, I swear I'll do Damage.
I was >this

The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Not that it matters a whole helluva lot, but I loved my husband's
prediction that the Black Scientist Chick from the first scene, would be
the only Black person in this movie.  Too bad he was proved wrong - by
the Black Comic Relief robot.  The one quickly offed at Flesh Fair.  And
the beat goes on...
Bammer's Bottom Line
Don't be fooled by the hype: A.I. is nothing more than a rambling,
pointless, godawful boring paean to Spielberg's Neverneverland fixation.
Almost makes me wish I'd given in and seen POOTIE TANG instead.  Uh,
almost.
A.I.:  ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE (rating: redlight):
ET, would you take your butt home already?  gotDAM, I'm sicka you.

Title
Review for Our Song (2000)
OUR SONG (2000)
Rated R; running time 95 minutes
Genre: Drama
Official site: http://www.magiclanternpr.com/films/ifc_oursong.html
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0244244
Written by: Jim McKay
Directed by: Jim McKay
Cast: Kerry Washington, Anna Simpson, Melissa Martinez, Marlene Forte,
Raymond Anthony Thomas, Rosalyn Coleman, Carmen Lopez, Tyrone Brown,
Kim Howard, Juan Romero Jr., Lorraine Berry, Natasha Frith
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsoursong.html
Ah, summer movie season.  A time when much of what you see on the Silver
Screen involves big explosions, lots of sound and fury, and action
plotting that insists there be a big tub of popcorn handy.
Sorry hon, this is the theater for OUR SONG; "Big Summer Explosions 4:
Die Hardest" is two screens down, take a right...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
OUR SONG is a simple - but not mindless - story of three young friends
in Crown Heights, Brooklyn, during one hot summer.  Lanisha (Kerry
Washington), Maria (Melissa Martinez), and Joycelyn (Anna Simpson) are
members of the Jackie Robinson Steppers, a marching band that's highly
respected and supported in their neighborhood; and the bandleader, Mr.
Miller (Tyrone Brown) works hard to keep it that way, keeping the
members motivated toward being the best they can be.
Each of the girls' family members support them in varying degrees;
Lanisha's mother Pilar (Marlene Forte) and father Carl (Ray Anthony
Thomas) seem to be right behind Lanisha, whereas Maria and her mother
Rita (Carmen Lopez) and numbnut brother Alex (Reginald Washington) have
some serious Issues, and Joy's mother Dawn (Rosalyn Coleman) seems more
intent on having a Good Time on the streets than in helping her daughter
grow up.  And even the strong bond they have as friends, is threatened
when Joy pulls away from them and gets closer to her Stepper friends Kim
(Lorraine Berry) and Keisha (Natasha Frith).
Big things, like the closing of their school, boyfriend Issues they each
have, and unforeseen events involving their friend Eleanor (Kim Howard)
and her young son Samson (Juan Romero Jr.), affect each of the girls.
But Lanisha, Maria, and Joy have the same goals and aspirations as many
a young person in Anytown, USA - and like those nameless others, it's
the small things in life that can have the biggest impact on them.
The Upshot:
As a movie critic, I try to stay objective about what I'm watching, but
still stay involved enough to give a reasoned opinion.  But as a member
of the human race and of one of its subsets - namely, Black Folk - I
sometimes find my presumptions about What Usually Happens Next, a bit
disturbing.  I started out with any number of expectations,
presumptions, and prejudices, mainly revolving around its Inner-City
setting and subject matter.  If you were to take a look at the notes I
made while watching OUR SONG, you might see things like "I bet a
beat-down is coming next", or "I bet Character X turns out to be a major
drug dealer".  Color me surprised when I got to the end credits, and saw
that many of my presumptions about what makes a Hood Flick, were (ahem)
shot down.
In fact, OUR SONG surprised me at nearly every turn, but quietly so.
The lack of Big! Dramatic! Events! was somewhat unnerving, probably
because I have become conditioned to expect exactly that after hours and
hours of mainstream movies clouding my brain.  Still, it was great to
revisit previous pages in my notebook and write "nope, I was wrong about
that".  I'm happy to note, though, that I wasn't wrong about the way the
remake of "Ooh Child" would continually be used throughout the movie.
It's a good, inspirational song, even as a remake, but they almost wore
it to the ground.
Yet another surprise for me: the natural feel of the main characters,
and the charm and talent of the young actors playing them.  Melissa
Martinez (Maria), Anna Simpson (Joycelyn), and especially Kerry
Washington (Lanisha), had a strong film presence that is all the more
amazing considering that this was the first feature film for each of
them.  They were able to seemingly effortlessly blend humor with drama,
diminishing neither.  Washington, Martinez, and Simpson are definitely
worth looking for in the future; I just hope that Mainstream Hollywood
doesn't lock them into dead-end Welfare Mama/Crackhead "NYPD-Blue"-type
roles - but you'll notice I'm not holding my breath.
In any case, the lasting impact of OUR SONG is that it is an Everyman's
film, about the everyday life of young folks in a particular corner of
the world.  No Gritty plot points, no Patron Saint to come rescue the
poor hoodie rats, no big drama for your mama - and that's the point.
The circumstances might be different, the shading might change, the mood
music might be in a different key - but the groove of OUR SONG, whether
on the streets of New York, in the suburbs of Colorado, or on the street
where *you* live, might just be universal.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I often get get email slamming me when I point out the ways that [SOME]
Black folk do [SOME] things differently from [SOME] White folk [What?
You didn't know?  Shocking, innit?]. Let's run this up the flag pole,
see who salutes.
The Jackie Robinson Steppers marching band is another illustration of
(sub)cultural differences.  I may have missed it in my rush to avoid All
Things Sports, but I live for the day that a funked-up marching band
like the fabulous Steppers, become the rule instead of the exception.
Pardon my lack of Racially-Neutral Words here, but I think a little
non-gladiator color might do American sports audiences some good.  And
no, pre-manufactured Boy Bands don't count.
[Ok, that address is bams@3blackchicks.com; just use the subject line
"HOW *DARE* YOU SAY THAT BLACK FOLK ARE DIFFERENT FROM WHITE FOLK! WE'RE
ALL THE SAME UNDER THE SKIN! KUUMBAYA, MY LORD!!!", so I'll know where
to file it].
Bammer's Bottom Line:
This summer brings an interesting, stark contrast of Life In The Hood
from the cameras of two directors: John Singleton's larger-than-life,
death-waiting-on-every-corner BABY BOY, and Jim McKay's slice-of-life
OUR SONG.  I find it fascinating that the three girls in "Song" could be
my baby cousins - and that I know no one even remotely resembling
Singleton's Boys.
OUR SONG (rating: greenlight):
Do something different this summer: check out a film that reminds you
that the little things in life count as much - if not more - as the Big
Dramatic Stuff.  Yes, even in the Hood.

Title
Review for Reindeer Games (2000)
Reindeer Games (2000) 
Rated R; running time 105 minutes
Genre: Action Adventure 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0184858 
Official site: http://www.dimensionfilms.com/  
Written by: Ehren Kruger
Directed by: John Frankenheimer
Starring:  Ben Affleck, Charlize Theron, Gary Sinise, 
Dennis Farina, James Frain, Clarence Williams III
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsreindeer.html
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below):
In what must have been a good idea to somebody down the line (though 
lord only knows why), Ben Affleck stars as Rudy [Get it?  "Rudy", as in 
"Rudolph"...you know, on the "Reindeer Games" theme?  Yah, that's what I 
said, too.], newly released from prison after doing time for car theft.  
While in prison, Rudy bunked with Nick (James Frain), who was in a 
serious pen-pal relationship with Ashley (Charlize Theron), a woman 
he--and Rudy--obsessed over.  Nick was also due to be released at the 
same time as Rudy, until he was attacked by a con who was after Rudy; 
when Rudy got out, he assumed Nick's identity so he could get with 
Ashley.  But Ashley's brother Gabriel (Gary Sinise) had plans for 
"Nick": he needed Nick to set up a heist of the casino owned by James 
Banks (Dennis Farina)--and Gabriel's not the type to take "no" for an 
answer...
The Upshot:
I know what you're thinking.  "Self," I hear you saying to yourself, 
"just what's got that Chick up in arms about that description, enough 
for her to say 'Reindeer Games is On Drugs'?"  Well, I'll tell ya: the 
way this story is told by writer Ehren Kruger and director John 
Frankenheimer, has got to be the most preposterous load of baloney I've 
ever seen--and it got worse as the movie got longer.  I sat there, 
stunned, unable to believe that they really wanted us to run with this 
one.  I couldn't play along; my Disbelief was Suspended so high, it 
developed a nosebleed.  And what's more: from the stunned looks on the 
faces of most of the actors, especially Ben Affleck and Charlize Theron, 
I find it hard to believe that they believed it, either.  
I'll be kind and blame it on the writer and director, giving the actors 
the benefit of the doubt. After all, it's not Affleck's fault that his 
character seemed so dunderheaded throughout most of the movie [movie 
character rule number one: if given the chance to escape your kidnappers 
and you come back for no obvious reason, you deserve to be chained to 
your bed], resorting to lame humor that fell completely flat during the 
casino scenes.  I bet Affleck is regretting having raised such a stink 
about being billed as the star of "Boiler Room" right about now; Ben, 
old boy, maybe you should just count the money and run. 
Affleck got off easy compared to the rest of the cast.  Sinise, so good 
in even a quick cameo in The Green Mile, is as wasted here as poor 
Dennis Farina is--though at least Sinise actually got to act during his 
screen time.  I have no idea what it was that Farina was doing; alas, 
it's a long way from his heyday in TV's "Crime Story" to this mess.  And 
speaking of TV heydays, Clarence Williams III--"Linc" in "Mod Squad" 
from back in the day--was so exchangeable with The Bad Indian and The 
Bad White Guy sidekicks, I never noticed they had individual names.  
As for Ms. Theron, my heart broke, seeing her so badly miscast (not to 
mention, acting so badly) here after her good performance in "The Cider 
House Rules" last year.  I have no doubt that Sinise, as talented as he 
is, can bounce back from this bad idea; I can only hope the same for 
Theron (Affleck, on the other hand, will probably do just fine.  There's 
something to be said for being Flava Of The Month, and Affleck, Matt 
Damon, and Leo DiCapitated seem to have that market cornered pretty 
well).
It's hard to go into detail about exactly what ticked me off so about 
this flick, without giving away "key" scenes, so I won't--except to say 
that the "twist" at the end goes down in my book as the worst excuse for 
a "reason why it all happened" that I've seen in a long time.  Suffice 
it to say that if you go see it, when you hear yourself mumbling "what 
the hell?" over and over again, you'll know what I mean.  
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I wasn't gonna bother with the BF for this flick--Clarence Williams III 
having such a nothing part in this that it didn't much matter--but on 
second thought, there was one thing that I actually got half a chuckle 
over.  In a blink-and-you'll-miss-it moment, Isaac Hayes (on leave from 
"South Park" perhaps?) shows up as a prisoner grossed out by 
the..."protein" supplement in his jello.  My, Chef, how the mighty have 
fallen...
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Note to Movie Executives: please please a thousand times please, 
institute a No Hallucinogens Allowed policy during your storyboard 
brainstorming meetings with these wacko writers and directors.  Movie 
viewers everywhere will thank you.
"Reindeer Games" (rating: redlight): 
...This is your writer/director On Drugs.  Any questions?

Title
Review for Another Planet (1999)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsanother.html
"A child on the farm sees a plane fly overhead and dreams of a faraway 
place.  A traveler on the plane sees the farmhouse and thinks of home." 
-Carl Burns
Perhaps Mr. Burns had ANOTHER PLANET in mind when he said that.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The synopsis from the official press release says it best:
  "Cassandra Jones [Sandy Daley] is a young woman from Toronto with a
   very active imagination and a unique view of the world. Feeling
   trapped by life in her low-income community, and unable to relate to
   her brother Patrick [Kevin White], a petty criminal, or her overly
   pious mother, Mary [Marcia Brown], Cassandra decides to leave
   Toronto. She applies and is accepted into an exchange program between
   Quebec and West Africa. When she reaches her Quebec destination, a
   pig farm, she encounters Sylvie Leblanc [Monique MacDonald], a woman
   in need of change, her husband Luc Leblanc [Daniel Levesque], a man
   afraid of change, and Abdoulaye Diallo [Tiemoko Simaga], her African
   exchange counterpart and a man who regrets his decision to seek
   change. 
   Because none of her expectations are met, Cassandra quickly becomes 
   unhappy on the farm. Her presence creates plenty of tension, much of
   it humorous. A surprising conclusion comes about after a
   roller-coaster series of events. 
   ANOTHER PLANET explores how we define ourselves be it by our gender,
   race, class or simply by what we eat, how we dress or what we believe
   in.  The film is essentially a journey in self-discovery; a journey
   we all must take at some time in our lives."
The Upshot:
It must be said right off: those of us who are more accustom to watching 
movies, as opposed to films, will likely have a bit of difficulty with 
writer/director Christene Browne's ANOTHER PLANET.  Unpolished and 
somewhat slow-paced at first blush, it takes some patience and an open 
mind to enjoy and understand fully.  If subtitles go right over your 
head, or if you equate success with bonzo-boxoffice, you might be prone 
to shrug off films like this.  If that describes your mindframe, read 
the above synopsis again and consider this: instead of being a 
celebration of self-discovery as told by an independent filmmaker, in 
the hands of a big-budget writer/director, ANOTHER PLANET would probably 
have had Cassandra be a neck-twistin', gum-snappin' hoochie mama out to 
get pi-zaid, Patrick a gang-bangin' b-ballin' playa, mother Mary a 
neglectful crackhead, and Diallo a race-hating pimp.  As I contemplated 
that very nightmare while watching Browne's film, I gained a greater 
appreciation of the vast difference between most independent filmmakers 
and Hollywood's "finest"--and the film came across much easier for that 
realization.
To be sure, "Planet" takes some getting used to, from both the story 
aspect as well as the "physical" film quality itself.  Cassandra's 
africentric storyline, though familiar to me with my own strong 
africentric leanings, was still quite different as it was flavored with 
her West Indies upbringing--which I, as a native Detroiter, could only 
imagine second-hand.  The spiritual character of Moko Jumbie, central to 
the outcome of the story, was something I struggled to understand (and 
in the end, failed to fully grasp, even with the help of the writer 
herself).  And as anyone from Detroit who goes across the river to 
Windsor could tell you, understanding French Canadian language can be a 
challenge in and of itself.   
It was worth the challenge, though; through Browne's interpretation of 
her own personal experiences, many familiar faces break through the 
somewhat unfamiliar surface.  The characters may have had a different 
accent, but I could see many old friends and kin in Cassandra, and Mary, 
and even in Sylvie and Luc.  And never before have I seen the face of 
God in the person of a "Majestic Black Woman" (played by Pancheta S. 
Barnett)--but, why not?  Seeing God really listening to prayers, was a 
moment unlike any other I've seen on film before; try that in a 
mainstream flick, and watch the sparks fly...
The performers, for the most part, do well.  Sandy Daley plays Cassandra 
with a light touch of humor, and without the go-girlness that is so 
prevalent in U.S. movie productions starring Black women; though she 
could use more acting experience, anyone that could hold a squealing 
piglet and not turn up her nose at the ordeal, is okay by me.  As 
Patrick, Kevin White left a little something to be desired; of all the 
main characters, his performance just didn't work for me.  On the other 
end of the acting spectrum, however, Marcia Brown's Mary conveyed the 
bible-thumping while lotto-playing paradox with a sense of humor 
reminiscent of the late Helen Martin in movies like DON'T BE A 
MENACE(etc) and HOLLYWOOD SHUFFLE.  
Daniel Levesque, as Luc, and Monique MacDonald as his wife Sylvie, were 
more difficult to grasp early on, though as the film progressed, the 
Sylvie character became more defined, primarily through her interactions 
with Cassandra.  The battle-of-the-sexes, with Cassandra and Sylvie on 
the one side, and Luc and African exchange student Diallo on the other, 
was a subplot that wasn't as well developed as it could've been (and 
paled in comparison to some of the more stringent "Mars vs Venus" 
battles we've seen in mainstream flicks.  Not that that's A Bad 
Thing...); but Tiemoko Simaga (who spoke mostly French throughout) was 
good as the somewhat chauvinistic Malian who opened Cassandra's eyes to 
something she already had within her grasp.   In a refreshing change 
from American movie norms, Mathieu Dutan plays Jean "Johnny" Leblanc 
with all of the humor and none of the brattiness of his American 
contemporaries.  And almost a character itself, Donald Quan's background 
instrumental music added an unexpected richness to this film.
Believed to be the first Black woman to write, direct and produce a 
feature film in Canada, Browne's background makes for an interesting 
story itself; in the tradition of independent filmmakers the world over, 
she struggled to raise money to make and distribute her film, which is 
based on her time in an exchange program working on a pig farm in 
Quebec.  I hope she goes on to do another film based on her time working 
in Mali; it would be one of only a few "part two" stories that I'd look 
forward to seeing.
If you're looking for a Hollywood-type offering, look elsewhere.  Then 
remember how bloody awful Hollywood's offerings have been thus far this 
year, and reconsider ANOTHER PLANET.  I found myself glad for the 
exposure to a world outside of what usually passes before my eyes on the 
Silver Screen, and I look forward to seeing more from Browne's pen and 
camera.  
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
What, you thought that there'd be no BF for ANOTHER PLANET just because 
it's a Black film?  Tsk...whaddya think "We Are Not A Monolith" means, 
eh?
Americans have a tendency to be strongly Americentric; we generally act 
like the world revolves around us, and that our viewpoint is the de 
facto standard.  Unfortunately, this tendency doesn't escape Black 
Americans, though (in a Monolithic way) you'd think We'd be more 
sensitive to such things.  Past the entry-level "shock" that often comes 
with dealing with a more personal film (as opposed to a megaconglomerate 
studio-backed blockbuster movie), many Americans might view the LeBlancs 
as not very much like any White folks they ever met, by gum!  Similarly, 
many Blacks might see scenes such as Cassandra braiding Sylvie's hair, 
for example, and grumble something or other about how We Can't Keep 
Anything For Ourselves, Doggonit. 
Of course, this is shortsighted thinking; just another reason that we 
(and We) should be exposed to more multicultural experiences.  Not that 
we should beat ourselves up overmuch for our Americentricity; we've been 
hoodwinked (ObMalcolmXTheMovie: been bamboozled! run amuck! led astray!) 
by propagandistic politicians and media outlets for so long about our 
Rightful Place In The Sun, that it takes a lot for us to realize that 
there are other cultures out there with experiences and worldviews that 
are every bit as legitimate as ours, even when they diverge sharply from 
our own.  Even when members of those cultures look so much like us.  
And, of course, Us.
Substitute "I" and "me" for "we" and "us" in the above, and you get the 
general gist of my own experience watching ANOTHER PLANET for the first 
time.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
Though cultural differences may leave you wondering exactly how one plot 
point leads to another in this film, there is no doubt that 
writer/director Browne's personal experiences and quest for 
self-discovery, as told in Cassandra's story, have a universality that 
is easy to identify with.  Monolith or no, I most def Felt her desire to 
explore and defend her "Africanness", all the way down to my nappy roots.
ANOTHER PLANET (rating: greenlight): 
No, ANOTHER PLANET doesn't have the Spit 'N Polish shine that a 
big-budget flick has--but considering the way mainstream Hollywood has 
been spitting on its audiences lately, maybe that's A Good Thing.
[ANOTHER PLANET is scheduled to be released in art film-outlets this 
summer; stay tuned to 3BC for an upcoming interview with Bams and 
filmmaker Christene Browne.]

Title
Review for Keeping the Faith (2000)
KEEPING THE FAITH (2000) 
Rated PG-13; running time 129 minutes 
Genre: Romantic Comedy 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0171433 
Official site: http://studio.go.com/movies/keepingthefaith/
Written by: Stuart Blumberg  
Directed by: Edward Norton
Starring: Edward Norton, Ben Stiller, Jenna Elfman, Eli Wallach, 
Anne Bancroft, Ron Rifkin, Brian George, Ken Leung
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamskeepfaith.html
It's amazing where the day will take you.  Facing two movie 
doubleheaders this weekend, I was all set to be blown away by WHERE THE 
MONEY IS and bored spitless by KEEPING THE FAITH.  Would "oh ye of 
little faith" be too lame to say here?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Brian (Edward Norton), Jake (Ben Stiller), and Anna (Jenna Elfman) were 
inseparable friends as kids; Anna moved to California with her family, 
leaving Brian and Jake behind in New York.  Brian grew up to be a 
priest, Jake became a rabbi, and both were determined to "kick the dust 
off faith", bringing it into the 21st century, by staying in touch with 
their community.  This is made somewhat difficult by the resistance of 
the elder rabbis (Eli Wallach, Ron Rifkin) who want to maintain 
long-standing tradition.  Jake's life is further complicated by the 
matchmaking service is mother (Anne Bancroft) wants to perform for 
him--against his will.
Now all grown up and kinda sparkly, Anna reenters their lives when her 
business ("she's analyzing synergies, or synergizing analogies...") 
brings her back to New York.  And suddenly, the "cloth" that both men 
wear, fits a little too snugly for comfort.
The Upshot:
I have to be careful not to gush here, lest I go into every single, 
specific detail of what I liked about this movie.  And there are many 
things, not the least of which is the fact that though there's nothing 
particularly "new" in this movie--boy and boy meet girl; boy and boy 
fall for girl; girl move away; girl come back; boy and boy vie for her 
attention--the *way* it was told, and the sincerity with which it came 
across, was very refreshing.  And as jaded as I've been lately due to 
this pretty dreadful movie season, that's saying a lot.
When wearing his director's hat, Edward Norton brings a fresh view to 
the screen that's been missing for quite some time now.  Maybe in 
knowing that he was directing, I paid more attention than I normally 
would; but for a first-time feature film director (I think), he did an 
amazing job of getting good camera shots, without going overboard as far 
too many pretentious artistes do these days.  I especially liked his 
shots in and around the bar (uh, no pun intended); for some reason, they 
stood out as being different from anything that I've seen in a 
mainstream film recently.  Perhaps it's because even though the barroom 
banter was funny, it wasn't forced humor--and even further, because it 
felt intimate in a way, instead of in-your-face.  We've all heard the 
cliches about bartender-as-confessor; Norton somehow avoided the cliche 
and achieved a genuine sense of that reality, without making the humor 
maudlin.  Scenes like this exist throughout the movie; you get the 
feeling that there's a real and important story being told, rather than 
a mass of images moving swiftly to a conclusion.
But as enjoyable as Director Norton's work was to me, Actor Norton's 
performance as Father Brian Finn was even more fun to watch.  Whether 
with Jenna Elfman (with whom he had this incredible chemistry; Anna and 
Brian's relationship was much more convincing than was hers with Jake), 
Ben Stiller, or especially the great rapport he had with the "minor" 
supporting characters like the Bartender (Brian George) and Karioke Tong 
(Ken Leung), Norton's skill as an actor made me easily forget that this 
was the same man who played a skinhead in AMERICAN HISTORY X and an 
airhead in FIGHT CLUB.  It is a compliment to his abilities that the 
"priest on fire" scene that I've seen in the "Faith" trailer multiple 
times, was no less funny when I saw it in context of the movie; in fact, 
I think I laughed even harder than I did when I first saw it.  Norton is 
truly an underrated actor; and since the Academy is notoriously 
short-sighted when it comes to recognizing comedies at the podium, 
chances are that he'll remain unrewarded for his work here, too.
As I alluded to above, Elfman's best work was with Norton; leaving no 
traces of her flower child Dharma character (from the DHARMA AND GREG TV 
series), she impressed me most when she was dealing with Brian's "crisis 
of faith".  But to my pleasant surprise, I enjoyed Stiller's performance 
almost as much as I did Norton's, especially in their interactions 
together.  Ben Stiller is generally an acquired taste, one which I 
haven't picked up to date.  But in "Faith", he seemed less concerned 
about being "raw and edgy" than he has been in past performances (like 
his roles in MYSTERY MEN and BLACK AND WHITE, for instance).  Here, 
Stiller seems to sense the importance of his rabbi character's sincerity 
about his "flock", coming across, and it shows in his performance.  This 
is not to say that the good rabbi was all serious; as with Norton's 
trailer scenes, the previews with Stiller and "Workout Chick" (Lisa 
Eldestein) held up, if less so.   What really made me sit up and take 
notice, though, is that Stiller didn't allow his comedy bits to 
overshadow the overall character and Jake's struggles with being a 
needful human on the one hand, and feeling obligated to serve his 
congregation in the way he thought they needed him most, on the other.  
More than at any other time I've watched Stiller, I Felt his 
character--and liked him.
Just as I said to myself, "there's nothing about this movie I don't 
like!" near the end of the flick, it started to slow down to almost a 
crawl.  I was appreciative of that break, though; if I had been 
completely in love with this movie, I think I would've questioned my own 
sanity.  The flaws in it made me appreciate it all the more, from the 
efforts of the main cast, to the importance of the "minor" characters 
(that Bartender had me in absolute stitches, as did Tong), to the 
curiousness I've developed about Judaism, since I didn't understand a 
great deal what was going on with that aspect of the story.  If I may 
allow myself a single cliche--even at its worst, it was better than most.
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Actually, let's dish on "The Church Factor" today.  
As the daughter of a fiery Baptist mother, I connected to this flick on 
so many levels, especially when the rabbi and the priest attempted to 
get their respective members to participate more in the services.  The 
most obvious connection came when Jake brought the Black choir in to the 
synagogue, to liven up the services.  I was immediately taken back to 
the time when I was the drummer for a campus choir, and we stepped out 
of our ordinary performance rotation of Black Baptist and Pentacostal 
churches, by going to a White Presbyterian church, at their request.  
The experience was definitely memorable.  Though the scene was played 
for laughs on-screen, I have a feeling Jake's bunch had as good a time 
as we all did.  The church scenes also reminded me of the time when my 
holy-ghost-shoutin'/already-been-baptized mother went to a service at 
the Catholic church she would sometimes allow me to go to; remind me to 
tell you about it one day, but needless to say, St. Cecilia's was never 
quite the same after mama was in tha' house...
But beyond those connections, I related easily to Jake and Brian's 
message itself, that of trying to reach their members on a personal 
level: not through the recanting of years and years of traditional 
rites, but by appealing to their sense of community.  I'm probably 
telling on myself when I say that I've missed that aspect of my life 
most in my transition from being a member of a tight-knit community when 
I was growing up, to the supposedly sophisticated semi-suburban dweller 
that I am today.  Characters in a movie though they may be, I could dig 
being a member of either of the God Squad's congregations.
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
Hallelujah!  Finally, an unadulterated, unequivocally good movie in the 
year 2000.  Easily the best comedy so far this year, and a strong 
contender for best movie of this third of the year, period.
KEEPING THE FAITH (rating: greenlight): 
I'd say "Bless me, Father, for I have laughed", but I hate cliches.

Title
Review for For Love of the Game (1999)
"For Love Of The Game" (1999) 
Rated PG-13; running time of 120 minutes
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Title?0126916 
Official site: http://www.universalpictures.com/forloveofthegame/ 
Written by: Dana Stevens, based on the novel by Michael Shaara 
Directed by: Sam Raimi
Starring: Kevin Costner, Kelly Preston, John C. Reilly, Jena Malone, 
Bill E. Rogers, Greer Barnes
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 1999
There's something about Kevin Costner and uniforms--especially of the
baseball variety. He wowed us (at least this part of "us") in "Bull
Durham", and came back for more in "Field Of Dreams"; and now, he gives us
"For Love Of The Game". The question remains: did he knock this one outta
da park, or was it a swingandamiss?
The Story (WARNING: some spoilers contained below)
Ever since he was a wee lad, Billy Chapel lived for the game of baseball;
after spending his whole professional career as a Pitcher for the Detroit
Tigers [native-Detroiter-Bammer will rant about this later,] in the last
game of what a teammate describes as "the end of a shitty season", he
reaches down deep and lives in "the zone", potentially pitching a perfect
game. He finds himself at a crossroads when the love of his life threatens
to leave him. The question is, who is that love: his girlfriend Jane
Aubrey, or Baseball itself?
The Upshot
I have no Deep Abiding Love for baseball. Truth to tell, it bores me
silly, as do most sports. And let me go 'head and get my promised rant out
of the way: for a movie that proclaims the Glory of being a Tiger,
whythell was Detroit so totally shunned in this flick? Bad enough that
e-v-e-r-y friggin game they played was an Away game; they couldn't do
Detroit the honour of mentioning its name more than once or twice, even
just in passing? It was very noticeable to the crowd that watched with me
(I was surprised there were so many there for this sneak preview), and my
husband ranted about it when I got home, even though he didn't watch with
me. This aspect of the movie dulled the authenticity of it all for me; had
Chapel been made a Yankee instead of a Tiger, I could've dug it, but there
was no real Tiger Pride as far as I could see.
Now that that's out of the way, I'll surprise you a wee bit: I liked this
flick. And strangely, I don't quite know why. To be sure, it seemed to do
everything it could to insure that I wouldn't like it, from the
Detroit-less Tigers, to being a baseball movie to begin with--and
especially because of Kelly Preston.
Kelly Preston. Man, that chick was hard to deal with. At once seeming way
too young for Chapel, and very outclassed in the acting department by even
Costner (who doesn't deserve all the flack he gets. Some, but not all); in
the end, she grew on me, maybe becase Chapel turned out to be such a prick
[y'all shoulda seen the typo I made on the first draft of this review!
But, as is my way, I digress.] My major Issue with her was that she
looked, and acted, more like a Valley Girl than a Noo Yawka. She seemed
too flighty at first, and her character began as unsympathetic for me (we
see Jane stand-up Billy just before his Big Game, as she tells him she's
going to London because "you don't really need me"; "Get over yourself!",
I mumbled quietly to the screen), but as the movie progresses, she seems
to "grow up" in fits and starts, though some of the crap she takes from
Billy throughout had me wanting to shake her and wake her dumbbutt up. In
the end, though there could've been better choices of actresses for her
role, she acquits herself adequately enough.
And Costner, The Man Hissef; what of him? I'll put it like this: he wears
his uniforms well. And that's no backhanded compliment; though he looked
too old for the part, I could Believe him as a ballplayer. The shots of
him (and his double) on the diamond were beautifully done by the
cinematographer (it's hard to describe, unfortunately; you'll have to see
it for yourself to know what I mean), especially the "clear the mechanism"
scenes. And even when the pseudo-Philospher that's apparently inherant in
all baseball players, came to the fore, I didn't run Yelling And Screaming
from the theater. Costner's Billy Chapel seemed Real to me, and though
overall, "Bull Durham" was a much better flick for him (Costner's "How do
you like to be kissed?" line couldn't touch his Bull Durham characters' "I
believe in..." speech to Susan Sarandon, on a good day), Kevin should be
able to loose the ghosts of "The Postman" past with this one; until his
next Big Flop, at least.
As for the story itself, I am again surprised that I wound up being
interested in it. There was very little actual conflict, and what there
was, seemed contrived. The baseball game itself was just a set-up for the
flashbacks which told the story--or was it? Hmmm...even if it were,
though, the "conflict" in the game itself was light; and yet, still
effective. I loved the character of Gus ("the ugliest Wife in the league";
played by Reilly), and I found myself rooting for Billy's every pitch,
straining to hear his "conversations" with the stadium crowd, his "worthy
opponents" on the other team, and most of all, with himself--despite my
lack of enthusiasm for baseball. And at the end of the game (I won't give
it away, but needless to say, there were no real plot twists), I cheered
right along with the rest of the crowd--on screen, and off. The
simultaneous love story was rather bizarre, too; there was nothing there
at all to grab onto from either the characters' standpoint or for Joe
Viewer, until the appearance of one of Jane's family members (Heather, who
I found quite charming, in spite of my reservations about that kind of
character being added to Save The Day; perhaps because Heather was played
nicely by Malone). And oddly enough, that whole plot took on a different
Feel from there; it became softer, sweeter; it became interesting. It
threatened to lose my interest when Preston's lack of acting skills got in
the way again, but the whole timbre of the movie changed with that one
scene. I blushed at their "will you still love me when..." telephone
conversation--having remembered one very much like it after I fell in love
with my now-husband. Recognition of Self, when watching a movie, generally
being A Good Thing...
"For Love Of The Game" was no "The Natural", but at least it was no
"WaterWorld" either. If you need a Feel-Good movie right about now [I did:
just before I went to see it, my wallet was stolen], you could do much
worse. And coming from me, that's about as good a compliment that a film
not on the same level as, for instance, "The Matrix", can get.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]
As a Black woman, I see the "Black Factor"--things that affect me as a
"consumer of color"--in many aspects of life; movies included. Whether
from the standpoint of noting Black (and other "minority") cast and crew
members (if any), to the (lack of) focus toward "people of color" (dag, I
hate that term), to the out-and-out antagonistic attitude toward Us
(Jar-Jar, anyone?), the "Black Factor" (BF) is something that plays as
much a role in my film enjoyment as any other aspect of the movie itself.
As has been noted Elsewhere about the lack of Blacks in new TV series this
Fall season (there's an article in the 7/30/99 issue of "Entertainment
Weekly" that I highly recommend, titled "White Wash"), it's much easier
depicting an integrated workplace than it is to show folks of different
races hangin' out after hours--but what if that workplace was the sports
arena, as it is in this flick? I'd postulate that in those cases, there'd
be the usual hand-wringing by The Powers That Be over How To Handle The
Race Issue: "Well," I hear The Powers thinking; "should we show the team
lineup as a reflection of what we actually see in real-life sports, or
should we add a White [or Black, as the case may be] guy in the mix?
Should we trip all over ourselves to include a Black [White] Friend? Oh
how do we get The Black Dollar in to see this one?!?"
Fortunately, that postulation in this case, would be wrong. That mindset,
and the slippery slope it begets, didn't seem to be at the forefront in
this movie, for the most part. The Black players clearly had a
Relationship with Billy, but so did the rest of the team (those that were
featured, as well as the team in toto). Billy respected Davis Birche
(Rogers) a former teammate of his that happened to be Black (whose wife
Keisha--played by Sheila Lussier--also had an effect on Jane), and though
the little time they spent on their personal relationship felt a little
clumsy, it wasn't focused on long enough to make the problematic part of
modern entertainment--showing White and Black folks together in
non-workplace settings--become an Issue. And I still have the feeling that
if it were (this being a movie drama, not a TV sitcom), it would've been
done well. At any point, there was no big deal made of the fact that
either Davis, or Mickey Hart (Barnes), a current teammate who he gave some
sound advice to, in the role of OldSchooler, were Black. And that, in this
instance, was A Good Thing.
Bammer's Bottom Line 
My problems with the flick notwithstanding (Kelly Preston at times; the
DAMNED ANNOYING Fox TV announcers--I think all sports announcers should be
fined for stoopidity when they keep yammering on; likewise, the DAMNED
ANNOYING "instant replays"--not only did they not look real, they were
simply unneeded, having added nothing to the story), there was something
about this film that Reached me. I didn't mind being less $6 for the sneak
preview that I saw. That may not sound like much of a movie
recommendation, so look at it this way: I wouldn't mind seeing it again,
even if only as a second-run flick; "Chill Factor", and its ilk, I
wouldn't see again if you paid me. Can ya diggit?
"For Love Of The Game": Though I have no love for the game of baseball,
this flick stands out for me if only because it was the first new one I've
seen in awhile that didn't plain Suck. Maybe my standards are too low
lately because of that, but what the heck; unless you're an certified
Costner-hater (or if the thought of seeing even fictionalized baseball
gives you gas), go check it out.

Title
Review for State and Main (2000)
STATE AND MAIN (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 106 minutes
Genre: Comedy
Official site: http://www.stateandmain.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0120202
Written by: David Mamet
Directed by: David Mamet
Cast: William H. Macy, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Rebecca Pidgeon,
Alec Baldwin, Sarah Jessica Parker, David Paymer, Julia Stiles,
Jim Frangione, Clark Gregg, Charles Durning, Patti LuPone
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsstate.html
Remember what I said last year [man, has it been that long already?]
about that horrid waste of actors and celluloid, SUPERNOVA?  Well, raise
that notion to the nth degree, and you'll know the Pain I felt in
watching the disaster called STATE AND MAIN.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
The cast and crew of the late 19-century period piece, "The Old Mill",
look for a new location in which to film their flick; it seems like the
antics of its horny star, Bob Barrenger (Alec Baldwin), led to the
production leaving its first location set in New Hampshire, in a bit of
a hurry.  This causes big problems for the movie's put-upon director,
Walt Price (William H. Macy), who has to clean up behind Bob again when
Bob casts his eyes upon Carla (Julia Stiles), a local teenager who lives
in the movie's new location - Waterford, Vermont.
But Bob's big and little heads are just the tip of Walt's problems; he
also has to contend with a cantankerous producer, Marty Rossen (David
Paymer); the town's Mayor (Charles Durning) and his wife (Patti LuPone);
Bob's leading lady Claire Wellesley (Sarah Jessica Parker), who chickens
out of a key scene after she overhears Walt's assistant, Tommy (Jim
Frangione); and Joseph Turner White (Philip Seymour Hoffman), a somewhat
naive writer who falls for local playwright Annie Black (Rebecca
Pidgeon), much to the chagrin of Annie's politician fiance and movie
hater, Doug Mackenzie (Clark Gregg).
[This is supposed to be the part where I say "And, Wackiness Ensues" -
but there's this Truth In Advertising thingy...]
The Upshot:
January, movie-wise, is starting to look like That Time Of The Month for
Hollywood.  That's the only explanation I can think of why films like
last January's "Stupornova" and this year's STATE AND MAIN, would abuse
such talented casts as they both did, with the wretchedness that spilled
forth from their reels.
The wretchedness of STATE AND MAIN upsets me mightily [couldn't tell,
could ya?  I Mask so well.], because I've been dying to see this cast in
what *should* have been a Witty Comedy.  Instead, I got to witness a
train wreck, saved only by a charming, unknown (to me, anyway) actress
by the name of Rebecca Pidgeon (Annie), a few great lines (especially
the final, mumbled bit by Alec Baldwin), and a fairly decent end scene:
alas, all a day late and a dollar short.  Hell, way before the halfway
mark, I was looking for a blunt instrument to throw at the screen...
The most painful waste of all for me was that William H. Macy - the
actor I'd most love to thank for his brilliance to date - got
suckered...uh, convinced...to participate in this film.  But I reckon I
shouldn't be too harsh.  "State" didn't earn my complete wrath, as
witnessed by my not giving it a full redlight, because, taken
individually, the performances weren't really all that bad.  Macy, who
seemingly got the lion's share of the movie's lines, worked hard at his
craft; were he an unknown, auditioning for a one-man play, I'd certainly
cast him on the strength of his performance here.  Similarly, David
Paymer (strangely cast against type as an in-your-face producer), and
Philip Seymour Hoffman - two actors I also look forward to watching -
bit deep into their juicy roles.
Thankfully, Alec Baldwin and Sarah Jessica Parker were reduced to
second-string parts (ironic, since the movie-within-a-movie had them
playing the stars of the show they were filming), and Charles Durning
(Mayor Bailey) wasn't called on to play the Wacky Backwoods Politician
again (c.f. O BROTHER, WHERE ART THOU? for the latest in a long line of
his irritating Wacky Backwoods Politician roles).  And, except for a few
hokey bits, writer/director David Mamet pretty much laid off the Wise
Local Yokels routine; I guess this was A Good Thing, though not hearing
much of a Vermont dialect in the locals' speech, left something to be
desired.
No, the individual parts were fairly harmless; it's when they were made
into a whole, that STATE AND MAIN became unbearable to watch.  It seemed
full of aborted plotlines [uh, did somebody forget about Uberto and the
window?], devoid of anything remotely Funny [did I laugh once? I can't
remember], and wrapped itself up with one of the most ludicrous payoffs
I've ever seen in a movie (ironic, again, because the final scene was
the best part of the flick for me.  Probably because I was so anxious
for it to end).  And nothing was more egregious than that godawful
background music.  I swear, I could feel the bile rise in my gullet
everytime I heard that ugly melody start up.  No, I take that back.  It
never had a chance to "start up": it seemed to drone on endlessly
throughout the movie, driving me mad with every note.
Ooh, I said I wouldn't be Harsh, didn't I?  My bad.  Uh...did I mention
that I liked Rebecca Pidgeon?
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Was STATE AND MAIN supposed to be a cautionary tale about the
soullessness of show business folk? or the importance of being Pure and
True? or a statement about second chances?  Sorry, I was too busy
praying for an end to the Pain to notice.  Or care.  Mr. Macy, I Weep
for you.  You deserve much, much better.
STATE AND MAIN (rating: flashing redlight):
STATE AND MAIN served as a tedious reminder of why I don't really give a
rats ass about the Lifestyles Of The Sick And Shameless (Hollywood
edition).

Title
Review for Gojira ni-sen mireniamu (1999)
GODZILLA 2000 (aka "Gojira ni-sen mireniamu"; 1999)
Rated PG; running time 108 minutes
Genre: Science-Fantasy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0188640
Official site: http://www.sony.com/godzilla2000/ (U.S. version)
Written by: Hiroshi Kashiwabara, Wataru Mimura
Directed by: Takao Okawara
Cast: Tsutomu Kitagawa, Takehiro Murata, Hiroshi Abe, Naomi Nishida,
Mayu Suzuki, Shiro Sano
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsgodzilla2k.html
Don't get me wrong - I love me some straight-up comedy, and thus, looked
forward to seeing THE ORIGINAL KINGS OF COMEDY this weekend - but
there's nothing that takes me back to The Day like The Big Lizard.  Man,
I remember all those campy GODZILLA flicks as a kid, watching them on
"Bill Kennedy's Sunday Movie" on channel 50 in Detroit just before my
sisters and I had to go to Sunday School.  It was a good memory, damn
near besmirched by Hollywood's special effects (and lack of soul) in its
lame Matthew Broderick-starring remake a couple years back.  When I
heard that Japan's Toho Studios had done their own GODZILLA update last
year, I couldn't wait to see the Real, True Lizard in all his
badly-dubbed glory.  My only question was, would he hold up to a G2K
treatment?
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Worrying about the plot of a GODZILLA movie is like trying to understand
the dialogue in a porno flick, but if you insist...
In an obvious continuation of previous Japanese GODZILLA movies, the
Godzilla Prediction Mobile team of Yuji Shinoda (Takehiro Murata) and
his young daughter Io (Mayu Suzuki), along with Roving Reporter Yuki
Ichinose (Naomi Nishida), want to study the city-stompin' - but
otherwise cute (in an ugly sort of way) - giant lizard known as Godzilla
(Tsutomu Kitagawa, under that rubber suit).  But not the Evil Folk of
the Crisis Control Intelligence agency [CCI, eh?  Hmmm...].  Where the
GPM wants to study Godzilla to learn ways to harness his power for Good,
the CCI agents - director Mitsuo Katagiri (Hiroshi Abe) and his
sidekick, Shiro Mayazaki (Shiro Sano) - take the American Approach: if
you don't understand it, destroy it.
The twist in this, the 23rd movie in the GODZILLA series, comes from a
mysterious big rock the CCI finds underwater and investigates as a
"possible alternate fuel source".  When they try to bring the big rock
up to the surface, they find it may not be what it appears to be at
first glance.  And since Godzilla can wreak only so much local havoc,
and he needs an ObAlien to fight against these days...well, you get the
idea.
The Upshot:
The point above - about GODZILLA 2000 being a continuation of previous
flicks - is an important one because it starts out, seemingly, where
those previous versions left off.  The existence of Godzilla Prediction
Mobile Unit is supposed to make perfect sense to the audience, because
we are given only a minimal background on it.  Or any of the characters,
for that matter - including Godzilla, who just shows up at the beginning
of the movie, tearin' stuff up, which the movie's citizens take in
stride, as if it happened all the time.
Indeed, I didn't get what was going on in the movie until about the
halfway point; up to then, GODZILLA 2000 was just a bunch of disjointed
scenes that I figured would gel into an understandable story, sooner or
later.  Not that this was a problem for me; part of the fun of watching
a GODZILLA flick, after all, is laughing at the dubbing, the cheesy
music and special effects, the campy overacting, and most of all, the
patented Godzilla screech and fireball.
All of which the audience got, in spades.  Well, mostly.  Almost all of
those classic elements were firmly in place, and even updated with a
'90s sensibility.  The music and special effects were still cheesy
(check out the underwater scenes), and the acting just as stoically
intense, even when saying lines like "Hey, did you see that flying rock
go by?", or staging a Three Stooges-like slapstick scene (that only
nominally worked).  One noticeable "improvement" that didn't work for
me, however, was the special effects fireball.  This new version, in a
word, sucked.  It looked as if Godzilla's mouth was unnaturally set on
fire every time it happened, and I longed for Godzilla's old firerings.
An update that did work well, though, was the use of current computers
by some the character; I got a kick out of seeing Apple iMacs and G3s in
the background, though I have to wonder about Compaqs being used as
Serious Scientific Equipment [she said, waiting for the ObComplaints
from Compaq lovers].  The whole product placement issue - there were
advertiser stickers seemingly everywhere - had me wondering whether this
was standard fare in Japanese movies these days.  And whether U.S.
studios are looking to follow this trend.
Fun, too, was the dubbed dialogue, and the patchwork editing.  I don't
know what was better: watching the GPM team driving at first far behind,
then parallel to Godzilla, a la Twister, only to pull up miles in front
of him, driving toward him, in the very next jumpcut - or hearing a
English dub of a Japanese character telling someone, "Bite me!".
If this were any other movie, I'd spend time Obsessing about how
Godzilla magically tears only so much stuff up, then stops for the
night, as if a referee blew a Time Out whistle (or for that matter, what
Godzilla does in between movies).  But asking for logic in a GODZILLA
movie is like wondering whether world wide rasslin' is real.  You have
to either accept what you see as part of the thrill of the show, or
totally wash your hands of it.
Its minor flaws aside, the goofy GODZILLA 2000 is a fun, mindless way to
spend an hour or two in the theater; you have to hang up your Disbelief
Issues at the door, but other than that, it's an easy ride.  But I think
Yuji got it wrong: I think what he meant to say is, "there's a little
bit of all of *us* in Godzilla"...
Bammer's Bottom Line:
All the Camp, none of the Matthew Broderick.  Thank you, Toho Studios,
for taking me back down Memory Lane.
GODZILLA 2000 (rating: greenlight):
You Haven't Lived until you hear and see a Japanese film in which the
line "kwit yer bitchin'" is dubbed.

Title
Review for Final Destination (2000)
Final Destination (2000) 
Rated R; running time 93 minutes
Genre: Thriller* (see asteriked footnote below) 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0195714 
Official site: http://www.deathiscoming.com/  
Written by: Glen Morgan (based on a story by Jeffrey Reddick)
Directed by: James Wong
Starring: Devon Sawa, Ali Larter, Chad E. Donella, Kerr Smith,  
Seann William Scott,  Kristen Cloke, Amanda Detmer, Roger Guenveur 
Smith, Daniel Roebuck, Tony Todd
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsfinaldest.html
[asteriked footnote]-> *(By only the longest stretch of the imagination).
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
It's the Laughfest Of The Year!  
Alex Browning (Devon Sawa) boards a plane bound for Paris with his high 
school classmates and French teachers, amongst them Tod (Chad E. 
Donella), his best friend; Carter (Kerr Smith), who doesn't like Alex; 
Terry (Amanda Detmer), Carter's girlfriend; Billy (Seann William Scott), 
the Comic Relief; Clear Rivers (Ali Larter), a girl who doesn't know 
him--yet; and teacher Valerie Lewton (Kristen Cloke).  But Alex has a 
vision that the plane will explode, and after he freaks out about his 
vision, the seven of them leave the plane--minutes before it actually 
explodes, exactly as he pictured it would.
His act of saving their lives, of course, fails to endear him to anyone 
but Clear Rivers ["Clear Rivers", get it?  Fun-nee!].  His premonition 
spooks most of the others out (except Carter, who is downright hostile 
to him).  But that's the least of his worries: he also has to deal with 
FBI agents Weine (Daniel Roebuck) and Trey (Roger Guenveur Smith) [ooh, 
these play-on-words names just keep getting better and better!]--and 
with the spooky Mortician (Tony Todd) named Bludworth [stop it, you're 
splitting my sides!] who warns Alex that Death isn't finished with them.  
His message to Alex?  "I'll see you soon."
Surely, this flick was a stroke of comedic parodying genius.  How else 
would one explain the many Signs And Guideposts foretelling the action 
ahead?  From the ominous "this is the end" line writ in red during the 
opening credits, to the first scenes of the mother tearing Alex's "lucky 
tag" from his suitcase against his wishes, to the "Ghost"-like Murky 
Death Images spattered throughout, to...well, damn near everything else 
in between, the audience quickly (and repeatedly) learns that someone is 
about to Die, wooo!  
And not just Die!, nosiree, that'd be too boring!  Our heros and 
heroetts are offed in the spectacular fashion befitting such a satiric 
look at Really Bad Horror Flicks like...oh, say, "Candyman" [parts 1 
through 12. So far. But I digress].  Death is one creative mutha here: 
mad as the dickens that Alex robbed it ("it", because Death isn't ever 
seen here; just its Instruments) of its rightful task, Death manifests 
itself via water, electricity, towels, fire, flying objects...heck, 
Death has itself one helluva party!  And not to be outdone, the teens 
sure could pull a fast one on Death!  Who knew that duct tape could be 
used as a Grim Reaper-stopper?
Yes, this had to be a riff on the horror genre.  Had to be; the actors 
were too solemn, too serious about the dumbest of situations, the most 
idiotic of lines, for it to really have been a straight-up thriller.  
Surely, FBI Agents wouldn't really be so laughably inept?  Surely, 
morticians wouldn't really Appear From Nowhere and start cutting up a 
corpse in front of trespassing teens?  Surely, next-in-line victims 
wouldn't really all but have bullseye signs drawn on them and stand 
right on the "I got your death right here, punk!" mark drawn in the 
ground?  Nah!  Director James Wong and writer Glen Morgan are comic 
geniuses, I tell ya!  Bravo!  Take a bow!  Right on this mark over 
here...  
You'll laugh!  You'll...laugh some more!  And when it's over, you'll ask 
yourself, "what the hell was THAT?"
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Tony "Candyman" Todd's appearance as Bludworth the Mortician reminded me 
of Eric Todd-Dullum's  guest star turns on TV's "Homicide: Life On The 
Street" in that campy acting/pianissimo voice way they both had.  Though 
he has a fairly long credits listing on the Internet Movie Database, 
I've never seen Todd in anything else but "Candyman" (and I'm not sure 
I'd really want to).  Still, it was kind of a kick to see him in a 
non-maniac role for once, goofy though it may have been.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
You know that phrase "so bad it's good"?  It's got "Final Destination" 
written all over it.  But I'm not complaining; I needed a good laugh 
right about now. 
"Final Destination": 
(rating: greenlight): Early pick for Comedy Of The Year!
(rating: yellowlight): What, it's really supposed to be a thriller, not 
a comedy?  Whoops...

Title
Review for Training Day (2001)
TRAINING DAY (2001)
Rated R; running time 122 minutes
Genre: drama/action
Seen at: Lowes Star Southfield (Detroit, Michigan)
Official site: http://trainingday.warnerbros.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0139654
Written by: David Ayer
Directed by: Antoine Fuqua
Cast: Denzel Washington, Ethan Hawke, Scott Glenn, Eva Mendes,
Snoop Dogg, Dr. Dre, Harris Yulin, Raymond J. Barry, Cliff Curtis,
Emilio Rivera, Tom Berenger, Charlotte Ayanna, Macy Gray
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamstrainingday.html
Pardon my tangent, but I like watching Stanley Kubrick's FULL METAL
JACKET a lot, especially the home video version.  Through the magic of
video, I can watch, transfixed, as actors R. Lee Ermey and Vincent
D'Onofrio (along with the rest of the gang) teach a masters-level film
seminar as a Marine Corps Drill Instructor and his Instructee gone
terribly wrong.  And, as the emphasis moves from Boot Camp to Vietnam,
home video also allows me to turn the TV off and move on to Something
Else - since, for me, most everything past FMJ's Boot Camp just doesn't
compare to that brilliant first act.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
LAPD cop Jake Hoyt (Ethan Hawke) is excited about his new gig, as an
undercover narcotics officer; still naive, Hoyt believes he can Make A
Difference in the War On [Some] Drugs, and he's eager to prove himself
to his new boss.  Said boss - one Alonzo Harris (Denzel Washington),
wants Hoyt to prove himself, alright; but not in the way Hoyt thinks.
Hoyt quickly discovers that Harris is, at best, a rogue cop playing by
his own rules, seemingly only answering to his code of street conduct.
And at worse, Harris is a completely corrupt cop, taking advantage of
the power his badge and shield affords him.  Not to mention the dirty
money he comes by.  Hoyt has to decide, and decide quickly, just how far
into the dirt he'll let Harris drag him.
The Upshot (WARNING: **more spoilers contained below**):
Sure, there were other actors populating this movie - Scott Glenn,
Harris Yulin, Tom Berenger, Emilio Rivera, and Cliff Curtis, just to
name a few (Snoop Dogg counts too, I reckon; my jury's still out on
including Macy Grey and Dr. Dre in the "actor" category) .  But make no
mistake: this picture belonged to Denzel Washington and Ethan Hawke.
For better or for worse.
For me, it's the second half to two-thirds of this picture, that make up
the "for worse".  Like  FULL METAL JACKET before it, the "training" bits
of TRAINING DAY were a riveting portrait of Denzel Washington at his
over-the-top thug life finest; even when he was obviously trying too
hard to be Down [did someone buy Denzel a copy of 'GhettoSpeak 101'?],
Washington's wolfish narcotics cop was fascinating to watch - and cringe
at - in all his raw power.  Ethan Hawke as rookie undercover cop Jake
Hoyt, in training mode, complimented Washington nicely; even as Alonzo
Harris became progressively nastier, and Hoyt settled into wary pupil
status, the lessons on surviving in this big bad world, were great to
watch.  The first few pages of my notepad were riddled with reactions to
Professa' Alonzo's whip as it connected with Student Jake's tender butt.
Everything changed suddenly, when class was apparently dismissed, and
Harris' earth-bound motivations became clear; once Alonzo was revealed
to be indeed smaller-than-life, the thrill was gone for me as a viewer.
The longer this film went on, the less I liked it, and the more the
sheer mass of my suspended disbelief weighed me down.  Scene after scene
after endless boggling scene had me silently screaming over how
incredibly doofus Hoyt had to be to let himself be caught up in Harris'
madness to such an extent.
If I disliked the corrupt Alonzo, I could not stand his idiot rookie
trainee; and adding more of the corrupt cops to the mix, did nothing to
improve my mood.  I knew I was Through when the repeated cacophony of
"my nigga" failed to invoke the gag response in me.  By the time the
overwrought, ObCrimeDoesn'tPay anticlimactic mishmash of BONNIE AND
CLYDE and the "tollbooth" scene from THE GODFATHER went down, I was
anxious to Exit, Stage Right.
Don't get me wrong: my gripe isn't so much with the actors (though
Washington's bad mix of Scarface and Nino Brown, got on my last nerve),
as it is with the story itself.  Even if every frame was an accurate
representation of Life On The Mean Streets (and believe me, my eyes
rolled so much, the on-screen 'bangers used them for dice), I simply
failed to believe, or care anymore.  Whup my ass and call me Silly, but
I don't think that's the reaction Antoine Fuqua & Company were going for.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
As with SERENDIPITY, it looks like I'm swimming upstream again; while
most reviewers are apparently giving TRAINING DAY their seal of
approval, I can't manage much more than a indifferent yellowlight rating
for Washington and Hawke's efforts.  And like I said before, Say La Vee.
TRAINING DAY (rating: yellowlight):
As a Rilly Bad Guy, Denzel Washington is still a wet-behind-the-ears
rookie.  But he does look good behind those ears.

Title
Review for Naomi's Web (2000) (V)
NAOMI'S WEB (2000) 
Unrated; running time 88 minutes
Genre: Thriller
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0243441 
Official site: http://www.newquestfilms.com/
Written by: Don Abernathy, Keana Jackson
Directed by: Don Abernathy
Starring: La Tamra Smith, Keana Jackson, Don Wood, George Tovar, 
Audrey Morgan, Diane Travis, Michael Raines,
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsnaomisweb.html
It's fairly easy to review a big-budget, studio released movie, 
especially when it's bad, and even more especially when it's 
irredeemably so.  After all, the kabillion dollars that's blown on Rilly 
Bad Flicks, just begs folks like me to come along and rip the movies' 
Powers That Be, a new one.  Such is not the case when I review an 
independent film for 3BC's "Spotlight On..." section.  If I think it's 
bad, I have the obligation to myself and my readers, to say so; but in 
doing so [she said, at risk of overestimating her value as a critic] I 
worry about alienating struggling indie artists, and that I might be 
contributing to the dearth of independent voices in the world of film - 
the very thing "Spotlight" was created to help remedy.  In many ways, 
it's a no-win situation for me, but I always try to go with my gut 
feeling.  And my gut doesn't feel too good right about now...
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
In this unnecessarily convoluted tale, Army therapist Elaine Marshall 
(La Tamra Smith) is assigned to go to the Troyville military 
installation that serves as a prison for teen psychopaths, to do a 
profile of Naomi Richardson (Keana Jackson).  Naomi, accused of 
bludgeoning her father, mother, and prison roommate, is none too anxious 
to cooperate with Elaine.  It's par for Elaine's course, as she is also 
being sexually harassed by her superior officer, Colonel Brian Baxter 
(Don Wood) and not taken seriously by prison doctor Sanders (George 
Tovar) or the Warden (Audrey Morgan). 
Though she starts out thinking of Naomi as an "animal" and a "freak 
show", Elaine's job is to get Naomi to trust her enough so Elaine can 
get at the root of Naomi's Issues with the world at large.  But what 
will Elaine find when she gets there? 
The Upshot:
My sympathies for independent filmmakers aside, it was difficult for me 
to keep the sarcasm level to a minimum in writing the above movie 
synopsis.  If you knew the sheer number of punctuation marks and 
incredulous reactions I left out ("'...military installation that serves 
as a prison for teen psychopaths'???  Whathell?!?"), you'd understand; 
doubly so if you read the spiel on the tape's cover, which incorrectly 
calls Elaine a "Navy psychologist" (unless I read my uniforms wrong, 
she's clearly Army; and the Colonel is wearing an Airborne patch), and 
provided me an ironic chuckle ("As the body count mysteriously rises, 
genders bend without reason".  Oh yeah, "without reason" sums a great 
deal of this movie up nicely).
The story as presented made little logical sense, most likely because it 
tried to do too much in too little time, with actors only too eager to 
play it too broad.  Filled with plotholes wide enough to drive a 
semi-truck through, I found myself laughing hysterically in all the 
wrong places--which brought FINAL DESTINATION, itself a comedy 
masquerading as a thriller, immediately to mind.  Unfortunately for this 
film, it suffers even from *that* comparison.  My enjoyment of "Naomi" 
didn't reach the level of my guilty-pleasure fondness for "Destination", 
save for one aspect: Keana Jackson could act circles around any of the 
"Destination" teens.  Indeed, Jackson's actions kept this film from 
being a total disaster.  
A natural in a sea of overactors, Jackson rarely brought me out of the 
moment when watching her.  Even when presented with the most far-fetched 
of plot points (suffice it to say, I spent a lot of time screaming "Give 
me a break!" and "No way would that happen!" at the screen), I could 
almost take her Naomi at face value without too many questions.  If Ms. 
Jackson decided to tackle mainstream Hollywood (or for that fact, 
continue on in indies), she could do extremely well; she has the stuff 
to be a major star, given the opportunity.
Would that I could say the same for the rest of the cast, or for the 
situations written for them.  If I were cleaning house on this movie, 
I'd lop off the Colonel, along with the entire notion of a military 
installation that serves as a prison for teen psychopaths, first and 
foremost; it's beyond me why that disaster-waiting-to-happen was even 
included in the movie.  Besides, with that subplot gone, Wood's 
reminiscent-of-porno acting (hmmm...) would go right along with it.  And 
since I'm in a house-cleaning mood, I'd also excise all instances of 
Smith's "go girl" strident cadence, all too evident in her earlier 
scenes; it did not suit her character well, and was a major distraction 
every time she took that voice out of her bag.  "Go Girl" Elaine worked 
my last nerve, whereas the more professional--and paradoxically, 
softer--Elaine complimented the Naomi character quite well.  As for the 
silent [but unfortunately, not unheard-from] prison guard (Michael 
Raines), the wish-she-had-remained silent Warden (Audrey Morgan), and 
the why-the-heck-was-she-kept silent Judge (Diane Travis), the less 
said, the better.
To be fair, "Naomi" got better as it progressed; or to be more precise, 
Smith's acting and Elaine and Naomi's storyline, gradually worked 
better, albeit in fits and starts.  Resembling a soap opera moreso than 
a thriller, by the time "Naomi" came to its climax, I couldn't be mad at 
it for much (except the irritating repetition of the line "Oh what a 
tangled web we weave".  I got it, ok?), especially since I had almost as 
good a time laughing at it as I wish I could've had being thrilled by 
it.  
In the end, I found myself wishing for what could have been: a 
powerfully dramatic thriller told from a unique point of view.  My 
advice to co-writers Don Abernathy and Keana Jackson?  Take away the 
flotsam (why complicate matters by throwing in the military?  What was 
*that* about?), the jetsam (most of the supporting cast; Jackson and a 
neck-twistless Smith could easily have held the story together on their 
own), add more meat to the main story, and NAOMI'S WEB could really take 
off.  At base, it does have a story worth exploring, even in short-story 
form; it's just covered up with too much nonsense as-is.
But hey, I'm not picky: I could've dug it just as well as an intentional 
comedy.  It was already halfway there.     
Bammer's Bottom Line:
You have to give Abernathy points for the sincere effort, and most def 
give Jackson praise for rising above the material--even though as 
co-writer, parts of that material were her own doing.  Taken in the same 
vein of its cousin-in-zealousness - the equally (and unintentionally) 
humorous FINAL DESTINATION - "Naomi" would be best viewed as a parody of 
the genre.  I can get with it as a soap; but it just does not cut it 
(uh, no pun intended) as a serious thriller.
NAOMI'S WEB (rating: yellowlight): 
More time devoted to the plot that needed it, less time to the subplots 
that didn't, and perhaps this web would not be so unnecessarily tangled.

Title
Review for Me, Myself & Irene (2000)
ME, MYSELF & IRENE (2000)
Rated R; running time 118 minutes
Genre: Comedy
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0183505
Official site: http://www.memyselfandirene.com/
Written by: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly, Mike Cerrone
Directed by: Bobby Farrelly, Peter Farrelly
Cast: Jim Carrey, Renee Zellweger, Chris Cooper, Robert Forster,
Richard Jenkins, Mongo Brownlee, Anthony Anderson, Jerod Mixon,
Danny Green, Michael Bowman, Traylor Howard, Rob Moran, Lin Shaye
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsirene.html
The Diva, in her ME, MYSELF & IRENE review, was far too kind.  This
movie wasn't just bad; it was Ugly.  *Butt Ugly*.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Charlie (Jim Carrey), a mild-mannered Rhode Island motorcycle cop,
stands by while the world walks over him, especially his two-timing wife
Layla (Traylor Howard), who cheats on him with Chante Jackson (Tony
Cox), the Black chauffeur at his wedding.  Even when his "triplet" kids,
Jamaal (Anthony Anderson), Lee Harvey (Mongo Brownlee), and Chante Jr
(Jerod Mixon) come out looking remarkably more like Chante than him,
Charlie just grins and bears it--until Layla leaves him and Charlie
eventually snaps into two personalities: his mild, sexually-repressed
self, and "Hank", the angry, sexually-hungry, (and no longer) suppressed
side of him that Charlie "buried" inside when Layla ditched him.
Something-or-other about a dirt-dumb subplot involving Irene (Renee
Zellweger), the target of Charlie and Hank's affection, and bad cop Lt.
Gerke (Chris Cooper) and embezzlement at a golf course, ensues,
and...sorry, I can't be arsed to describe anything else about this inane
movie.  I'd really like to forget it ever happened, actually.
The Upshot:
Going into this flick, I of course knew it was a Farrelly Brothers
production--and what that exactly meant.  Shakespeare, it ain't; I can
dig that.  And though I avoided THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY like the
plague, I understood well in advance that the gross factor would be high
in "Irene".  "Gross", I could deal with.  "Jackass Stupid" and
"Unreasonably Meanspirited", however, pisses me off to no end.
"Irene" has no redeeming factors, or at least, those that might bring it
up from the sewer it occupies, are so damn subtle and underplayed that I
spent more time getting irritated by the grating music, the illogical
plotline [whoever came up with the Bad Turf Manager idea, needs their
butt whupped.  Now.], the foolishly empty characters, the bad acting,
Zellweger's nails-on-a-blackboard voice, and the crappy "special
effects" [that cow looked like a reject from the JAWS mechanical animals
pile] than in noticing any semblance of good within its l-o-n-g reels of
film [two bloody hours?  WHAT WERE THEY THINKING?  Oops.  Forgot.]  The
sound of silence--in the theater, and from the screen in between moments
of Slapstick Hijinx--was deafening.  And remember, this was supposedly a
comedy.  Oops.
The only tolerable thing about this whole movie--Jim Carrey's amazingly
agile body and the way he can contort it--was tempered by the knowledge
that he's Been There/Done That before; the child's play has played out,
bub.   All the Clint Eastwood voice-channelling in the world can't make
up for the fact that Carrey has quickly become a one-trick pony,
recycling the same characterization over and over, ad nauseum.  I kept
thinking to myself, "He gets paid $20 mil for this?  Where do I sign up
for Clown Lessons???".  Even the Rhode Island scenery was marred by the
thuddingly foolish decision by the directors to have Charlie covered by
bugs when he motored through the countryside on his Harley Electra Glide
Police Special.  Having just recently taken a cross-country trip on the
back *and* front of an Electra Glide, I'd complain about the fact that
That Just Wouldn't Happen, but since the balance of this film wouldn't,
either, what's the point?
Wasted potential grinds my gizzards.  Recycled waste served up as a
fresh dish, causes me to paint Yellow lights, Red.  I want that two
hours of my life, refunded to me, dammit.
The "Black Factor"  [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
In this day and age of so-called Political Correctness (about as stoopid
a term as "colorblindness"), one must be careful not to get ones hackles
raised when the group with which one closely affiliates--be it Blacks,
women, paraplegics, Catholics, World War II vets, soccer moms, what have
you--is targeted in a flick like "Irene".  The thin-skinned amongst us
might be read'ta take up arms, crosses, bazookas, what have you, to
protest Those Bad People Who Made Fun Of Us.
Me, I don't consider myself all that thin-skinned.  So when much fun was
made of Chante and the chip on his shoulder for being Black, a
chauffeur, and a dwarf, I barely batted an eye [but, take note, Farrelly
bros: Chante is a *girl's* name, ka peach?]  When that ho Layla tongued
(ewww) Chante right in front of Charlie, I almost lost my lunch, but my
temper was intact.  Even the "one-drop rule" joke made of Charlie's
"triplet" (uh huh) sons, elicited not much more than a roll of my big
brown eyes.
But when the brothers Farrelly implied that the only thing Charlie's
smart, Black sons got out of watching Richard Pryor, was the ability to
toss around cuss words like lettuce in a salad...well, them's fightin'
words, buster.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
The question is begged: is Jim Carrey a grossly overpaid but
Misunderstood Clown with a Lucille Ball-like gift for physical humor
(and little else)--or does he just have an unholy fixation with his ass?

Title
Review for Gladiator (2000)
GLADIATOR (2000) 
Rated R; running time 150 minutes 
Genre: Action 
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0172495 
Official site: http://www.gladiator-thefilm.com/  
Written by: David H. Franzoni, John Logan, William Nicholson
Directed by: Ridley Scott 
Starring: Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Richard Harris, 
Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed, Djimon Hounsou, Derek Jacobi, 
Spencer Treat Clark, Tomas Arana (Quintus)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsgladiator.html
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Corrupt politicians.  High-profile athletes.  Bloodthirsty fans.  No, 
it's not business as usual in modern-day America...  
It's 180 A.D; Maximus (Russell Crowe), fearless and beloved General in 
the Roman Empire, has had a hard two years and 234 days and one morning, 
and just wants to go home to his wife and son.  But Emperor Marcus 
Aurelius (Richard Harris) has something else in mind for the General: 
declaring Maximus "the son I wish I'd had", Marcus wants Maximus to 
insure that Rome returns to public rule by taking interim control of the 
Empire until the Roman Senate can get it together enough to take over.  
This does not sit well with Marcus' actual son (and next-in-line for the 
Emperorship), the pampered Commodus (Joaquin Phoenix); feeling cheated 
out of his rightful place in life, he conspires against Marcus and 
Maximus, as well as his sister Lucilla (Connie Nielsen) and her son 
Lucius (Spencer Treat Clark), and Senator Gracchus (Derek Jacobi) to 
become the next Emperor of Rome.  Commodus [am I The Only One who can't 
help thinking of a toilet bowl when seeing that name in print?] does Bad 
Things that eventually lead to Maximus being made a gladiator-slave in 
the servitude of Proximo (Oliver Reed), who teaches Maximus and fellow 
gladiator-slave Juba (Djimon Hounsou) the rule-of-thumb of becoming a 
successful--that is, living--gladiator: "win the people, and you'll win 
your freedom".
The Upshot:
Hmmm...that shorthand synopsis sounds a bit soap-operaish, and in fact, 
elements of the story do bring in mind something along the lines of All 
My Decadent First-Century Children.  And a soap isn't the only thing the 
storyline of GLADIATOR brings to mind; the movie reminded me of any 
number of things, from NFL players in a stadium, to the American 
Congress, to other movies (like, of all things, Kevin Costner's version 
of "Robin Hood", and of course, classics like BEN HUR and SPARTACUS).  
But mostly, GLADIATOR reminded me just how brilliant and chameleon-like 
Russell Crowe is as an actor.
It's breathtaking to watch Crowe so easily losing himself in his roles, 
while totally drawing the viewer in and keeping them believing; just as 
Crowe *was* the downtrodden, overweight, middle-aged protagonist in THE 
INSIDER, he is equally convincing here as Maximus--about as far from 
Jeffrey Wigand as he could be.  Yet, both characters have something in 
common: their sense of family and the need to make things right.  And 
whether it's from under a business suit or a suit of armor, Crowe 
portrays those strong character traits skillfully.
That said, the movie suffers most whenever Crowe is not involved in a 
scene.  To be sure, most of the supporting cast is capable, if not 
strong--Richard Harris in his brief turn as the Emperor, Oliver Reed in 
a meatier role as Proximus, and Derek Jacobi's Gracchus, being standouts 
among them--but the movie seems to crawl along most noticeably in 
Crowe's absence, and when the action stops.  That, and the difficult 
time I had believing that Commodus would last a day as Emperor [could he 
be more whiny?] or that Lucilla would suddenly become powerless and 
demure in the presence of her rather limp brother, threatened to wreak 
havoc with my suspension of disbelief...until Crowe showed up on the 
screen again, and everything was Made Right once more.
And speaking of "action", director Ridley Scott pulled out all the stops 
to bring it to the audience, in full, bloody gore.  The special effects 
are seamless and spectacular; never getting in the way of the story, it 
wasn't until the closing credits rolled that I remembered that so many 
of the background images were computer-generated.  Effects alone doesn't 
pay the bills, though; and the interplay between Crowe and Nielsen, and 
Crowe and Phoenix, and Crowe and [insert castmember's name here] show 
the earmarks of good directing on Scott's part.
The parallels in GLADIATOR with American politics were humorous--a 
leader would give power back to The People by empowering The Senate?  
bwah!--but those parallels also made it all the more easy to follow the 
plotline.  And before the viewer has a chance to get comfortable with 
the humor, Scott and Crowe come back with a testosterone rush and get 
the adrenaline pumping again.
Now *that's* how you kick-start a Summer movie season!  
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
Spectacular images, remarkable action, powerful scene-chewing by Russell 
Crowe in the lead - on top of a hit-and-miss story presented whenever he 
wasn't on-screen.  Oh well; three outta four ain't bad...
GLADIATOR (rating: greenlight): 
It ain't Spartacus, but it's most def good enough for a repeat 
performance, if only to see Crowe sizzle again.

Title
Review for Swordfish (2001)
SWORDFISH (2001)
Rated R; running time 95 minutes
Genre: Action
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.operationswordfish.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0244244
Written by: Skip Woods
Directed by: Dominic Sena
Cast: John Travolta, Hugh Jackman, Halle Berry, Don Cheadle, Camryn
Grimes,
Vinnie Jones, Sam Shepard
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsswordfish.html
Glory be, Halle was actually *good* in this one.  Maybe she should loose
her breastesses more often; removing that sling seemed to have had a
freeing effect on her acting.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**)
Gabriel Shear (John Travolta) needs a few good men to help him liberate
nine billion dollars from a high-security government computer, to fund a
project which I will not spoil for you [unlike a few of my fellow
reviewers. But that's Another Rant For Another Time].  Enter Stanley
Jobson (Hugh Jackman), a former "hacker" [*cracker*, dammit!] who served
two years in prison for doing Bad Things to a computer that didn't
belong to him, and isn't allowed to see his daughter Holly (Camryn
Grimes) because her drunk shrew of a mother got a court order against
him.
Gabriel sends his assistant, Ginger (Halle Berry), off to recruit Stan
to break into the supercomputer, with promises of helping Stan regain
custody of Holly - not to mention a few million dollars of his own - as
incentive.  But Stan, who could go to prison for simply *touching* a
computer again, must elude the agent who put him away in the first place
- burnt-out cybercrimes supersluth Agent Roberts (Don Cheadle) - and try
to figure out how to survive Gabriel, aka The World's Most Dangerous Spy.
The Upshot:
Oh, I reckon I could kvetch about how SWORDFISH slung around
TechnoBabble like it was going out of style, and how laughingly AOL-ish
Stan's Graphical Hydra was ["You've Got Worms!"], and how Dell is making
beaucoup bux from product placement, and how this movie was chock full
of gratuitous dialogue and shots (and nope, I'm not just playa-hatin' on
Halle's Friends), and ultimately, how derivative SWORDFISH was of any
number of Summer Action Flicks (pick one, *any* one; start with John
Travolta's BROKEN ARROW, mix in DIE HARD, work a little SPEED in
there...you get my drift).
I reckon I could, but I won't - because SWORDFISH was exactly what it
set out to be: a straight-ahead Summer Testosterone Rush wrapped up in
Action Flick clothing.  I can diggit.
I have to admit, too, that Halle Berry really surprised me; she worked
this flick like nobody's business.  Berry and John Travolta left poor
Hugh Jackman in the dust (much in the way Christopher Walken walked all
over doe-eyed Johnny Depp in the similar daddy-struggles-to-save-his-kid
actioner, NICK OF TIME).  None of their characters were all that deep,
though at least they weren't completely predictable, or written wholly
in good/evil tones.  Yes, I gave a bah humbug to Gabriel's Declaration
of exactly who he was, but by that point in the movie, even the blatant
compugeek name-dropping ["Torvalds"? Guffaw!] or the underuse of Don
Cheadle and Vinnie Jones (Marco), didn't phase me anymore.
I do have one true complaint, though: the first 15 or so minutes, set a
"Matrix"-like pace that the next 80 or so minutes lived up to only
sporadically; let's just say that director Dominic Sena blew too much of
his action wad in the trailer (yes, I know; not his fault).  Still,
SWORDFISH was interesting - ok, I'll admit it: fun - even when it was
downright silly.
And the irony of Gabriel's monologue about Bad Movies - especially
considering Travolta's last two contributions to the world of Ugly
Cinema: LUCKY NUMBERS ad BATTLEFIELD EARTH - was completely delicious.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
If you've visited the 3BC "Viewer Voices" webboard lately (and if you
haven't, you should), you'll notice that some of us have been discussing
Halle Berry's decision to bare her breasts, for - as rumor would have it
(a rumor she's since denied) - $500,000 [another irony, considering what
the Stan character was paid to talk to her character's boss.  But I
digress].  Much of the discussion on the VV board centered around a
statement Berry was said to have made as to why she did her first
semi-nude movie scene; a 3BC reader saw an interview in which Berry was
quoted as saying:
   "For the first ten years of my film career, I've always said no
    to nudity. I wouldn't even read a script that called for nudity.
    But a lot has changed in my life...So, I finally feel free to
    explore myself as an artist. Not to say that the minute I got
    that revelation I decided to take my clothes off. But I feel
    free to make choices from an artistic standpoint, and that's a
    very empowered place to be.  But instead of focusing on a role
    you might not approve of, I'd like people to note that this was
    a role written for a white woman, opposite a big star like
    John Travolta.  Doesn't this take us to another level in the
    industry as black women?"
My take on the matter?  First, as long as she's not hurting anyone in
the process, I don't think Halle Berry owes anybody any explanations for
what she chooses to do with her body, on- or off-screen.  Like I said on
"Viewer Voices", if she decides to run around butt naked and pour baby
oil on her knees, that's her business.
But please, Ms. Berry, don't be fooled into thinking that showing your
Perky Tits (tm, alt.tv.homicide) is any Giant Leap For Blackwomankind,
especially as done in the (mostly gratuitous, though still effective)
SWORDFISH scene.  Political Statement, it ain't.  Not that Hugh Jackman
and half the men (and some of the women) in America, mind.  But you go,
girl, and don't sweat about having to Uplift The Race; uplift your
asking salary, even if you have to uplift your breasts to do it.  I
ain't mad atcha.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
Call it derivative, call it an homage, but SWORDFISH made me hungry
[nyuk nyuk] for a little DOG DAY AFTERNOON action.  I wonder if
(ObProductPlacement) Netflix's open this late at night...
SWORDFISH (rating: greenlight):
Wanna bet that Halle's Pups'll get nominated for two MTV Movie Awards?

Title
Review for Supernova (2000)
Supernova (1999--or 2000, depending on who you ask...) 
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamssupernova.html
[Author's note: Before I begin this rant...
The astute follower of my normal 3BC reviews will note something 
different about this "review" right away: I dispensed with the normal 
credits which have always been part of my particular writing style, and 
the remainder of this text will be an all-out rant about that 
abomination masquerading as a movie, and calling itself "Supernova".  
For those who came here expecting a thoughtful, decent review, my 
apologies; I'll do better in the future, given better material to start 
with.  If you need a quick-n-dirty recommendation, I can sum it up in 
three simple words: "This Flick Sucked.", and direct you to read our 
other reviews for this week.  For those masochists for whom that is 
simply not enough, I give you: The Bammer Rant On The Godawful 
Abomination Masquerading As A Movie, Calling Itself "Supernova".
The UnStory (no spoilers, since there was no story.)
Friends, romans, countrymen, lend me your ear: if you have even the most 
miniscule faith in my ability to judge a movie, you will run--not 
walk--run away from any movie review that suggests you go see this most 
dreadful collection of frames of moving images running swiftly together 
which would normally be called "film" but could not by any stretch of 
the imagination be honoured with such a label.
I have seen Bad Movies in my life.  I have seen "Lost In Space".  I have 
seen "A Night At The Roxbury".  I have seen "Caligula".  But nothing - 
y'all don't hear me; I'll say it once again: N O T H I N G - I have seen 
in my 37 years on this third rock from the sun, could possibly compare 
to the hour and a half of torture I endured watching the collection of 
frames of moving images that I won't dare name again, lest I suffer more 
seizures.
If the above does not convince you, consider this: the collection of 
frames of moving images was so ashamed of itself, it did not have 
opening titles or credits at all; if one was so inclined to ride out the 
length of the collection of frames of moving images (and more than half 
of the people in the theater during this showing, were not so inclined), 
one would have to wait until the end to know what the title was.  That 
might not be enough to convince you--after all, it could've just been 
Clever! And! Hip!  It wasn't, but it could've been trying to be, so 
consider this also: the collection of frames of moving images, stopped 
working during the final scene.  None of us in the audience, cared.  
Even when it started working again, none of us cared.  Many of us left, 
well before the break.  And when the torture was finally over and we all 
filed out of the theater with blood in our eyes and hatred in our hearts 
for the normally-decent James Spader, Angela Bassett, and Lou Diamond 
Phillips for the exercise in mental masturbation they performed on the 
screen, theater ushers greeted us at the door with free passes, 
apologizing profusely for the break.  I like to think that they were led 
by a Higher Power to apologize profusely for the excrement that made its 
way to the screen.
Please. Don't. Go. To. This...Thing.  And if you ignore me and do go, 
please let me know, so I can laugh heartily as you writhe in misery.
[End note to those review purists who'll no doubt wish to chastise me 
for wasting your time with this rant: save it.  I warned you at the 
beginning, and you read on anyway?  Your bad.] 
Bammer's Bottom Line: 
This Flick Sucked.  It sucked the lifeforce right out of me; so much so 
that I was unable to stay in the theater to watch "Girl, Interrupted" 
afterwards, as I had planned on doing.  I had to run quickly out of the 
theater house before I stumbled upon the Projectionists Room; I had 
matches, and I knew how to use them.
May it die the quick boxoffice death it so richly deserves.

Title
Review for X-Men (2000)
Rated PG-13; running time 140 minutes
Genre: Action
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0120903
Official site: http://www.x-men-the-movie.com/
Written by:Christopher McQuarrie, Ed Solomon
Directed by: Bryan Singer
Cast: Patrick Stewart, Sir Ian McKellen, Hugh Jackman, Anna Paquin,
Famke Janssen, Halle Berry, James Marsden, Ray Park, Tyler Mane,
Rebecca Romijn-Stamos, Bruce Davison, Shawn Ashmore (Bobby)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsxmen.html
Let me just say right off the bat that the closest I ever got to "X-Men"
comics was [I can't believe I'm confessing this] when I used to read
"Betty And Veronica"; that, and watching my sons play the "X-Men" arcade
game.  I had a passing knowledge of the basic idea of the
Super(anti)Heroes, but not much more than your average Chick.  Suffice
it to say, except for my ongoing Beef that Angela "Born To Be 'Storm'"
Bassett wasn't in it, I went into this flick with a clean slate, not
quite knowing what to expect.
And while I didn't come out with nearly the "wow" feeling that I had
from a similar-in-spirit flick - 1999's THE MATRIX - I can honestly say
that X-MEN was a damned sight better than most of the live-action
remakes of cartoons and comics I've had the sorry "pleasure" to witness
[cf BATMAN AND ROBIN and ROCKY AND BULLWINKLE].  Heck, I can say more
than that: I actually liked X-MEN.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
In the not-too-distant future, genetically-altered mutants will become a
"forward leap" in mankind's evolution.  And, as has been proven in
mankind's past dealings with those seen as Different, that evolution
will be feared - possibly to the point of extinction.
As an orphaned survivor of the Holocaust in Poland, Magneto (Sir Ian
McKellen) has no intention of being vulnerable to the whims of mortal
men again.  Using his powers of literal magnetism, he gathers other
mutants of similar mind - including super-strong Sabretooth (the
aptly-named Tyler Mane); the flexible (of tongue and limb) Toad (Ray
Park); and shapeshifting Mystique (Rebecca Romijn-Stamos) - to gain the
upper hand on normal humans before McCarthy-ite Senator Kelly (Bruce
Davison) and his ilk try to legislate the mutants out of existence.
But Magneto and the Bad Mutants have to contend with the X-Men:
Wolverine (Hugh Jackman), a loner whose whole body is his weapon; Rogue
(Anna Paquin), a sensitive teen whose mere touch can bring death;
Cyclops (James Marsden), whose unshielded eyes have the same effect as
Rogue's touch; Storm (Halle Berry), who can control weather in powerful
ways; Dr. Jean Grey (Famke Janssen), who has the gifts of telepathy and
telemetry; and their leader, super-psychic Professor Charles Xavier
(Patrick Stewart).  Despite their ability to cause mutants permanent
grief, Prof. X still believes in the basic goodness of human beings, and
brings in young and old mutants into his School For The Gifted to teach
them how to Use Their Powers For Good, to best serve humanity.
The Upshot:
The best compliments I can pay to X-MEN are that it did not get
overwhelmed by its (pretty decent) special effects, and that it provided
a good (without being condescending) introduction to a world formerly
known only to fans of the comic books, and to a lesser extent, the video
games.  Not being plugged in to either of those pasttimes, I cannot say
with any authority whether it was a completely valid introduction, but,
as I mentioned earlier, I've seen much, much worse.  I can dig this one.
Effects-wise, I wasn't as impressed as I thought I'd be; once you get
past their basic powers - Sabertooth's Bigness, Cyclops' fire-shooting
eyes, and Wolverine's claws - the thrill is gone.  I had high hopes of
seeing Something Special from Storm, but was let down there, too.  In
fact, the most impressive part of the flick was Cyclops' motorcycle
[yes, I know: spoken as a true gearhead].  Still, Mystique was true to
form [uh, no pun intended], and Toad was someone I'd Like To Get To Know
Better...if you know what I mean [And I Think That You Do].
performances of its cast; wherever the writing and direction went
lacking (and it was, in quite a few places; it wasn't until more than
halfway through the movie, for instance, that X-MEN seemed to recognize
the potential humor in Wolverine's and Cyclops' pissing contest), the
actors came through with better-than-expected, honest depictions of
their comic-book characters.  It would've been all too easy to play it
for camp, or go the "Batman" route with overly-maudlin performances; to
their credit, this mostly-unglittery (with obvious exceptions) cast
played it straight without being stodgy or overblown.
This first in an apparent series (that "ending" was anything but) was
obviously Wolverine and Rogue's story, and actors Jackman and Paquin had
the lion's share of the lines and action.  They did well, as did Stewart
as the hopeful Professor X and McKellen as the very bitter Magneto.
Most of the rest of the players were there in truly supporting roles,
whether limited by their own acting abilities (most notably Berry as
Storm; I'll get to her later) or by the necessity of their character's
limited movements (I felt bad for Tyler Mane; after all, what can a big
Sabretooth do but roar excessively?)  Ray Park, though, Worked It as
Toad; by far my favorite mutant, he turned Being Bad into an art form.
Bru'man most def had an Evil Tigger quality about him.
Having said all that, while I did enjoy the movie, I walked away feeling
somewhat unsatisfied, and with more questions than answers.  Probably
much to the delight of the filmmakers, who've set this up as a
"Batman"-like franchise.  One can only hope X-MEN as a series has more
staying power.  And, hopefully for the follow-up flick, a stronger
ending.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Another disclaimer: it's no secret that I don't hold a lot of stock in
Halle Berry's acting abilities, and that I would've much preferred
Angela Bassett in this role [dammit, she really was Born To Be Storm.
grumble.]  Even with that bias, though, I really did try to give Berry
the benefit of the doubt.  She almost had me on her side; her character
not having a whole lot to do but speak her limited lines with a weirdly
affected accent, I could've lived with her just Standing There, Being
Pretty.
And then she had to ruin my illusions with a Keanu Moment (SMALL SPOILER
AHEAD): "You know what happens when a toad gets hit by lightning?  Same
thing as what happens to everything else."  (END SPOILER)
Hmm...is it too late to suggest Grace Jones for the next flick?
Bammer's Bottom Line:
It ain't rocket science [hmmm...actually, in this case, it might just
be] but X-MEN was a good fun romp for an hour or two; certainly, as a
direct-from-the-comics flick, it ran circles around TEENAGE NINJA MUTANT
TURTLES. Not that that'd be all that big a circle to start with...
I'll be impressed when they add the Computer Geek Mutant.

Title
Review for Miss Congeniality (2000)
MISS CONGENIALITY (2000)
PG-13; running time 110 minutes
Genre: Comedy/Action
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.misscongeniality.net/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0212346
Written by: Katie Ford, Marc Lawrence, Caryn Lucas
Directed by: Donald Petrie
Cast: Sandra Bullock, Benjamin Bratt, Michael Caine, Candice Bergen,
William Shatner, Ernie Hudson, Wendy Raquel Robinson, Heather Burns,
Melissa De Sousa, Diedre Quinn, Asia De Marcos, Steve Monroe (Frank)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamscongeniality.html
After being completely underwhelmed by Sandra "Speed" Bullock in
forgettable flick-lites like SPEED 2, 28 DAYS, and the completely
unentertaining THE NET, I figured MISS CONGENIALITY would be a total
bust.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
>From the time she was a young girl growing up in New Jersey, Gracie Hart
(Sandra Bullock) was what's commonly referred to as a "tomboy".  Young
Gracie felt she had an obligation to protect and serve those who
couldn't do so for themselves.  Naturally, that obligation led her to
become an FBI agent, under no-nonsense supervisor McDonald (Ernie
Hudson), who was wary of Hart's hard-edged, gung-ho tactics.
His wariness was proven out when rough-and-tumble Hart went against his
orders, endangering the lives of fellow FBI agents, including Handsomely
Rugged Eric Matthews (Benjamin Bratt); because of this, McDonald makes
Hart cool her jets at her desk.  But when Matthews gets assigned to run
his own Ops in pursuit of the terrorist known as The Citizen, Matthews
convinces McDonald to let Hart be used as bait when they learn of The
Citizen's next target: the Miss United States Beauty Pageant.
Excuse me, I meant "Scholarship Contest".  Or so says Cathy Morningside
(Candice Bergen), pageant...er, contest sponsor, aging ex-beauty queen,
and co-host, along with the equally aging Stan Fields (William Shatner).
The idea is for Gracie to be planted in the contest as Miss New Jersey,
alongside fellow contestants including Miss Rhode Island (Heather
Burns), Miss California (Wendy Raquel Robinson), Miss New York (Melissa
De Sousa), Miss Texas (Diedre Quinn), and Miss Hawaii (Asia De Marcos).
Only one problem: this Miss New Jersey is a slob.  Enter Victor Melling
(Michael Caine), a pageant consultant with Issues.
The Upshot:
No one was more surprised than I was to hear myself laughing throughout
the movie MISS CONGENIALITY - and at appropriate times, no less!
Sandra Bullock was a delight to watch from start to finish; not since
SPEED has she seemed so Lucille Ball-esque in her mixed of roughneck
charm and physical humor, blended with a natural beauty that shined even
under all the grit.  It was nice to see some of the qualities in her
that made SPEED such fun to watch.
But contrary to the views of some of my fellow critics, Bullock didn't
have to carry this flick alone; she was ably assisted by the almost
always-brilliant Michael Caine as disgruntled diva-maker Victor Melling,
flat out hilarious in yet another good role.  The quick wit sparring
between Bullock and Caine was as good a bit of acting, editing, and
writing as I've seen in any mainstream comedy this year.  Add Candice
Bergen to the mix as an acerbically funny ex-beauty queen, and Benjamin
Bratt as the ObStud, and you have a recipe for a purty darn good flick.
Strangely enough, William Shatner's campy pageant queen, Stan Fields,
did nothing for me; I went in expecting Shatner to chew up scenery in
classic Captain Kirk With-A-Twist mode, but he just fell flat.  In fact,
other than the need for having a separate groomsman and show host,
Shatner's Fields was an unnecessary duplication of efforts; Caine
could've more than ably handled playing the host (though I would've
sorely missed his showing Gracie how to "glide".  Nah, the tradeoff
wouldn't have been worth it at all).
Don't think too much about the obligatory (for FBI involvement)
"mystery" of The Citizen; that part was all smoke and mirrors.  At
heart, it's the interplay between Bullock and Caine, cute teasing from
Bullock and Bratt, and catty, but fun overall, flow between all of
Gracie's fellow pageant entrants, that made this flick surprisingly
good.  I'm no fan of beauty cattlecalls...er, I mean, pageants...but the
chicks of MISS CONGENIALITY - along with their cohort, Michael Caine -
made the fictional Miss United States Scholarship Contest, a winner.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
Diva and I often talk about Spot in our reviews - you know, that one
Black person that you know was included as Diversity Filler, just to
show that Lead Character X Has Black Friends, Too.  The Black pageant
entrants in MISS CONGENIALITY - Miss California (Wendy Raquel Robinson)
and Miss New York (Melissa De Sousa, late of THE BEST MAN) - showed no
signs of Spottage; they looked and acted like they belonged right where
they were.
And speaking of De Sousa, look for a funny spotlight on her late in the
movie.  By that time, I thought all the laughs were over.  I was,
fortunately, wrong again.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
MISS CONGENIALITY brought out the humorous best in Sandra Bullock,
Michael Caine, and believe it or not, Candice Bergman.  I haven't seen
Bullock this slap-my-knee funny since SPEED.  Nope, I take that back:
she was even better in "Miss".  I'm going to see it again when it opens
next week.
MISS CONGENIALITY (rating: greenlight):
Any woman that can toss a man around in evening wear and come up
smiling, is One Kewl Chick in my book!

Title
Review for 15 Minutes (2001)
15 MINUTES (2001)
Rated R; running time 120 minutes
Genre: Crime/Thriller
Seen at: Jack Lokes' Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.15minutesmovie.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0179626
Written by: John Herzfeld
Directed by: John Herzfeld
Cast: Robert De Niro, Edward Burns, Karel Roden, Oleg Taktarov,
Kelsey Grammer, Melina Kanakaredes, Avery Brooks, Vera Farmiga,
John DiResta, Darius McCrary, Charlize Theron, Kim Cattrall
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2001
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bams15minutes.html
Failing to write my reviews immediately after I've seen a movie, is a
blessing and a curse.  I find it best to write soon after I've watched,
because the movie is still In The Moment, if you will; I'm clear, as
precise as I get, and certain about how I feel about said flick.
But there's something about sleeping on it, that allows one to more
carefully examine what seemed Simply Bloody Brilliant the night before,
and go "uh...whathell?"
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Remember in SPLASH, when Darryl Hannah's mermaid character learned how
to speak English by watching television?  15 MINUTES exists in an Evil
Parallel Universe...
Emil Slovak (Karel Roden) and his partner Oleg Ratzgul (Oleg Taktarov)
come to America to seek their fortune.  No, not the one noted in The
American Dream: they want the one for which they served time in the
Europe.  When their ex-partner Milos, living as a plumber in New York,
doesn't come up with the goods, Emil does Bad Stuff to Milos while Oleg,
a man who fancies himself a frustrated director, nonchalantly videotapes
the act.
Somewhere down the road, arson investigator Jordy Warsaw (Edward Burns)
becomes attached to a case involving a fire set up to mask a double
homicide; cue celebrity homicide cop Eddie Flemming (Robert De Niro),
whose high-profile cases have been spotlighted by scummy TV "journalist"
Robert Hawkins (Kelsey Grammer).  Jordy doesn't have a lot of respect
initially for Eddie's showboating - but Eddie comes to the attention of
quick learners Emil and Oleg, who seize the tragic moment that could
bring them fame and fortune.
There's More Stuff, involving Eddie's partner Leon Jackson (Avery
Brooks), a Czech woman named Daphne (Vera Farmiga), Beat Reporter
Nicolette (Melina Kanakaredes), and a Cast Of (seeming) Thousands, but
you get the drift, eh?
The Upshot:
The bad? Too many characters [did we *really* need a Seedy TV "Newsman"
_and_ a TV Reporter Chick cum Love Interest for Eddie?  Uh, couldn't
they have been combined?  And whathell was Kim Cattrall's character
about?], and nonsensical plot devices [one simple change - nixing the
fireman angle in favor of a Rogue Youngbuck Cop, would've kept the
whathell?s to a minimum], top the list.  Edward Burns' constant empty
stare would occupy a list space, too, but I was too busy wondering why
Kelsey Grammer (who I adore in FRASIER) was so busy trying to get us to
forget his TV persona by cussin' up a storm, that I was able to
effectively block Burns' rather silly character and plot, right out of
my view for the first half of the movie.
The good?  Robert De Niro, in both Tender Mode [call me a softie, but I
dug his half of the love story.  And by the way, my pal from TIME SLOT,
Melik, wanted me to note that I failed to grasp the TAXI DRIVER
reference when Eddie was talking to himself in the mirror.  So sue me.],
and during his climatic confrontation with the bad guys.  Though it was
quite a shocker to me that De Niro *wasn't* the heart of this movie,
when he *was* the focus of attention, it was close to impossible to
notice much of anything else around him.  In the world of Stars and
Actors, De Niro is the rare combination that disproves the rule.
The sublime?  The music (more on this below), and especially Karel Roden
as Czech National Emil Slovak and Oleg Taktarov as the Frank Capraesque
Russian, Oleg Ratzgul.  Somebody oughta call the cops, because this duo
completely stole 15 MINUTES out from under everybody, including De Niro.
There wasn't a single scene in which Roden and Slovak participated, that
I wasn't captured by [how's *that* for a double negative?], and in fact,
the pivotal scene that I mentioned earlier with De Niro, was made damn
near perfect by the fierceness of Roden and the eerie playfulness of
Taktarov.
Emil's near-insane temper and Oleg's humorous, blind madness, cut right
to the "15 minutes of fame" issue in a way that all the intended
moralizing by writer/director John Herzfeld about the Robert Hawkinses
of this world, never touched.  That I found myself laughing at Oleg when
my brain told me that what he was doing was no laughing matter, was what
made this movie so scary, and immediate.  In that, it earned its genre
title: thriller.
One more thing: I think I have a crush on Charlize Theron.  I swear, her
eyes go right through me.  Not That There's Anything Wrong With That.
In The Movie House:
I had thought about doing a quickie Black Factor here - ok, here's a
quickie: Avery Brooks is good, and plenty; Darius McCrary was just more
unnecessary flotsam - but decided against it, in favor of praise for the
movie's musical score.
9 out of 10 times, movie music irritates me.  If it's loud enough for me
to notice it, it's usually 1) too daggone loud and 2) not all that good.
But as with FINDING FORRESTER before it, the score in "15" was used
quite effectively, wonderfully accentuating many a scene (the techie
girl in me hurrahed the musical emphasis when De Niro and company went
a'chasing the bad guys), and generally adding quite a bit of spice to
this flick.  Combined once again with Celebration Cinema's awesome
surround sound environment, this score left me awed.
Bammer's Bottom Line:
As my pal Melik said, 15 MINUTES rocked; at times, it was
thought-provoking, and disturbing, and the musical score was brilliantly
executed (this will be a good DVD/surround sound flick to pick up).  On
the neutral-to-negative side of things, Robert De Niro and Edward Burns
were just okay; Kelsey Grammer's Slimy Journalist wasn't slimy *enough*;
and some of the silly things the audience was asked to believe, kept it
on this side of Best Of 2001 territory for me.  But Karel Roden as the
Czech and Oleg Taktarov as the Russian, Made this movie.  Watch it, if
only for them and the score.
15 MINUTES (rating: greenlight):
Another one for the "can't wait till it hits DVD" file.

Title
Review for Men of Honor (2000)
MEN OF HONOR (2000)
Rated R; running time 125 minutes
Genre: Drama
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.foxmovies.com/navydivercs.html
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0203019
Written by: Scott Marshall Smith
Directed by: George Tillman Jr.
Cast: Robert De Niro, Cuba Gooding Jr. Aunjanue Ellis (Jo),
Charlize Theron (Gwen Sunday), David Conrad (Hanks),
Michael Rapaport, Hal Holbrook, Powers Boothe, Holt McCallany,
Joshua Leonard, Glynn Turman, Carl Lumbly, Lonette McKee,
David Keith (Capt. Hartigan)
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamshonor.html
I only regret that I didn't finish this review yesterday as I had
planned to; I wanted this to be a salute to son and my father - both of
whom served their military time in Korea - on Veterans Day.  I'm proud
of them both for having done what they did, and am very happy that they
both came home from their individual tours.  And though my son was an
Army Man, he - and countless Black military men and women - owes a debt
of gratitude to Carl Brashear, the U.S. Navy's first Black Diver.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Sonora, Kentucky in the 1940s saw Mac and Ella Brashear (Carl Lumbly and
Lonette McKee) living off the land as sharecroppers.  As hard a life as
it was for them, they wanted much more for their son; Mac insisted that
his boy stay in school, not stay home and work the land with them.  But
when times got hard, the son had no choice but to quit school and help
his father.  When their son Carl (Cuba Gooding Jr.) grew up, he enlisted
in the Navy, hoping to do the thing he loved best - dive - and make his
father proud of him.  As Carl left home, Mac admonished him out of love
to never come back to Sonora, and to keep his eyes on the prize.  The
memory of his father's words, and his own determination, stayed deep in
Carl's heart.
But the sixties weren't much better for a young Black man in the
minimally desegregated military. Brashear soon realized that while
President Truman ordered the Navy to let Blacks *in*, the Navy didn't
have to *like* it - nor did they have to allow Blacks to do anything
but, in the words of Chief Floyd (Glynn Turman), "be a Navy cook, a
White Officer's valet, or leave the Navy".  Brashear, though, had other
plans.  Chafing against rules that applied unfairly to Blacks,
Brashear's brash actions impressed Captain Pullman (Powers Boothe) of
the U.S.S. Hoist enough that he was allowed to serve as a Search And
Rescue swimmer - though Brashear quickly learned that he still wouldn't
be fully accepted by his fellow seamen, nor by the Navy, for some time
to come.
This point was driven home after he convinced Pullman to transfer him to
Navy Diving School, under the command of Master Chief Billy Sunday
(Robert De Niro), a hard-drinking, tough S.O.B. who Brashear first
learned of during his time on the Hoist.  Sunday, like the rest of the
military, had no love for "uppity" Blacks, and like fellow Diving School
students Rourke (Holt McCallany) and Isert (Joshua Leonard), Sunday and
his commanding officer, the very strange Mister Pappy (Hal Holbrook),
did everything they could to convince Brashear to give up on becoming a
Navy Diver.  But again, Brashear, befriended by fellow student Snowhill
(Michael Rapaport), had other plans...
The Upshot:
Past the story itself, past the history, past the drama of it all, MEN
OF HONOR is a beautifully shot and acted film, showcasing the many
talents of its director, George Tillman Jr., and stars Cuba Gooding Jr.
and Robert De Niro (my lord, can that man act his butt off!).  It stands
up there with the likes of REMEMBER THE TITANS as one of the best films
of the year, if only on the merits of those three alone.
Gooding first caught my eye in his introductory role in John Singleton's
BOYZ IN THE HOOD.  His Denzel Washington impersonation in "Boyz" only
hinted at his ability to strike at the heart of his movie characters,
but Loud tripe like CHILL FACTOR left a bad taste in my mouth for Cuba;
good to see that he's back on the right track in "Honor", playing a
heroic figure with enough personal ambition to keep his Carl Brashear,
human.  And though Billy Sunday is an amalgamation of many of the men
the real Carl Brashear served under, De Niro plays Sunday with a
fierceness I'm starting to think only De Niro is capable of; not too
melodramatic nor over-the-top, De Niro's Sunday was a character you
could love to hate, and hate to love, all at the same time.  Director
Tillman brought out the best in Gooding and De Niro, entertaining the
audience while we were being educated; and all the while, remembering
that while Brashear's story had an epic sweep, it had to remain a
personal story about what drove Carl to be the best.
Fortunately for "Honor", it had much more going for it than just the
talents of three good men.  Of the supporting cast, actor Michael
Rapaport must again be noted in my reviews.  Like fellow actor David
Morse, Rapaport's talent has been unsung for far too long.  This is the
third film I've seen him in in the last two months (the other two being
BAMBOOZLED and the otherwise-unmentionable LUCKY NUMBERS), and each
time, he's stood out among the crowd in noteworthy performances.  His
solid turn in "Honor", then, was expected, but nonetheless appreciated.
Somebody get this man a leading role! (Yeah, I know; but ZEBRAHEAD was a
long time ago...)
But the story itself, the history, the drama of it all, cannot be
ignored.  It's "easy" to make a movie about the Black struggle for
equality in America, and simply point at the racist White people and
institutions and say "Bad, Bad people! Bad, Bad institutions!".  That
"Honor" went deeper than that, went further past Brashear's struggles
with racism and told a more full story about Brashear's struggles with
*himself*, truly elevated this movie above the pack. The shame of it all
is that it takes movies like MEN OF HONOR and HBO's TUSKEEGEE AIRMEN to
teach some of us - me included - about many of Our Firsts; notably, Our
non-sporting and non-entertainment Firsts.  Sure, I was told of Jackie
Robinson in grade school, as I'm sure many of today's schoolkids are
being taught about him.  But what about pioneering Black cowboys, and
Black doctors, and Black airmen, and Black divers?  Are *these* heroes
being taught?  If not, shame on America's schools for "forgetting".
And, shame on America's parents - me included - for not making sure our
children have a more balanced education.
For students of American history, for those who knew but forgot, for
those who are deluded into thinking It's All In The Distant Past, for
those who want to remember American war heroes - or even for those who
just want to see a damn good movie, MEN OF HONOR is a must-see.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I grouse a lot about the state of mainstream Black Cinema in the States;
and though it still walks on wobbly legs, looking back at this year
alone, I recall many good projects starring, and helmed by, talented
Black actors, actresses, writers and directors.  George Tillman Jr,
director of "Honor" and SOUL FOOD, can certainly be counted amongst
those talented folks; and with MEN OF HONOR, he raises the stakes
significantly.  The question is not "Will Tillman's name be added to the
list of America's most talented *Black* directors?"; the question is
"Will Tillman's name be added to the list of America's most talented
*directors*?"  Period.
To read what The Man Himself has to say on the subject of Black
directors making movies these days, check out the interview with George
Tillman Jr. in the online edition of the "Atlanta Journal &
Constitution"  at
http://www.accessatlanta.com/partners/ajc/epaper/editions/friday/preview
_a3b0456cf394f13f00ab.html> (my thanks go to 3BC "Viewer Voices"
webboard regular "Los2" for the link).
Bammer's Bottom Line:
On a personal level, MEN OF HONOR was a inspiring tale of one man's
triumph over adversity; and on the larger scale, a wonderful way to
honor our nation's war heroes on Veterans Day.  Even those who had to be
dragged, kicking and screaming, toward a truly integrated military.
MEN OF HONOR (rating: greenlight):
Jumbe, Daddy - thanks for serving your Country as you did.

Title
Review for Proof of Life (2000)
PROOF OF LIFE (2000)
Rated R; running time 135 minutes
Genre: Drama
Seen at: Celebration Cinema (Lansing, Michigan)
Official site: http://www.proofoflife.com/
IMDB site: http://us.imdb.com/Details?0228750
Written by: Tony Gilroy (based on an article by William Prochnau)
Directed by: Taylor Hackford
Cast: Meg Ryan, Russell Crowe, David Morse, David Caruso, Pamela Reed,
Wolframio Benavides, Michael Kitchen, Daniel Lugo, Mario Sanchez,
Pietro Sibille
Review Copyright Rose Cooper, 2000
Review URL: http://www.3blackchicks.com/bamsproof.html
You Know Your Movie's In Trouble When...the normally stoic David Caruso
is the most lively person on screen.
The Story (WARNING: **spoilers contained below**):
Peter Bowman (David Morse), an Engineer for a multinational oil company
trying to build a well (as cover for their ultimate goal: to build an
oil pipeline which just so happens to be on the same lines as a drug
field), is kidnapped by the ELT, a South American Rebel Faction that is
more interested in "earning" money than in political gain.  After the
company which sent Peter to that country fails to support Peter in his
time of need, international kidnap and ransom agent Terry Thorne
(Russell Crowe), Terry's friend and partner, Dino (David Caruso), and
Peter's wife Alice (Meg Ryan), work closely together to try and bring
Peter safely home.  So closely together, in fact, that Terry starts
developing Feelings for Alice.
The Upshot:
The thing I hate most about yellowlight-worthy flicks is that while
there's not a lot *good* to point out within them, there's also nothing
so irreparably and completely *bad* about them that they won't give
*somebody* the idea to rant at me about why I keep Picking On their Star
Du Jour.  I'd druther have strong feelings about a movie, one way or
another, that would allow me to vigorously defend my stance to said
ranter.  Ambivalence sucks.
One positive thing PROOF OF LIFE had going for it, admittedly, was one
of the best character actors working today.  In the limited screen time
he had, David Morse as the kidnapee, far outclassed the rest of the
field; his was the only character of the bunch that I gave two figs
about coming out alive.
Meg Ryan's Damsel In Distress, in the person of Alice Bowman, at least
had the good graces to not be the same airheaded so-and-so Ryan seemed
so eager to play as a young Hollywood actress.  Indeed, her Alice was
reminiscent of one of Ryan's strongest characters yet, the
tough-as-nails Military Chick in COURAGE UNDER FIRE; Alice even *cries*
like Ryan's "Courage" character.  Which is to say, Alice had a very Been
There, Done That feel to her.  And though Crowe must still be riding
high from the success of GLADIATOR from earlier this year, he apparently
decided to play it safe in a minimally-defined role that might've been
much more interesting had it been more fully fleshed-out.
Of the supporters, Wolframio Benavides (as Juaco, the Hot-Headed Rebel)
and Morse shared a few interesting moments as a captor and his willful
captive; unfortunately, those moments weren't allowed enough room to
breathe and grow into a full-fleged Defining Event for either of the
actors or their characters.  Of the remaining main supporters, Pamela
Reed was far too screechy as Peter's older sister; and Caruso - who I so
dearly loved as Detective Kelly in his infamous NYPD BLUE role - *very*
quickly wore out his wildly-overacting welcome in a questionably
humorous supporting part.
The direction and writing was as unremarkable as the South American
scenery was beautiful; drop Stallone's "Rambo" in that jungle, maybe
you'd have a more thrilling (if not Meaningful) story.  The most
irritating thing about "Proof" is that it took forever to get to an
easily-anticipated Point that could've been more quickly achieved with
well more than half of it edited out.  My husband said it best when he,
uncharacteristically, left the theater to get a pop refill - and wasn't
very concerned about what he might miss in doing so.
The "Black Factor" [ObDisclaimer: We Are Not A Monolith]:
I don't think I've had a "Latino Factor" yet.  To be honest, I don't
know if I'm qualified to address their Issues, especially not those
concerning [insert Latin/South American country here]'s Drug Trafficking
Problem.  Hell, I'm not really even sure what the proper terminology
used to address those who my fellow Americans once blindly grouped as
"Mexicans", would be ("Hispanic"?  "Latino"? Or as I've commonly heard
in the vernacular lately, "Brown"?)
I'd be more than happy to Lend This Space to someone more knowledgeable
of the LF than myself. While you're at it, I'd like to know if it's Just
Me, or is anyone else tired of the brunt of the blame for the
consequences of America's War On [Some] Drugs, being laid entirely at
the feet of [insert Latin/South American country here], with no blame
being assigned to the War On [Some] Drugs itself?
[Contestant]: "I'll take 'Proof Of Life' for $200, Alex"
[Alex]:  "It's our first Daily Double! The answer: 'What paramedics were
checking for after catatonic-looking audience members left the new movie
starring Russell Crowe and Meg Ryan...'"
PROOF OF LIFE (rating: yellowlight):
PROOF OF LIFE committed the unforgivable act of boring me to death.
